




INTRODUCTION.

In what relation the Apology of Plato stands to the real defence of
Socrates, there are no means of determining.  It certainly agrees in tone
and character with the description of Xenophon, who says in the Memorabilia
that Socrates might have been acquitted 'if in any moderate degree he would
have conciliated the favour of the dicasts;' and who informs us in another
passage, on the testimony of Hermogenes, the friend of Socrates, that he
had no wish to live; and that the divine sign refused to allow him to
prepare a defence, and also that Socrates himself declared this to be
unnecessary, on the ground that all his life long he had been preparing
against that hour.  For the speech breathes throughout a spirit of
defiance, (ut non supplex aut reus sed magister aut dominus videretur esse
judicum' (Cic. de Orat.); and the loose and desultory style is an imitation
of the 'accustomed manner' in which Socrates spoke in 'the agora and among
the tables of the money-changers.'  The allusion in the Crito may, perhaps,
be adduced as a further evidence of the literal accuracy of some parts. 
But in the main it must be regarded as the ideal of Socrates, according to
Plato's conception of him, appearing in the greatest and most public scene
of his life, and in the height of his triumph, when he is weakest, and yet
his mastery over mankind is greatest, and his habitual irony acquires a new
meaning and a sort of tragic pathos in the face of death.  The facts of his
life are summed up, and the features of his character are brought out as if
by accident in the course of the defence.  The conversational manner, the
seeming want of arrangement, the ironical simplicity, are found to result
in a perfect work of art, which is the portrait of Socrates.

Yet some of the topics may have been actually used by Socrates; and the
recollection of his very words may have rung in the ears of his disciple. 
The Apology of Plato may be compared generally with those speeches of
Thucydides in which he has embodied his conception of the lofty character
and policy of the great Pericles, and which at the same time furnish a
commentary on the situation of affairs from the point of view of the
historian.  So in the Apology there is an ideal rather than a literal
truth; much is said which was not said, and is only Plato's view of the
situation.  Plato was not, like Xenophon, a chronicler of facts; he does
not appear in any of his writings to have aimed at literal accuracy.  He is
not therefore to be supplemented from the Memorabilia and Symposium of
Xenophon, who belongs to an entirely different class of writers.  The
Apology of Plato is not the report of what Socrates said, but an elaborate
composition, quite as much so in fact as one of the Dialogues.  And we may
perhaps even indulge in the fancy that the actual defence of Socrates was
as much greater than the Platonic defence as the master was greater than
the disciple.  But in any case, some of the words used by him must have
been remembered, and some of the facts recorded must have actually
occurred.  It is significant that Plato is said to have been present at the
defence (Apol.), as he is also said to have been absent at the last scene
in the Phaedo.  Is it fanciful to suppose that he meant to give the stamp
of authenticity to the one and not to the other?--especially when we
consider that these two passages are the only ones in which Plato makes
mention of himself.  The circumstance that Plato was to be one of his
sureties for the payment of the fine which he proposed has the appearance
of truth.  More suspicious is the statement that Socrates received the
first impulse to his favourite calling of cross-examining the world from
the Oracle of Delphi; for he must already have been famous before
Chaerephon went to consult the Oracle (Riddell), and the story is of a kind
which is very likely to have been invented.  On the whole we arrive at the
conclusion that the Apology is true to the character of Socrates, but we
cannot show that any single sentence in it was actually spoken by him.  It
breathes the spirit of Socrates, but has been cast anew in the mould of
Plato.

There is not much in the other Dialogues which can be compared with the
Apology.  The same recollection of his master may have been present to the
mind of Plato when depicting the sufferings of the Just in the Republic. 
The Crito may also be regarded as a sort of appendage to the Apology, in
which Socrates, who has defied the judges, is nevertheless represented as
scrupulously obedient to the laws.  The idealization of the sufferer is
carried still further in the Gorgias, in which the thesis is maintained,
that 'to suffer is better than to do evil;' and the art of rhetoric is
described as only useful for the purpose of self-accusation.  The
parallelisms which occur in the so-called Apology of Xenophon are not worth
noticing, because the writing in which they are contained is manifestly
spurious.  The statements of the Memorabilia respecting the trial and death
of Socrates agree generally with Plato; but they have lost the flavour of
Socratic irony in the narrative of Xenophon.

The Apology or Platonic defence of Socrates is divided into three parts: 
1st. The defence properly so called; 2nd. The shorter address in mitigation
of the penalty; 3rd. The last words of prophetic rebuke and exhortation.

The first part commences with an apology for his colloquial style; he is,
as he has always been, the enemy of rhetoric, and knows of no rhetoric but
truth; he will not falsify his character by making a speech.  Then he
proceeds to divide his accusers into two classes; first, there is the
nameless accuser--public opinion.  All the world from their earliest years
had heard that he was a corrupter of youth, and had seen him caricatured in
the Clouds of Aristophanes.  Secondly, there are the professed accusers,
who are but the mouth-piece of the others.  The accusations of both might
be summed up in a formula.  The first say, 'Socrates is an evil-doer and a
curious person, searching into things under the earth and above the heaven;
and making the worse appear the better cause, and teaching all this to
others.'  The second, 'Socrates is an evil-doer and corrupter of the youth,
who does not receive the gods whom the state receives, but introduces other
new divinities.'  These last words appear to have been the actual
indictment (compare Xen. Mem.); and the previous formula, which is a
summary of public opinion, assumes the same legal style.

The answer begins by clearing up a confusion.  In the representations of
the Comic poets, and in the opinion of the multitude, he had been
identified with the teachers of physical science and with the Sophists. 
But this was an error.  For both of them he professes a respect in the open
court, which contrasts with his manner of speaking about them in other
places.  (Compare for Anaxagoras, Phaedo, Laws; for the Sophists, Meno,
Republic, Tim., Theaet., Soph., etc.)  But at the same time he shows that
he is not one of them.  Of natural philosophy he knows nothing; not that he
despises such pursuits, but the fact is that he is ignorant of them, and
never says a word about them.  Nor is he paid for giving instruction--that
is another mistaken notion:--he has nothing to teach.  But he commends
Evenus for teaching virtue at such a 'moderate' rate as five minae. 
Something of the 'accustomed irony,' which may perhaps be expected to sleep
in the ear of the multitude, is lurking here.

He then goes on to explain the reason why he is in such an evil name.  That
had arisen out of a peculiar mission which he had taken upon himself.  The
enthusiastic Chaerephon (probably in anticipation of the answer which he
received) had gone to Delphi and asked the oracle if there was any man
wiser than Socrates; and the answer was, that there was no man wiser.  What
could be the meaning of this--that he who knew nothing, and knew that he
knew nothing, should be declared by the oracle to be the wisest of men? 
Reflecting upon the answer, he determined to refute it by finding 'a
wiser;' and first he went to the politicians, and then to the poets, and
then to the craftsmen, but always with the same result--he found that they
knew nothing, or hardly anything more than himself; and that the little
advantage which in some cases they possessed was more than counter-balanced
by their conceit of knowledge.  He knew nothing, and knew that he knew
nothing:  they knew little or nothing, and imagined that they knew all
things.  Thus he had passed his life as a sort of missionary in detecting
the pretended wisdom of mankind; and this occupation had quite absorbed him
and taken him away both from public and private affairs.  Young men of the
richer sort had made a pastime of the same pursuit, 'which was not
unamusing.'  And hence bitter enmities had arisen; the professors of
knowledge had revenged themselves by calling him a villainous corrupter of
youth, and by repeating the commonplaces about atheism and materialism and
sophistry, which are the stock-accusations against all philosophers when
there is nothing else to be said of them.

The second accusation he meets by interrogating Meletus, who is present and
can be interrogated.  'If he is the corrupter, who is the improver of the
citizens?'  (Compare Meno.)  'All men everywhere.'  But how absurd, how
contrary to analogy is this!  How inconceivable too, that he should make
the citizens worse when he has to live with them.  This surely cannot be
intentional; and if unintentional, he ought to have been instructed by
Meletus, and not accused in the court.

But there is another part of the indictment which says that he teaches men
not to receive the gods whom the city receives, and has other new gods. 
'Is that the way in which he is supposed to corrupt the youth?'  'Yes, it
is.'  'Has he only new gods, or none at all?'  'None at all.'  'What, not
even the sun and moon?'  'No; why, he says that the sun is a stone, and the
moon earth.'  That, replies Socrates, is the old confusion about
Anaxagoras; the Athenian people are not so ignorant as to attribute to the
influence of Socrates notions which have found their way into the drama,
and may be learned at the theatre.  Socrates undertakes to show that
Meletus (rather unjustifiably) has been compounding a riddle in this part
of the indictment:  'There are no gods, but Socrates believes in the
existence of the sons of gods, which is absurd.'

Leaving Meletus, who has had enough words spent upon him, he returns to the
original accusation.  The question may be asked, Why will he persist in
following a profession which leads him to death?  Why?--because he must
remain at his post where the god has placed him, as he remained at
Potidaea, and Amphipolis, and Delium, where the generals placed him. 
Besides, he is not so overwise as to imagine that he knows whether death is
a good or an evil; and he is certain that desertion of his duty is an evil. 
Anytus is quite right in saying that they should never have indicted him if
they meant to let him go.  For he will certainly obey God rather than man;
and will continue to preach to all men of all ages the necessity of virtue
and improvement; and if they refuse to listen to him he will still
persevere and reprove them.  This is his way of corrupting the youth, which
he will not cease to follow in obedience to the god, even if a thousand
deaths await him.

He is desirous that they should let him live--not for his own sake, but for
theirs; because he is their heaven-sent friend (and they will never have
such another), or, as he may be ludicrously described, he is the gadfly who
stirs the generous steed into motion.  Why then has he never taken part in
public affairs?  Because the familiar divine voice has hindered him; if he
had been a public man, and had fought for the right, as he would certainly
have fought against the many, he would not have lived, and could therefore
have done no good.  Twice in public matters he has risked his life for the
sake of justice--once at the trial of the generals; and again in resistance
to the tyrannical commands of the Thirty.

But, though not a public man, he has passed his days in instructing the
citizens without fee or reward--this was his mission.  Whether his
disciples have turned out well or ill, he cannot justly be charged with the
result, for he never promised to teach them anything.  They might come if
they liked, and they might stay away if they liked:  and they did come,
because they found an amusement in hearing the pretenders to wisdom
detected.  If they have been corrupted, their elder relatives (if not
themselves) might surely come into court and witness against him, and there
is an opportunity still for them to appear.  But their fathers and brothers
all appear in court (including 'this' Plato), to witness on his behalf; and
if their relatives are corrupted, at least they are uncorrupted; 'and they
are my witnesses.  For they know that I am speaking the truth, and that
Meletus is lying.'

This is about all that he has to say.  He will not entreat the judges to
spare his life; neither will he present a spectacle of weeping children,
although he, too, is not made of 'rock or oak.'  Some of the judges
themselves may have complied with this practice on similar occasions, and
he trusts that they will not be angry with him for not following their
example.  But he feels that such conduct brings discredit on the name of
Athens:  he feels too, that the judge has sworn not to give away justice;
and he cannot be guilty of the impiety of asking the judge to break his
oath, when he is himself being tried for impiety.

As he expected, and probably intended, he is convicted.  And now the tone
of the speech, instead of being more conciliatory, becomes more lofty and
commanding.  Anytus proposes death as the penalty:  and what counter-
proposition shall he make?  He, the benefactor of the Athenian people,
whose whole life has been spent in doing them good, should at least have
the Olympic victor's reward of maintenance in the Prytaneum.  Or why should
he propose any counter-penalty when he does not know whether death, which
Anytus proposes, is a good or an evil?  And he is certain that imprisonment
is an evil, exile is an evil.  Loss of money might be an evil, but then he
has none to give; perhaps he can make up a mina.  Let that be the penalty,
or, if his friends wish, thirty minae; for which they will be excellent
securities.

(He is condemned to death.)

He is an old man already, and the Athenians will gain nothing but disgrace
by depriving him of a few years of life.  Perhaps he could have escaped, if
he had chosen to throw down his arms and entreat for his life.  But he does
not at all repent of the manner of his defence; he would rather die in his
own fashion than live in theirs.  For the penalty of unrighteousness is
swifter than death; that penalty has already overtaken his accusers as
death will soon overtake him.

And now, as one who is about to die, he will prophesy to them.  They have
put him to death in order to escape the necessity of giving an account of
their lives.  But his death 'will be the seed' of many disciples who will
convince them of their evil ways, and will come forth to reprove them in
harsher terms, because they are younger and more inconsiderate.

He would like to say a few words, while there is time, to those who would
have acquitted him.  He wishes them to know that the divine sign never
interrupted him in the course of his defence; the reason of which, as he
conjectures, is that the death to which he is going is a good and not an
evil.  For either death is a long sleep, the best of sleeps, or a journey
to another world in which the souls of the dead are gathered together, and
in which there may be a hope of seeing the heroes of old--in which, too,
there are just judges; and as all are immortal, there can be no fear of any
one suffering death for his opinions.

Nothing evil can happen to the good man either in life or death, and his
own death has been permitted by the gods, because it was better for him to
depart; and therefore he forgives his judges because they have done him no
harm, although they never meant to do him any good.

He has a last request to make to them--that they will trouble his sons as
he has troubled them, if they appear to prefer riches to virtue, or to
think themselves something when they are nothing.

...

'Few persons will be found to wish that Socrates should have defended
himself otherwise,'--if, as we must add, his defence was that with which
Plato has provided him.  But leaving this question, which does not admit of
a precise solution, we may go on to ask what was the impression which Plato
in the Apology intended to give of the character and conduct of his master
in the last great scene?  Did he intend to represent him (1) as employing
sophistries; (2) as designedly irritating the judges?  Or are these
sophistries to be regarded as belonging to the age in which he lived and to
his personal character, and this apparent haughtiness as flowing from the
natural elevation of his position?

For example, when he says that it is absurd to suppose that one man is the
corrupter and all the rest of the world the improvers of the youth; or,
when he argues that he never could have corrupted the men with whom he had
to live; or, when he proves his belief in the gods because he believes in
the sons of gods, is he serious or jesting?  It may be observed that these
sophisms all occur in his cross-examination of Meletus, who is easily
foiled and mastered in the hands of the great dialectician.  Perhaps he
regarded these answers as good enough for his accuser, of whom he makes
very light.  Also there is a touch of irony in them, which takes them out
of the category of sophistry.  (Compare Euthyph.)

That the manner in which he defends himself about the lives of his
disciples is not satisfactory, can hardly be denied.  Fresh in the memory
of the Athenians, and detestable as they deserved to be to the newly
restored democracy, were the names of Alcibiades, Critias, Charmides.  It
is obviously not a sufficient answer that Socrates had never professed to
teach them anything, and is therefore not justly chargeable with their
crimes.  Yet the defence, when taken out of this ironical form, is
doubtless sound:  that his teaching had nothing to do with their evil
lives.  Here, then, the sophistry is rather in form than in substance,
though we might desire that to such a serious charge Socrates had given a
more serious answer.

Truly characteristic of Socrates is another point in his answer, which may
also be regarded as sophistical.  He says that 'if he has corrupted the
youth, he must have corrupted them involuntarily.'  But if, as Socrates
argues, all evil is involuntary, then all criminals ought to be admonished
and not punished.  In these words the Socratic doctrine of the
involuntariness of evil is clearly intended to be conveyed.  Here again, as
in the former instance, the defence of Socrates is untrue practically, but
may be true in some ideal or transcendental sense.  The commonplace reply,
that if he had been guilty of corrupting the youth their relations would
surely have witnessed against him, with which he concludes this part of his
defence, is more satisfactory.

Again, when Socrates argues that he must believe in the gods because he
believes in the sons of gods, we must remember that this is a refutation
not of the original indictment, which is consistent enough--'Socrates does
not receive the gods whom the city receives, and has other new divinities'
--but of the interpretation put upon the words by Meletus, who has affirmed
that he is a downright atheist.  To this Socrates fairly answers, in
accordance with the ideas of the time, that a downright atheist cannot
believe in the sons of gods or in divine things.  The notion that demons or
lesser divinities are the sons of gods is not to be regarded as ironical or
sceptical.  He is arguing 'ad hominem' according to the notions of
mythology current in his age.  Yet he abstains from saying that he believed
in the gods whom the State approved.  He does not defend himself, as
Xenophon has defended him, by appealing to his practice of religion. 
Probably he neither wholly believed, nor disbelieved, in the existence of
the popular gods; he had no means of knowing about them.  According to
Plato (compare Phaedo; Symp.), as well as Xenophon (Memor.), he was
punctual in the performance of the least religious duties; and he must have
believed in his own oracular sign, of which he seemed to have an internal
witness.  But the existence of Apollo or Zeus, or the other gods whom the
State approves, would have appeared to him both uncertain and unimportant
in comparison of the duty of self-examination, and of those principles of
truth and right which he deemed to be the foundation of religion.  (Compare
Phaedr.; Euthyph.; Republic.)

The second question, whether Plato meant to represent Socrates as braving
or irritating his judges, must also be answered in the negative.  His
irony, his superiority, his audacity, 'regarding not the person of man,'
necessarily flow out of the loftiness of his situation.  He is not acting a
part upon a great occasion, but he is what he has been all his life long,
'a king of men.'  He would rather not appear insolent, if he could avoid it
(ouch os authadizomenos touto lego).  Neither is he desirous of hastening
his own end, for life and death are simply indifferent to him.  But such a
defence as would be acceptable to his judges and might procure an
acquittal, it is not in his nature to make.  He will not say or do anything
that might pervert the course of justice; he cannot have his tongue bound
even 'in the throat of death.'  With his accusers he will only fence and
play, as he had fenced with other 'improvers of youth,' answering the
Sophist according to his sophistry all his life long.  He is serious when
he is speaking of his own mission, which seems to distinguish him from all
other reformers of mankind, and originates in an accident.  The dedication
of himself to the improvement of his fellow-citizens is not so remarkable
as the ironical spirit in which he goes about doing good only in
vindication of the credit of the oracle, and in the vain hope of finding a
wiser man than himself.  Yet this singular and almost accidental character
of his mission agrees with the divine sign which, according to our notions,
is equally accidental and irrational, and is nevertheless accepted by him
as the guiding principle of his life.  Socrates is nowhere represented to
us as a freethinker or sceptic.  There is no reason to doubt his sincerity
when he speculates on the possibility of seeing and knowing the heroes of
the Trojan war in another world.  On the other hand, his hope of
immortality is uncertain;--he also conceives of death as a long sleep (in
this respect differing from the Phaedo), and at last falls back on
resignation to the divine will, and the certainty that no evil can happen
to the good man either in life or death.  His absolute truthfulness seems
to hinder him from asserting positively more than this; and he makes no
attempt to veil his ignorance in mythology and figures of speech.  The
gentleness of the first part of the speech contrasts with the aggravated,
almost threatening, tone of the conclusion.  He characteristically remarks
that he will not speak as a rhetorician, that is to say, he will not make a
regular defence such as Lysias or one of the orators might have composed
for him, or, according to some accounts, did compose for him.  But he first
procures himself a hearing by conciliatory words.  He does not attack the
Sophists; for they were open to the same charges as himself; they were
equally ridiculed by the Comic poets, and almost equally hateful to Anytus
and Meletus.  Yet incidentally the antagonism between Socrates and the
Sophists is allowed to appear.  He is poor and they are rich; his
profession that he teaches nothing is opposed to their readiness to teach
all things; his talking in the marketplace to their private instructions;
his tarry-at-home life to their wandering from city to city.  The tone
which he assumes towards them is one of real friendliness, but also of
concealed irony.  Towards Anaxagoras, who had disappointed him in his hopes
of learning about mind and nature, he shows a less kindly feeling, which is
also the feeling of Plato in other passages (Laws).  But Anaxagoras had
been dead thirty years, and was beyond the reach of persecution.

It has been remarked that the prophecy of a new generation of teachers who
would rebuke and exhort the Athenian people in harsher and more violent
terms was, as far as we know, never fulfilled.  No inference can be drawn
from this circumstance as to the probability of the words attributed to him
having been actually uttered.  They express the aspiration of the first
martyr of philosophy, that he would leave behind him many followers,
accompanied by the not unnatural feeling that they would be fiercer and
more inconsiderate in their words when emancipated from his control.

The above remarks must be understood as applying with any degree of
certainty to the Platonic Socrates only.  For, although these or similar
words may have been spoken by Socrates himself, we cannot exclude the
possibility, that like so much else, e.g. the wisdom of Critias, the poem
of Solon, the virtues of Charmides, they may have been due only to the
imagination of Plato.  The arguments of those who maintain that the Apology
was composed during the process, resting on no evidence, do not require a
serious refutation.  Nor are the reasonings of Schleiermacher, who argues
that the Platonic defence is an exact or nearly exact reproduction of the
words of Socrates, partly because Plato would not have been guilty of the
impiety of altering them, and also because many points of the defence might
have been improved and strengthened, at all more conclusive.  (See English
Translation.)  What effect the death of Socrates produced on the mind of
Plato, we cannot certainly determine; nor can we say how he would or must
have written under the circumstances.  We observe that the enmity of
Aristophanes to Socrates does not prevent Plato from introducing them
together in the Symposium engaged in friendly intercourse.  Nor is there
any trace in the Dialogues of an attempt to make Anytus or Meletus
personally odious in the eyes of the Athenian public.


APOLOGY

by

Plato

Translated by Benjamin Jowett


How you, O Athenians, have been affected by my accusers, I cannot tell; but
I know that they almost made me forget who I was--so persuasively did they
speak; and yet they have hardly uttered a word of truth.  But of the many
falsehoods told by them, there was one which quite amazed me;--I mean when
they said that you should be upon your guard and not allow yourselves to be
deceived by the force of my eloquence.  To say this, when they were certain
to be detected as soon as I opened my lips and proved myself to be anything
but a great speaker, did indeed appear to me most shameless--unless by the
force of eloquence they mean the force of truth; for is such is their
meaning, I admit that I am eloquent.  But in how different a way from
theirs!  Well, as I was saying, they have scarcely spoken the truth at all;
but from me you shall hear the whole truth:  not, however, delivered after
their manner in a set oration duly ornamented with words and phrases. No,
by heaven! but I shall use the words and arguments which occur to me at the
moment; for I am confident in the justice of my cause (Or, I am certain
that I am right in taking this course.):  at my time of life I ought not to
be appearing before you, O men of Athens, in the character of a juvenile
orator--let no one expect it of me.  And I must beg of you to grant me a
favour:--If I defend myself in my accustomed manner, and you hear me using
the words which I have been in the habit of using in the agora, at the
tables of the money-changers, or anywhere else, I would ask you not to be
surprised, and not to interrupt me on this account.  For I am more than
seventy years of age, and appearing now for the first time in a court of
law, I am quite a stranger to the language of the place; and therefore I
would have you regard me as if I were really a stranger, whom you would
excuse if he spoke in his native tongue, and after the fashion of his
country:--Am I making an unfair request of you?  Never mind the manner,
which may or may not be good; but think only of the truth of my words, and
give heed to that:  let the speaker speak truly and the judge decide
justly.

And first, I have to reply to the older charges and to my first accusers,
and then I will go on to the later ones.  For of old I have had many
accusers, who have accused me falsely to you during many years; and I am
more afraid of them than of Anytus and his associates, who are dangerous,
too, in their own way.  But far more dangerous are the others, who began
when you were children, and took possession of your minds with their
falsehoods, telling of one Socrates, a wise man, who speculated about the
heaven above, and searched into the earth beneath, and made the worse
appear the better cause.  The disseminators of this tale are the accusers
whom I dread; for their hearers are apt to fancy that such enquirers do not
believe in the existence of the gods.  And they are many, and their charges
against me are of ancient date, and they were made by them in the days when
you were more impressible than you are now--in childhood, or it may have
been in youth--and the cause when heard went by default, for there was none
to answer.  And hardest of all, I do not know and cannot tell the names of
my accusers; unless in the chance case of a Comic poet.  All who from envy
and malice have persuaded you--some of them having first convinced
themselves--all this class of men are most difficult to deal with; for I
cannot have them up here, and cross-examine them, and therefore I must
simply fight with shadows in my own defence, and argue when there is no one
who answers.  I will ask you then to assume with me, as I was saying, that
my opponents are of two kinds; one recent, the other ancient:  and I hope
that you will see the propriety of my answering the latter first, for these
accusations you heard long before the others, and much oftener.

Well, then, I must make my defence, and endeavour to clear away in a short
time, a slander which has lasted a long time.  May I succeed, if to succeed
be for my good and yours, or likely to avail me in my cause!  The task is
not an easy one; I quite understand the nature of it.  And so leaving the
event with God, in obedience to the law I will now make my defence.

I will begin at the beginning, and ask what is the accusation which has
given rise to the slander of me, and in fact has encouraged Meletus to
proof this charge against me.  Well, what do the slanderers say?  They
shall be my prosecutors, and I will sum up their words in an affidavit: 
'Socrates is an evil-doer, and a curious person, who searches into things
under the earth and in heaven, and he makes the worse appear the better
cause; and he teaches the aforesaid doctrines to others.'  Such is the
nature of the accusation:  it is just what you have yourselves seen in the
comedy of Aristophanes (Aristoph., Clouds.), who has introduced a man whom
he calls Socrates, going about and saying that he walks in air, and talking
a deal of nonsense concerning matters of which I do not pretend to know
either much or little--not that I mean to speak disparagingly of any one
who is a student of natural philosophy.  I should be very sorry if Meletus
could bring so grave a charge against me.  But the simple truth is, O
Athenians, that I have nothing to do with physical speculations.  Very many
of those here present are witnesses to the truth of this, and to them I
appeal.  Speak then, you who have heard me, and tell your neighbours
whether any of you have ever known me hold forth in few words or in many
upon such matters...You hear their answer.  And from what they say of this
part of the charge you will be able to judge of the truth of the rest.

As little foundation is there for the report that I am a teacher, and take
money; this accusation has no more truth in it than the other.  Although,
if a man were really able to instruct mankind, to receive money for giving
instruction would, in my opinion, be an honour to him.  There is Gorgias of
Leontium, and Prodicus of Ceos, and Hippias of Elis, who go the round of
the cities, and are able to persuade the young men to leave their own
citizens by whom they might be taught for nothing, and come to them whom
they not only pay, but are thankful if they may be allowed to pay them. 
There is at this time a Parian philosopher residing in Athens, of whom I
have heard; and I came to hear of him in this way:--I came across a man who
has spent a world of money on the Sophists, Callias, the son of Hipponicus,
and knowing that he had sons, I asked him:  'Callias,' I said, 'if your two
sons were foals or calves, there would be no difficulty in finding some one
to put over them; we should hire a trainer of horses, or a farmer probably,
who would improve and perfect them in their own proper virtue and
excellence; but as they are human beings, whom are you thinking of placing
over them?  Is there any one who understands human and political virtue? 
You must have thought about the matter, for you have sons; is there any
one?'  'There is,' he said.  'Who is he?' said I; 'and of what country? and
what does he charge?'  'Evenus the Parian,' he replied; 'he is the man, and
his charge is five minae.'  Happy is Evenus, I said to myself, if he really
has this wisdom, and teaches at such a moderate charge.  Had I the same, I
should have been very proud and conceited; but the truth is that I have no
knowledge of the kind.

I dare say, Athenians, that some one among you will reply, 'Yes, Socrates,
but what is the origin of these accusations which are brought against you;
there must have been something strange which you have been doing?  All
these rumours and this talk about you would never have arisen if you had
been like other men:  tell us, then, what is the cause of them, for we
should be sorry to judge hastily of you.'  Now I regard this as a fair
challenge, and I will endeavour to explain to you the reason why I am
called wise and have such an evil fame.  Please to attend then.  And
although some of you may think that I am joking, I declare that I will tell
you the entire truth.  Men of Athens, this reputation of mine has come of a
certain sort of wisdom which I possess.  If you ask me what kind of wisdom,
I reply, wisdom such as may perhaps be attained by man, for to that extent
I am inclined to believe that I am wise; whereas the persons of whom I was
speaking have a superhuman wisdom which I may fail to describe, because I
have it not myself; and he who says that I have, speaks falsely, and is
taking away my character.  And here, O men of Athens, I must beg you not to
interrupt me, even if I seem to say something extravagant.  For the word
which I will speak is not mine.  I will refer you to a witness who is
worthy of credit; that witness shall be the God of Delphi--he will tell you
about my wisdom, if I have any, and of what sort it is.  You must have
known Chaerephon; he was early a friend of mine, and also a friend of
yours, for he shared in the recent exile of the people, and returned with
you.  Well, Chaerephon, as you know, was very impetuous in all his doings,
and he went to Delphi and boldly asked the oracle to tell him whether--as I
was saying, I must beg you not to interrupt--he asked the oracle to tell
him whether anyone was wiser than I was, and the Pythian prophetess
answered, that there was no man wiser.  Chaerephon is dead himself; but his
brother, who is in court, will confirm the truth of what I am saying.

Why do I mention this?  Because I am going to explain to you why I have
such an evil name.  When I heard the answer, I said to myself, What can the
god mean? and what is the interpretation of his riddle? for I know that I
have no wisdom, small or great.  What then can he mean when he says that I
am the wisest of men?  And yet he is a god, and cannot lie; that would be
against his nature.  After long consideration, I thought of a method of
trying the question.  I reflected that if I could only find a man wiser
than myself, then I might go to the god with a refutation in my hand.  I
should say to him, 'Here is a man who is wiser than I am; but you said that
I was the wisest.'  Accordingly I went to one who had the reputation of
wisdom, and observed him--his name I need not mention; he was a politician
whom I selected for examination--and the result was as follows:  When I
began to talk with him, I could not help thinking that he was not really
wise, although he was thought wise by many, and still wiser by himself; and
thereupon I tried to explain to him that he thought himself wise, but was
not really wise; and the consequence was that he hated me, and his enmity
was shared by several who were present and heard me.  So I left him, saying
to myself, as I went away:  Well, although I do not suppose that either of
us knows anything really beautiful and good, I am better off than he is,--
for he knows nothing, and thinks that he knows; I neither know nor think
that I know.  In this latter particular, then, I seem to have slightly the
advantage of him.  Then I went to another who had still higher pretensions
to wisdom, and my conclusion was exactly the same.  Whereupon I made
another enemy of him, and of many others besides him.

Then I went to one man after another, being not unconscious of the enmity
which I provoked, and I lamented and feared this:  but necessity was laid
upon me,--the word of God, I thought, ought to be considered first.  And I
said to myself, Go I must to all who appear to know, and find out the
meaning of the oracle.  And I swear to you, Athenians, by the dog I swear!
--for I must tell you the truth--the result of my mission was just this:  I
found that the men most in repute were all but the most foolish; and that
others less esteemed were really wiser and better.  I will tell you the
tale of my wanderings and of the 'Herculean' labours, as I may call them,
which I endured only to find at last the oracle irrefutable.  After the
politicians, I went to the poets; tragic, dithyrambic, and all sorts.  And
there, I said to myself, you will be instantly detected; now you will find
out that you are more ignorant than they are.  Accordingly, I took them
some of the most elaborate passages in their own writings, and asked what
was the meaning of them--thinking that they would teach me something.  Will
you believe me?  I am almost ashamed to confess the truth, but I must say
that there is hardly a person present who would not have talked better
about their poetry than they did themselves.  Then I knew that not by
wisdom do poets write poetry, but by a sort of genius and inspiration; they
are like diviners or soothsayers who also say many fine things, but do not
understand the meaning of them.  The poets appeared to me to be much in the
same case; and I further observed that upon the strength of their poetry
they believed themselves to be the wisest of men in other things in which
they were not wise.  So I departed, conceiving myself to be superior to
them for the same reason that I was superior to the politicians.

At last I went to the artisans.  I was conscious that I knew nothing at
all, as I may say, and I was sure that they knew many fine things; and here
I was not mistaken, for they did know many things of which I was ignorant,
and in this they certainly were wiser than I was.  But I observed that even
the good artisans fell into the same error as the poets;--because they were
good workmen they thought that they also knew all sorts of high matters,
and this defect in them overshadowed their wisdom; and therefore I asked
myself on behalf of the oracle, whether I would like to be as I was,
neither having their knowledge nor their ignorance, or like them in both;
and I made answer to myself and to the oracle that I was better off as I
was.

This inquisition has led to my having many enemies of the worst and most
dangerous kind, and has given occasion also to many calumnies.  And I am
called wise, for my hearers always imagine that I myself possess the wisdom
which I find wanting in others:  but the truth is, O men of Athens, that
God only is wise; and by his answer he intends to show that the wisdom of
men is worth little or nothing; he is not speaking of Socrates, he is only
using my name by way of illustration, as if he said, He, O men, is the
wisest, who, like Socrates, knows that his wisdom is in truth worth
nothing.  And so I go about the world, obedient to the god, and search and
make enquiry into the wisdom of any one, whether citizen or stranger, who
appears to be wise; and if he is not wise, then in vindication of the
oracle I show him that he is not wise; and my occupation quite absorbs me,
and I have no time to give either to any public matter of interest or to
any concern of my own, but I am in utter poverty by reason of my devotion
to the god.

There is another thing:--young men of the richer classes, who have not much
to do, come about me of their own accord; they like to hear the pretenders
examined, and they often imitate me, and proceed to examine others; there
are plenty of persons, as they quickly discover, who think that they know
something, but really know little or nothing; and then those who are
examined by them instead of being angry with themselves are angry with me: 
This confounded Socrates, they say; this villainous misleader of youth!--
and then if somebody asks them, Why, what evil does he practise or teach?
they do not know, and cannot tell; but in order that they may not appear to
be at a loss, they repeat the ready-made charges which are used against all
philosophers about teaching things up in the clouds and under the earth,
and having no gods, and making the worse appear the better cause; for they
do not like to confess that their pretence of knowledge has been detected--
which is the truth; and as they are numerous and ambitious and energetic,
and are drawn up in battle array and have persuasive tongues, they have
filled your ears with their loud and inveterate calumnies.  And this is the
reason why my three accusers, Meletus and Anytus and Lycon, have set upon
me; Meletus, who has a quarrel with me on behalf of the poets; Anytus, on
behalf of the craftsmen and politicians; Lycon, on behalf of the
rhetoricians:  and as I said at the beginning, I cannot expect to get rid
of such a mass of calumny all in a moment.  And this, O men of Athens, is
the truth and the whole truth; I have concealed nothing, I have dissembled
nothing.  And yet, I know that my plainness of speech makes them hate me,
and what is their hatred but a proof that I am speaking the truth?--Hence
has arisen the prejudice against me; and this is the reason of it, as you
will find out either in this or in any future enquiry.

I have said enough in my defence against the first class of my accusers; I
turn to the second class.  They are headed by Meletus, that good man and
true lover of his country, as he calls himself.  Against these, too, I must
try to make a defence:--Let their affidavit be read:  it contains something
of this kind:  It says that Socrates is a doer of evil, who corrupts the
youth; and who does not believe in the gods of the state, but has other new
divinities of his own.  Such is the charge; and now let us examine the
particular counts.  He says that I am a doer of evil, and corrupt the
youth; but I say, O men of Athens, that Meletus is a doer of evil, in that
he pretends to be in earnest when he is only in jest, and is so eager to
bring men to trial from a pretended zeal and interest about matters in
which he really never had the smallest interest.  And the truth of this I
will endeavour to prove to you.

Come hither, Meletus, and let me ask a question of you.  You think a great
deal about the improvement of youth?

Yes, I do.

Tell the judges, then, who is their improver; for you must know, as you
have taken the pains to discover their corrupter, and are citing and
accusing me before them.  Speak, then, and tell the judges who their
improver is.--Observe, Meletus, that you are silent, and have nothing to
say.  But is not this rather disgraceful, and a very considerable proof of
what I was saying, that you have no interest in the matter?  Speak up,
friend, and tell us who their improver is.

The laws.

But that, my good sir, is not my meaning.  I want to know who the person
is, who, in the first place, knows the laws.

The judges, Socrates, who are present in court.

What, do you mean to say, Meletus, that they are able to instruct and
improve youth?

Certainly they are.

What, all of them, or some only and not others?

All of them.

By the goddess Here, that is good news!  There are plenty of improvers,
then.  And what do you say of the audience,--do they improve them?

Yes, they do.

And the senators?

Yes, the senators improve them.

But perhaps the members of the assembly corrupt them?--or do they too
improve them?

They improve them.

Then every Athenian improves and elevates them; all with the exception of
myself; and I alone am their corrupter?  Is that what you affirm?

That is what I stoutly affirm.

I am very unfortunate if you are right.  But suppose I ask you a question: 
How about horses?  Does one man do them harm and all the world good?  Is
not the exact opposite the truth?  One man is able to do them good, or at
least not many;--the trainer of horses, that is to say, does them good, and
others who have to do with them rather injure them?  Is not that true,
Meletus, of horses, or of any other animals?  Most assuredly it is; whether
you and Anytus say yes or no.  Happy indeed would be the condition of youth
if they had one corrupter only, and all the rest of the world were their
improvers.  But you, Meletus, have sufficiently shown that you never had a
thought about the young:  your carelessness is seen in your not caring
about the very things which you bring against me.

And now, Meletus, I will ask you another question--by Zeus I will:  Which
is better, to live among bad citizens, or among good ones?  Answer, friend,
I say; the question is one which may be easily answered.  Do not the good
do their neighbours good, and the bad do them evil?

Certainly.

And is there anyone who would rather be injured than benefited by those who
live with him?  Answer, my good friend, the law requires you to answer--
does any one like to be injured?

Certainly not.

And when you accuse me of corrupting and deteriorating the youth, do you
allege that I corrupt them intentionally or unintentionally?

Intentionally, I say.

But you have just admitted that the good do their neighbours good, and the
evil do them evil.  Now, is that a truth which your superior wisdom has
recognized thus early in life, and am I, at my age, in such darkness and
ignorance as not to know that if a man with whom I have to live is
corrupted by me, I am very likely to be harmed by him; and yet I corrupt
him, and intentionally, too--so you say, although neither I nor any other
human being is ever likely to be convinced by you.  But either I do not
corrupt them, or I corrupt them unintentionally; and on either view of the
case you lie.  If my offence is unintentional, the law has no cognizance of
unintentional offences: you ought to have taken me privately, and warned
and admonished me; for if I had been better advised, I should have left off
doing what I only did unintentionally--no doubt I should; but you would
have nothing to say to me and refused to teach me.  And now you bring me up
in this court, which is a place not of instruction, but of punishment.

It will be very clear to you, Athenians, as I was saying, that Meletus has
no care at all, great or small, about the matter.  But still I should like
to know, Meletus, in what I am affirmed to corrupt the young.  I suppose
you mean, as I infer from your indictment, that I teach them not to
acknowledge the gods which the state acknowledges, but some other new
divinities or spiritual agencies in their stead.  These are the lessons by
which I corrupt the youth, as you say.

Yes, that I say emphatically.

Then, by the gods, Meletus, of whom we are speaking, tell me and the court,
in somewhat plainer terms, what you mean! for I do not as yet understand
whether you affirm that I teach other men to acknowledge some gods, and
therefore that I do believe in gods, and am not an entire atheist--this you
do not lay to my charge,--but only you say that they are not the same gods
which the city recognizes--the charge is that they are different gods.  Or,
do you mean that I am an atheist simply, and a teacher of atheism?

I mean the latter--that you are a complete atheist.

What an extraordinary statement!  Why do you think so, Meletus?  Do you
mean that I do not believe in the godhead of the sun or moon, like other
men?

I assure you, judges, that he does not:  for he says that the sun is stone,
and the moon earth.

Friend Meletus, you think that you are accusing Anaxagoras:  and you have
but a bad opinion of the judges, if you fancy them illiterate to such a
degree as not to know that these doctrines are found in the books of
Anaxagoras the Clazomenian, which are full of them.  And so, forsooth, the
youth are said to be taught them by Socrates, when there are not
unfrequently exhibitions of them at the theatre (Probably in allusion to
Aristophanes who caricatured, and to Euripides who borrowed the notions of
Anaxagoras, as well as to other dramatic poets.) (price of admission one
drachma at the most); and they might pay their money, and laugh at Socrates
if he pretends to father these extraordinary views.  And so, Meletus, you
really think that I do not believe in any god?

I swear by Zeus that you believe absolutely in none at all.

Nobody will believe you, Meletus, and I am pretty sure that you do not
believe yourself.  I cannot help thinking, men of Athens, that Meletus is
reckless and impudent, and that he has written this indictment in a spirit
of mere wantonness and youthful bravado.  Has he not compounded a riddle,
thinking to try me?  He said to himself:--I shall see whether the wise
Socrates will discover my facetious contradiction, or whether I shall be
able to deceive him and the rest of them.  For he certainly does appear to
me to contradict himself in the indictment as much as if he said that
Socrates is guilty of not believing in the gods, and yet of believing in
them--but this is not like a person who is in earnest.

I should like you, O men of Athens, to join me in examining what I conceive
to be his inconsistency; and do you, Meletus, answer.  And I must remind
the audience of my request that they would not make a disturbance if I
speak in my accustomed manner:

Did ever man, Meletus, believe in the existence of human things, and not of
human beings?...I wish, men of Athens, that he would answer, and not be
always trying to get up an interruption.  Did ever any man believe in
horsemanship, and not in horses? or in flute-playing, and not in flute-
players?  No, my friend; I will answer to you and to the court, as you
refuse to answer for yourself.  There is no man who ever did.  But now
please to answer the next question:  Can a man believe in spiritual and
divine agencies, and not in spirits or demigods?

He cannot.

How lucky I am to have extracted that answer, by the assistance of the
court!  But then you swear in the indictment that I teach and believe in
divine or spiritual agencies (new or old, no matter for that); at any rate,
I believe in spiritual agencies,--so you say and swear in the affidavit;
and yet if I believe in divine beings, how can I help believing in spirits
or demigods;--must I not?  To be sure I must; and therefore I may assume
that your silence gives consent.  Now what are spirits or demigods?  Are
they not either gods or the sons of gods?

Certainly they are.

But this is what I call the facetious riddle invented by you:  the demigods
or spirits are gods, and you say first that I do not believe in gods, and
then again that I do believe in gods; that is, if I believe in demigods. 
For if the demigods are the illegitimate sons of gods, whether by the
nymphs or by any other mothers, of whom they are said to be the sons--what
human being will ever believe that there are no gods if they are the sons
of gods?  You might as well affirm the existence of mules, and deny that of
horses and asses.  Such nonsense, Meletus, could only have been intended by
you to make trial of me.  You have put this into the indictment because you
had nothing real of which to accuse me.  But no one who has a particle of
understanding will ever be convinced by you that the same men can believe
in divine and superhuman things, and yet not believe that there are gods
and demigods and heroes.

I have said enough in answer to the charge of Meletus:  any elaborate
defence is unnecessary, but I know only too well how many are the enmities
which I have incurred, and this is what will be my destruction if I am
destroyed;--not Meletus, nor yet Anytus, but the envy and detraction of the
world, which has been the death of many good men, and will probably be the
death of many more; there is no danger of my being the last of them.

Some one will say:  And are you not ashamed, Socrates, of a course of life
which is likely to bring you to an untimely end?  To him I may fairly
answer:  There you are mistaken:  a man who is good for anything ought not
to calculate the chance of living or dying; he ought only to consider
whether in doing anything he is doing right or wrong--acting the part of a
good man or of a bad.  Whereas, upon your view, the heroes who fell at Troy
were not good for much, and the son of Thetis above all, who altogether
despised danger in comparison with disgrace; and when he was so eager to
slay Hector, his goddess mother said to him, that if he avenged his
companion Patroclus, and slew Hector, he would die himself--'Fate,' she
said, in these or the like words, 'waits for you next after Hector;' he,
receiving this warning, utterly despised danger and death, and instead of
fearing them, feared rather to live in dishonour, and not to avenge his
friend.  'Let me die forthwith,' he replies, 'and be avenged of my enemy,
rather than abide here by the beaked ships, a laughing-stock and a burden
of the earth.'  Had Achilles any thought of death and danger?  For wherever
a man's place is, whether the place which he has chosen or that in which he
has been placed by a commander, there he ought to remain in the hour of
danger; he should not think of death or of anything but of disgrace.  And
this, O men of Athens, is a true saying.

Strange, indeed, would be my conduct, O men of Athens, if I who, when I was
ordered by the generals whom you chose to command me at Potidaea and
Amphipolis and Delium, remained where they placed me, like any other man,
facing death--if now, when, as I conceive and imagine, God orders me to
fulfil the philosopher's mission of searching into myself and other men, I
were to desert my post through fear of death, or any other fear; that would
indeed be strange, and I might justly be arraigned in court for denying the
existence of the gods, if I disobeyed the oracle because I was afraid of
death, fancying that I was wise when I was not wise.  For the fear of death
is indeed the pretence of wisdom, and not real wisdom, being a pretence of
knowing the unknown; and no one knows whether death, which men in their
fear apprehend to be the greatest evil, may not be the greatest good.  Is
not this ignorance of a disgraceful sort, the ignorance which is the
conceit that a man knows what he does not know?  And in this respect only I
believe myself to differ from men in general, and may perhaps claim to be
wiser than they are:--that whereas I know but little of the world below, I
do not suppose that I know:  but I do know that injustice and disobedience
to a better, whether God or man, is evil and dishonourable, and I will
never fear or avoid a possible good rather than a certain evil.  And
therefore if you let me go now, and are not convinced by Anytus, who said
that since I had been prosecuted I must be put to death; (or if not that I
ought never to have been prosecuted at all); and that if I escape now, your
sons will all be utterly ruined by listening to my words--if you say to me,
Socrates, this time we will not mind Anytus, and you shall be let off, but
upon one condition, that you are not to enquire and speculate in this way
any more, and that if you are caught doing so again you shall die;--if this
was the condition on which you let me go, I should reply:  Men of Athens, I
honour and love you; but I shall obey God rather than you, and while I have
life and strength I shall never cease from the practice and teaching of
philosophy, exhorting any one whom I meet and saying to him after my
manner:  You, my friend,--a citizen of the great and mighty and wise city
of Athens,--are you not ashamed of heaping up the greatest amount of money
and honour and reputation, and caring so little about wisdom and truth and
the greatest improvement of the soul, which you never regard or heed at
all?  And if the person with whom I am arguing, says:  Yes, but I do care;
then I do not leave him or let him go at once; but I proceed to interrogate
and examine and cross-examine him, and if I think that he has no virtue in
him, but only says that he has, I reproach him with undervaluing the
greater, and overvaluing the less.  And I shall repeat the same words to
every one whom I meet, young and old, citizen and alien, but especially to
the citizens, inasmuch as they are my brethren.  For know that this is the
command of God; and I believe that no greater good has ever happened in the
state than my service to the God.  For I do nothing but go about persuading
you all, old and young alike, not to take thought for your persons or your
properties, but first and chiefly to care about the greatest improvement of
the soul.  I tell you that virtue is not given by money, but that from
virtue comes money and every other good of man, public as well as private.
This is my teaching, and if this is the doctrine which corrupts the youth,
I am a mischievous person.  But if any one says that this is not my
teaching, he is speaking an untruth.  Wherefore, O men of Athens, I say to
you, do as Anytus bids or not as Anytus bids, and either acquit me or not;
but whichever you do, understand that I shall never alter my ways, not even
if I have to die many times.

Men of Athens, do not interrupt, but hear me; there was an understanding
between us that you should hear me to the end:  I have something more to
say, at which you may be inclined to cry out; but I believe that to hear me
will be good for you, and therefore I beg that you will not cry out.  I
would have you know, that if you kill such an one as I am, you will injure
yourselves more than you will injure me.  Nothing will injure me, not
Meletus nor yet Anytus--they cannot, for a bad man is not permitted to
injure a better than himself.  I do not deny that Anytus may, perhaps, kill
him, or drive him into exile, or deprive him of civil rights; and he may
imagine, and others may imagine, that he is inflicting a great injury upon
him:  but there I do not agree.  For the evil of doing as he is doing--the
evil of unjustly taking away the life of another--is greater far.

And now, Athenians, I am not going to argue for my own sake, as you may
think, but for yours, that you may not sin against the God by condemning
me, who am his gift to you.  For if you kill me you will not easily find a
successor to me, who, if I may use such a ludicrous figure of speech, am a
sort of gadfly, given to the state by God; and the state is a great and
noble steed who is tardy in his motions owing to his very size, and
requires to be stirred into life.  I am that gadfly which God has attached
to the state, and all day long and in all places am always fastening upon
you, arousing and persuading and reproaching you.  You will not easily find
another like me, and therefore I would advise you to spare me.  I dare say
that you may feel out of temper (like a person who is suddenly awakened
from sleep), and you think that you might easily strike me dead as Anytus
advises, and then you would sleep on for the remainder of your lives,
unless God in his care of you sent you another gadfly.  When I say that I
am given to you by God, the proof of my mission is this:--if I had been
like other men, I should not have neglected all my own concerns or
patiently seen the neglect of them during all these years, and have been
doing yours, coming to you individually like a father or elder brother,
exhorting you to regard virtue; such conduct, I say, would be unlike human
nature.  If I had gained anything, or if my exhortations had been paid,
there would have been some sense in my doing so; but now, as you will
perceive, not even the impudence of my accusers dares to say that I have
ever exacted or sought pay of any one; of that they have no witness.  And I
have a sufficient witness to the truth of what I say--my poverty.

Some one may wonder why I go about in private giving advice and busying
myself with the concerns of others, but do not venture to come forward in
public and advise the state.  I will tell you why.  You have heard me speak
at sundry times and in divers places of an oracle or sign which comes to
me, and is the divinity which Meletus ridicules in the indictment.  This
sign, which is a kind of voice, first began to come to me when I was a
child; it always forbids but never commands me to do anything which I am
going to do.  This is what deters me from being a politician.  And rightly,
as I think.  For I am certain, O men of Athens, that if I had engaged in
politics, I should have perished long ago, and done no good either to you
or to myself.  And do not be offended at my telling you the truth:  for the
truth is, that no man who goes to war with you or any other multitude,
honestly striving against the many lawless and unrighteous deeds which are
done in a state, will save his life; he who will fight for the right, if he
would live even for a brief space, must have a private station and not a
public one.

I can give you convincing evidence of what I say, not words only, but what
you value far more--actions.  Let me relate to you a passage of my own life
which will prove to you that I should never have yielded to injustice from
any fear of death, and that 'as I should have refused to yield' I must have
died at once.  I will tell you a tale of the courts, not very interesting
perhaps, but nevertheless true.  The only office of state which I ever
held, O men of Athens, was that of senator:  the tribe Antiochis, which is
my tribe, had the presidency at the trial of the generals who had not taken
up the bodies of the slain after the battle of Arginusae; and you proposed
to try them in a body, contrary to law, as you all thought afterwards; but
at the time I was the only one of the Prytanes who was opposed to the
illegality, and I gave my vote against you; and when the orators threatened
to impeach and arrest me, and you called and shouted, I made up my mind
that I would run the risk, having law and justice with me, rather than take
part in your injustice because I feared imprisonment and death.  This
happened in the days of the democracy.  But when the oligarchy of the
Thirty was in power, they sent for me and four others into the rotunda, and
bade us bring Leon the Salaminian from Salamis, as they wanted to put him
to death.  This was a specimen of the sort of commands which they were
always giving with the view of implicating as many as possible in their
crimes; and then I showed, not in word only but in deed, that, if I may be
allowed to use such an expression, I cared not a straw for death, and that
my great and only care was lest I should do an unrighteous or unholy thing. 
For the strong arm of that oppressive power did not frighten me into doing
wrong; and when we came out of the rotunda the other four went to Salamis
and fetched Leon, but I went quietly home.  For which I might have lost my
life, had not the power of the Thirty shortly afterwards come to an end. 
And many will witness to my words.

Now do you really imagine that I could have survived all these years, if I
had led a public life, supposing that like a good man I had always
maintained the right and had made justice, as I ought, the first thing?  No
indeed, men of Athens, neither I nor any other man.  But I have been always
the same in all my actions, public as well as private, and never have I
yielded any base compliance to those who are slanderously termed my
disciples, or to any other.  Not that I have any regular disciples.  But if
any one likes to come and hear me while I am pursuing my mission, whether
he be young or old, he is not excluded.  Nor do I converse only with those
who pay; but any one, whether he be rich or poor, may ask and answer me and
listen to my words; and whether he turns out to be a bad man or a good one,
neither result can be justly imputed to me; for I never taught or professed
to teach him anything.  And if any one says that he has ever learned or
heard anything from me in private which all the world has not heard, let me
tell you that he is lying.

But I shall be asked, Why do people delight in continually conversing with
you?  I have told you already, Athenians, the whole truth about this
matter:  they like to hear the cross-examination of the pretenders to
wisdom; there is amusement in it.  Now this duty of cross-examining other
men has been imposed upon me by God; and has been signified to me by
oracles, visions, and in every way in which the will of divine power was
ever intimated to any one.  This is true, O Athenians, or, if not true,
would be soon refuted.  If I am or have been corrupting the youth, those of
them who are now grown up and have become sensible that I gave them bad
advice in the days of their youth should come forward as accusers, and take
their revenge; or if they do not like to come themselves, some of their
relatives, fathers, brothers, or other kinsmen, should say what evil their
families have suffered at my hands.  Now is their time.  Many of them I see
in the court.  There is Crito, who is of the same age and of the same deme
with myself, and there is Critobulus his son, whom I also see.  Then again
there is Lysanias of Sphettus, who is the father of Aeschines--he is
present; and also there is Antiphon of Cephisus, who is the father of
Epigenes; and there are the brothers of several who have associated with
me.  There is Nicostratus the son of Theosdotides, and the brother of
Theodotus (now Theodotus himself is dead, and therefore he, at any rate,
will not seek to stop him); and there is Paralus the son of Demodocus, who
had a brother Theages; and Adeimantus the son of Ariston, whose brother
Plato is present; and Aeantodorus, who is the brother of Apollodorus, whom
I also see.  I might mention a great many others, some of whom Meletus
should have produced as witnesses in the course of his speech; and let him
still produce them, if he has forgotten--I will make way for him.  And let
him say, if he has any testimony of the sort which he can produce.  Nay,
Athenians, the very opposite is the truth.  For all these are ready to
witness on behalf of the corrupter, of the injurer of their kindred, as
Meletus and Anytus call me; not the corrupted youth only--there might have
been a motive for that--but their uncorrupted elder relatives.  Why should
they too support me with their testimony?  Why, indeed, except for the sake
of truth and justice, and because they know that I am speaking the truth,
and that Meletus is a liar.

Well, Athenians, this and the like of this is all the defence which I have
to offer.  Yet a word more.  Perhaps there may be some one who is offended
at me, when he calls to mind how he himself on a similar, or even a less
serious occasion, prayed and entreated the judges with many tears, and how
he produced his children in court, which was a moving spectacle, together
with a host of relations and friends; whereas I, who am probably in danger
of my life, will do none of these things.  The contrast may occur to his
mind, and he may be set against me, and vote in anger because he is
displeased at me on this account.  Now if there be such a person among
you,--mind, I do not say that there is,--to him I may fairly reply:  My
friend, I am a man, and like other men, a creature of flesh and blood, and
not 'of wood or stone,' as Homer says; and I have a family, yes, and sons,
O Athenians, three in number, one almost a man, and two others who are
still young; and yet I will not bring any of them hither in order to
petition you for an acquittal.  And why not?  Not from any self-assertion
or want of respect for you.  Whether I am or am not afraid of death is
another question, of which I will not now speak.  But, having regard to
public opinion, I feel that such conduct would be discreditable to myself,
and to you, and to the whole state.  One who has reached my years, and who
has a name for wisdom, ought not to demean himself.  Whether this opinion
of me be deserved or not, at any rate the world has decided that Socrates
is in some way superior to other men.  And if those among you who are said
to be superior in wisdom and courage, and any other virtue, demean
themselves in this way, how shameful is their conduct!  I have seen men of
reputation, when they have been condemned, behaving in the strangest
manner:  they seemed to fancy that they were going to suffer something
dreadful if they died, and that they could be immortal if you only allowed
them to live; and I think that such are a dishonour to the state, and that
any stranger coming in would have said of them that the most eminent men of
Athens, to whom the Athenians themselves give honour and command, are no
better than women.  And I say that these things ought not to be done by
those of us who have a reputation; and if they are done, you ought not to
permit them; you ought rather to show that you are far more disposed to
condemn the man who gets up a doleful scene and makes the city ridiculous,
than him who holds his peace.

But, setting aside the question of public opinion, there seems to be
something wrong in asking a favour of a judge, and thus procuring an
acquittal, instead of informing and convincing him.  For his duty is, not
to make a present of justice, but to give judgment; and he has sworn that
he will judge according to the laws, and not according to his own good
pleasure; and we ought not to encourage you, nor should you allow
yourselves to be encouraged, in this habit of perjury--there can be no
piety in that.  Do not then require me to do what I consider dishonourable
and impious and wrong, especially now, when I am being tried for impiety on
the indictment of Meletus.  For if, O men of Athens, by force of persuasion
and entreaty I could overpower your oaths, then I should be teaching you to
believe that there are no gods, and in defending should simply convict
myself of the charge of not believing in them.  But that is not so--far
otherwise.  For I do believe that there are gods, and in a sense higher
than that in which any of my accusers believe in them.  And to you and to
God I commit my cause, to be determined by you as is best for you and me.

...

There are many reasons why I am not grieved, O men of Athens, at the vote
of condemnation.  I expected it, and am only surprised that the votes are
so nearly equal; for I had thought that the majority against me would have
been far larger; but now, had thirty votes gone over to the other side, I
should have been acquitted.  And I may say, I think, that I have escaped
Meletus.  I may say more; for without the assistance of Anytus and Lycon,
any one may see that he would not have had a fifth part of the votes, as
the law requires, in which case he would have incurred a fine of a thousand
drachmae.

And so he proposes death as the penalty.  And what shall I propose on my
part, O men of Athens?  Clearly that which is my due.  And what is my due?
What return shall be made to the man who has never had the wit to be idle
during his whole life; but has been careless of what the many care for--
wealth, and family interests, and military offices, and speaking in the
assembly, and magistracies, and plots, and parties.  Reflecting that I was
really too honest a man to be a politician and live, I did not go where I
could do no good to you or to myself; but where I could do the greatest
good privately to every one of you, thither I went, and sought to persuade
every man among you that he must look to himself, and seek virtue and
wisdom before he looks to his private interests, and look to the state
before he looks to the interests of the state; and that this should be the
order which he observes in all his actions.  What shall be done to such an
one?  Doubtless some good thing, O men of Athens, if he has his reward; and
the good should be of a kind suitable to him.  What would be a reward
suitable to a poor man who is your benefactor, and who desires leisure that
he may instruct you?  There can be no reward so fitting as maintenance in
the Prytaneum, O men of Athens, a reward which he deserves far more than
the citizen who has won the prize at Olympia in the horse or chariot race,
whether the chariots were drawn by two horses or by many.  For I am in
want, and he has enough; and he only gives you the appearance of happiness,
and I give you the reality.  And if I am to estimate the penalty fairly, I
should say that maintenance in the Prytaneum is the just return.

Perhaps you think that I am braving you in what I am saying now, as in what
I said before about the tears and prayers.  But this is not so.  I speak
rather because I am convinced that I never intentionally wronged any one,
although I cannot convince you--the time has been too short; if there were
a law at Athens, as there is in other cities, that a capital cause should
not be decided in one day, then I believe that I should have convinced you.
But I cannot in a moment refute great slanders; and, as I am convinced that
I never wronged another, I will assuredly not wrong myself.  I will not say
of myself that I deserve any evil, or propose any penalty.  Why should I?
because I am afraid of the penalty of death which Meletus proposes?  When I
do not know whether death is a good or an evil, why should I propose a
penalty which would certainly be an evil?  Shall I say imprisonment?  And
why should I live in prison, and be the slave of the magistrates of the
year--of the Eleven?  Or shall the penalty be a fine, and imprisonment
until the fine is paid?  There is the same objection.  I should have to lie
in prison, for money I have none, and cannot pay.  And if I say exile (and
this may possibly be the penalty which you will affix), I must indeed be
blinded by the love of life, if I am so irrational as to expect that when
you, who are my own citizens, cannot endure my discourses and words, and
have found them so grievous and odious that you will have no more of them,
others are likely to endure me.  No indeed, men of Athens, that is not very
likely.  And what a life should I lead, at my age, wandering from city to
city, ever changing my place of exile, and always being driven out!  For I
am quite sure that wherever I go, there, as here, the young men will flock
to me; and if I drive them away, their elders will drive me out at their
request; and if I let them come, their fathers and friends will drive me
out for their sakes.

Some one will say:  Yes, Socrates, but cannot you hold your tongue, and
then you may go into a foreign city, and no one will interfere with you? 
Now I have great difficulty in making you understand my answer to this. 
For if I tell you that to do as you say would be a disobedience to the God,
and therefore that I cannot hold my tongue, you will not believe that I am
serious; and if I say again that daily to discourse about virtue, and of
those other things about which you hear me examining myself and others, is
the greatest good of man, and that the unexamined life is not worth living,
you are still less likely to believe me.  Yet I say what is true, although
a thing of which it is hard for me to persuade you.  Also, I have never
been accustomed to think that I deserve to suffer any harm.  Had I money I
might have estimated the offence at what I was able to pay, and not have
been much the worse.  But I have none, and therefore I must ask you to
proportion the fine to my means.  Well, perhaps I could afford a mina, and
therefore I propose that penalty:  Plato, Crito, Critobulus, and
Apollodorus, my friends here, bid me say thirty minae, and they will be the
sureties.  Let thirty minae be the penalty; for which sum they will be
ample security to you.

...

Not much time will be gained, O Athenians, in return for the evil name
which you will get from the detractors of the city, who will say that you
killed Socrates, a wise man; for they will call me wise, even although I am
not wise, when they want to reproach you.  If you had waited a little
while, your desire would have been fulfilled in the course of nature.  For
I am far advanced in years, as you may perceive, and not far from death.  I
am speaking now not to all of you, but only to those who have condemned me
to death.  And I have another thing to say to them:  you think that I was
convicted because I had no words of the sort which would have procured my
acquittal--I mean, if I had thought fit to leave nothing undone or unsaid.
Not so; the deficiency which led to my conviction was not of words--
certainly not.  But I had not the boldness or impudence or inclination to
address you as you would have liked me to do, weeping and wailing and
lamenting, and saying and doing many things which you have been accustomed
to hear from others, and which, as I maintain, are unworthy of me.  I
thought at the time that I ought not to do anything common or mean when in
danger:  nor do I now repent of the style of my defence; I would rather die
having spoken after my manner, than speak in your manner and live.  For
neither in war nor yet at law ought I or any man to use every way of
escaping death.  Often in battle there can be no doubt that if a man will
throw away his arms, and fall on his knees before his pursuers, he may
escape death; and in other dangers there are other ways of escaping death,
if a man is willing to say and do anything.  The difficulty, my friends, is
not to avoid death, but to avoid unrighteousness; for that runs faster than
death.  I am old and move slowly, and the slower runner has overtaken me,
and my accusers are keen and quick, and the faster runner, who is
unrighteousness, has overtaken them.  And now I depart hence condemned by
you to suffer the penalty of death,--they too go their ways condemned by
the truth to suffer the penalty of villainy and wrong; and I must abide by
my award--let them abide by theirs.  I suppose that these things may be
regarded as fated,--and I think that they are well.

And now, O men who have condemned me, I would fain prophesy to you; for I
am about to die, and in the hour of death men are gifted with prophetic
power.  And I prophesy to you who are my murderers, that immediately after
my departure punishment far heavier than you have inflicted on me will
surely await you.  Me you have killed because you wanted to escape the
accuser, and not to give an account of your lives.  But that will not be as
you suppose:  far otherwise.  For I say that there will be more accusers of
you than there are now; accusers whom hitherto I have restrained:  and as
they are younger they will be more inconsiderate with you, and you will be
more offended at them.  If you think that by killing men you can prevent
some one from censuring your evil lives, you are mistaken; that is not a
way of escape which is either possible or honourable; the easiest and the
noblest way is not to be disabling others, but to be improving yourselves. 
This is the prophecy which I utter before my departure to the judges who
have condemned me.

Friends, who would have acquitted me, I would like also to talk with you
about the thing which has come to pass, while the magistrates are busy, and
before I go to the place at which I must die.  Stay then a little, for we
may as well talk with one another while there is time.  You are my friends,
and I should like to show you the meaning of this event which has happened
to me.  O my judges--for you I may truly call judges--I should like to tell
you of a wonderful circumstance.  Hitherto the divine faculty of which the
internal oracle is the source has constantly been in the habit of opposing
me even about trifles, if I was going to make a slip or error in any
matter; and now as you see there has come upon me that which may be
thought, and is generally believed to be, the last and worst evil.  But the
oracle made no sign of opposition, either when I was leaving my house in
the morning, or when I was on my way to the court, or while I was speaking,
at anything which I was going to say; and yet I have often been stopped in
the middle of a speech, but now in nothing I either said or did touching
the matter in hand has the oracle opposed me.  What do I take to be the
explanation of this silence?  I will tell you.  It is an intimation that
what has happened to me is a good, and that those of us who think that
death is an evil are in error.  For the customary sign would surely have
opposed me had I been going to evil and not to good.

Let us reflect in another way, and we shall see that there is great reason
to hope that death is a good; for one of two things--either death is a
state of nothingness and utter unconsciousness, or, as men say, there is a
change and migration of the soul from this world to another.  Now if you
suppose that there is no consciousness, but a sleep like the sleep of him
who is undisturbed even by dreams, death will be an unspeakable gain.  For
if a person were to select the night in which his sleep was undisturbed
even by dreams, and were to compare with this the other days and nights of
his life, and then were to tell us how many days and nights he had passed
in the course of his life better and more pleasantly than this one, I think
that any man, I will not say a private man, but even the great king will
not find many such days or nights, when compared with the others.  Now if
death be of such a nature, I say that to die is gain; for eternity is then
only a single night.  But if death is the journey to another place, and
there, as men say, all the dead abide, what good, O my friends and judges,
can be greater than this?  If indeed when the pilgrim arrives in the world
below, he is delivered from the professors of justice in this world, and
finds the true judges who are said to give judgment there, Minos and
Rhadamanthus and Aeacus and Triptolemus, and other sons of God who were
righteous in their own life, that pilgrimage will be worth making.  What
would not a man give if he might converse with Orpheus and Musaeus and
Hesiod and Homer?  Nay, if this be true, let me die again and again.  I
myself, too, shall have a wonderful interest in there meeting and
conversing with Palamedes, and Ajax the son of Telamon, and any other
ancient hero who has suffered death through an unjust judgment; and there
will be no small pleasure, as I think, in comparing my own sufferings with
theirs.  Above all, I shall then be able to continue my search into true
and false knowledge; as in this world, so also in the next; and I shall
find out who is wise, and who pretends to be wise, and is not.  What would
not a man give, O judges, to be able to examine the leader of the great
Trojan expedition; or Odysseus or Sisyphus, or numberless others, men and
women too!  What infinite delight would there be in conversing with them
and asking them questions!  In another world they do not put a man to death
for asking questions:  assuredly not.  For besides being happier than we
are, they will be immortal, if what is said is true.

Wherefore, O judges, be of good cheer about death, and know of a certainty,
that no evil can happen to a good man, either in life or after death.  He
and his are not neglected by the gods; nor has my own approaching end
happened by mere chance.  But I see clearly that the time had arrived when
it was better for me to die and be released from trouble; wherefore the
oracle gave no sign.  For which reason, also, I am not angry with my
condemners, or with my accusers; they have done me no harm, although they
did not mean to do me any good; and for this I may gently blame them.

Still I have a favour to ask of them.  When my sons are grown up, I would
ask you, O my friends, to punish them; and I would have you trouble them,
as I have troubled you, if they seem to care about riches, or anything,
more than about virtue; or if they pretend to be something when they are
really nothing,--then reprove them, as I have reproved you, for not caring
about that for which they ought to care, and thinking that they are
something when they are really nothing.  And if you do this, both I and my
sons will have received justice at your hands.

The hour of departure has arrived, and we go our ways--I to die, and you to
live.  Which is better God only knows.



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES, who is the narrator; CHARMIDES;
CHAEREPHON; CRITIAS. Scene: The Palaestra of Taureas, which is near
the Porch of the King Archon.

  Yesterday evening I returned from the army at Potidaea, and having
been a good while away, I thought that I should like to go and look at
my old haunts. So I went into the palaestra of Taureas, which is
over against the temple adjoining the porch of the King Archon, and
there I found a number of persons, most of whom I knew, but not all.
My visit was unexpected, and no sooner did they see me entering than
they saluted me from afar on all sides; and Chaerephon, who is a
kind of madman, started up and ran to me, seizing my hand, and saying,
How did you escape, Socrates?-(I should explain that an engagement had
taken place at Potidaea not long before we came away, of which the
news had only just reached Athens.)

  You see, I replied, that here I am.

  There was a report, he said, that the engagement was very severe,
and that many of our acquaintance had fallen.

  That, I replied, was not far from the truth.

  I suppose, he said, that you were present.

  I was.

  Then sit down, and tell us the whole story, which as yet we have
only heard imperfectly.

  I took the place which he assigned to me, by the side of Critias the
son of Callaeschrus, and when I had saluted him and the rest of the
company, I told them the news from the army, and answered their
several enquiries.

  Then, when there had been enough of this, I, in my turn, began to
make enquiries about matters at home-about the present state of
philosophy, and about the youth. I asked whether any of them were
remarkable for wisdom or beauty, or both. Critias, glancing at the
door, invited my attention to some youths who were coming in, and
talking noisily to one another, followed by a crowd. Of the
beauties, Socrates, he said, I fancy that you will soon be able to
form a judgment. For those who are just entering are the advanced
guard of the great beauty, as he is thought to be, of the day, and
he is likely to be not far off himself.

  Who is he, I said; and who is his father?

  Charmides, he replied, is his name; he is my cousin, and the son
of my uncle Glaucon: I rather think that you know him too, although he
was not grown up at the time of your departure.

  Certainly, I know him, I said, for he was remarkable even then
when he was still a child, and I should imagine that by this time he
must be almost a young man.

  You will see, he said, in a moment what progress he has made and
what he is like. He had scarcely said the word, when Charmides
entered.

  Now you know, my friend, that I cannot measure anything, and of
the beautiful, I am simply such a measure as a white line is of chalk;
for almost all young persons appear to be beautiful in my eyes. But at
that moment, when I saw him coming in, I confess that I was quite
astonished at his beauty and stature; all the world seemed to be
enamoured of him; amazement and confusion reigned when he entered; and
a troop of lovers followed him. That grown-up men like ourselves
should have been affected in this way was not surprising, but I
observed that there was the same feeling among the boys; all of
them, down to the very least child, turned and looked at him, as if he
had been a statue.

  Chaerephon called me and said: What do you think of him, Socrates?
Has he not a beautiful face?

  Most beautiful, I said.

  But you would think nothing of his face, he replied, if you could
see his naked form: he is absolutely perfect.

  And to this they all agreed.

  By Heracles, I said, there never was such a paragon, if he has
only one other slight addition.

  What is that? said Critias.

  If he has a noble soul; and being of your house, Critias, he may
be expected to have this.

  He is as fair and good within, as he is without, replied Critias.

  Then, before we see his body, should we not ask him to show us his
soul, naked and undisguised? he is just of an age at which he will
like to talk.

  That he will, said Critias, and I can tell you that he is a
philosopher already, and also a considerable poet, not in his own
opinion only, but in that of others.

  That, my dear Critias, I replied, is a distinction which has long
been in your family, and is inherited by you from Solon. But why do
you not call him, and show him to us? for even if he were younger than
he is, there could be no impropriety in his talking to us in the
presence of you, who are his guardian and cousin.

  Very well, he said; then I will call him; and turning to the
attendant, he said, Call Charmides, and tell him that I want him to
come and see a physician about the illness of which he spoke to me the
day before yesterday. Then again addressing me, he added: He has
been complaining lately of having a headache when he rises in the
morning: now why should you not make him believe that you know a
cure for the headache?

  Why not, I said; but will he come?

  He will be sure to come, he replied.

  He came as he was bidden, and sat down between Critias and me. Great
amusement was occasioned by every one pushing with might and main at
his neighbour in order to make a place for him next to themselves,
until at the two ends of the row one had to get up and the other was
rolled over sideways. Now my friend, was beginning to feel awkward;
former bold belief in my powers of conversing with him had vanished.
And when Critias told him that I was the person who had the cure, he
looked at me in such an indescribable manner, and was just going to
ask a question. And at that moment all the people in the palaestra
crowded about us, and, O rare! I caught a sight of the inwards of
his garment, and took the flame. Then I could no longer contain
myself. I thought how well Cydias understood the nature of love, when,
in speaking of a fair youth, he warns some one "not to bring the
fawn in the sight of the lion to be devoured by him," for I felt
that I had been overcome by a sort of wild-beast appetite. But I
controlled myself, and when he asked me if I knew the cure of the
headache, I answered, but with an effort, that I did know.

  And what is it? he said.

  I replied that it was a kind of leaf, which required to be
accompanied by a charm, and if a person would repeat the charm at
the same time that he used the cure, he would be made whole; but
that without the charm the leaf would be of no avail.

  Then I will write out the charm from your dictation, he said.

  With my consent? I said, or without my consent?

  With your consent, Socrates, he said, laughing.

  Very good, I said; and are you quite sure that you know my name?

  I ought to know you, he replied, for there is a great deal said
about you among my companions; and I remember when I was a child
seeing you in company with my cousin Critias.

  I am glad to find that you remember me, I said; for I shall now be
more at home with you and shall be better able to explain the nature
of the charm, about which I felt a difficulty before. For the charm
will do more, Charmides, than only cure the headache. I dare say
that you have heard eminent physicians say to a patient who comes to
them with bad eyes, that they cannot cure his eyes by themselves,
but that if his eyes are to be cured, his head must be treated; and
then again they say that to think of curing the head alone, and not
the rest of the body also, is the height of folly. And arguing in this
way they apply their methods to the whole body, and try to treat and
heal the whole and the part together. Did you ever observe that this
is what they say?

  Yes, he said.

  And they are right, and you would agree with them?

  Yes, he said, certainly I should.

  His approving answers reassured me, and I began by degrees to regain
confidence, and the vital heat returned. Such, Charmides, I said, is
the nature of the charm, which I learned when serving with the army
from one of the physicians of the Thracian king Zamolxis, who are to
be so skilful that they can even give immortality. This Thracian
told me that in these notions of theirs, which I was just now
mentioning, the Greek physicians are quite right as far as they go;
but Zamolxis, he added, our king, who is also a god, says further,
"that as you ought not to attempt to cure the eyes without the head,
or the head without the body, so neither ought you to attempt to
cure the body without the soul; and this," he said, "is the reason why
the cure of many diseases is unknown to the physicians of Hellas,
because they are ignorant of the whole, which ought to be studied
also; for the part can never be well unless the whole is well." For
all good and evil, whether in the body or in human nature, originates,
as he declared, in the soul, and overflows from thence, as if from the
head into the eyes. And therefore if the head and body are to be well,
you must begin by curing the soul; that is the first thing. And the
cure, my dear youth, has to be effected by the use of certain
charms, and these charms are fair words; and by them temperance is
implanted in the soul, and where temperance is, there health is
speedily imparted, not only to the head, but to the whole body. And he
who taught me the cure and the charm at the same time added a
special direction: "Let no one," he said, "persuade you to cure the
head, until he has first given you his soul to be cured by the
charm. For this," he said, "is the great error of our day in the
treatment of the human body, that physicians separate the soul from
the body." And he added with emphasis, at the same time making me
swear to his words, "Let no one, however rich, or noble, or fair,
persuade you to give him the cure, without the charm." Now I have
sworn, and I must keep my oath, and therefore if you will allow me
to apply the Thracian charm first to your soul, as the stranger
directed, I will afterwards proceed to apply the cure to your head.
But if not, I do not know what I am to do with you, my dear Charmides.

  Critias, when he heard this, said: The headache will be an
unexpected gain to my young relation, if the pain in his head
compels him to improve his mind: and I can tell you, Socrates, that
Charmides is not only pre-eminent in beauty among his equals, but also
in that quality which is given by the charm; and this, as you say,
is temperance?

  Yes, I said.

  Then let me tell you that he is the most temperate of human
beings, and for his age inferior to none in any quality.

  Yes, I said, Charmides; and indeed I think that you ought to excel
others in all good qualities; for if I am not mistaken there is no one
present who could easily point out two Athenian houses, whose union
would be likely to produce a better or nobler scion than the two
from which you are sprung. There is your father's house, which is
descended from Critias the son of Dropidas, whose family has been
commemorated in the panegyrical verses of Anacreon, Solon, and many
other poets, as famous for beauty and virtue and all other high
fortune: and your mother's house is equally distinguished; for your
maternal uncle, Pyrilampes, is reputed never to have found his
equal, in Persia at the court of the great king, or on the continent
of Asia, in all the places to which he went as ambassador, for stature
and beauty; that whole family is not a whit inferior to the other.
Having such ancestors you ought to be first in all things, and,
sweet son of Glaucon, your outward form is no dishonour to any of
them. If to beauty you add temperance, and if in other respects you
are what Critias declares you to be, then, dear Charmides, blessed art
thou, in being the son of thy mother. And here lies the point; for if,
as he declares, you have this gift of temperance already, and are
temperate enough, in that case you have no need of any charms, whether
of Zamolxis or of Abaris the Hyperborean, and I may as well let you
have the cure of the head at once; but if you have not yet acquired
this quality, I must use the charm before I give you the medicine.
Please, therefore, to inform me whether you admit the truth of what
Critias has been saying;-have you or have you not this quality of
temperance?

  Charmides blushed, and the blush heightened his beauty, for
modesty is becoming in youth; he then said very ingenuously, that he
really could not at once answer, either yes, or no, to the question
which I had asked: For, said he, if I affirm that I am not
temperate, that would be a strange thing for me to say of myself,
and also I should give the lie to Critias, and many others who think
as he tells you, that I am temperate: but, on the other hand, if I say
that I am, I shall have to praise myself, which would be ill
manners; and therefore I do not know how to answer you.

  I said to him: That is a natural reply, Charmides, and I think
that you and I ought together to enquire whether you have this quality
about which I am asking or not; and then you will not be compelled
to say what you do not like; neither shall I be a rash practitioner of
medicine: therefore, if you please, I will share the enquiry with you,
but I will not press you if you would rather not.

  There is nothing which I should like better, he said; and as far
as I am concerned you may proceed in the way which you think best.

  I think, I said, that I had better begin by asking you a question;
for if temperance abides in you, you must have an opinion about her;
she must give some intimation of her nature and qualities, which may
enable you to form a notion of her. Is not that true?

  Yes, he said, that I think is true.

  You know your native language, I said, and therefore you must be
able to tell what you feel about this.

  Certainly, he said.

  In order, then, that I may form a conjecture whether you have
temperance abiding in you or not, tell me, I said, what, in your
opinion, is Temperance?

  At first he hesitated, and was very unwilling to answer: then he
said that he thought temperance was doing things orderly and
quietly, such things for example as walking in the streets, and
talking, or anything else of that nature. In a word, he said, I should
answer that, in my opinion, temperance is quietness.

  Are you right, Charmides? I said. No doubt some would affirm that
the quiet are the temperate; but let us see whether these words have
any meaning; and first tell me whether you would not acknowledge
temperance to be of the class of the noble and good?

  Yes.

  But which is best when you are at the writing-master's, to write the
same letters quickly or quietly?

  Quickly.

  And to read quickly or slowly?

  Quickly again.

  And in playing the lyre, or wrestling, quickness or sharpness are
far better than quietness and slowness?

  Yes.

  And the same holds in boxing and in the pancratium?

  Certainly.

  And in leaping and running and in bodily exercises generally,
quickness and agility are good; slowness, and inactivity, and
quietness, are bad?

  That is evident.

  Then, I said, in all bodily actions, not quietness, but the greatest
agility and quickness, is noblest and best?

  Yes, certainly.

  And is temperance a good?

  Yes.

  Then, in reference to the body, not quietness, but quickness will be
the higher degree of temperance, if temperance is a good?

  True, he said.

  And which, I said, is better-facility in learning, or difficulty
in learning?

  Facility.

  Yes, I said; and facility in learning is learning quickly, and
difficulty in learning is learning quietly and slowly?

  True.

  And is it not better to teach another quickly and energetically,
rather than quietly and slowly?

  Yes.

  And which is better, to call to mind, and to remember, quickly and
readily, or quietly and slowly?

  The former.

  And is not shrewdness a quickness or cleverness of the soul, and not
a quietness?

  True.

  And is it not best to understand what is said, whether at the
writing-master's or the music-master's, or anywhere else, not as
quietly as possible, but as quickly as possible?

  Yes.

  And in the searchings or deliberations of the soul, not the
quietest, as I imagine, and he who with difficulty deliberates and
discovers, is thought worthy of praise, but he who does so most easily
and quickly?

  Quite true, he said.

  And in all that concerns either body or soul, swiftness and activity
are clearly better than slowness and quietness?

  Clearly they are.

  Then temperance is not quietness, nor is the temperate life
quiet,-certainly not upon this view; for the life which is temperate
is supposed to be the good. And of two things, one is true, either
never, or very seldom, do the quiet actions in life appear to be
better than the quick and energetic ones; or supposing that of the
nobler actions, there are as many quiet, as quick and vehement: still,
even if we grant this, temperance will not be acting quietly any
more than acting quickly and energetically, either in walking or
talking or in anything else; nor will the quiet life be more temperate
than the unquiet, seeing that temperance is admitted by us to be a
good and noble thing, and the quick have been shown to be as good as
the quiet.

  I think, he said, Socrates, that you are right.

  Then once more, Charmides, I said, fix your attention, and look
within; consider the effect which temperance has upon yourself, and
the nature of that which has the effect. Think over all this, and,
like a brave youth, tell me-What is temperance?

  After a moment's pause, in which he made a real manly effort to
think, he said: My opinion is, Socrates, that temperance makes a man
ashamed or modest, and that temperance is the same as modesty.

  Very good, I said; and did you not admit, just now, that
temperance is noble?

  Yes, certainly, he said.

  And the temperate are also good?

  Yes.

  And can that be good which does not make men good?

  Certainly not.

  And you would infer that temperance is not only noble, but also
good?

  That is my opinion.

  Well, I said; but surely you would agree with Homer when he says,

     Modesty is not good for a needy man?

  Yes, he said; I agree.

  Then I suppose that modesty is and is not good?

  Clearly.

  But temperance, whose presence makes men only good, and not bad,
is always good?

  That appears to me to be as you say.

  And the inference is that temperance cannot be modesty-if temperance
is a good, and if modesty is as much an evil as a good?

  All that, Socrates, appears to me to be true; but I should like to
know what you think about another definition of temperance, which I
just now remember to have heard from some one, who said, "That
temperance is doing our own business." Was he right who affirmed that?

  You monster! I said; this is what Critias, or some philosopher has
told you.

  Some one else, then, said Critias; for certainly I have not.

  But what matter, said Charmides, from whom I heard this?

  No matter at all, I replied; for the point is not who said the
words, but whether they are true or not.

  There you are in the right, Socrates, he replied.

  To be sure, I said; yet I doubt whether we shall ever be able to
discover their truth or falsehood; for they are a kind of riddle.

  What makes you think so? he said.

  Because, I said, he who uttered them seems to me to have meant one
thing, and said another. Is the scribe, for example, to be regarded as
doing nothing when he reads or writes?

  I should rather think that he was doing something.

  And does the scribe write or read, or teach you boys to write or
read, your own names only, or did you write your enemies' names as
well as your own and your friends'?

  As much one as the other.

  And was there anything meddling or intemperate in this?

  Certainly not.

  And yet if reading and writing are the same as doing, you were doing
what was not your own business?

  But they are the same as doing.

  And the healing art, my friend, and building, and weaving, and doing
anything whatever which is done by art,-these all clearly come under
the head of doing?

  Certainly.

  And do you think that a state would be well ordered by a law which
compelled every man to weave and wash his own coat, and make his own
shoes, and his own flask and strigil, and other implements, on this
principle of every one doing and performing his own, and abstaining
from what is not his own?

  I think not, he said.

  But, I said, a temperate state will be a well ordered state.

  Of course, he replied.

  Then temperance, I said, will not be doing one's own business; not
at least in this way, or doing things of this sort?

  Clearly not.

  Then, as I was just now saying, he who declared that temperance is a
man doing his own business had another and a hidden meaning; for I
do not think that he could have been such a fool as to mean this.
Was he a fool who told you, Charmides?

  Nay, he replied, I certainly thought him a very wise man.

  Then I am quite certain that he put forth his definition as a
riddle, thinking that no one would know the meaning of the words
"doing his own business."

  I dare say, he replied.

  And what is the meaning of a man doing his own business? Can you
tell me?

  Indeed, I cannot; and I should not wonder if the man himself who
used this phrase did not understand what he was saying. Whereupon he
laughed slyly, and looked at Critias.

  Critias had long been showing uneasiness, for he felt that he had
a reputation to maintain with Charmides and the rest of the company.
He had, however, hitherto managed to restrain himself; but now he
could no longer forbear, and I am convinced of the truth of the
suspicion which I entertained at the time, that Charmides had heard
this answer about temperance from Critias. And Charmides, who did
not want to answer himself, but to make Critias answer, tried to
stir him up. He went on pointing out that he had been refuted, at
which Critias grew angry, and appeared, as I thought, inclined to
quarrel with him; just as a poet might quarrel with an actor who
spoiled his poems in repeating them; so he looked hard at him and
said--

  Do you imagine, Charmides, that the author of this definition of
temperance did not understand the meaning of his own words, because
you do not understand them?

  Why, at his age, I said, most excellent Critias, he can hardly be
expected to understand; but you, who are older, and have studied,
may well be assumed to know the meaning of them; and therefore, if you
agree with him, and accept his definition of temperance, I would
much rather argue with you than with him about the truth or
falsehood of the definition.

  I entirely agree, said Critias, and accept the definition.

  Very good, I said; and now let me repeat my question-Do you admit,
as I was just now saying, that all craftsmen make or do something?

  I do.

  And do they make or do their own business only, or that of others
also?

  They make or do that of others also.

  And are they temperate, seeing that they make not for themselves
or their own business only?

  Why not? he said.

  No objection on my part, I said, but there may be a difficulty on
his who proposes as a definition of temperance, "doing one's own
business," and then says that there is no reason why those who do
the business of others should not be temperate.

  Nay, said he; did I ever acknowledge that those who do the
business of others are temperate? I said, those who make, not those
who do.

  What! I asked; do you mean to say that doing and making are not
the same?

  No more, he replied, than making or working are the same; thus
much I have learned from Hesiod, who says that "work is no
disgrace." Now do you imagine that if he had meant by working and
doing such things as you were describing, he would have said that
there was no disgrace in them-for example, in the manufacture of
shoes, or in selling pickles, or sitting for hire in a house of
ill-fame? That, Socrates, is not to be supposed: but I conceive him to
have distinguished making from doing and work; and, while admitting
that the making anything might sometimes become a disgrace, when the
employment was not honourable, to have thought that work was never any
disgrace at all. For things nobly and usefully made he called works;
and such makings he called workings, and doings; and he must be
supposed to have called such things only man's proper business, and
what is hurtful, not his business: and in that sense Hesiod, and any
other wise man, may be reasonably supposed to call him wise who does
his own work.

  O Critias, I said, no sooner had you opened your mouth, than I
pretty well knew that you would call that which is proper to a man,
and that which is his own, good; and that the markings of the good you
would call doings, for I am no stranger to the endless distinctions
which Prodicus draws about names. Now I have no objection to your
giving names any signification which you please, if you will only tell
me what you mean by them. Please then to begin again, and be a
little plainer. Do you mean that this doing or making, or whatever
is the word which you would use, of good actions, is temperance?

  I do, he said.

  Then not he who does evil, but he who does good, is temperate?

  Yes, he said; and you, friend, would agree.

  No matter whether I should or not; just now, not what I think, but
what you are saying, is the point at issue.

  Well, he answered; I mean to say, that he who does evil, and not
good, is not temperate; and that he is temperate who does good, and
not evil: for temperance I define in plain words to be the doing of
good actions.

  And you may be very likely right in what you are saying; but I am
curious to know whether you imagine that temperate men are ignorant of
their own temperance?

  I do not think so, he said.

  And yet were you not saying, just now, that craftsmen might be
temperate in doing another's work, as well as in doing their own?

  I was, he replied; but what is your drift?

  I have no particular drift, but I wish that you would tell me
whether a physician who cures a patient may do good to himself and
good to another also?

  I think that he may.

  And he who does so does his duty?

  Yes.

  And does not he who does his duty act temperately or wisely?

  Yes, he acts wisely.

  But must the physician necessarily know when his treatment is likely
to prove beneficial, and when not? or must the craftsman necessarily
know when he is likely to be benefited, and when not to be
benefited, by the work which he is doing?

  I suppose not.

  Then, I said, he may sometimes do good or harm, and not know what he
is himself doing, and yet, in doing good, as you say, he has done
temperately or wisely. Was not that your statement?

  Yes.

  Then, as would seem, in doing good, he may act wisely or
temperately, and be wise or temperate, but not know his own wisdom
or temperance?

  But that, Socrates, he said, is impossible; and therefore if this
is, as you imply, the necessary consequence of any of my previous
admissions, I will withdraw them, rather than admit that a man can
be temperate or wise who does not know himself; and I am not ashamed
to confess that I was in error. For self-knowledge would certainly
be maintained by me to be the very essence of knowledge, and in this I
agree with him who dedicated the inscription, "Know thyself!" at
Delphi. That word, if I am not mistaken, is put there as a sort of
salutation which the god addresses to those who enter the temple; as
much as to say that the ordinary salutation of "Hail!" is not right,
and that the exhortation "Be temperate!" would be a far better way
of saluting one another. The notion of him who dedicated the
inscription was, as I believe, that the god speaks to those who
enter his temple, not as men speak; but, when a worshipper enters, the
first word which he hears is "Be temperate!" This, however, like a
prophet he expresses in a sort of riddle, for "Know thyself!" and
"Be temperate!" are the same, as I maintain, and as the letters imply,
and yet they may be easily misunderstood; and succeeding sages who
added "Never too much," or, "Give a pledge, and evil is nigh at hand,"
would appear to have so misunderstood them; for they imagined that
"Know thyself!" was a piece of advice which the god gave, and not
his salutation of the worshippers at their first coming in; and they
dedicated their own inscription under the idea that they too would
give equally useful pieces of advice. Shall I tell you, Socrates,
why I say all this? My object is to leave the previous discussion
(in which I know not whether you or I are more right, but, at any
rate, no clear result was attained), and to raise a new one in which I
will attempt to prove, if you deny, that temperance is self-knowledge.

  Yes, I said, Critias; but you come to me as though I professed to
know about the questions which I ask, and as though I could, if I only
would, agree with you. Whereas the fact is that I enquire with you
into the truth of that which is advanced from time to time, just
because I do not know; and when I have enquired, I will say whether
I agree with you or not. Please then to allow me time to reflect.

  Reflect, he said.

  I am reflecting, I replied, and discover that temperance, or wisdom,
if implying a knowledge of anything, must be a science, and a
science of something.

  Yes, he said; the science of itself.

  Is not medicine, I said, the science of health?

  True.

  And suppose, I said, that I were asked by you what is the use or
effect of medicine, which is this science of health, I should answer
that medicine is of very great use in producing health, which, as
you will admit, is an excellent effect.

  Granted.

  And if you were to ask me, what is the result or effect of
architecture, which is the science of building, I should say houses,
and so of other arts, which all have their different results. Now I
want you, Critias, to answer a similar question about temperance, or
wisdom, which, according to you, is the science of itself. Admitting
this view, I ask of you, what good work, worthy of the name wise, does
temperance or wisdom, which is the science of itself, effect? Answer
me.

  That is not the true way of pursuing the enquiry, Socrates, he said;
for wisdom is not like the other sciences, any more than they are like
one another: but you proceed as if they were alike. For tell me, he
said, what result is there of computation or geometry, in the same
sense as a house is the result of building, or a garment of weaving,
or any other work of any other art? Can you show me any such result of
them? You cannot.

  That is true, I said; but still each of these sciences has a subject
which is different from the science. I can show you that the art of
computation has to do with odd and even numbers in their numerical
relations to themselves and to each other. Is not that true?

  Yes, he said.

  And the odd and even numbers are not the same with the art of
computation?

  They are not.

  The art of weighing, again, has to do with lighter and heavier;
but the art of weighing is one thing, and the heavy and the light
another. Do you admit that?

  Yes.

  Now, I want to know, what is that which is not wisdom, and of
which wisdom is the science?

  You are just falling into the old error, Socrates, he said. You come
asking in what wisdom or temperance differs from the other sciences,
and then you try to discover some respect in which they are alike; but
they are not, for all the other sciences are of something else, and
not of themselves; wisdom alone is a science of other sciences, and of
itself. And of this, as I believe, you are very well aware: and that
you are only doing what you denied that you were doing just now,
trying to refute me, instead of pursuing the argument.

  And what if I am? How can you think that I have any other motive
in refuting you but what I should have in examining into myself? which
motive would be just a fear of my unconsciously fancying that I knew
something of which I was ignorant. And at this moment I pursue the
argument chiefly for my own sake, and perhaps in some degree also
for the sake of my other friends. For is not the discovery of things
as they truly are, a good common to all mankind?

  Yes, certainly, Socrates, he said.

  Then, I said, be cheerful, sweet sir, and give your opinion in
answer to the question which I asked, never minding whether Critias or
Socrates is the person refuted; attend only to the argument, and see
what will come of the refutation.

  I think that you are right, he replied; and I will do as you say.

  Tell me, then, I said, what you mean to affirm about wisdom.

  I mean to say that wisdom is the only science which is the science
of itself as well as of the other sciences.

  But the science of science, I said, will also be the science of
the absence of science.

  Very true, he said.

  Then the wise or temperate man, and he only, will know himself,
and be able to examine what he knows or does not know, and to see what
others know and think that they know and do really know; and what they
do not know, and fancy that they know, when they do not. No other
person will be able to do this. And this is wisdom and temperance
and self-knowledge-for a man to know what he knows, and what he does
not know. That is your meaning?

  Yes, he said.

  Now then, I said, making an offering of the third or last argument
to Zeus the Saviour, let us begin again, and ask, in the first
place, whether it is or is not possible for a person to know that he
knows and does not know what he knows and does not know; and in the
second place, whether, if perfectly possible, such knowledge is of any
use.

  That is what we have to consider, he said.

  And here, Critias, I said, I hope that you will find a way out of
a difficulty into which I have got myself. Shall I tell you the nature
of the difficulty?

  By all means, he replied.

  Does not what you have been saying, if true, amount to this: that
there must be a single science which is wholly a science of itself and
of other sciences, and that the same is also the science of the
absence of science?

  Yes.

  But consider how monstrous this proposition is, my friend: in any
parallel case, the impossibility will be transparent to you.

  How is that? and in what cases do you mean?

  In such cases as this: Suppose that there is a kind of vision
which is not like ordinary vision, but a vision of itself and of other
sorts of vision, and of the defect of them, which in seeing sees no
colour, but only itself and other sorts of vision: Do you think that
there is such a kind of vision?

  Certainly not.

  Or is there a kind of hearing which hears no sound at all, but
only itself and other sorts of hearing, or the defects of them?

  There is not.

  Or take all the senses: can you imagine that there is any sense of
itself and of other senses, but which is incapable of perceiving the
objects of the senses?

  I think not.

  Could there be any desire which is not the desire of any pleasure,
but of itself, and of all other desires?

  Certainly not.

  Or can you imagine a wish which wishes for no good, but only for
itself and all other wishes?

  I should answer, No.

  Or would you say that there is a love which is not the love of
beauty, but of itself and of other loves?

  I should not.

  Or did you ever know of a fear which fears itself or other fears,
but has no object of fear?

  I never did, he said.

  Or of an opinion which is an opinion of itself and of other
opinions, and which has no opinion on the subjects of opinion in
general?

  Certainly not.

  But surely we are assuming a science of this kind, which, having
no subject-matter, is a science of itself and of the other sciences?

  Yes, that is what is affirmed.

  But how strange is this, if it be indeed true: must not however as
yet absolutely deny the possibility of such a science; let us rather
consider the matter.

  You are quite right.

  Well then, this science of which we are speaking is a science of
something, and is of a nature to be a science of something?

  Yes.

  Just as that which is greater is of a nature to be greater than
something else?

  Yes.

  Which is less, if the other is conceived to be greater?

  To be sure.

  And if we could find something which is at once greater than itself,
and greater than other great things, but not greater than those things
in comparison of which the others are greater, then that thing would
have the property of being greater and also less than itself?

  That, Socrates, he said, is the inevitable inference.

  Or if there be a double which is double of itself and of other
doubles, these will be halves; for the double is relative to the half?

  That is true.

  And that which is greater than itself will also be less, and that
which is heavier will also be lighter, and that which is older will
also be younger: and the same of other things; that which has a nature
relative to self will retain also the nature of its object: I mean
to say, for example, that hearing is, as we say, of sound or voice. Is
that true?

  Yes.

  Then if hearing hears itself, it must hear a voice; for there is
no other way of hearing.

  Certainly.

  And sight also, my excellent friend, if it sees itself must see a
colour, for sight cannot see that which has no colour.

  No.

  Do you remark, Critias, that in several of the examples which have
been recited the notion of a relation to self is altogether
inadmissible, and in other cases hardly credible-inadmissible, for
example, in the case of magnitudes, numbers, and the like?

  Very true.

  But in the case of hearing and sight, or in the power of
self-motion, and the power of heat to burn, this relation to self will
be regarded as incredible by some, but perhaps not by others. And some
great man, my friend, is wanted, who will satisfactorily determine for
us, whether there is nothing which has an inherent property of
relation to self, or some things only and not others; and whether in
this class of self-related things, if there be such a class, that
science which is called wisdom or temperance is included. I altogether
distrust my own power of determining these matters: I am not certain
whether there is such a science of science at all; and even if there
be, I should not acknowledge this to be wisdom or temperance, until
I can also see whether such a science would or would not do us any
good; for I have an impression that temperance is a benefit and a
good. And therefore, O son of Callaeschrus, as you maintain that
temperance or wisdom is a science of science, and also of the
absence of science, I will request you to show in the first place,
as I was saying before, the possibility, and in the second place,
the advantage, of such a science; and then perhaps you may satisfy
me that you are right in your view of temperance.

  Critias heard me say this, and saw that I was in a difficulty; and
as one person when another yawns in his presence catches the infection
of yawning from him, so did he seem to be driven into a difficulty
by my difficulty. But as he had a reputation to maintain, he was
ashamed to admit before the company that he could not answer my
challenge or determine the question at issue; and he made an
unintelligible attempt to hide his perplexity. In order that the
argument might proceed, I said to him, Well then Critias, if you like,
let us assume that there is this science of science; whether the
assumption is right or wrong may hereafter be investigated.
Admitting the existence of it, will you tell me how such a science
enables us to distinguish what we know or do not know, which, as we
were saying, is self-knowledge or wisdom: so we were saying?

  Yes, Socrates, he said; and that I think is certainly true: for he
who has this science or knowledge which knows itself will become
like the knowledge which he has, in the same way that he who has
swiftness will be swift, and he who has beauty will be beautiful,
and he who has knowledge will know. In the same way he who has that
knowledge which is self-knowing, will know himself.

  I do not doubt, I said, that a man will know himself, when he
possesses that which has self-knowledge: but what necessity is there
that, having this, he should know what he knows and what he does not
know?

  Because, Socrates, they are the same.

  Very likely, I said; but I remain as stupid as ever; for still I
fail to comprehend how this knowing what you know and do not know is
the same as the knowledge of self.

  What do you mean? he said.

  This is what I mean, I replied: I will admit that there is a science
of science;-can this do more than determine that of two things one
is and the other is not science or knowledge?

  No, just that.

  But is knowledge or want of knowledge of health the same as
knowledge or want of knowledge of justice?

  Certainly not.

  The one is medicine, and the other is politics; whereas that of
which we are speaking is knowledge pure and simple.

  Very true.

  And if a man knows only, and has only knowledge of knowledge, and
has no further knowledge of health and justice, the probability is
that he will only know that he knows something, and has a certain
knowledge, whether concerning himself or other men.

  True.

  Then how will this knowledge or science teach him to know what he
knows? Say that he knows health;-not wisdom or temperance, but the art
of medicine has taught it to him; and he has learned harmony from
the art of music, and building from the art of building, neither, from
wisdom or temperance: and the same of other things.

  That is evident.

  How will wisdom, regarded only as a knowledge of knowledge or
science of science, ever teach him that he knows health, or that he
knows building?

  It is impossible.

  Then he who is ignorant of these things will only know that he
knows, but not what he knows?

  True.

  Then wisdom or being wise appears to be not the knowledge of the
things which we do or do not know, but only the knowledge that we know
or do not know?

  That is the inference.

  Then he who has this knowledge will not be able to examine whether a
pretender knows or does not know that which he says that he knows:
he will only know that he has a knowledge of some kind; but wisdom
will not show him of what the knowledge is?

  Plainly not.

  Neither will he be able to distinguish the pretender in medicine
from the true physician, nor between any other true and false
professor of knowledge. Let us consider the matter in this way: If the
wise man or any other man wants to distinguish the true physician from
the false, how will he proceed? He will not talk to him about
medicine; and that, as we were saying, is the only thing which the
physician understands.

  True.

  And, on the other hand, the physician knows nothing of science,
for this has been assumed to be the province of wisdom.

  True.

  And further, since medicine is science, we must infer that he does
not know anything of medicine.

  Exactly.

  Then the wise man may indeed know that the physician has some kind
of science or knowledge; but when he wants to discover the nature of
this he will ask, What is the subject-matter? For the several sciences
are distinguished not by the mere fact that they are sciences, but
by the nature of their subjects. Is not that true?

  Quite true.

  And medicine is distinguished from other sciences as having the
subject-matter of health and disease?

  Yes.

  And he who would enquire into the nature of medicine must pursue the
enquiry into health and disease, and not into what is extraneous?

  True.

  And he who judges rightly will judge of the physician as a physician
in what relates to these?

  He will.

  He will consider whether what he says is true, and whether what he
does is right, in relation to health and disease?

  He will.

  But can any one attain the knowledge of either unless he have a of
medicine?

  He cannot.

  No one at all, it would seem, except the physician can have this
knowledge; and therefore not the wise man; he would have to be a
physician as well as a wise man.

  Very true.

  Then, assuredly, wisdom or temperance, if only a science of science,
and of the absence of science or knowledge, will not be able to
distinguish the physician who knows from one who does not know but
pretends or thinks that he knows, or any other professor of anything
at all; like any other artist, he will only know his fellow in art
or wisdom, and no one else.

  That is evident, he said.

  But then what profit, Critias, I said, is there any longer in wisdom
or temperance which yet remains, if this is wisdom? If, indeed, as
we were supposing at first, the wise man had been able to
distinguish what he knew and did not know, and that he knew the one
and did not know the other, and to recognize a similar faculty of
discernment in others, there would certainly have been a great
advantage in being wise; for then we should never have made a mistake,
but have passed through life the unerring guides of ourselves and of
those who are under us; and we should not have attempted to do what we
did not know, but we should have found out those who knew, and have
handed the business over to them and trusted in them; nor should we
have allowed those who were under us to do anything which they were
not likely to do well and they would be likely to do well just that of
which they had knowledge; and the house or state which was ordered
or administered under the guidance of wisdom, and everything else of
which wisdom was the lord, would have been well ordered; for truth
guiding, and error having been eliminated, in all their doings, men
would have done well, and would have been happy. Was not this,
Critias, what we spoke of as the great advantage of wisdom to know
what is known and what is unknown to us?

  Very true, he said.

  And now you perceive, I said, that no such science is to be found
anywhere.

  I perceive, he said.

  May we assume then, I said, that wisdom, viewed in this new light
merely as a knowledge of knowledge and ignorance, has this
advantage:-that he who possesses such knowledge will more easily learn
anything which he learns; and that everything will be clearer to
him, because, in addition to the knowledge of individuals, he sees the
science, and this also will better enable him to test the knowledge
which others have of what he knows himself; whereas the enquirer who
is without this knowledge may be supposed to have a feebler and weaker
insight? Are not these, my friend, the real advantages which are to be
gained from wisdom? And are not we looking and seeking after something
more than is to be found in her?

  That is very likely, he said.

  That is very likely, I said; and very likely, too, we have been
enquiring to no purpose; as I am led to infer, because I observe
that if this is wisdom, some strange consequences would follow. Let
us, if you please, assume the possibility of this science of sciences,
and further admit and allow, as was originally suggested, that
wisdom is the knowledge of what we know and do not know. Assuming
all this, still, upon further consideration, I am doubtful, Critias,
whether wisdom, such as this, would do us much good. For we were
wrong, I think, in supposing, as we were saying just now, that such
wisdom ordering the government of house or state would be a great
benefit.

  How so? he said.

  Why, I said, we were far too ready to admit the great benefits which
mankind would obtain from their severally doing the things which
they knew, and committing the things of which they are ignorant to
those who were better acquainted with them.

  Were we not right in making that admission?

  I think not.

  How very strange, Socrates!

  By the dog of Egypt, I said, there I agree with you; and I was
thinking as much just now when I said that strange consequences
would follow, and that I was afraid we were on the wrong track; for
however ready we may be to admit that this is wisdom, I certainly
cannot make out what good this sort of thing does to us.

  What do you mean? he said; I wish that you could make me
understand what you mean.

  I dare say that what I am saying is nonsense, I replied; and yet
if a man has any feeling of what is due to himself, he cannot let
the thought which comes into his mind pass away unheeded and
unexamined.

  I like that, he said.

  Hear, then, I said, my own dream; whether coming through the horn or
the ivory gate, I cannot tell. The dream is this: Let us suppose
that wisdom is such as we are now defining, and that she has
absolute sway over us; then each action will be done according to
the arts or sciences, and no one professing to be a pilot when he is
not, or any physician or general, or any one else pretending to know
matters of which he is ignorant, will deceive or elude us; our
health will be improved; our safety at sea, and also in battle, will
be assured; our coats and shoes, and all other instruments and
implements will be skilfully made, because the workmen will be good
and true. Aye, and if you please, you may suppose that prophecy, which
is the knowledge of the future, will be under the control of wisdom,
and that she will deter deceivers and set up the true prophets in
their place as the revealers of the future. Now I quite agree that
mankind, thus provided, would live and act according to knowledge, for
wisdom would watch and prevent ignorance from intruding on us. But
whether by acting according to knowledge we shall act well and be
happy, my dear Critias,-this is a point which we have not yet been
able to determine.

  Yet I think, he replied, that if you discard knowledge, you will
hardly find the crown of happiness in anything else.

  But of what is this knowledge? I said. Just answer me that small
question. Do you mean a knowledge of shoemaking?

  God forbid.

  Or of working in brass?

  Certainly not.

  Or in wool, or wood, or anything of that sort?

  No, I do not.

  Then, I said, we are giving up the doctrine that he who lives
according to knowledge is happy, for these live according to
knowledge, and yet they are not allowed by you to be happy; but I
think that you mean to confine happiness to particular individuals who
live according to knowledge, such for example as the prophet, who,
as I was saying, knows the future. Is it of him you are speaking or of
some one else?

  Yes, I mean him, but there are others as well.

  Yes, I said, some one who knows the past and present as well as
the future, and is ignorant of nothing. Let us suppose that there is
such a person, and if there is, you will allow that he is the most
knowing of all living men.

  Certainly he is.

  Yet I should like to know one thing more: which of the different
kinds of knowledge makes him happy? or do all equally make him happy?

  Not all equally, he replied.

  But which most tends to make him happy? the knowledge of what
past, present, or future thing? May I infer this to be the knowledge
of the game of draughts?

  Nonsense about the game of draughts.

  Or of computation?

  No.

  Or of health?

  That is nearer the truth, he said.

  And that knowledge which is nearest of all, I said, is the knowledge
of what?

  The knowledge with which he discerns good and evil.

  Monster! I said; you have been carrying me round in a circle, and
all this time hiding from me the fact that the life according to
knowledge is not that which makes men act rightly and be happy, not
even if knowledge include all the sciences, but one science only, that
of good and evil. For, let me ask you, Critias, whether, if you take
away this, medicine will not equally give health, and shoemaking
equally produce shoes, and the art of the weaver clothes?-whether
the art of the pilot will not equally save our lives at sea, and the
art of the general in war?

  Quite so.

  And yet, my dear Critias, none of these things will be well or
beneficially done, if the science of the good be wanting.

  True.

  But that science is not wisdom or temperance, but a science of human
advantage; not a science of other sciences, or of ignorance, but of
good and evil: and if this be of use, then wisdom or temperance will
not be of use.

  And why, he replied, will not wisdom be of use? For, however much we
assume that wisdom is a science of sciences, and has a sway over other
sciences, surely she will have this particular science of the good
under her control, and in this way will benefit us.

  And will wisdom give health? I said; is not this rather the effect
of medicine? Or does wisdom do the work any of the other arts, do they
not each of them do their own work? Have we not long ago asseverated
that wisdom is only the knowledge of knowledge and of ignorance, and
of nothing else?

  That is obvious.

  Then wisdom will not be the producer of health.

  Certainly not.

  The art of health is different.

  Yes, different.

  Nor does wisdom give advantage, my good friend; for that again we
have just now been attributing to another art.

  Very true.

  How then can wisdom be advantageous, when giving no advantage?

  That, Socrates, is certainly inconceivable.

  You see then, Critias, that I was not far wrong in fearing that I
could have no sound notion about wisdom; I was quite right in
depreciating myself; for that which is admitted to be the best of
all things would never have seemed to us useless, if I had been good
for anything at an enquiry. But now I have been utterly defeated,
and have failed to discover what that is to which the imposer of names
gave this name of temperance or wisdom. And yet many more admissions
were made by us than could be fairly granted; for we admitted that
there was a science of science, although the argument said No, and
protested against us; and we admitted further, that this science
knew the works of the other sciences (although this too was denied
by the argument), because we wanted to show that the wise man had
knowledge of what he knew and did not know; also we nobly disregarded,
and never even considered, the impossibility of a man knowing in a
sort of way that which he does not know at all; for our assumption
was, that he knows that which he does not know; than which nothing, as
I think, can be more irrational. And yet, after finding us so easy and
good-natured, the enquiry is still unable to discover the truth; but
mocks us to a degree, and has gone out of its way to prove the
inutility of that which we admitted only by a sort of supposition
and fiction to be the true definition of temperance or wisdom: which
result, as far as I am concerned, is not so much to be lamented, I
said. But for your sake, Charmides, I am very sorry-that you, having
such beauty and such wisdom and temperance of soul, should have no
profit or good in life from your wisdom and temperance. And still more
am I grieved about the charm which I learned with so much pain, and to
so little profit, from the Thracian, for the sake of a thing which
is nothing worth. I think indeed that there is a mistake, and that I
must be a bad enquirer, for wisdom or temperance I believe to be
really a great good; and happy are you, Charmides, if you certainly
possess it. Wherefore examine yourself, and see whether you have
this gift and can do without the charm; for if you can, I would rather
advise you to regard me simply as a fool who is never able to reason
out anything; and to rest assured that the more wise and temperate you
are, the happier you will be.

  Charmides said: I am sure that I do not know, Socrates, whether I
have or have not this gift of wisdom and temperance; for how can I
know whether I have a thing, of which even you and Critias are, as you
say, unable to discover the nature?-(not that I believe you.) And
further, I am sure, Socrates, that I do need the charm, and as far
as I am concerned, I shall be willing to be charmed by you daily,
until you say that I have had enough.

  Very good, Charmides, said Critias; if you do this I shall have a
proof of your temperance, that is, if you allow yourself to be charmed
by Socrates, and never desert him at all.

  You may depend on my following and not deserting him, said
Charmides: if you who are my guardian command me, I should be very
wrong not to obey you.

  And I do command you, he said.

  Then I will do as you say, and begin this very day.

  You sirs, I said, what are you conspiring about?

  We are not conspiring, said Charmides, we have conspired already.

  And are you about to use violence, without even going through the
forms of justice?

  Yes, I shall use violence, he replied, since he orders me; and
therefore you had better consider well.

  But the time for consideration has passed, I said, when violence
is employed; and you, when you are determined on anything, and in
the mood of violence, are irresistible.

  Do not you resist me then, he said.

  I will not resist you, I replied.

                             -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES, HERMOGENES, CRATYLUS

  Hermogenes. Suppose that we make Socrates a party to the argument?

  Cratylus. If you please.

  Her. I should explain to you, Socrates, that our friend Cratylus has
been arguing about names; he says that they are natural and not
conventional; not a portion of the human voice which men agree to use;
but that there is a truth or correctness in them, which is the same
for Hellenes as for barbarians. Whereupon I ask him, whether his own
name of Cratylus is a true name or not, and he answers "Yes." And
Socrates? "Yes." Then every man's name, as I tell him, is that which
he is called. To this he replies- "If all the world were to call you
Hermogenes, that would not be your name." And when I am anxious to
have a further explanation he is ironical and mysterious, and seems to
imply that he has a notion of his own about the matter, if he would
only tell, and could entirely convince me, if he chose to be
intelligible. Tell me, Socrates, what this oracle means; or rather
tell me, if you will be so good, what is your own view of the truth or
correctness of names, which I would far sooner hear.

  Socrates. Son of Hipponicus, there is an ancient saying, that
"hard is the knowledge of the good." And the knowledge of names is a
great part of knowledge. If I had not been poor, I might have heard
the fifty-drachma course of the great Prodicus, which is a complete
education in grammar and language- these are his own words- and then I
should have been at once able to answer your question about the
correctness of names. But, indeed, I have only heard the
single-drachma course, and therefore, I do not know the truth about
such matters; I will, however, gladly assist you and Cratylus in the
investigation of them. When he declares that your name is not really
Hermogenes, I suspect that he is only making fun of you;- he means
to say that you are no true son of Hermes, because you are always
looking after a fortune and never in luck. But, as I was saying, there
is a good deal of difficulty in this sort of knowledge, and
therefore we had better leave the question open until we have heard
both sides.

  Her. I have often talked over this matter, both with Cratylus and
others, and cannot convince myself that there is any principle of
correctness in names other than convention and agreement; any name
which you give, in my opinion, is the right one, and if you change
that and give another, the new name is as correct as the old- we
frequently change the names of our slaves, and the newly-imposed
name is as good as the old: for there is no name given to anything
by nature; all is convention and habit of the users;- such is my view.
But if I am mistaken I shall be happy to hear and learn of Cratylus,
or of any one else.

  Soc. I dare say that you be right, Hermogenes: let us see;- Your
meaning is, that the name of each thing is only that which anybody
agrees to call it?

  Her. That is my notion.

  Soc. Whether the giver of the name be an individual or a city?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Well, now, let me take an instance;- suppose that I call a
man a horse or a horse a man, you mean to say that a man will be
rightly called a horse by me individually, and rightly called a man by
the rest of the world; and a horse again would be rightly called a man
by me and a horse by the world:- that is your meaning?

  Her. He would, according to my view.

  Soc. But how about truth, then? you would acknowledge that there
is in words a true and a false?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. And there are true and false propositions?

  Her. To be sure.

  Soc. And a true proposition says that which is, and a false
proposition says that which is not?

  Her. Yes; what other answer is possible?

  Soc. Then in a proposition there is a true and false?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. But is a proposition true as a whole only, and are the parts
untrue?

  Her. No; the parts are true as well as the whole.

  Soc. Would you say the large parts and not the smaller ones, or
every part?

  Her. I should say that every part is true.

  Soc. Is a proposition resolvable into any part smaller than a name?

  Her. No; that is the smallest.

  Soc. Then the name is a part of the true proposition?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Yes, and a true part, as you say.

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And is not the part of a falsehood also a falsehood?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Then, if propositions may be true and false, names may be
true and false?

  Her. So we must infer.

  Soc. And the name of anything is that which any one affirms to be
the name?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And will there be so many names of each thing as everybody says
that there are? and will they be true names at the time of uttering
them?

  Her. Yes, Socrates, I can conceive no correctness of names other
than this; you give one name, and I another; and in different cities
and countries there are different names for the same things;
Hellenes differ from barbarians in their use of names, and the several
Hellenic tribes from one another.

  Soc. But would you say, Hermogenes, that the things differ as the
names differ? and are they relative to individuals, as Protagoras
tells us? For he says that man is the measure of all things, and
that things are to me as they appear to me, and that they are to you
as they appear to you. Do you agree with him, or would you say that
things have a permanent essence of their own?

  Her. There have been times, Socrates, when I have been driven in
my perplexity to take refuge with Protagoras; not that I agree with
him at all.

  Soc. What! have you ever been driven to admit that there was no such
thing as a bad man?

  Her. No, indeed; but I have often had reason to think that there are
very bad men, and a good many of them.

  Soc. Well, and have you ever found any very good ones?

  Her. Not many.

  Soc. Still you have found them?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And would you hold that the very good were the very wise, and
the very evil very foolish? Would that be your view?

  Her. It would.

  Soc. But if Protagoras is right, and the truth is that things are as
they appear to any one, how can some of us be wise and some of us
foolish?

  Her. Impossible.

  Soc. And if, on the other hand, wisdom and folly are really
distinguishable, you will allow, I think, that the assertion of
Protagoras can hardly be correct. For if what appears to each man is
true to him, one man cannot in reality be wiser than another.

  Her. He cannot.

  Soc. Nor will you be disposed to say with Euthydemus, that all
things equally belong to all men at the same moment and always; for
neither on his view can there be some good and other bad, if virtue
and vice are always equally to be attributed to all.

  Her. There cannot.

  Soc. But if neither is right, and things are not relative to
individuals, and all things do not equally belong to all at the same
moment and always, they must be supposed to have their own proper
and permanent essence: they are not in relation to us, or influenced
by us, fluctuating according to our fancy, but they are independent,
and maintain to their own essence the relation prescribed by nature.

  Her. I think, Socrates, that you have said the truth.

  Soc. Does what I am saying apply only to the things themselves, or
equally to the actions which proceed from them? Are not actions also a
class of being?

  Her. Yes, the actions are real as well as the things.

  Soc. Then the actions also are done according to their proper
nature, and not according to our opinion of them? In cutting, for
example, we do not cut as we please, and with any chance instrument;
but we cut with the proper instrument only, and according to the
natural process of cutting; and the natural process is right and
will succeed, but any other will fail and be of no use at all.

  Her. I should say that the natural way is the right way.

  Soc. Again, in burning, not every way is the right way; but the
right way is the natural way, and the right instrument the natural
instrument.

  Her. True.

  Soc. And this holds good of all actions?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And speech is a kind of action?

  Her. True.

  Soc. And will a man speak correctly who speaks as he pleases? Will
not the successful speaker rather be he who speaks in the natural
way of speaking, and as things ought to be spoken, and with the
natural instrument? Any other mode of speaking will result in error
and failure.

  Her. I quite agree with you.

  Soc. And is not naming a part of speaking? for in giving names men
speak.

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. And if speaking is a sort of action and has a relation to acts,
is not naming also a sort of action?

  Her. True.

  Soc. And we saw that actions were not relative to ourselves, but had
a special nature of their own?

  Her. Precisely.

  Soc. Then the argument would lead us to infer that names ought to be
given according to a natural process, and with a proper instrument,
and not at our pleasure: in this and no other way shall we name with
success.

  Her. I agree.

  Soc. But again, that which has to be cut has to be cut with
something?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And that which has to be woven or pierced has to be woven or
pierced with something?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. And that which has to be named has to be named with something?

  Her. True.

  Soc. What is that with which we pierce?

  Her. An awl.

  Soc. And with which we weave?

  Her. A shuttle.

  Soc. And with which we name?

  Her. A name.

  Soc. Very good: then a name is an instrument?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. Suppose that I ask, "What sort of instrument is a shuttle?" And
you answer, "A weaving instrument."

  Her. Well.

  Soc. And I ask again, "What do we do when we weave?"- The answer is,
that we separate or disengage the warp from the woof.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. And may not a similar description be given of an awl, and of
instruments in general?

  Her. To be sure.

  Soc. And now suppose that I ask a similar question about names: will
you answer me? Regarding the name as an instrument, what do we do when
we name?

  Her. I cannot say.

  Soc. Do we not give information to one another, and distinguish
things according to their natures?

  Her. Certainly we do.

  Soc. Then a name is an instrument of teaching and of
distinguishing natures, as the shuttle is of distinguishing the
threads of the web.

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And the shuttle is the instrument of the weaver?

  Her. Assuredly.

  Soc. Then the weaver will use the shuttle well- and well means
like a weaver? and the teacher will use the name well- and well
means like a teacher?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And when the weaver uses the shuttle, whose work will he be
using well?

  Her. That of the carpenter.

  Soc. And is every man a carpenter, or the skilled only?

  Her. Only the skilled.

  Soc. And when the piercer uses the awl, whose work will he be
using well?

  Her. That of the smith.

  Soc. And is every man a smith, or only the skilled?

  Her. The skilled only.

  Soc. And when the teacher uses the name, whose work will he be
using?

  Her. There again I am puzzled.

  Soc. Cannot you at least say who gives us the names which we use?

  Her. Indeed I cannot.

  Soc. Does not the law seem to you to give us them?

  Her. Yes, I suppose so.

  Soc. Then the teacher, when he gives us a name, uses the work of the
legislator?

  Her. I agree.

  Soc. And is every man a legislator, or the skilled only?

  Her. The skilled only.

  Soc. Then, Hermogenes, not every man is able to give a name, but
only a maker of names; and this is the legislator, who of all
skilled artisans in the world is the rarest.

  Her. True.

  Soc. And how does the legislator make names? and to what does he
look? Consider this in the light of the previous instances: to what
does the carpenter look in making the shuttle? Does he not look to
that which is naturally fitted to act as a shuttle?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. And suppose the shuttle to be broken in making, will he make
another, looking to the broken one? or will he look to the form
according to which he made the other?

  Her. To the latter, I should imagine.

  Soc. Might not that be justly called the true or ideal shuttle?

  Her. I think so.

  SOC. And whatever shuttles are wanted, for the manufacture of
garments, thin or thick, of flaxen, woollen, or other material,
ought all of them to have the true form of the shuttle; and whatever
is the shuttle best adapted to each kind of work, that ought to be the
form which the maker produces in each case.

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And the same holds of other instruments: when a man has
discovered the instrument which is naturally adapted to each work,
he must express this natural form, and not others which he fancies, in
the material, whatever it may be, which he employs; for example, he
ought to know how to put into iron the forms of awls adapted by nature
to their several uses?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. And how to put into wood forms of shuttles adapted by nature to
their uses?

  Her. True.

  Soc. For the several forms of shuttles naturally answer to the
several kinds of webs; and this is true of instruments in general.

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Then, as to names: ought not our legislator also to know how to
put the true natural names of each thing into sounds and syllables and
to make and give all names with a view to the ideal name, if he is
to be a namer in any true sense? And we must remember that different
legislators will not use the same syllables. For neither does every
smith, although he may be making the same instrument for the same
purpose, make them all of the same iron. The form must be the same,
but the material may vary, and still the instrument may be equally
good of whatever iron made, whether in Hellas or in a foreign
country;- there is no difference.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. And the legislator, whether he be Hellene or barbarian, is
not therefore to be deemed by you a worse legislator, provided he
gives the true and proper form of the name in whatever syllables; this
or that country makes no matter.

  Her. Quite true.

  Soc. But who then is to determine whether the proper form is given
to the shuttle, whatever sort of wood may be used? the carpenter who
makes, or the weaver who is to use them?

  Her. I should say, he who is to use them, Socrates.

  Soc. And who uses the work of the lyremaker? Will not he be the
man who knows how to direct what is being done, and who will know also
whether the work is being well done or not?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. And who is he?

  Her. The player of the lyre.

  Soc. And who will direct the shipwright?

  Her. The pilot.

  Soc. And who will be best able to direct the legislator in his work,
and will know whether the work is well done, in this or any other
country? Will not the user be the man?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And this is he who knows how to ask questions?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And how to answer them?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And him who knows how to ask and answer you would call a
dialectician?

  Her. Yes; that would be his name.

  Soc. Then the work of the carpenter is to make a rudder, and the
pilot has to direct him, if the rudder is to be well made.

  Her. True.

  Soc. And the work of the legislator is to give names, and the
dialectician must be his director if the names are to be rightly
given?

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. Then, Hermogenes, I should say that this giving of names can be
no such light matter as you fancy, or the work of light or chance
persons; and Cratylus is right in saying that things have names by
nature, and that not every man is an artificer of names, but he only
who looks to the name which each thing by nature has, and is able to
express the true forms of things in letters and syllables.

  Her. I cannot answer you, Socrates; but I find a difficulty in
changing my opinion all in a moment, and I think that I should be more
readily persuaded, if you would show me what this is which you term
the natural fitness of names.

  Soc. My good Hermogenes, I have none to show. Was I not telling
you just now (but you have forgotten), that I knew nothing, and
proposing to share the enquiry with you? But now that you and I have
talked over the matter, a step has been gained; for we have discovered
that names have by nature a truth, and that not every man knows how to
give a thing a name.

  Her. Very good.

  Soc. And what is the nature of this truth or correctness of names?
That, if you care to know, is the next question.

  Her. Certainly, I care to know.

  Soc. Then reflect.

  Her. How shall I reflect?

  Soc. The true way is to have the assistance of those who know, and
you must pay them well both in money and in thanks; these are the
Sophists, of whom your brother, Callias, has- rather dearly- bought
the reputation of wisdom. But you have not yet come into your
inheritance, and therefore you had better go to him, and beg and
entreat him to tell you what he has learnt from Protagoras about the
fitness of names.

  Her. But how inconsistent should I be, if, whilst repudiating
Protagoras and his Truth, I were to attach any value to what he and
his book affirm!

  Soc. Then if you despise him, you must learn of Homer and the poets.

  Her. And where does Homer say anything about names, and what does he
say?

  Soc. He often speaks of them; notably and nobly in the places
where he distinguishes the different names which Gods and men give
to the same things. Does he not in these passages make a remarkable
statement about the correctness of names? For the Gods must clearly be
supposed to call things by their right and natural names; do you not
think so?

  Her. Why, of course they call them rightly, if they call them at
all. But to what are you referring?

  Soc. Do you not know what he says about the river in Troy who had
a single combat with Hephaestus?

     Whom the Gods call Xanthus, and men call Scamander.

  Her. I remember.

  Soc. Well, and about this river- to know that he ought to be
called Xanthus and not Scamander- is not that a solemn lesson? Or
about the bird which, as he says,

     The Gods call Chalcis, and men Cymindis:

to be taught how much more correct the name Chalcis is than the name
Cymindis- do you deem that a light matter? Or about Batieia and
Myrina? And there are many other observations of the same kind in
Homer and other poets. Now, I think that this is beyond the
understanding of you and me; but the names of Scamandrius and
Astyanax, which he affirms to have been the names of Hector's son, are
more within the range of human faculties, as I am disposed to think;
and what the poet means by correctness may be more readily apprehended
in that instance: you will remember I dare say the lines to which I
refer?

  Her. I do.

  Soc. Let me ask you, then, which did Homer think the more correct of
the names given to Hector's son- Astyanax or Scamandrius?

  Her. I do not know.

  Soc. How would you answer, if you were asked whether the wise or the
unwise are more likely to give correct names?

  Her. I should say the wise, of course.

  Soc. And are the men or the women of a city, taken as a class, the
wiser?

  Her. I should say, the men.

  Soc. And Homer, as you know, says that the Trojan men called him
Astyanax (king of the city); but if the men called him Astyanax, the
other name of Scamandrius could only have been given to him by the
women.

  Her. That may be inferred.

  Soc. And must not Homer have imagined the Trojans to be wiser than
their wives?

  Her. To be sure.

  Soc. Then he must have thought Astyanax to be a more correct name
for the boy than Scamandrius?

  Her. Clearly.

  Soc. And what is the reason of this? Let us consider:- does he not
himself suggest a very good reason, when he says,

     For he alone defended their city and long walls?

This appears to be a good reason for calling the son of the saviour
king of the city which his father was saving, as Homer observes.

  Her. I see.

  Soc. Why, Hermogenes, I do not as yet see myself; and do you?

  Her. No, indeed; not I.

  Soc. But tell me, friend, did not Homer himself also give Hector his
name?

  Her. What of that?

  Soc. The name appears to me to be very nearly the same as the name
of Astyanax- both are Hellenic; and a king (anax) and a holder (ektor)
have nearly the same meaning, and are both descriptive of a king;
for a man is clearly the holder of that of which he is king; he rules,
and owns, and holds it. But, perhaps, you may think that I am
talking nonsense; and indeed I believe that I myself did not know what
I meant when I imagined that I had found some indication of the
opinion of Homer about the correctness of names.

  Her. I assure you that I think otherwise, and I believe you to be on
the right track.

  Soc. There is reason, I think, in calling the lion's whelp a lion,
and the foal of a horse a horse; I am speaking only of the ordinary
course of nature, when an animal produces after his kind, and not of
extraordinary births;- if contrary to nature a horse have a calf, then
I should not call that a foal but a calf; nor do I call any inhuman
birth a man, but only a natural birth. And the same may be said of
trees and other things. Do you agree with me?

  Her. Yes, I agree.

  Soc. Very good. But you had better watch me and see that I do not
play tricks with you. For on the same principle the son of a king is
to be called a king. And whether the syllables of the name are the
same or not the same, makes no difference, provided the meaning is
retained; nor does the addition or subtraction of a letter make any
difference so long as the essence of the thing remains in possession
of the name and appears in it.

  Her. What do you mean?

  Soc. A very simple matter. I may illustrate my meaning by the
names of letters, which you know are not the same as the letters
themselves with the exception of the four e, u, o (short), o (long);
the names of the rest, whether vowels or consonants, are made up of
other letters which we add to them; but so long as we introduce the
meaning, and there can be no mistake, the name of the letter is
quite correct. Take, for example, the letter beta- the addition of
e, t, a, gives no offence, and does not prevent the whole name from
having the value which the legislator intended- so well did he know
how to give the letters names.

  Her. I believe you are right.

  Soc. And may not the same be said of a king? a king will often be
the son of a king, the good son or the noble son of a good or noble
sire; and similarly the off spring of every kind, in the regular
course of nature, is like the parent, and therefore has the same name.
Yet the syllables may be disguised until they appear different to
the ignorant person, and he may not recognize them, although they
are the same, just as any one of us would not recognize the same drugs
under different disguises of colour and smell, although to the
physician, who regards the power of them, they are the same, and he is
not put out by the addition; and in like manner the etymologist is not
put out by the addition or transposition or subtraction of a letter or
two, or indeed by the change of all the letters, for this need not
interfere with the meaning. As was just now said, the names of
Hector and Astyanax have only one letter alike, which is t, and yet
they have the same meaning. And how little in common with the
letters of their names has Archepolis (ruler of the city)- and yet the
meaning is the same. And there are many other names which just mean
"king." Again, there are several names for a general, as, for example,
Agis (leader) and Polemarchus (chief in war) and Eupolemus (good
warrior); and others which denote a physician, as Iatrocles (famous
healer) and Acesimbrotus (curer of mortals); and there are many others
which might be cited, differing in their syllables and letters, but
having the same meaning. Would you not say so?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. The same names, then, ought to be assigned to those who
follow in the course of nature?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And what of those who follow out of the course of nature, and
are prodigies? for example, when a good and religious man has an
irreligious son, he ought to bear the name not of his father, but of
the class to which he belongs, just as in the case which was before
supposed of a horse foaling a calf.

  Her. Quite true.

  Soc. Then the irreligious son of a religious father should be called
irreligious?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. He should not be called Theophilus (beloved of God) or
Mnesitheus (mindful of God), or any of these names: if names are
correctly given, his should have an opposite meaning.

  Her. Certainly, Socrates.

  Soc. Again, Hermogenes, there is Orestes (the man of the
mountains) who appears to be rightly called; whether chance gave the
name, or perhaps some poet who meant to express the brutality and
fierceness and mountain wildness of his hero's nature.

  Her. That is very likely, Socrates.

  Soc. And his father's name is also according to nature.

  Her. Clearly.

  Soc. Yes, for as his name, so also is his nature; Agamemnon
(admirable for remaining) is one who is patient and persevering in the
accomplishment of his resolves, and by his virtue crowns them; and his
continuance at Troy with all the vast army is a proof of that
admirable endurance in him which is signified by the name Agamemnon. I
also think that Atreus is rightly called; for his murder of Chrysippus
and his exceeding cruelty to Thyestes are damaging and destructive
to his reputation- the name is a little altered and disguised so as
not to be intelligible to every one, but to the etymologist there is
no difficulty in seeing the meaning, for whether you think of him as
ateires the stubborn, or as atrestos the fearless, or as ateros the
destructive one, the name is perfectly correct in every point of view.
And I think that Pelops is also named appropriately; for, as the
name implies, he is rightly called Pelops who sees what is near only
(o ta pelas oron).

  Her. How so?

  Soc. Because, according to the tradition, he had no forethought or
foresight of all the evil which the murder of Myrtilus would entail
upon his whole race in remote ages; he saw only what was at hand and
immediate,- Or in other words, pelas (near), in his eagerness to win
Hippodamia by all means for his bride. Every one would agree that
the name of Tantalus is rightly given and in accordance with nature,
if the traditions about him are true.

  Her. And what are the traditions?

  Soc. Many terrible misfortunes are said to have happened to him in
his life- last of all, came the utter ruin of his country; and after
his death he had the stone suspended (talanteia) over his head in
the world below- all this agrees wonderfully well with his name. You
might imagine that some person who wanted to call him Talantatos
(the most weighted down by misfortune), disguised the name by altering
it into Tantalus; and into this form, by some accident of tradition,
it has actually been transmuted. The name of Zeus, who is his
alleged father, has also an excellent meaning, although hard to be
understood, because really like a sentence, which is divided into
two parts, for some call him Zena, and use the one half, and others
who use the other half call him Dia; the two together signify the
nature of the God, and the business of a name, as we were saying, is
to express the nature. For there is none who is more the author of
life to us and to all, than the lord and king of all. Wherefore we are
right in calling him Zena and Dia, which are one name, although
divided, meaning the God through whom all creatures always have life
(di on zen aei pasi tois zosin uparchei). There is an irreverence,
at first sight, in calling him son of Cronos (who is a proverb for
stupidity), and we might rather expect Zeus to be the child of a
mighty intellect. Which is the fact; for this is the meaning of his
father's name: Kronos quasi Koros (Choreo, to sweep), not in the sense
of a youth, but signifying to chatharon chai acheraton tou nou, the
pure and garnished mind (sc. apo tou chorein). He, as we are
informed by tradition, was begotten of Uranus, rightly so called
(apo tou oran ta ano) from looking upwards; which, as philosophers
tell us, is the way to have a pure mind, and the name Uranus is
therefore correct. If I could remember the genealogy of Hesiod, I
would have gone on and tried more conclusions of the same sort on
the remoter ancestors of the Gods,- then I might have seen whether
this wisdom, which has come to me all in an instant, I know not
whence, will or will not hold good to the end.

  Her. You seem to me, Socrates, to be quite like a prophet newly
inspired, and to be uttering oracles.

  Soc. Yes, Hermogenes, and I believe that I caught the inspiration
from the great Euthyphro of the Prospaltian deme, who gave me a long
lecture which commenced at dawn: he talked and I listened, and his
wisdom and enchanting ravishment has not only filled my ears but taken
possession of my soul,and to-day I shall let his superhuman power work
and finish the investigation of names- that will be the way; but
to-morrow, if you are so disposed, we will conjure him away, and
make a purgation of him, if we can only find some priest or sophist
who is skilled in purifications of this sort.

  Her. With all my heart; for am very curious to hear the rest of
the enquiry about names.

  Soc. Then let us proceed; and where would you have us begin, now
that we have got a sort of outline of the enquiry? Are there any names
which witness of themselves that they are not given arbitrarily, but
have a natural fitness? The names of heroes and of men in general
are apt to be deceptive because they are often called after
ancestors with whose names, as we were saying, they may have no
business; or they are the expression of a wish like Eutychides (the
son of good fortune), or Sosias (the Saviour), or Theophilus (the
beloved of God), and others. But I think that we had better leave
these, for there will be more chance of finding correctness in the
names of immutable essences;- there ought to have been more care taken
about them when they were named, and perhaps there may have been
some more than human power at work occasionally in giving them names.

  Her. I think so, Socrates.

  Soc. Ought we not to begin with the consideration of the Gods, and
show that they are" rightly named Gods?

  Her. Yes, that will be well.

  Soc. My notion would be something of this sort:- I suspect that
the sun, moon, earth, stars, and heaven, which are still the Gods of
many barbarians, were the only Gods known to the aboriginal
Hellenes. Seeing that they were always moving and running, from
their running nature they were called Gods or runners (Theous,
Theontas); and when men became acquainted with the other Gods, they
proceeded to apply the same name to them all. Do you think that
likely?

  Her. I think it very likely indeed.

  Soc. What shall follow the Gods?

  Her. Must not demons and heroes and men come next?

  Soc. Demons! And what do you consider to be the meaning of this
word? Tell me if my view is right.

  Her. Let me hear.

  Soc. You know how Hesiod uses the word?

  Her. I do not.

  Soc. Do you not remember that he speaks of a golden race of men
who came first?

  Her. Yes, I do.

  Soc. He says of them-

     But now that fate has closed over this race

     They are holy demons upon the earth,

     Beneficent, averters of ills, guardians of mortal men.

  Her. What is the inference?

  Soc. What is the inference! Why, I suppose that he means by the
golden men, not men literally made of gold, but good and noble; and
I am convinced of this, because he further says that we are the iron
race.

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. And do you not suppose that good men of our own day would by
him be said to be of golden race?

  Her. Very likely.

  Soc. And are not the good wise?

  Her. Yes, they are wise.

  Soc. And therefore I have the most entire conviction that he
called them demons, because they were daemones (knowing or wise),
and in our older Attic dialect the word itself occurs. Now he and
other poets say truly, that when a good man dies he has honour and a
mighty portion among the dead, and becomes a demon; which is a name
given to him signifying wisdom. And I say too, that every wise man who
happens to be a good man is more than human (daimonion) both in life
and death, and is rightly called a demon.

  Her. Then I rather think that I am of one mind with you; but what is
the meaning of the word "hero"? (eros)

  Soc. I think that there is no difficulty in explaining, for the name
is not much altered, and signifies that they were born of love.

  Her. What do you mean?

  Soc. Do you not know that the heroes are demigods?

  Her. What then?

  Soc. All of them sprang either from the love of a God for a mortal
woman, or of a mortal man for a Goddess; think of the word in the
old Attic, and you will see better that the name heros is only a
slight alteration of Eros, from whom the heroes sprang: either this is
the meaning, or, if not this, then they must have been skilful as
rhetoricians and dialecticians, and able to put the question (erotan),
for eirein is equivalent to legein. And therefore, as I was saying, in
the Attic dialect the heroes turn out to be rhetoricians and
questioners. All this is easy enough; the noble breed of heroes are
a tribe of sophists and rhetors. But can you tell me why men are
called anthropoi?- that is more difficult.

  Her. No, I cannot; and I would not try even if I could, because I
think that you are the more likely to succeed.

  Soc. That is to say, you trust to the inspiration of Euthyphro.

  Her. Of course.

  Soc. Your faith is not vain; for at this very moment a new and
ingenious thought strikes me, and, if I am not careful, before
tomorrow's dawn I shall be wiser than I ought to be. Now, attend to
me; and first, remember that we of put in and pull out letters in
words, and give names as we please and change the accents. Take, for
example, the word Dii Philos; in order to convert this from a sentence
into a noun, we omit one of the iotas and sound the middle syllable
grave instead of acute; as, on the other hand, letters are sometimes
inserted in words instead of being omitted, and the acute takes the
place of the grave.

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. The name anthropos, which was once a sentence, and is now a
noun, appears to be a case just of this sort, for one letter, which is
the a, has been omitted, and the acute on the last syllable has been
changed to a grave.

  Her. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean to say that the word "man" implies that other animals
never examine, or consider, or look up at what they see, but that
man not only sees (opope) but considers and looks up at that which
he sees, and hence he alone of all animals is rightly anthropos,
meaning anathron a opopen.

  Her. May I ask you to examine another word about which I am curious?

  Soc. Certainly.

  Her. I will take that which appears to me to follow next in order.
You know the distinction of soul and body?

  Soc. Of course.

  Her. Let us endeavour to analyze them like the previous words.

  Soc. You want me first of all to examine the natural fitness of
the word psnche (soul), and then of the word soma (body)?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. If I am to say what occurs to me at the moment, I should
imagine that those who first use the name psnche meant to express that
the soul when in the body is the source of life, and gives the power
of breath and revival (anapsuchon), and when this reviving power fails
then the body perishes and dies, and this, if I am not mistaken,
they called psyche. But please stay a moment; I fancy that I can
discover something which will be more acceptable to the disciples of
Euthyphro, for I am afraid that they will scorn this explanation. What
do you say to another?

  Her. Let me hear.

  Soc. What is that which holds and carries and gives life and
motion to the entire nature of the body? What else but the soul?

  Her. Just that.

  Soc. And do you not believe with Anaxagoras, that mind or soul is
the ordering and containing principle of all things?

  Her. Yes; I do.

  Soc. Then you may well call that power phuseche which carries and
holds nature (e phusin okei, kai ekei), and this may be refined away
into psuche.

 Her. Certainly; and this derivation is, I think, more scientific than
the other.

  Soc. It is so; but I cannot help laughing, if I am to suppose that
this was the true meaning of the name.

  Her. But what shall we say of the next word?

  Soc. You mean soma (the body).

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. That may be variously interpreted; and yet more variously if
a little permutation is allowed. For some say that the body is the
grave (sema) of the soul which may be thought to be buried in our
present life; or again the index of the soul, because the soul gives
indications to (semainei) the body; probably the Orphic poets were the
inventors of the name, and they were under the impression that the
soul is suffering the punishment of sin, and that the body is an
enclosure or prison in which the soul is incarcerated, kept safe
(soma, sozetai), as the name ooma implies, until the penalty is
paid; according to this view, not even a letter of the word need be
changed.

  Her. I think, Socrates, that we have said enough of this class of
words. But have we any more explanations of the names of the Gods,
like that which you were giving of Zeus? I should like to know whether
any similar principle of correctness is to be applied to them.

  Soc. Yes, indeed, Hermogenes; and there is one excellent principle
which, as men of sense, we must acknowledge,- that of the Gods we know
nothing, either of their natures or of the names which they give
themselves; but we are sure that the names by which they call
themselves, whatever they may be, are true. And this is the best of
all principles; and the next best is to say, as in prayers, that we
will call them by any sort of kind names or patronymics which they
like, because we do not know of any other. That also, I think, is a
very good custom, and one which I should much wish to observe. Let us,
then, if you please, in the first place announce to them that we are
not enquiring about them; we do not presume that we are able to do so;
but we are enquiring about the meaning of men in giving them these
names,- in this there can be small blame.

  Her. I think, Socrates, that you are quite right, and I would like
to do as you say.

  Soc. Shall we begin, then, with Hestia, according to custom?

  Her. Yes, that will be very proper.

  Soc. What may we suppose him to have meant who gave the name Hestia?

  Her. That is another and certainly a most difficult question.

  Soc. My dear Hermogenes, the first imposers of names must surely
have been considerable persons; they were philosophers, and had a good
deal to say.

  Her. Well, and what of them?

  Soc. They are the men to whom I should attribute the imposition of
names. Even in foreign names, if you analyze them, a meaning is
still discernible. For example, that which we term ousia is by some
called esia, and by others again osia. Now that the essence of
things should be called estia, which is akin to the first of these
(esia = estia), is rational enough. And there is reason in the
Athenians calling that estia which participates in ousia. For in
ancient times we too seem to have said esia for ousia, and this you
may note to have been the idea of those who appointed that
sacrifices should be first offered to estia, which was natural
enough if they meant that estia was the essence of things. Those again
who read osia seem to have inclined to the opinion of Heracleitus,
that all things flow and nothing stands; with them the pushing
principle (othoun) is the cause and ruling power of all things, and is
therefore rightly called osia. Enough of this, which is all that we
who know nothing can affirm. Next in order after Hestia we ought to
consider Rhea and Cronos, although the name of Cronos has been already
discussed. But I dare say that I am talking great nonsense.

  Her. Why, Socrates?

  Soc. My good friend, I have discovered a hive of wisdom.

  Her. Of what nature?

  Soc. Well, rather ridiculous, and yet plausible.

  Her. How plausible?

  Soc. I fancy to myself Heracleitus repeating wise traditions of
antiquity as old as the days of Cronos and Rhea, and of which Homer
also spoke.

  Her. How do you mean?

  Soc. Heracleitus is supposed to say that all things are in motion
and nothing at rest; he compares them to the stream of a river, and
says that you cannot go into the same water twice.

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. Well, then, how can we avoid inferring that he who gave the
names of Cronos and Rhea to the ancestors of the Gods, agreed pretty
much in the doctrine of Heracleitus? Is the giving of the names of
streams to both of them purely accidental? Compare the line in which
Homer, and, as I believe, Hesiod also, tells of

     Ocean, the origin of Gods, and mother Tethys.

And again, Orpheus says, that

     The fair river of Ocean was the first to marry, and he espoused
his sister Tethys, who was his mother's daughter.

You see that this is a remarkable coincidence, and all in the
direction of Heracleitus.

  Her. I think that there is something in what you say, Socrates;
but I do not understand the meaning of the name Tethys.

  Soc. Well, that is almost self-explained, being only the name of a
spring, a little disguised; for that which is strained and filtered
(diattomenon, ethoumenon) may be likened to a spring, and the name
Tethys is made up of these two words.

  Her. The idea is ingenious, Socrates.

  Soc. To be sure. But what comes next?- of Zeus we have spoken.

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Then let us next take his two brothers, Poseidon and Pluto,
whether the latter is called by that or by his other name.

  Her. By all means.

  Soc. Poseidon is Posidesmos, the chain of the feet; the original
inventor of the name had been stopped by the watery element in his
walks, and not allowed to go on, and therefore he called the ruler
of this element Poseidon; the e was probably inserted as an
ornament. Yet, perhaps, not so; but the name may have been
originally written with a double l and not with an s, meaning that the
God knew many things (Polla eidos). And perhaps also he being the
shaker of the earth, has been named from shaking (seiein), and then
p and d have been added. Pluto gives wealth (Ploutos), and his name
means the giver of wealth, which comes out of the earth beneath.
People in general appear to imagine that the term Hades is connected
with the invisible (aeides) and so they are led by their fears to call
the God Pluto instead.

  Her. And what is the true derivation?

  Soc. In spite of the mistakes which are made about the power of this
deity, and the foolish fears which people have of him, such as the
fear of always being with him after death, and of the soul denuded
of the body going to him, my belief is that all is quite consistent,
and that the office and name of the God really correspond.

  Her. Why, how is that?

  Soc. I will tell you my own opinion; but first, I should like to ask
you which chain does any animal feel to be the stronger? and which
confines him more to the same spot,- desire or necessity?

  Her. Desire, Socrates, is stronger far.

  Soc. And do you not think that many a one would escape from Hades,
if he did not bind those who depart to him by the strongest of chains?

  Her. Assuredly they would.

  Soc. And if by the greatest of chains, then by some desire, as I
should certainly infer, and not by necessity?

  Her. That is clear.

  Soc. And there are many desires?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And therefore by the greatest desire, if the chain is to be the
greatest?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. And is any desire stronger than the thought that you will be
made better by associating with another?

  Her. Certainly not.

  Soc. And is not that the reason, Hermogenes, why no one, who has
been to him, is willing to come back to us? Even the Sirens, like
all the rest of the world, have been laid under his spells. Such a
charm, as I imagine, is the God able to infuse into his words. And,
according to this view, he is the perfect and accomplished Sophist,
and the great benefactor of the inhabitants of the other world; and
even to us who are upon earth he sends from below exceeding blessings.
For he has much more than he wants down there; wherefore he is
called Pluto (or the rich). Note also, that he will have nothing to do
with men while they are in the body, but only when the soul is
liberated from the desires and evils of the body. Now there is a great
deal of philosophy and reflection in that; for in their liberated
state he can bind them with the desire of virtue, but while they are
flustered and maddened by the body, not even father Cronos himself
would suffice to keep them with him in his own far-famed chains.

  Her. There is a deal of truth in what you say.

  Soc. Yes, Hermogenes, and the legislator called him Hades, not
from the unseen (aeides)- far otherwise, but from his knowledge
(eidenai) of all noble things.

  Her. Very good; and what do we say of Demeter, and Here, and Apollo,
and Athene, and Hephaestus, and Ares, and the other deities?

  Soc. Demeter is e didousa meter, who gives food like a mother;
Here is the lovely one (erate)- for Zeus, according to tradition,
loved and married her; possibly also the name may have been given when
the legislator was thinking of the heavens, and may be only a disguise
of the air (aer), putting the end in the place of the beginning. You
will recognize the truth of this if you repeat the letters of Here
several times over. People dread the name of Pherephatta as they dread
the name of Apollo- and with as little reason; the fear, if I am not
mistaken, only arises from their ignorance of the nature of names. But
they go changing the name into Phersephone, and they are terrified
at this; whereas the new name means only that the Goddess is wise
(sophe); for seeing that all things in the world are in motion
(pheromenon), that principle which embraces and touches and is able to
follow them, is wisdom. And therefore the Goddess may be truly
called Pherepaphe (Pherepapha), or some name like it, because she
touches that which is (tou pheromenon ephaptomene), herein showing her
wisdom. And Hades, who is wise, consorts with her, because she is
wise. They alter her name into Pherephatta now-a-days, because the
present generation care for euphony more than truth. There is the
other name, Apollo, which, as I was saying, is generally supposed to
have some terrible signification. Have you remarked this fact?

  Her. To be sure I have, and what you say is true.

  Soc. But the name, in my opinion, is really most expressive of the
power of the God.

  Her. How so?

  Soc. I will endeavour to explain, for I do not believe that any
single name could have been better adapted to express the attributes
of the God, embracing and in a manner signifying all four of them,-
music, and prophecy, and medicine, and archery.

  Her. That must be a strange name, and I should like to hear the
explanation.

  Soc. Say rather an harmonious name, as beseems the God of Harmony.
In the first place, the purgations and purifications which doctors and
diviners use, and their fumigations with drugs magical or medicinal,
as well as their washings and lustral sprinklings, have all one and
the same object, which is to make a man pure both in body and soul.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. And is not Apollo the purifier, and the washer, and the
absolver from all impurities?

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. Then in reference to his ablutions and absolutions, as being
the physician who orders them, he may be rightly called Apolouon
(purifier); or in respect of his powers of divination, and his truth
and sincerity, which is the same as truth, he may be most fitly called
Aplos, from aplous (sincere), as in the Thessalian dialect, for all
the Thessalians call him Aplos; also he is Ballon (always shooting),
because he is a master archer who never misses; or again, the name may
refer to his musical attributes, and then, as in akolouthos, and
akoitis, and in many other words the a is supposed to mean "together,"
so the meaning of the name Apollo will be "moving together," whether
in the poles of heaven as they are called, or in the harmony of
song, which is termed concord, because he moves all together by an
harmonious power, as astronomers and musicians ingeniously declare.
And he is the God who presides over harmony, and makes all things move
together, both among Gods and among men. And as in the words
akolouthos and akoitis the a is substituted for an o, so the name
Apollon is equivalent to omopolon; only the second l is added in order
to avoid the ill-omened sound of destruction (apolon). Now the
suspicion of this destructive power still haunts the minds of some who
do not consider the true value of the name, which, as I was saying
just now, has reference to all the powers of the God, who is the
single one, the everdarting, the purifier, the mover together (aplous,
aei Ballon, apolouon, omopolon). The name of the Muses and of music
would seem to be derived from their making philosophical enquiries
(mosthai); and Leto is called by this name, because she is such a
gentle Goddess, and so willing (ethelemon) to grant our requests; or
her name may be Letho, as she is often called by strangers- they
seem to imply by it her amiability, and her smooth and easy-going
way of behaving. Artemis is named from her healthy (artemes),
well-ordered nature, and because of her love of virginity, perhaps
because she is a proficient in virtue (arete), and perhaps also as
hating intercourse of the sexes (ton aroton miseasa). He who gave
the Goddess her name may have had any or all of these reasons.

  Her. What is the meaning of Dionysus and Aphrodite?

  Soc. Son of Hipponicus, you ask a solemn question; there is a
serious and also a facetious explanation of both these names; the
serious explanation is not to be had from me, but there is no
objection to your hearing the facetious one; for the Gods too love a
joke. Dionusos is simply didous oinon (giver of wine), as he might
be called in fun,- and oinos is properly oionous, because wine makes
those who drink, think (oiesthai) that they have a mind (noun) when
they have none. The derivation of Aphrodite, born of the foam
(aphoros), may be fairly accepted on the authority of Hesiod.

  Her. Still there remains Athene, whom you, Socrates, as an Athenian,
will surely not forget; there are also Hephaestus and Ares.

  Soc. I am not likely to forget them.

  Her. No, indeed.

  Soc. There is no difficulty in explaining the other appellation of
Athene.

  Her. What other appellation?

  Soc. We call her Pallas.

  Her. To be sure.

  Soc. And we cannot be wrong in supposing that this is derived from
armed dances. For the elevation of oneself or anything else above
the earth, or by the use of the hands, we call shaking (pallein), or
dancing.

  Her. That is quite true.

  Soc. Then that is the explanation of the name Pallas?

  Her. Yes; but what do you say of the other name?

  Soc. Athene?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. That is a graver matter, and there, my friend, the modern
interpreters of Homer may, I think, assist in explaining the view of
the ancients. For most of these in their explanations of the poet,
assert that he meant by Athene "mind" (nous) and "intelligence"
(dianoia), and the maker of names appears to have had a singular
notion about her; and indeed calls her by a still higher title,
"divine intelligence" (Thou noesis), as though he would say: This is
she who has the mind of God (Theonoa);- using a as a dialectical
variety e, and taking away i and s. Perhaps, however, the name Theonoe
may mean "she who knows divine things" (Theia noousa) better than
others. Nor shall we be far wrong in supposing that the author of it
wished to identify this Goddess with moral intelligence (en ethei
noesin), and therefore gave her the name ethonoe; which, however,
either he or his successors have altered into what they thought a
nicer form, and called her Athene.

  Her. But what do you say of Hephaestus?

  Soc. Speak you of the princely lord of light (Phaeos istora)?

  Her. Surely.

  Soc. Ephaistos is Phaistos, and has added the e by attraction;
that is obvious to anybody.

  Her. That is very probable, until some more probable notion gets
into your head.

  Soc. To prevent that, you had better ask what is the derivation of
Ares.

  Her. What is Ares?

  Soc. Ares may be called, if you will, from his manhood (arren) and
manliness, or if you please, from his hard and unchangeable nature,
which is the meaning of arratos: the latter is a derivation in every
way appropriate to the God of war.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. And now, by the Gods, let us have no more of the Gods, for I am
afraid of them; ask about anything but them, and thou shalt see how
the steeds of Euthyphro can prance.

  Her. Only one more God! I should like to know about Hermes, of
whom I am said not to be a true son. Let us make him out, and then I
shall know whether there is any meaning in what Cratylus says.

  Soc. I should imagine that the name Hermes has to do with speech,
and signifies that he is the interpreter (ermeneus), or messenger,
or thief, or liar, or bargainer; all that sort of thing has a great
deal to do with language; as I was telling you the word eirein is
expressive of the use of speech, and there is an often-recurring
Homeric word emesato, which means "he contrived"- out of these two
words, eirein and mesasthai, the legislator formed the name of the God
who invented language and speech; and we may imagine him dictating
to us the use of this name: "O my friends," says he to us, "seeing
that he is the contriver of tales or speeches, you may rightly call
him Eirhemes." And this has been improved by us, as we think, into
Hermes. Iris also appears to have been called from the verb "to
tell" (eirein), because she was a messenger.

  Her. Then I am very sure that Cratylus was quite right in saying
that I was no true son of Hermes (Ermogenes), for I am not a good hand
at speeches.

  Soc. There is also reason, my friend, in Pan being the double-formed
son of Hermes.

  Her. How do you make that out?

  Soc. You are aware that speech signifies all things (pan), and is
always turning them round and round, and has two forms, true and
false?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. Is not the truth that is in him the smooth or sacred form which
dwells above among the Gods, whereas falsehood dwells among men below,
and is rough like the goat of tragedy; for tales and falsehoods have
generally to do with the tragic or goatish life, and tragedy is the
place of them?

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. Then surely Pan, who is the declarer of all things (pan) and
the perpetual mover (aei polon) of all things, is rightly called
aipolos (goat-herd), he being the two-formed son of Hermes, smooth
in his upper part, and rough and goatlike in his lower regions. And,
as the son of Hermes, he is speech or the brother of speech, and
that brother should be like brother is no marvel. But, as I was
saying, my dear Hermogenes, let us get away from the Gods.

  Her. From these sort of Gods, by all means, Socrates. But why should
we not discuss another kind of Gods- the sun, moon, stars, earth,
aether, air, fire, water, the seasons, and the year?

  Soc. You impose a great many tasks upon me. Still, if you wish, I
will not refuse.

  Her. You will oblige me.

  Soc. How would you have me begin? Shall I take first of all him whom
you mentioned first- the sun?

  Her. Very good.

  Soc. The origin of the sun will probably be clearer in the Doric
form, for the Dorians call him alios, and this name is given to him
because when he rises he gathers (alizoi) men together or because he
is always rolling in his course (aei eilein ion) about the earth; or
from aiolein, of which meaning is the same as poikillein (to
variegate), because he variegates the productions of the earth.

  Her. But what is selene (the moon)?

  Soc. That name is rather unfortunate for Anaxagoras.

  Her. How so?

  Soc. The word seems to forestall his recent discovery, that the moon
receives her light from the sun.

  Her. Why do you say so?

  Soc. The two words selas (brightness) and phos (light) have much the
same meaning?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. This light about the moon is always new (neon) and always old
(enon), if the disciples of Anaxagoras say truly. For the sun in his
revolution always adds new light, and there is the old light of the
previous month.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. The moon is not unfrequently called selanaia.

  Her. True.

  Soc. And as she has a light which is always old and always new (enon
neon aei) she may very properly have the name selaenoneoaeia; and this
when hammered into shape becomes selanaia.

  Her. A real dithyrambic sort of name that, Socrates. But what do you
say of the month and the stars?

  Soc. Meis (month) is called from meiousthai (to lessen), because
suffering diminution; the name of astra (stars) seems to be derived
from astrape, which is an improvement on anastphope, signifying the
upsetting of the eyes (anastrephein opa).

  Her. What do you say of pur (fire) and udor (water)?

  Soc. I am at a loss how to explain pur; either the muse of Euthyphro
has deserted me, or there is some very great difficulty in the word.
Please, however, to note the contrivance which I adopt whenever I am
in a difficulty of this sort.

  Her. What is it?

  Soc. I will tell you; but I should like to know first whether you
can tell me what is the meaning of the pur?

  Her. Indeed I cannot.

  Soc. Shall I tell you what I suspect to be the true explanation of
this and several other words?- My belief is that they are of foreign
origin. For the Hellenes, especially those who were under the dominion
of the barbarians, often borrowed from them.

  Her. What is the inference?

  Soc. Why, you know that any one who seeks to demonstrate the fitness
of these names according to the Hellenic language, and not according
to the language from which the words are derived, is rather likely
to be at fault.

  Her. Yes, certainly.

  Soc. Well then, consider whether this pur is not foreign; for the
word is not easily brought into relation with the Hellenic tongue, and
the Phrygians may be observed to have the same word slightly
changed, just as they have udor (water) and kunes (dogs), and many
other words.

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. Any violent interpretations of the words should be avoided; for
something to say about them may easily be found. And thus I get rid of
pur and udor. Aer (air), Hermogenes, may be explained as the element
which raises (airei) things from the earth, or as ever flowing (aei
pei), or because the flux of the air is wind, and the poets call the
winds "air-blasts," (aetai); he who uses the term may mean, so to
speak, air-flux (aetorroun), in the sense of wind-flux
(pneumatorroun); and because this moving wind may be expressed by
either term he employs the word air (aer = aetes rheo). Aither
(aether) I should interpret as  aeitheer; this may be correctly
said, because this element is always running in a flux about the air
(aei thei peri tou aera ron). The meaning of the word ge (earth) comes
out better when in the form of gaia, for the earth may be truly called
"mother" (gaia, genneteira), as in the language of Homer (Od. ix. 118;
xiii. 160) gegaasi means gegennesthai.

  Her. Good.

  Soc. What shall we take next?

 Her. There are orai (the seasons), and the two names of the year,
eniautos and etos.

  Soc. The orai should be spelt in the old Attic way, if you desire to
know the probable truth about them; they are rightly called the orai
because they divide (orizousin) the summers and winters and winds
and the fruits of the earth. The words eniautos and etos appear to
be the same,- "that which brings to light the plants and growths of
the earth in their turn, and passes them in review within itself (en
eauto exetazei)": this is broken up into two words, eniautos from en
eauto, and etos from etazei, just as the original name of Zeus was
divided into Zena and Dia; and the whole proposition means that his
power of reviewing from within is one, but has two names, two words
etos and eniautos being thus formed out of a single proposition.

  Her. Indeed, Socrates, you make surprising progress.

  Soc. I am run away with.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. But am not yet at my utmost speed.

  Her. I should like very much to know, in the next place, how you
would explain the virtues. What principle of correctness is there in
those charming words- wisdom, understanding, justice, and the rest
of them?

  Soc. That is a tremendous class of names which you are disinterring;
still, as I have put on the lion's skin, I must not be faint of heart;
and I suppose that I must consider the meaning of wisdom (phronesis)
and understanding (sunesis), and judgment (gnome), and knowledge
(episteme), and all those other charming words, as you call them?

  Her. Surely, we must not leave off until we find out their meaning.

  Soc. By the dog of Egypt I have not a bad notion which came into
my head only this moment: I believe that the primeval givers of
names were undoubtedly like too many of our modern philosophers,
who, in their search after the nature of things, are always getting
dizzy from constantly going round and round, and then they imagine
that the world is going round and round and moving in all
directions; and this appearance, which arises out of their own
internal condition, they suppose to be a reality of nature; they think
that there is nothing stable or permanent, but only flux and motion,
and that the world is always full of every sort of motion and
change. The consideration of the names which I mentioned has led me
into making this reflection.

  Her. How is that, Socrates?

  Soc. Perhaps you did not observe that in the names which have been
just cited, the motion or flux or generation of things is most
surely indicated.

  Her. No, indeed, I never thought of it.

  Soc. Take the first of those which you mentioned; clearly that is
a name indicative of motion.

  Her. What was the name?

 Soc. Phronesis (wisdom), which may signify Phoras kai rhou noesis
(perception of motion and flux), or perhaps Phoras onesis (the
blessing of motion), but is at any rate connected with Pheresthai
(motion); gnome (judgment), again, certainly implies the ponderation
or consideration (nomesis) of generation, for to ponder is the same as
to consider; or, if you would rather, here is noesis, the very word
just now mentioned, which is neou esis (the desire of the new); the
word neos implies that the world is always in process of creation. The
giver of the name wanted to express his longing of the soul, for the
original name was neoesis, and not noesis. The word sophrosune is
the salvation (soteria) of that wisdom (phronesis) which we were
just now considering. Epioteme (knowledge) is akin to this, and
indicates that the soul which is good for anything follows (epetai)
the motion of things, neither anticipating them nor falling behind
them; wherefor the word should rather be read as epistemene, inserting
en. Sunesis (understanding) may be regarded in like manner as a kind
of conclusion; the word is derived from sunienai (to go along with),
and, like epistasthai (to know), implies the progression of the soul
in company with the nature of things. Sophia (wisdom) is very dark,
and appears not to be of native growth; the meaning is, touching the
motion or stream of things. You must remember that the poets, when
they speak of the commencement of any rapid motion, often use the word
esuthe (he rushed); and there was a famous Lacedaemonian who was named
Sous (Rush), for by this word the Lacedaemonians signify rapid motion,
and the touching (epaphe) of motion is expressed by sophia, for all
things are supposed to be in motion. Good (agathon) is the name
which is given to the admirable (agasto) in nature; for, although
all things move, still there are degrees of motion; some are
swifter, some slower; but there are some things which are admirable
for their swiftness, and this admirable part of nature is called
agathon. Dikaiosune (justice) is clearly dikaiou sunesis
(understanding of the just); but the actual word dikaion is more
difficult: men are only agreed to a certain extent about justice,
and then they begin to disagree.

  For those who suppose all things to be in motion conceive the
greater part of nature to be a mere receptacle; and they say that
there is a penetrating power which passes through all this, and is the
instrument of creation in all, and is the subtlest and swiftest
element; for if it were not the subtlest, and a power which none can
keep out, and also the swiftest, passing by other things as if they
were standing still, it could not penetrate through the moving
universe. And this element, which superintends all things and pieces
(diaion) all, is rightly called dikaion; the letter k is only added
for the sake of euphony. Thus far, as I was saying, there is a general
agreement about the nature of justice; but I, Hermogenes, being an
enthusiastic disciple, have been told in a mystery that the justice of
which I am speaking is also the cause of the world: now a cause is
that because of which anything is created; and some one comes and
whispers in my ear that justice is rightly so called because partaking
of the nature of the cause, and I begin, after hearing what he has
said, to interrogate him gently: "Well, my excellent friend," say I,
"but if all this be true, I still want to know what is justice."
Thereupon they think that I ask tiresome questions, and am leaping
over the barriers, and have been already sufficiently answered, and
they try to satisfy me with one derivation after another, and at
length they quarrel. For one of them says that justice is the sun, and
that he only is the piercing (diaionta) and burning (kaonta) element
which is the guardian of nature. And when I joyfully repeat this
beautiful notion, I am answered by the satirical remark, "What, is
there no justice in the world when the sun is down?" And when I
earnestly beg my questioner to tell me his own honest opinion, he
says, "Fire in the abstract"; but this is not very intelligible.
Another says, "No, not fire in the abstract, but the abstraction of
heat in the fire." Another man professes to laugh at all this, and
says, as Anaxagoras says, that justice is mind, for mind, as they say,
has absolute power, and mixes with nothing, and orders all things, and
passes through all things. At last, my friend, I find myself in far
greater perplexity about the nature of justice than I was before I
began to learn. But still I am of opinion that the name, which has led
me into this digression, was given to justice for the reasons which
I have mentioned.

  Her. I think, Socrates, that you are not improvising now; you must
have heard this from some one else.

  Soc. And not the rest?

  Her. Hardly.

 Soc. Well, then, let me go on in the hope of making you believe in
the originality of the rest. What remains after justice? I do not
think that we have as yet discussed courage (andreia),- injustice
(adikia), which is obviously nothing more than a hindrance to the
penetrating principle (diaiontos), need not be considered. Well, then,
the name of andreia seems to imply a battle;- this battle is in the
world of existence, and according to the doctrine of flux is only
the counterflux (enantia rhon): if you extract the d from andreia, the
name at once signifies the thing, and you may clearly understand
that andreia is not the stream opposed to every stream, but only to
that which is contrary to justice, for otherwise courage would not
have been praised. The words arren (male) and aner (man) also
contain a similar allusion to the same principle of the upward flux
(te ano rhon). Gune (woman) I suspect to be the same word as goun
(birth): thelu (female) appears to be partly derived from thele (the
teat), because the teat is like rain, and makes things flourish
(tethelenai).

  Her. That is surely probable.

  Soc. Yes; and the very word thallein (to flourish) seems to figure
the growth of youth, which is swift and sudden ever. And this is
expressed by the legislator in the name, which is a compound of
thein (running), and allesthai (leaping). Pray observe how I gallop
away when I get on smooth ground. There are a good many names
generally thought to be of importance, which have still to be
explained.

  Her. True.

  Soc. There is the meaning of the word techne (art), for example.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. That may be identified with echonoe, and expresses the
possession of mind: you have only to take away the t and insert two
o's, one between the ch and n, and another between the n and e.

  Her. That is a very shabby etymology.

  Soc. Yes, my dear friend; but then you know that the original
names have been long ago buried and disguised by people sticking on
and stripping off letters for the sake of euphony, and twisting and
bedizening them in all sorts of ways: and time too may have had a
share in the change. Take, for example, the word katoptron; why is the
letter r inserted? This must surely be the addition of some one who
cares nothing about the truth, but thinks only of putting the mouth
into shape. And the additions are often such that at last no human
being can possibly make out the original meaning of the word.
Another example is the word sphigx, sphiggos, which ought properly
to be phigx, phiggos, and there are other examples.

  Her. That is quite true, Socrates.

  Soc. And yet, if you are permitted to put in and pull out any
letters which you please, names will be too easily made, and any
name may be adapted to any object.

  Her. True.

  Soc. Yes, that is true. And therefore a wise dictator, like
yourself, should observe the laws of moderation and probability.

  Her. Such is my desire.

  Soc. And mine, too, Hermogenes. But do not be too much of a
precisian, or "you will unnerve me of my strength." When you have
allowed me to add mechane (contrivance) to techne (art) I shall be
at the top of my bent, for I conceive mechane to be a sign of great
accomplishment- anein; for mekos the meaning of greatness, and these
two, mekos and anein, make up the word mechane. But, as I was
saying, being now at the top of my bent, I should like to consider the
meaning of the two words arete (virtue) and kakia (vice) arete I do
not as yet understand, but kakia is transparent, and agrees with the
principles which preceded, for all things being in a flux (ionton),
kakia is kakos ion (going badly); and this evil motion when existing
in the soul has the general name of kakia or vice, specially
appropriated to it. The meaning of kakos ienai may be further
illustrated by the use of deilia (cowardice), which ought to have come
after andreia, but was forgotten, and, as I fear, is not the only word
which has been passed over. Deilia signifies that the soul is bound
with a strong chain (desmos), for lian means strength, and therefore
deilia expresses the greatest and strongest bond of the soul; and
aporia (difficulty) is an evil of the same nature (from a not, and
poreuesthai to go), like anything else which is an impediment to
motion and movement. Then the word kakia appears to mean kakos
ienai, or going badly, or limping and halting; of which the
consequence is, that the soul becomes filled with vice. And if kakia
is the name of this sort of thing, arete will be the opposite of it,
signifying in the first place ease of motion, then that the stream
of the good soul is unimpeded, and has therefore the attribute of ever
flowing without let or hindrance, and is therefore called arete, or,
more correctly, aeireite (ever-flowing), and may perhaps have had
another form, airete (eligible), indicating that nothing is more
eligible than virtue, and this has been hammered into arete. I daresay
that you will deem this to be another invention of mine, but I think
that if the previous word kakia was right, then arete is also right.

  Her. But what is the meaning of kakon, which has played so great a
part in your previous discourse?

  Soc. That is a very singular word about which I can hardly form an
opinion, and therefore I must have recourse to my ingenious device.

  Her. What device?

  Soc. The device of a foreign origin, which I shall give to this word
also.

  Her. Very likely you are right; but suppose that we leave these
words and endeavour to see the rationale of kalon and aischron.

  Soc. The meaning of aischron is evident, being only aei ischon
roes (always preventing from flowing), and this is in accordance
with our former derivations. For the name-giver was a great enemy to
stagnation of all sorts, and hence he gave the name aeischoroun to
that which hindered the flux (aei ischon roun), and that is now beaten
together into aischron.

  Her. But what do you say of kalon?

  Soc. That is more obscure; yet the form is only due to the quantity,
and has been changed by altering ou into o.

  Her. What do you mean?

  Soc. This name appears to denote mind.

  Her. How so?

  Soc. Let me ask you what is the cause why anything has a name; is
not the principle which imposes the name the cause?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. And must not this be the mind of Gods, or of men, or of both?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Is not mind that which called (kalesan) things by their
names, and is not mind the beautiful (kalon)?

  Her. That is evident.

  Soc. And are not the works of intelligence and mind worthy of
praise, and are not other works worthy of blame?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. Physic does the work of a physician, and carpentering does
the works of a carpenter?

  Her. Exactly.

  Soc. And the principle of beauty does the works of beauty?

  Her. Of course.

  Soc. And that principle we affirm to be mind?

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. Then mind is rightly called beauty because she does the works
which we recognize and speak of as the beautiful?

  Her. That is evident.

  Soc. What more names remain to us?

  Her. There are the words which are connected with agathon and kalon,
such as sumpheron and lusiteloun, ophelimon, kerdaleon, and their
opposites.

  Soc. The meaning of sumpheron (expedient) I think that you may
discover for yourself by the light of the previous examples,- for it
is a sister word to episteme, meaning just the motion (pora) of the
soul accompanying the world, and things which are done upon this
principle are called sumphora or sumpheronta, because they are carried
round with the world.

  Her. That is probable.

  Soc. Again, cherdaleon (gainful) is called from cherdos (gain),
but you must alter the d into n if you want to get at the meaning; for
this word also signifies good, but in another way; he who gave the
name intended to express the power of admixture (kerannumenon) and
universal penetration in the good; in forming the word, however, he
inserted a d instead of an n, and so made kerdos.

  Her. Well, but what is lusiteloun (profitable)?

  Soc. I suppose, Hermogenes, that people do not mean by the
profitable the gainful or that which pays (luei) the retailer, but
they use the word in the sense of swift. You regard the profitable
(lusitelou), as that which being the swiftest thing in existence,
allows of no stay in things and no pause or end of motion, but always,
if there begins to be any end, lets things go again (luei), and
makes motion immortal and unceasing: and in this point of view, as
appears to me, the good is happily denominated lusiteloun- being
that which looses (luon) the end (telos) of motion. Ophelimon (the
advantageous) is derived from ophellein, meaning that which creates
and increases; this latter is a common Homeric word, and has a foreign
character.

  Her. And what do you say of their opposites?

  Soc. Of such as mere negatives I hardly think that I need speak.

  Her. Which are they?

  Soc. The words axumphoron (inexpedient), anopheles (unprofitable),
alusiteles (unadvantageous), akerdes (ungainful).

  Her. True.

  Soc. I would rather take the words blaberon (harmful), zemiodes
(hurtful).

  Her. Good.

  Soc. The word blaberon is that which is said to hinder or harm
(blaptein) the stream (roun); blapton is boulomenon aptein (seeking to
hold or bind); for aptein is the same as dein, and dein is always a
term of censure; boulomenon aptein roun (wanting to bind the stream)
would properly be boulapteroun, and this, as I imagine, is improved
into blaberon.

  Her. You bring out curious results, Socrates, in the use of names;
and when I hear the word boulapteroun I cannot help imagining that you
are making your mouth into a flute, and puffing away at some prelude
to Athene.

  Soc. That is the fault of the makers of the name, Hermogenes; not
mine.

  Her. Very true; but what is the derivation of zemiodes?

  Soc. What is the meaning of zemiodes?- let me remark, Hermogenes,
how right I was in saying that great changes are made in the meaning
of words by putting in and pulling out letters; even a very slight
permutation will sometimes give an entirely opposite sense; I may
instance the word deon, which occurs to me at the moment, and
reminds me of what I was going to say to you, that the fine
fashionable language of modern times has twisted and disguised and
entirely altered the original meaning both of deon, and also of
zemiodes, which in the old language is clearly indicated.

  Her. What do you mean?

  Soc. I will try to explain. You are aware that our forefathers loved
the sounds i and d, especially the women, who are most conservative of
the ancient language, but now they change i into e (long) or e
(short), and d into z; this is supposed to increase the grandeur of
the sound.

  Her. How do you mean?

  Soc. For example, in very ancient times they called the day either
imera or emera (short e), which is called by us emera (long e).

  Her. That is true.

  Soc. Do you observe that only the ancient form shows the intention
of the giver of the name? of which the reason is, that men long for
(imeirousi) and love the light which comes after the darkness, and
is therefore called imera, from imeros, desire.

  Her. Clearly.

  Soc. But now the name is so travestied that you cannot tell the
meaning, although there are some who imagine the day to be called
emuera because it makes things gentle (emera).

  Her. Such is my view.

  Soc. And do you know that the ancients said dougon and not zugon?

  Her. They did so.

  Soc. And zugon (yoke) has no meaning,- it ought to be duogon,
which word expresses the binding of two together (duein agoge) for the
purpose of drawing;- this has been changed into zugon, and there are
many other examples of similar changes.

  Her. There are.

  Soc. Proceeding in the same train of thought I may remark that the
word deon (obligation) has a meaning which is the opposite of all
the other appellations of good; for deon is here a species of good,
and is, nevertheless, the chain (desmos) or hinderer of motion, and
therefore own brother of blaberon.

  Her. Yes, Socrates; that is quite plain.

  Soc. Not if you restore the ancient form, which is more likely to be
the correct one, and read dion instead of deon; if you convert the e
into an i after the old fashion, this word will then agree with
other words meaning good; for dion, not deon, signifies the good,
and is a term of praise; and the author of names has not
contradicted himself, but in all these various appellations, deon
(obligatory), ophelimon (advantageous), lusiteloun (profitable),
kerdaleon (gainful), agathon (good), sumpheron (expedient), euporon
(plenteous), the same conception is implied of the ordering or
all-pervading principle which is praised, and the restraining and
binding principle which is censured. And this is further illustrated
by the word zemiodes (hurtful), which if the z is only changed into
d as in the ancient language, becomes demiodes; and this name, as
you will perceive, is given to that which binds motion (dounti ion).

  Her. What do you say of edone (pleasure), lupe (pain), epithumia
(desire), and the like, Socrates?

  Soc. I do not think, Hermogenes, that there is any great
difficulty about them- edone is e onesis, the action which tends to
advantage; and the original form may be supposed to have been eone,
but this has been altered by the insertion of the d. Lupe appears to
be derived from the relaxation (luein) which the body feels when in
sorrow; ania (trouble) is the hindrance of motion (a and ienai);
algedon (distress), if I am not mistaken, is a foreign word, which
is derived from aleinos (grievous); odune (grief) is called from the
putting on (endusis) sorrow; in achthedon (vexation) "the word too
labours," as any one may see; chara (joy) is the very expression of
the fluency and diffusion of the soul (cheo); terpsis (delight) is
so called from the pleasure creeping (erpon) through the soul, which
may be likened to a breath (pnoe) and is properly erpnoun, but has
been altered by time into terpnon; eupherosune (cheerfulness) and
epithumia explain themselves; the former, which ought to be
eupherosune and has been changed euphrosune, is named, as every one
may see, from the soul moving (pheresthai) in harmony with nature;
epithumia is really e epi ton thumon iousa dunamis, the power which
enters into the soul; thumos (passion) is called from the rushing
(thuseos) and boiling of the soul; imeros (desire) denotes the
stream (rous) which most draws the soul dia ten esin tes roes- because
flowing with desire (iemenos), and expresses a longing after things
and violent attraction of the soul to them, and is termed imeros
from possessing this power; pothos (longing) is expressive of the
desire of that which is not present but absent, and in another place
(pou); this is the reason why the name pothos is applied to things
absent, as imeros is to things present; eros (love) is so called
because flowing in (esron) from without; the stream is not inherent,
but is an influence introduced through the eyes, and from flowing in
was called esros (influx) in the old time when they used o (short) for
o (long), and is called eros, now that o (long) is substituted for o
(short). But why do you not give me another word?

  Her. What do you think of doxa (opinion), and that class of words?

  Soc. Doxa is either derived from dioxis (pursuit), and expresses the
march of the soul in the pursuit of knowledge, or from the shooting of
a bow (toxon); the latter is more likely, and is confirmed by oiesis
(thinking), which is only oisis (moving), and implies the movement
of the soul to the essential nature of each thing- just as boule
(counsel) has to do with shooting (bole); and boulesthai (to wish)
combines the notion of aiming and deliberating- all these words seem
to follow doxa, and all involve the idea of shooting, just as aboulia,
absence of counsel, on the other hand, is a mishap, or missing, or
mistaking of the mark, or aim, or proposal, or object.

  Her. You are quickening your pace now, Socrates.

  Soc. Why yes, the end I now dedicate to God, not, however, until I
have explained anagke (necessity), which ought to come next, and
ekousion (the voluntary). Ekousion is certainly the yielding (eikon)
and unresisting- the notion implied is yielding and not opposing,
yielding, as I was just now saying, to that motion which is in
accordance with our will; but the necessary and resistant being
contrary to our will, implies error and ignorance; the idea is taken
from walking through a ravine which is impassable, and rugged, and
overgrown, and impedes motion- and this is the derivation of the
word anagkaion (necessary) an agke ion, going through a ravine. But
while my strength lasts let us persevere, and I hope that you will
persevere with your questions.

  Her. Well, then, let me ask about the greatest and noblest, such
as aletheia (truth) and pseudos (falsehood) and on (being), not
forgetting to enquire why the word onoma (name), which is the theme of
our discussion, has this name of onoma.

  Soc. You know the word maiesthai (to seek)?

  Her. Yes;- meaning the same as zetein (to enquire).

  Soc. The word onoma seems to be a compressed sentence, signifying on
ou zetema (being for which there is a search); as is still more
obvious in onomaston (notable), which states in so many words that
real existence is that for which there is a seeking (on ou masma);
aletheia is also an agglomeration of theia ale (divine wandering),
implying the divine motion of existence; pseudos (falsehood) is the
opposite of motion; here is another ill name given by the legislator
to stagnation and forced inaction, which he compares to sleep
(eudein); but the original meaning of the word is disguised by the
addition of ps; on and ousia are ion with an i broken off; this agrees
with the true principle, for being (on) is also moving (ion), and
the same may be said of not being, which is likewise called not
going (oukion or ouki on = ouk ion).

  Her. You have hammered away at them manfully; but suppose that
some one were to say to you, what is the word ion, and what are reon
and doun?- show me their fitness.

  Soc. You mean to say, how should I answer him?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. One way of giving the appearance of an answer has been
already suggested.

  Her. What way?

  Soc. To say that names which we do not understand are of foreign
origin; and this is very likely the right answer, and something of
this kind may be true of them; but also the original forms of words
may have been lost in the lapse of ages; names have been so twisted in
all manner of ways, that I should not be surprised if the old language
when compared with that now in use would appear to us to be a
barbarous tongue.

  Her. Very likely.

  Soc. Yes, very likely. But still the enquiry demands our earnest
attention and we must not flinch. For we should remember, that if a
person go on analysing names into words, and enquiring also into the
elements out of which the words are formed, and keeps on always
repeating this process, he who has to answer him must at last give
up the enquiry in despair.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. And at what point ought he to lose heart and give up the
enquiry? Must he not stop when he comes to the names which are the
elements of all other names and sentences; for these cannot be
supposed to be made up of other names? The word agathon (good), for
example, is, as we were saying, a compound of agastos (admirable)
and thoos (swift). And probably thoos is made up of other elements,
and these again of others. But if we take a word which is incapable of
further resolution, then we shall be right in saying that we have at
last reached a primary element, which need not be resolved any
further.

  Her. I believe you to be in the right.

  Soc. And suppose the names about which you are now asking should
turn out to be primary elements, must not their truth or law be
examined according to some new method?

  Her. Very likely.

  Soc. Quite so, Hermogenes; all that has preceded would lead to
this conclusion. And if, as I think, the conclusion is true, then I
shall again say to you, come and help me, that I may not fall into
some absurdity in stating the principle of primary names.

  Her. Let me hear, and I will do my best to assist you.

  Soc. I think that you will acknowledge with me, that one principle
is applicable to all names, primary as well as secondary- when they
are regarded simply as names, there is no difference in them.

  Her. Certainly not.

  Soc. All the names that we have been explaining were intended to
indicate the nature of things.

  Her. Of course.

  Soc. And that this is true of the primary quite as much as of the
secondary names, is implied in their being names.

  Her. Surely.

  Soc. But the secondary, as I conceive, derive their significance
from the primary.

  Her. That is evident.

  Soc. Very good; but then how do the primary names which precede
analysis show the natures of things, as far as they can be shown;
which they must do, if they are to be real names? And here I will
ask you a question: Suppose that we had no voice or tongue, and wanted
to communicate with one another, should we not, like the deaf and
dumb, make signs with the hands and head and the rest of the body?

  Her. There would be no choice, Socrates.

  Soc. We should imitate the nature of the thing; the elevation of our
hands to heaven would mean lightness and upwardness; heaviness and
downwardness would be expressed by letting them drop to the ground; if
we were describing the running of a horse, or any other animal, we
should make our bodies and their gestures as like as we could to them.

  Her. I do not see that we could do anything else.

  Soc. We could not; for by bodily imitation only can the body ever
express anything.

  Her. Very true.

  Soc. And when we want to express ourselves, either with the voice,
or tongue, or mouth, the expression is simply their imitation of
that which we want to express.

  Her. It must be so, I think.

  Soc. Then a name is a vocal imitation of that which the vocal
imitator names or imitates?

  Her. I think so.

  Soc. Nay, my friend, I am disposed to think that we have not reached
the truth as yet.

  Her. Why not?

  Soc. Because if we have we shall be obliged to admit that the people
who imitate sheep, or cocks, or other animals, name that which they
imitate.

  Her. Quite true.

  Soc. Then could I have been right in what I was saying?

  Her. In my opinion, no. But I wish that you would tell me, Socrates,
what sort of an imitation is a name?

  Soc. In the first place, I should reply, not a musical imitation,
although that is also vocal; nor, again, an imitation of what music
imitates; these, in my judgment, would not be naming. Let me put the
matter as follows: All objects have sound and figure, and many have
colour?

  Her. Certainly.

  Soc. But the art of naming appears not to be concerned with
imitations of this kind; the arts which have to do with them are music
and drawing?

  Her. True.

  Soc. Again, is there not an essence of each thing, just as there
is a colour, or sound? And is there not an essence of colour and sound
as well as of anything else which may be said to have an essence?

  Her. I should think so.

  Soc. Well, and if any one could express the essence of each thing in
letters and syllables, would he not express the nature of each thing?

  Her. Quite so.

  Soc. The musician and the painter were the two names which you
gave to the two other imitators. What will this imitator be called?

  Her. I imagine, Socrates, that he must be the namer, or
name-giver, of whom we are in search.

  Soc. If this is true, then I think that we are in a condition to
consider the names ron (stream), ienai (to go), schesis (retention),
about which you were asking; and we may see whether the namer has
grasped the nature of them in letters and syllables in such a manner
as to imitate the essence or not.

  Her. Very good.

  Soc. But are these the only primary names, or are there others?

  Her. There must be others.

  Soc. So I should expect. But how shall we further analyse them,
and where does the imitator begin? Imitation of the essence is made by
syllables and letters; ought we not, therefore, first to separate
the letters, just as those who are beginning rhythm first
distinguish the powers of elementary, and then of compound sounds, and
when they have done so, but not before, they proceed to the
consideration of rhythms?

  Her. Yes.

  Soc. Must we not begin in the same way with letters; first
separating the vowels, and then the consonants and mutes, into
classes, according to the received distinctions of the learned; also
the semivowels, which are neither vowels, nor yet mutes; and
distinguishing into classes the vowels themselves? And when we have
perfected the classification of things, we shall give their names, and
see whether, as in the case of letters, there are any classes to which
they may be all referred; hence we shall see their natures, and see,
too, whether they have in them classes as there are in the letters;
and when we have well considered all this, we shall know how to
apply them to what they resemble-  whether one letter is used to
denote one thing, or whether there is to be an admixture of several of
them; just, as in painting, the painter who wants to depict anything
sometimes uses purple only, or any other colour, and sometimes mixes
up several colours, as his method is when he has to paint flesh colour
or anything of that kind- he uses his colours as his figures appear to
require them; and so, too, we shall apply letters to the expression of
objects, either single letters when required, or several letters;
and so we shall form syllables, as they are called, and from syllables
make nouns and verbs; and thus, at last, from the combinations of
nouns and verbs arrive at language, large and fair and whole; and as
the painter made a figure, even so shall we make speech by the art
of the namer or the rhetorician, or by some other art. Not that I am
literally speaking of ourselves, but I was carried away- meaning to
say that this was the way in which (not we but) the ancients formed
language, and what they put together we must take to pieces in like
manner, if we are to attain a scientific view of the whole subject,
and we must see whether the primary, and also whether the secondary
elements are rightly given or not, for if they are not, the
composition of them, my dear Hermogenes, will be a sorry piece of
work, and in the wrong direction.

  Her. That, Socrates, I can quite believe.

  Soc. Well, but do you suppose that you will be able to analyse
them in this way? for I am certain that I should not.

  Her. Much less am I likely to be able.

  Soc. Shall we leave them, then? or shall we seek to discover, if
we can, something about them, according to the measure of our ability,
saying by way of preface, as I said before of the Gods, that of the
truth about them we know nothing, and do but entertain human notions
of them. And in this present enquiry, let us say to ourselves,
before we proceed, that the higher method is the one which we or
others who would analyse language to any good purpose must follow; but
under the circumstances, as men say, we must do as well as we can.
What do you think?

  Her. I very much approve.

  Soc. That objects should be imitated in letters and syllables, and
so find expression, may appear ridiculous, Hermogenes, but it cannot
be avoided- there is no better principle to which we can look for
the truth of first names. Deprived of this, we must have recourse to
divine help, like the tragic poets, who in any perplexity have their
Gods waiting in the air; and must get out of our difficulty in like
fashion, by saying that "the Gods gave the first names, and
therefore they are right." This will be the best contrivance, or
perhaps that other notion may be even better still, of deriving them
from some barbarous people, for the barbarians are older than we
are; or we may say that antiquity has cast a veil over them, which
is the same sort of excuse as the last; for all these are not
reasons but only ingenious excuses for having no reasons concerning
the truth of words. And yet any sort of ignorance of first or
primitive names involves an ignorance of secondary words; for they can
only be explained by the primary. Clearly then the professor of
languages should be able to give a very lucid explanation of first
names, or let him be assured he will only talk nonsense about the
rest. Do you not suppose this to be true?

  Her. Certainly, Socrates.

  Soc. My first notions of original names are truly wild and
ridiculous, though I have no objection to impart them to you if you
desire, and I hope that you will communicate to me in return
anything better which you may have.

  Her. Fear not; I will do my best.

  Soc. In the first place, the letter r; appears to me to be the
general instrument expressing all motion (kinesis). But I have not yet
explained the meaning of this latter word, which is just iesis
(going); for the letter e (long) was not in use among the ancients,
who only employed e (short); and the root is kiein, which is a foreign
form, the same as ienai. And the old word kinesis will be correctly
given as iesis in corresponding modern letters. Assuming this
foreign root kiein, and allowing for the change of the e and the
insertion of the n, we have kinesis, which should have been kieinsis
or eisis; and stasis is the negative of ienai (or eisis), and has been
improved into stasis. Now the letter r, as I was saying, appeared to
the imposer of names an excellent instrument for the expression of
motion; and he frequently uses the letter for this purpose: for
example, in the actual words rein and roe he represents motion by r;
also in the words tromos (trembling), trachus (rugged); and again,
in words such as krouein (strike), thrauein (crush), ereikein
(bruise), thruptein (break), kermatixein (crumble), rumbein (whirl):
of all these sorts of movements he generally finds an expression in
the letter r, because, as I imagine, he had observed that the tongue
was most agitated and least at rest in the pronunciation of this
letter, which he therefore used in order to express motion, just as by
the letter i he expresses the subtle elements which pass through all
things. This is why he uses the letter i as imitative of motion,
ienai, iesthai. And there is another class of letters, ph, ps, s,
and x, of which the pronunciation is accompanied by great
expenditure of breath; these are used in the imitation of such notions
as psuchron (shivering), xeon (seething), seiesthai, (to be shaken),
seismos (shock), and are always introduced by the giver of names
when he wants to imitate what is phusodes (windy). He seems to have
thought that the closing and pressure of the tongue in the utterance
of d and t was expressive of binding and rest in a place: he further
observed the liquid movement of l, in the pronunciation of which the
tongue slips, and in this he found the expression of smoothness, as in
leios (level), and in the word oliothanein (to slip) itself, liparon
(sleek), in the word kollodes (gluey), and the like: the heavier sound
of g detained the slipping tongue, and the union of the two gave the
notion of a glutinous clammy nature, as in glischros, glukus,
gloiodes. The n he observed to be sounded from within, and therefore
to have a notion of inwardness; hence he introduced the sound in endos
and entos: a he assigned to the expression of size, and n of length,
because they are great letters: o was the sign of roundness, and
therefore there is plenty of o mixed up in the word goggulon
(round). Thus did the legislator, reducing all things into letters and
syllables, and impressing on them names and signs, and out of them
by imitation compounding other signs. That is my view, Hermogenes,
of the truth of names; but I should like to hear what Cratylus has
more to say.

  Her. But, Socrates, as I was telling you before, Cratylus
mystifies me; he says that there is a fitness of names, but he never
explains what is this fitness, so that I cannot tell whether his
obscurity is intended or not. Tell me now, Cratylus, here in the
presence of Socrates, do you agree in what Socrates has been saying
about names, or have you something better of your own? and if you
have, tell me what your view is, and then you will either learn of
Socrates, or Socrates and I will learn of you.

  Crat. Well, but surely, Hermogenes, you do not suppose that you
can learn, or I explain, any subject of importance all in a moment; at
any rate, not such a subject as language, which is, perhaps, the
very greatest of all.

  Her. No, indeed; but, as Hesiod says, and I agree with him, "to
add little to little" is worth while. And, therefore, if you think
that you can add anything at all, however small, to our knowledge,
take a little trouble and oblige Socrates, and me too, who certainly
have a claim upon you.

  Soc. I am by no means positive, Cratylus, in the view which
Hermogenes and myself have worked out; and therefore do not hesitate
to say what you think, which if it be better than my own view shall
gladly accept. And I should not be at all surprised to find that you
have found some better notion. For you have evidently reflected on
these matters and have had teachers, and if you have really a better
theory of the truth of names, you may count me in the number of your
disciples.

  Crat. You are right, Socrates, in saying that I have made a study of
these matters, and I might possibly convert you into a disciple. But I
fear that the opposite is more probable, and I already find myself
moved to say to you what Achilles in the "Prayers" says to Ajax-

     Illustrious Ajax, son of Telamon, lord of the people,

     You appear to have spoken in all things much to my mind.

And you, Socrates, appear to me to be an oracle, and to give answers
much to my whether you are inspired by Euthyphro, or whether some Muse
may have long been an inhabitant of your breast, unconsciously to
yourself.

  Soc. Excellent Cratylus, I have long been wondering at my own
wisdom; I cannot trust myself. And I think that I ought to stop and
ask myself What am I saying? for there is nothing worse than
self-deception- when the deceiver is always at home and always with
you- it is quite terrible, and therefore I ought often to retrace my
steps and endeavour to "look fore and aft," in the words of the
aforesaid Homer. And now let me see; where are we? Have we not been
saying that the correct name indicates the nature of the thing:- has
this proposition been sufficiently proven?

  Crat. Yes, Socrates, what you say, as I am disposed to think, is
quite true.

  Soc. Names, then, are given in order to instruct?

  Crat. Certainly.

  Soc. And naming is an art, and has artificers?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. And who are they?

  Crat. The legislators, of whom you spoke at first.

  Soc. And does this art grow up among men like other arts? Let me
explain what I mean: of painters, some are better and some worse?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. The better painters execute their works, I mean their
figures, better, and the worse execute them worse; and of builders
also, the better sort build fairer houses, and the worse build them
worse.

  Crat. True.

  Soc. And among legislators, there are some who do their work
better and some worse?

  Crat. No; there I do not agree with you.

  Soc. Then you do not think that some laws are better and others
worse?

  Crat. No, indeed.

  Soc. Or that one name is better than another?

  Crat. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then all names are rightly imposed?

  Crat. Yes, if they are names at all.

  Soc. Well, what do you say to the name of our friend Hermogenes,
which was mentioned before:- assuming that he has nothing of the
nature of Hermes in him, shall we say that this is a wrong name, or
not his name at all?

  Crat. I should reply that Hermogenes is not his name at all, but
only appears to be his, and is really the name of somebody else, who
has the nature which corresponds to it.

  Soc. And if a man were to call him Hermogenes, would he not be
even speaking falsely? For there may be a doubt whether you can call
him Hermogenes, if he is not.

  Crat. What do you mean?

  Soc. Are you maintaining that falsehood is impossible? For if this
is your meaning I should answer, that there have been plenty of
liars in all ages.

  Crat. Why, Socrates, how can a man say that which is not?- say
something and yet say nothing? For is not falsehood saying the thing
which is not?

  Soc. Your argument, friend, is too subtle for a man of my age. But I
should like to know whether you are one of those philosophers who
think that falsehood may be spoken but not said?

  Crat. Neither spoken nor said.

  Soc. Nor uttered nor addressed? For example: If a person, saluting
you in a foreign country, were to take your hand and say: "Hail,
Athenian stranger, Hermogenes, son of Smicrion"- these words,
whether spoken, said, uttered, or addressed, would have no application
to you but only to our friend Hermogenes, or perhaps to nobody at all?

  Crat. In my opinion, Socrates, the speaker would only be talking
nonsense.

  Soc. Well, but that will be quite enough for me, if you will tell me
whether the nonsense would be true or false, or partly true and partly
false:- which is all that I want to know.

  Crat. I should say that he would be putting himself in motion to
no purpose; and that his words would be an unmeaning sound like the
noise of hammering at a brazen pot.

  Soc. But let us see, Cratylus, whether we cannot find a
meeting-point, for you would admit that the name is not the same
with the thing named?

  Crat. I should.

  Soc. And would you further acknowledge that the name is an imitation
of the thing?

  Crat. Certainly.

  Soc. And you would say that pictures are also imitations of
things, but in another way?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. I believe you may be right, but I do not rightly understand
you. Please to say, then, whether both sorts of imitation (I mean both
pictures or words) are not equally attributable and applicable to
the things of which they are the imitation.

  Crat. They are.

  Soc. First look at the matter thus: you may attribute the likeness
of the man to the man, and of the woman to the woman; and so on?

  Crat. Certainly.

  Soc. And conversely you may attribute the likeness of the man to the
woman, and of the woman to the man?

  Crat. Very true.

  Soc. And are both modes of assigning them right, or only the first?

  Crat. Only the first.

  Soc. That is to say, the mode of assignment which attributes to each
that which belongs to them and is like them?

  Crat. That is my view.

  Soc. Now then, as I am desirous that we being friends should have
a good understanding about the argument, let me state my view to
you: the first mode of assignment, whether applied to figures or to
names, I call right, and when applied to names only, true as well as
right; and the other mode of giving and assigning the name which is
unlike, I call wrong, and in the case of names, false as well as
wrong.

  Crat. That may be true, Socrates, in the case of pictures; they
may be wrongly assigned; but not in the case of names- they must be
always right.

  Soc. Why, what is the difference? May I not go to a man and say to
him, "This is your picture," showing him his own likeness, or
perhaps the likeness of a woman; and when I say "show," I mean bring
before the sense of sight.

  Crat. Certainly.

  Soc. And may I not go to him again, and say, "This is your name"?-
for the name, like the picture, is an imitation. May I not say to him-
"This is your name"? and may I not then bring to his sense of
hearing the imitation of himself, when I say, "This is a man"; or of a
female of the human species, when I say, "This is a woman," as the
case may be? Is not all that quite possible?

  Crat. I would fain agree with you, Socrates; and therefore I say,
Granted.

  Soc. That is very good of you, if I am right, which need hardly be
disputed at present. But if I can assign names as well as pictures
to objects, the right assignment of them we may call truth, and the
wrong assignment of them falsehood. Now if there be such a wrong
assignment of names, there may also be a wrong or inappropriate
assignment of verbs; and if of names and verbs then of the
sentences, which are made up of them. What do you say, Cratylus?

  Crat. I agree; and think that what you say is very true.

  Soc. And further, primitive nouns may be compared to pictures, and
in pictures you may either give all the appropriate colours and
figures, or you may not give them all- some may be wanting; or there
may be too many or too much of them- may there not?

  Crat. Very true.

  Soc. And he who gives all gives a perfect picture or figure; and
he who takes away or adds also gives a picture or figure, but not a
good one.

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. In like manner, he who by syllables and letters imitates the
nature of things, if he gives all that is appropriate will produce a
good image, or in other words a name; but if he subtracts or perhaps
adds a little, he will make an image but not a good one; whence I
infer that some names are well and others ill made.

  Crat. That is true.

  Soc. Then the artist of names may be sometimes good, or he may be
bad?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. And this artist of names is called the legislator?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. Then like other artists the legislator may be good or he may be
bad; it must surely be so if our former admissions hold good?

  Crat. Very true, Socrates; but the case of language, you see, is
different; for when by the help of grammar we assign the letters a
or b, or any other letters to a certain name, then, if we add, or
subtract, or misplace a letter, the name which is written is not
only written wrongly, but not written at all; and in any of these
cases becomes other than a name.

  Soc. But I doubt whether your view is altogether correct, Cratylus.

  Crat. How so?

  Soc. I believe that what you say may be true about numbers, which
must be just what they are, or not be at all; for example, the
number ten at once becomes other than ten if a unit be added or
subtracted, and so of any other number: but this does not apply to
that which is qualitative or to anything which is represented under an
image. I should say rather that the image, if expressing in every
point the entire reality, would no longer be an image. Let us
suppose the existence of two objects: one of them shall be Cratylus,
and the other the image of Cratylus; and we will suppose, further,
that some God makes not only a representation such as a painter
would make of your outward form and colour, but also creates an inward
organization like yours, having the same warmth and softness; and into
this infuses motion, and soul, and mind, such as you have, in a word
copies all your qualities, and places them by you in another form;
would you say that this was Cratylus and the image of Cratylus, or
that there were two Cratyluses?

  Crat. I should say that there were two Cratyluses.

  Soc. Then you see, my friend, that we must find some other principle
of truth in images, and also in names; and not insist that an image is
no longer an image when something is added or subtracted. Do you not
perceive that images are very far from having qualities which are
the exact counterpart of the realities which they represent?

  Crat. Yes, I see.

  Soc. But then how ridiculous would be the effect of names on things,
if they were exactly the same with them! For they would be the doubles
of them, and no one would be able to determine which were the names
and which were the realities.

  Crat. Quite true.

  Soc. Then fear not, but have the courage to admit that one name
may be correctly and another incorrectly given; and do not insist that
the name shall be exactly the same with the thing; but allow the
occasional substitution of a wrong letter, and if of a letter also
of a noun in a sentence, and if of a noun in a sentence also of a
sentence which is not appropriate to the matter, and acknowledge
that the thing may be named, and described, so long as the general
character of the thing which you are describing is retained; and this,
as you will remember, was remarked by Hermogenes and myself in the
particular instance of the names of the letters.

  Crat. Yes, I remember.

  Soc. Good; and when the general character is preserved, even if some
of the proper letters are wanting, still the thing is signified;-
well, if all the letters are given; not well, when only a few of
them are given. I think that we had better admit this, lest we be
punished like travellers in Aegina who wander about the street late at
night: and be likewise told by truth herself that we have arrived
too late; or if not, you must find out some new notion of
correctness of names, and no longer maintain that a name is the
expression of a thing in letters or syllables; for if you say both,
you will be inconsistent with yourself.

  Crat. I quite acknowledge, Socrates, what you say to be very
reasonable.

  Soc. Then as we are agreed thus far, let us ask ourselves whether
a name rightly imposed ought not to have the proper letters.

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. And the proper letters are those which are like the things?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. Enough then of names which are rightly given. And in names
which are incorrectly given, the greater part may be supposed to be
made up of proper and similar letters, or there would be no
likeness; but there will be likewise a part which is improper and
spoils the beauty and formation of the word: you would admit that?

  Crat. There would be no use, Socrates, in my quarrelling with you,
since I cannot be satisfied that a name which is incorrectly given
is a name at all.

  Soc. Do you admit a name to be the representation of a thing?

  Crat. Yes, I do.

  Soc. But do you not allow that some nouns are primitive, and some
derived?

  Crat. Yes, I do.

  Soc. Then if you admit that primitive or first nouns are
representations of things, is there any better way of framing
representations than by assimilating them to the objects as much as
you can; or do you prefer the notion of Hermogenes and of many others,
who say that names are conventional, and have a meaning to those who
have agreed about them, and who have previous knowledge of the
things intended by them, and that convention is the only principle;
and whether you abide by our present convention, or make a new and
opposite one, according to which you call small great and great small-
that, they would say, makes no difference, if you are only agreed.
Which of these two notions do you prefer?

  Crat. Representation by likeness, Socrates, is infinitely better
than representation by any chance sign.

  Soc. Very good: but if the name is to be like the thing, the letters
out of which the first names are composed must also be like things.
Returning to the image of the picture, I would ask, How could any
one ever compose a picture which would be like anything at all, if
there were not pigments in nature which resembled the things imitated,
and out of which the picture is composed?

  Crat. Impossible.

  Soc. No more could names ever resemble any actually existing
thing, unless the original elements of which they are compounded
bore some degree of resemblance to the objects of which the names
are the imitation: And the original elements are letters?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. Let me now invite you to consider what Hermogenes and I were
saying about sounds. Do you agree with me that the letter r is
expressive of rapidity, motion, and hardness? Were we right or wrong
in saying so?

  Crat. I should say that you were right.

  Soc. And that l was expressive of smoothness, and softness, and
the like?

  Crat. There again you were right.

  Soc. And yet, as you are aware, that which is called by us
sklerotes, is by the Eretrians called skleroter.

  Crat. Very true.

  Soc. But are the letters r and s, equivalents; and is there the same
significance to them in the termination r, which there is to us in
s, or is there no significance to one of us?

  Crat. Nay, surely there is a significance to both of us.

  Soc. In as far as they are like, or in as far as they are unlike?

  Crat. In as far as they are like.

  Soc. Are they altogether alike?

  Crat. Yes; for the purpose of expressing motion.

  Soc. And what do you say of the insertion of the l? for that is
expressive not of hardness but of softness.

  Crat. Why, perhaps the letter l is wrongly inserted, Socrates, and
should be altered into r, as you were saying to Hermogenes and in my
opinion rightly, when you spoke of adding and subtracting letters upon
occasion.

  Soc. Good. But still the word is intelligible to both of us; when
I say skleros (hard), you know what I mean.

  Crat. Yes, my dear friend, and the explanation of that is custom.

  Soc. And what is custom but convention? I utter a sound which I
understand, and you know that I understand the meaning of the sound:
this is what you are saying?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. And if when I speak you know my meaning, there is an indication
given by me to you?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. This indication of my meaning may proceed from unlike as well
as from like, for example in the l of sklerotes. But if this is
true, then you have made a convention with yourself, and the
correctness of a name turns out to be convention, since letters
which are unlike are indicative equally with those which are like,
if they are sanctioned by custom and convention. And even supposing
that you distinguish custom from convention ever so much, still you
must say that the signification of words is given by custom and not by
likeness, for custom may indicate by the unlike as well as by the
like. But as we are agreed thus far, Cratylus (for I shall assume that
your silence gives consent), then custom and convention must be
supposed to contribute to the indication of our thoughts; for
suppose we take the instance of number, how can you ever imagine, my
good friend, that you will find names resembling every individual
number, unless you allow that which you term convention and
agreement to have authority in determining the correctness of names? I
quite agree with you that words should as far as possible resemble
things; but I fear that this dragging in of resemblance, as Hermogenes
says, is a shabby thing, which has to be supplemented by the
mechanical aid of convention with a view to correctness; for I believe
that if we could always, or almost always, use likenesses, which are
perfectly appropriate, this would be the most perfect state of
language; as the opposite is the most imperfect. But let me ask you,
what is the force of names, and what is the use of them?

  Crat. The use of names, Socrates, as I should imagine, is to inform:
the simple truth is, that he who knows names knows also the things
which are expressed by them.

  Soc. I suppose you mean to say, Cratylus, that as the name is, so
also is the thing; and that he who knows the one will also know the
other, because they are similars, and all similars fall under the same
art or science; and therefore you would say that he who knows names
will also know things.

  Crat. That is precisely what I mean.

  Soc. But let us consider what is the nature of this information
about things which, according to you, is given us by names. Is it
the best sort of information? or is there any other? What do you say?

  Crat. I believe that to be both the only and the best sort of
information about them; there can be no other.

  Soc. But do you believe that in the discovery of them, he who
discovers the names discovers also the things; or is this only the
method of instruction, and is there some other method of enquiry and
discovery.

  Crat. I certainly believe that the methods of enquiry and
discovery are of the same nature as instruction.

  Soc. Well, but do you not see, Cratylus, that he who follows names
in the search after things, and analyses their meaning, is in great
danger of being deceived?

  Crat. How so?

  Soc. Why clearly he who first gave names gave them according to
his conception of the things which they signified- did he not?

  Crat. True.

  Soc. And if his conception was erroneous, and he gave names
according to his conception, in what position shall we who are his
followers find ourselves? Shall we not be deceived by him?

  Crat. But, Socrates, am I not right in thinking that he must
surely have known; or else, as I was saying, his names would not be
names at all? And you have a clear proof that he has not missed the
truth, and the proof is- that he is perfectly consistent. Did you ever
observe in speaking that all the words which you utter have a common
character and purpose?

  Soc. But that, friend Cratylus, is no answer. For if he did begin in
error, he may have forced the remainder into agreement with the
original error and with himself; there would be nothing strange in
this, any more than in geometrical diagrams, which have often a slight
and invisible flaw in the first part of the process, and are
consistently mistaken in the long deductions which follow. And this is
the reason why every man should expend his chief thought and attention
on the consideration of his first principles:- are they or are they
not rightly laid down? and when he has duly sifted them, all the
rest will follow. Now I should be astonished to find that names are
really consistent. And here let us revert to our former discussion:
Were we not saying that all things are in motion and progress and
flux, and that this idea of motion is expressed by names? Do you not
conceive that to be the meaning of them?

  Crat. Yes; that is assuredly their meaning, and the true meaning.

  Soc. Let us revert to episteme (knowledge) and observe how ambiguous
this word is, seeming rather to signify stopping the soul at things
than going round with them; and therefore we should leave the
beginning as at present, and not reject the e, but make an insertion
of an instead of an i (not pioteme, but epiisteme). Take another
example: bebaion (sure) is clearly the expression of station and
position, and not of motion. Again, the word istoria (enquiry) bears
upon the face of it the stopping (istanai) of the stream; and the word
piston (faithful) certainly indicates cessation of motion; then,
again, mneme (memory), as any one may see, expresses rest in the soul,
and not motion. Moreover, words such as amartia and sumphora, which
have a bad sense, viewed in the light of their etymologies will be the
same as sunesis and episteme and other words which have a good sense
(i.e., omartein, sunienai, epesthai, sumphersthai) and much the same
may be said of amathia and akolaia, for amathia may be explained as
e ama theo iontos poreia, and akolasia as e akolouthia tois pragmasin.
Thus the names which in these instances we find to have the worst
sense, will turn out to be framed on the same principle as those which
have the best. And any one I believe who would take the trouble
might find many other examples in which the giver of names
indicates, not that things are in motion or progress, but that they
are at rest; which is the opposite of motion.

  Crat. Yes, Socrates, but observe; the greater number express motion.

  Soc. What of that, Cratylus? Are we to count them like votes? and is
correctness of names the voice of the majority? Are we to say of
whichever sort there are most, those are the true ones?

  Crat. No; that is not reasonable.

  Soc. Certainly not. But let us have done with this question and
proceed to another, about which I should like to know whether you
think with me. Were we not lately acknowledging that the first
givers of names in states, both Hellenic and barbarous, were the
legislators, and that the art which gave names was the art of the
legislator?

  Crat. Quite true.

  Soc. Tell me, then, did the first legislators, who were the givers
of the first names, know or not know the things which they named?

  Crat. They must have known, Socrates.

  Soc. Why, yes, friend Cratylus, they could hardly have been
ignorant.

  Crat. I should say not.

  Soc. Let us return to the point from which we digressed. You were
saying, if you remember, that he who gave names must have known the
things which he named; are you still of that opinion?

  Crat. I am.

  Soc. And would you say that the giver of the first names had also
a knowledge of the things which he named?

  Crat. I should.

  Soc. But how could he have learned or discovered things from names
if the primitive names were not yet given? For, if we are correct in
our view, the only way of learning and discovering things, is either
to discover names for ourselves or to learn them from others.

  Crat. I think that there is a good deal in what you say, Socrates.

  Soc. But if things are only to be known through names, how can we
suppose that the givers of names had knowledge, or were legislators
before there were names at all, and therefore before they could have
known them?

  Crat. I believe, Socrates, the true account of the matter to be,
that a power more than human gave things their first names, and that
the names which are thus given are necessarily their true names.

  Soc. Then how came the giver of the names, if he was an inspired
being or God, to contradict himself? For were we not saying just now
that he made some names expressive of rest and others of motion?
Were we mistaken?

  Crat. But I suppose one of the two not to be names at all.

  Soc. And which, then, did he make, my good friend; those which are
expressive of rest, or those which are expressive of motion? This is a
point which, as I said before, cannot be determined by counting them.

  Crat. No; not in that way, Socrates.

  Soc. But if this is a battle of names, some of them asserting that
they are like the truth, others contending that they are, how or by
what criterion are we to decide between them? For there are no other
names to which appeal can be made, but obviously recourse must be
had to another standard which, without employing names, will make
clear which of the two are right; and this must be a standard which
shows the truth of things.

  Crat. I agree.

  Soc. But if that is true, Cratylus, then I suppose that things may
be known without names?

  Crat. Clearly.

  Soc. But how would you expect to know them? What other way can there
be of knowing them, except the true and natural way, through their
affinities, when they are akin to each other, and through
themselves? For that which is other and different from them must
signify something other and different from them.

  Crat. What you are saying is, I think, true.

  Soc. Well, but reflect; have we not several times acknowledged
that names rightly given are the likenesses and images of the things
which they name?

  Crat. Yes.

  Soc. Let us suppose that to any extent you please you can learn
things through the medium of names, and suppose also that you can
learn them from the things themselves- which is likely to be the
nobler and clearer way to learn of the image, whether the image and
the truth of which the image is the expression have been rightly
conceived, or to learn of the truth whether the truth and the image of
it have been duly executed?

  Crat. I should say that we must learn of the truth.

  Soc. How real existence is to be studied or discovered is, I
suspect, beyond you and me. But we may admit so much, that the
knowledge of things is not to be derived from names. No; they must
be studied and investigated in themselves.

  Crat. Clearly, Socrates.

  Soc. There is another point. I should not like us to be imposed upon
by the appearance of such a multitude of names, all tending in the
same direction. I myself do not deny that the givers of names did
really give them under the idea that all things were in motion and
flux; which was their sincere but, I think, mistaken opinion. And
having fallen into a kind of whirlpool themselves, they are carried
round, and want to drag us in after them. There is a matter, master
Cratylus, about which I often dream, and should like to ask your
opinion: Tell me, whether there is or is not any absolute beauty or
good, or any other absolute existence?

  Crat. Certainly, Socrates, I think so.

  Soc. Then let us seek the true beauty: not asking whether a face
is fair, or anything of that sort, for all such things appear to be in
a flux; but let us ask whether the true beauty is not always
beautiful.

  Crat. Certainly.

  Soc. And can we rightly speak of a beauty which is always passing
away, and is first this and then that; must not the same thing be born
and retire and vanish while the word is in our mouths?

  Crat. Undoubtedly.

  Soc. Then how can that be a real thing which is never in the same
state? I for obviously things which are the same cannot change while
they remain the same; and if they are always the same and in the
same state, and never depart from their original form, they can
never change or be moved.

  Crat. Certainly they cannot.

  Soc. Nor yet can they be known by any one; for at the moment that
the observer approaches, then they become other and of another nature,
so that you cannot get any further in knowing their nature or state,
for you cannot know that which has no state.

  Crat. True.

  Soc. Nor can we reasonably say, Cratylus, that there is knowledge at
all, if everything is in a state of transition and there is nothing
abiding; for knowledge too cannot continue to be knowledge unless
continuing always to abide and exist. But if the very nature of
knowledge changes, at the time when the change occurs there will be no
knowledge; and if the transition is always going on, there will always
be no knowledge, and, according to this view, there will be no one
to know and nothing to be known: but if that which knows and that
which is known exist ever, and the beautiful and the good and every
other thing also exist, then I do not think that they can resemble a
process or flux, as we were just now supposing. Whether there is
this eternal nature in things, or whether the truth is what
Heracleitus and his followers and many others say, is a question
hard to determine; and no man of sense will like to put himself or the
education of his mind in the power of names: neither will he so far
trust names or the givers of names as to be confident in any knowledge
which condemns himself and other existences to an unhealthy state of
unreality; he will not believe that all things leak like a pot, or
imagine that the world is a man who has a running at the nose. This
may be true, Cratylus, but is also very likely to be untrue; and
therefore I would not have you be too easily persuaded of it.
Reflect well and like a man, and do not easily accept such a doctrine;
for you are young and of an age to learn. And when you have found
the truth, come and tell me.

  Crat. I will do as you say, though I can assure you, Socrates,
that I have been considering the matter already, and the result of a
great deal of trouble and consideration is that I incline to
Heracleitus.

  Soc. Then, another day, my friend, when you come back, you shall
give me a lesson; but at present, go into the country, as you are
intending, and Hermogenes shall set you on your way.

  Crat. Very good, Socrates; I hope, however, that you will continue
to think about these things yourself.

                             -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: CRITIAS; HERMOCRATES; TIMAEUS; SOCRATES

  Timaeus. How thankful I am, Socrates, that I have arrived at last,
and, like a weary traveller after a long journey, may be at rest!
And I pray the being who always was of old, and has now been by me
revealed, to grant that my words may endure in so far as they have
been spoken truly and acceptably to him; but if unintentionally I have
said anything wrong, I pray that he will impose upon me a just
retribution, and the just retribution of him who errs is that he
should be set right. Wishing, then, to speak truly in future
concerning the generation of the gods, I pray him to give me
knowledge, which of all medicines is the most perfect and best. And
now having offered my prayer I deliver up the argument to Critias, who
is to speak next according to our agreement.

  Critias. And I, Timaeus, accept the trust, and as you at first
said that you were going to speak of high matters, and begged that
some forbearance might be shown to you, I too ask the same or
greater forbearance for what I am about to say. And although I very
well know that my request may appear to be somewhat and
discourteous, I must make it nevertheless. For will any man of sense
deny that you have spoken well? I can only attempt to show that I
ought to have more indulgence than you, because my theme is more
difficult; and I shall argue that to seem to speak well of the gods to
men is far easier than to speak well of men to men: for the
inexperience and utter ignorance of his hearers about any subject is a
great assistance to him who has to speak of it, and we know how
ignorant we are concerning the gods. But I should like to make my
meaning clearer, if Timaeus, you will follow me. All that is said by
any of us can only be imitation and representation. For if we consider
the likenesses which painters make of bodies divine and heavenly,
and the different degrees of gratification with which the eye of the
spectator receives them, we shall see that we are satisfied with the
artist who is able in any degree to imitate the earth and its
mountains, and the rivers, and the woods, and the universe, and the
things that are and move therein, and further, that knowing nothing
precise about such matters, we do not examine or analyze the painting;
all that is required is a sort of indistinct and deceptive mode of
shadowing them forth. But when a person endeavours to paint the
human form we are quick at finding out defects, and our familiar
knowledge makes us severe judges of any one who does not render
every point of similarity. And we may observe the same thing to happen
in discourse; we are satisfied with a picture of divine and heavenly
things which has very little likeness to them; but we are more precise
in our criticism of mortal and human things. Wherefore if at the
moment of speaking I cannot suitably express my meaning, you must
excuse me, considering that to form approved likenesses of human
things is the reverse of easy. This is what I want to suggest to
you, and at the same time to beg, Socrates, that I may have not
less, but more indulgence conceded to me in what I am about to say.
Which favour, if I am right in asking, I hope that you will be ready
to grant.

  Socrates. Certainly, Critias, we will grant your request, and we
will grant the same by anticipation to Hermocrates, as well as to
you and Timaeus; for I have no doubt that when his turn comes a little
while hence, he will make the same request which you have made. In
order, then, that he may provide himself with a fresh beginning, and
not be compelled to say the same things over again, let him understand
that the indulgence is already extended by anticipation to him. And
now, friend Critias, I will announce to you the judgment of the
theatre. They are of opinion that the last performer was wonderfully
successful, and that you will need a great deal of indulgence before
you will be able to take his place.

  Hermocrates. The warning, Socrates, which you have addressed to him,
I must also take to myself. But remember, Critias, that faint heart
never yet raised a trophy; and therefore you must go and attack the
argument like a man. First invoke Apollo and the Muses, and then let
us hear you sound the praises and show forth the virtues of your
ancient citizens.

  Crit. Friend Hermocrates, you, who are stationed last and have
another in front of you, have not lost heart as yet; the gravity of
the situation will soon be revealed to you; meanwhile I accept your
exhortations and encouragements. But besides the gods and goddesses
whom you have mentioned, I would specially invoke Mnemosyne; for all
the important part of my discourse is dependent on her favour, and
if I can recollect and recite enough of what was said by the priests
and brought hither by Solon, I doubt not that I shall satisfy the
requirements of this theatre. And now, making no more excuses, I
will proceed.

  Let me begin by observing first of all, that nine thousand was the
sum of years which had elapsed since the war which was said to have
taken place between those who dwelt outside the Pillars of Heracles
and all who dwelt within them; this war I am going to describe. Of the
combatants on the one side, the city of Athens was reported to have
been the leader and to have fought out the war; the combatants on
the other side were commanded by the kings of Atlantis, which, as
was saying, was an island greater in extent than Libya and Asia, and
when afterwards sunk by an earthquake, became an impassable barrier of
mud to voyagers sailing from hence to any part of the ocean. The
progress of the history will unfold the various nations of
barbarians and families of Hellenes which then existed, as they
successively appear on the scene; but I must describe first of all
Athenians of that day, and their enemies who fought with them, and
then the respective powers and governments of the two kingdoms. Let us
give the precedence to Athens.

  In the days of old the gods had the whole earth distributed among
them by allotment. There was no quarrelling; for you cannot rightly
suppose that the gods did not know what was proper for each of them to
have, or, knowing this, that they would seek to procure for themselves
by contention that which more properly belonged to others. They all of
them by just apportionment obtained what they wanted, and peopled
their own districts; and when they had peopled them they tended us,
their nurselings and possessions, as shepherds tend their flocks,
excepting only that they did not use blows or bodily force, as
shepherds do, but governed us like pilots from the stern of the
vessel, which is an easy way of guiding animals, holding our souls
by the rudder of persuasion according to their own pleasure;-thus
did they guide all mortal creatures. Now different gods had their
allotments in different places which they set in order. Hephaestus and
Athene, who were brother and sister, and sprang from the same
father, having a common nature, and being united also in the love of
philosophy and art, both obtained as their common portion this land,
which was naturally adapted for wisdom and virtue; and there they
implanted brave children of the soil, and put into their minds the
order of government; their names are preserved, but their actions have
disappeared by reason of the destruction of those who received the
tradition, and the lapse of ages. For when there were any survivors,
as I have already said, they were men who dwelt in the mountains;
and they were ignorant of the art of writing, and had heard only the
names of the chiefs of the land, but very little about their
actions. The names they were willing enough to give to their children;
but the virtues and the laws of their predecessors, they knew only
by obscure traditions; and as they themselves and their children
lacked for many generations the necessaries of life, they directed
their attention to the supply of their wants, and of them they
conversed, to the neglect of events that had happened in times long
past; for mythology and the enquiry into antiquity are first
introduced into cities when they begin to have leisure, and when
they see that the necessaries of life have already been provided,
but not before. And this is reason why the names of the ancients
have been preserved to us and not their actions. This I infer
because Solon said that the priests in their narrative of that war
mentioned most of the names which are recorded prior to the time of
Theseus, such as Cecrops, and Erechtheus, and Erichthonius, and
Erysichthon, and the names of the women in like manner. Moreover,
since military pursuits were then common to men and women, the men
of those days in accordance with the custom of the time set up a
figure and image of the goddess in full armour, to be a testimony that
all animals which associate together, male as well as female, may,
if they please, practise in common the virtue which belongs to them
without distinction of sex.

  Now the country was inhabited in those days by various classes of
citizens;-there were artisans, and there were husbandmen, and there
was also a warrior class originally set apart by divine men. The
latter dwelt by themselves, and had all things suitable for nurture
and education; neither had any of them anything of their own, but they
regarded all that they had as common property; nor did they claim to
receive of the other citizens anything more than their necessary food.
And they practised all the pursuits which we yesterday described as
those of our imaginary guardians. Concerning the country the
Egyptian priests said what is not only probable but manifestly true,
that the boundaries were in those days fixed by the Isthmus, and
that in the direction of the continent they extended as far as the
heights of Cithaeron and Parnes; the boundary line came down in the
direction of the sea, having the district of Oropus on the right,
and with the river Asopus as the limit on the left. The land was the
best in the world, and was therefore able in those days to support a
vast army, raised from the surrounding people. Even the remnant of
Attica which now exists may compare with any region in the world for
the variety and excellence of its fruits and the suitableness of its
pastures to every sort of animal, which proves what I am saying; but
in those days the country was fair as now and yielded far more
abundant produce. How shall I establish my words? and what part of
it can be truly called a remnant of the land that then was? The
whole country is only a long promontory extending far into the sea
away from the rest of the continent, while the surrounding basin of
the sea is everywhere deep in the neighbourhood of the shore. Many
great deluges have taken place during the nine thousand years, for
that is the number of years which have elapsed since the time of which
I am speaking; and during all this time and through so many changes,
there has never been any considerable accumulation of the soil
coming down from the mountains, as in other places, but the earth
has fallen away all round and sunk out of sight. The consequence is,
that in comparison of what then was, there are remaining only the
bones of the wasted body, as they may be called, as in the case of
small islands, all the richer and softer parts of the soil having
fallen away, and the mere skeleton of the land being left. But in
the primitive state of the country, its mountains were high hills
covered with soil, and the plains, as they are termed by us, of
Phelleus were full of rich earth, and there was abundance of wood in
the mountains. Of this last the traces still remain, for although some
of the mountains now only afford sustenance to bees, not so very
long ago there were still to be seen roofs of timber cut from trees
growing there, which were of a size sufficient to cover the largest
houses; and there were many other high trees, cultivated by man and
bearing abundance of food for cattle. Moreover, the land reaped the
benefit of the annual rainfall, not as now losing the water which
flows off the bare earth into the sea, but, having an abundant
supply in all places, and receiving it into herself and treasuring
it up in the close clay soil, it let off into the hollows the
streams which it absorbed from the heights, providing everywhere
abundant fountains and rivers, of which there may still be observed
sacred memorials in places where fountains once existed; and this
proves the truth of what I am saying.

  Such was the natural state of the country, which was cultivated,
as we may well believe, by true husbandmen, who made husbandry their
business, and were lovers of honour, and of a noble nature, and had
a soil the best in the world, and abundance of water, and in the
heaven above an excellently attempered climate. Now the city in
those days was arranged on this wise. In the first place the Acropolis
was not as now. For the fact is that a single night of excessive
rain washed away the earth and laid bare the rock; at the same time
there were earthquakes, and then occurred the extraordinary
inundation, which was the third before the great destruction of
Deucalion. But in primitive times the hill of the Acropolis extended
to the Eridanus and Ilissus, and included the Pnyx on one side, and
the Lycabettus as a boundary on the opposite side to the Pnyx, and was
all well covered with soil, and level at the top, except in one or two
places. Outside the Acropolis and under the sides of the hill there
dwelt artisans, and such of the husbandmen as were tilling the
ground near; the warrior class dwelt by themselves around the
temples of Athene and Hephaestus at the summit, which moreover they
had enclosed with a single fence like the garden of a single house. On
the north side they had dwellings in common and had erected halls
for dining in winter, and had all the buildings which they needed
for their common life, besides temples, but there was no adorning of
them with gold and silver, for they made no use of these for any
purpose; they took a middle course between meanness and ostentation,
and built modest houses in which they and their children's children
grew old, and they handed them down to others who were like
themselves, always the same. But in summer-time they left their
gardens and gymnasia and dining halls, and then the southern side of
the hill was made use of by them for the same purpose. Where the
Acropolis now is there was a fountain, which was choked by the
earthquake, and has left only the few small streams which still
exist in the vicinity, but in those days the fountain gave an abundant
supply of water for all and of suitable temperature in summer and in
winter. This is how they dwelt, being the guardians of their own
citizens and the leaders of the Hellenes, who were their willing
followers. And they took care to preserve the same number of men and
women through all time, being so many as were required for warlike
purposes, then as now-that is to say, about twenty thousand. Such were
the ancient Athenians, and after this manner they righteously
administered their own land and the rest of Hellas; they were renowned
all over Europe and Asia for the beauty of their persons and for the
many virtues of their souls, and of all men who lived in those days
they were the most illustrious. And next, if I have not forgotten what
I heard when I was a child, I will impart to you the character and
origin of their adversaries. For friends should not keep their stories
to themselves, but have them in common.

  Yet, before proceeding further in the narrative, I ought to warn
you, that you must not be surprised if you should perhaps hear
Hellenic names given to foreigners. I will tell you the reason of
this: Solon, who was intending to use the tale for his poem,
enquired into the meaning of the names, and found that the early
Egyptians in writing them down had translated them into their own
language, and he recovered the meaning of the several names and when
copying them out again translated them into our language. My
great-grandfather, Dropides, had the original writing, which is
still in my possession, and was carefully studied by me when I was a
child. Therefore if you hear names such as are used in this country,
you must not be surprised, for I have told how they came to be
introduced. The tale, which was of great length, began as follows:-

  I have before remarked in speaking of the allotments of the gods,
that they distributed the whole earth into portions differing in
extent, and made for themselves temples and instituted sacrifices. And
Poseidon, receiving for his lot the island of Atlantis, begat children
by a mortal woman, and settled them in a part of the island, which I
will describe. Looking towards the sea, but in the centre of the whole
island, there was a plain which is said to have been the fairest of
all plains and very fertile. Near the plain again, and also in the
centre of the island at a distance of about fifty stadia, there was
a mountain not very high on any side.

  In this mountain there dwelt one of the earth born primeval men of
that country, whose name was Evenor, and he had a wife named Leucippe,
and they had an only daughter who was called Cleito. The maiden had
already reached womanhood, when her father and mother died; Poseidon
fell in love with her and had intercourse with her, and breaking the
ground, inclosed the hill in which she dwelt all round, making
alternate zones of sea and land larger and smaller, encircling one
another; there were two of land and three of water, which he turned as
with a lathe, each having its circumference equidistant every way from
the centre, so that no man could get to the island, for ships and
voyages were not as yet. He himself, being a god, found no
difficulty in making special arrangements for the centre island,
bringing up two springs of water from beneath the earth, one of warm
water and the other of cold, and making every variety of food to
spring up abundantly from the soil. He also begat and brought up
five pairs of twin male children; and dividing the island of
Atlantis into ten portions, he gave to the first-born of the eldest
pair his mother's dwelling and the surrounding allotment, which was
the largest and best, and made him king over the rest; the others he
made princes, and gave them rule over many men, and a large territory.
And he named them all; the eldest, who was the first king, he named
Atlas, and after him the whole island and the ocean were called
Atlantic. To his twin brother, who was born after him, and obtained as
his lot the extremity of the island towards the Pillars of Heracles,
facing the country which is now called the region of Gades in that
part of the world, he gave the name which in the Hellenic language
is Eumelus, in the language of the country which is named after him,
Gadeirus. Of the second pair of twins he called one Ampheres, and
the other Evaemon. To the elder of the third pair of twins he gave the
name Mneseus, and Autochthon to the one who followed him. Of the
fourth pair of twins he called the elder Elasippus, and the younger
Mestor. And of the fifth pair he gave to the elder the name of
Azaes, and to the younger that of Diaprepes. All these and their
descendants for many generations were the inhabitants and rulers of
divers islands in the open sea; and also, as has been already said,
they held sway in our direction over the country within the Pillars as
far as Egypt and Tyrrhenia.

  Now Atlas had a numerous and honourable family, and they retained
the kingdom, the eldest son handing it on to his eldest for many
generations; and they had such an amount of wealth as was never before
possessed by kings and potentates, and is not likely ever to be again,
and they were furnished with everything which they needed, both in the
city and country. For because of the greatness of their empire many
things were brought to them from foreign countries, and the island
itself provided most of what was required by them for the uses of
life. In the first place, they dug out of the earth whatever was to be
found there, solid as well as fusile, and that which is now only a
name and was then something more than a name, orichalcum, was dug
out of the earth in many parts of the island, being more precious in
those days than anything except gold. There was an abundance of wood
for carpenter's work, and sufficient maintenance for tame and wild
animals. Moreover, there were a great number of elephants in the
island; for as there was provision for all other sorts of animals,
both for those which live in lakes and marshes and rivers, and also
for those which live in mountains and on plains, so there was for
the animal which is the largest and most voracious of all. Also
whatever fragrant things there now are in the earth, whether roots, or
herbage, or woods, or essences which distil from fruit and flower,
grew and thrived in that land; also the fruit which admits of
cultivation, both the dry sort, which is given us for nourishment
and any other which we use for food-we call them all by the common
name pulse, and the fruits having a hard rind, affording drinks and
meats and ointments, and good store of chestnuts and the like, which
furnish pleasure and amusement, and are fruits which spoil with
keeping, and the pleasant kinds of dessert, with which we console
ourselves after dinner, when we are tired of eating-all these that
sacred island which then beheld the light of the sun, brought forth
fair and wondrous and in infinite abundance. With such blessings the
earth freely furnished them; meanwhile they went on constructing their
temples and palaces and harbours and docks. And they arranged the
whole country in the following manner:

  First of all they bridged over the zones of sea which surrounded the
ancient metropolis, making a road to and from the royal palace. And at
the very beginning they built the palace in the habitation of the
god and of their ancestors, which they continued to ornament in
successive generations, every king surpassing the one who went
before him to the utmost of his power, until they made the building
a marvel to behold for size and for beauty. And beginning from the sea
they bored a canal of three hundred feet in width and one hundred feet
in depth and fifty stadia in length, which they carried through to the
outermost zone, making a passage from the sea up to this, which became
a harbour, and leaving an opening sufficient to enable the largest
vessels to find ingress. Moreover, they divided at the bridges the
zones of land which parted the zones of sea, leaving room for a single
trireme to pass out of one zone into another, and they covered over
the channels so as to leave a way underneath for the ships; for the
banks were raised considerably above the water. Now the largest of the
zones into which a passage was cut from the sea was three stadia in
breadth, and the zone of land which came next of equal breadth; but
the next two zones, the one of water, the other of land, were two
stadia, and the one which surrounded the central island was a
stadium only in width. The island in which the palace was situated had
a diameter of five stadia. All this including the zones and the
bridge, which was the sixth part of a stadium in width, they
surrounded by a stone wall on every side, placing towers and gates
on the bridges where the sea passed in. The stone which was used in
the work they quarried from underneath the centre island, and from
underneath the zones, on the outer as well as the inner side. One kind
was white, another black, and a third red, and as they quarried,
they at the same time hollowed out double docks, having roofs formed
out of the native rock. Some of their buildings were simple, but in
others they put together different stones, varying the colour to
please the eye, and to be a natural source of delight. The entire
circuit of the wall, which went round the outermost zone, they covered
with a coating of brass, and the circuit of the next wall they
coated with tin, and the third, which encompassed the citadel, flashed
with the red light of orichalcum.

  The palaces in the interior of the citadel were constructed on
this wise:-in the centre was a holy temple dedicated to Cleito and
Poseidon, which remained inaccessible, and was surrounded by an
enclosure of gold; this was the spot where the family of the ten
princes first saw the light, and thither the people annually brought
the fruits of the earth in their season from all the ten portions,
to be an offering to each of the ten. Here was Poseidon's own temple
which was a stadium in length, and half a stadium in width, and of a
proportionate height, having a strange barbaric appearance. All the
outside of the temple, with the exception of the pinnacles, they
covered with silver, and the pinnacles with gold. In the interior of
the temple the roof was of ivory, curiously wrought everywhere with
gold and silver and orichalcum; and all the other parts, the walls and
pillars and floor, they coated with orichalcum. In the temple they
placed statues of gold: there was the god himself standing in a
chariot-the charioteer of six winged horses-and of such a size that he
touched the roof of the building with his head; around him there
were a hundred Nereids riding on dolphins, for such was thought to
be the number of them by the men of those days. There were also in the
interior of the temple other images which had been dedicated by
private persons. And around the temple on the outside were placed
statues of gold of all the descendants of the ten kings and of their
wives, and there were many other great offerings of kings and of
private persons, coming both from the city itself and from the foreign
cities over which they held sway. There was an altar too, which in
size and workmanship corresponded to this magnificence, and the
palaces, in like manner, answered to the greatness of the kingdom
and the glory of the temple.

  In the next place, they had fountains, one of cold and another of
hot water, in gracious plenty flowing; and they were wonderfully
adapted for use by reason of the pleasantness and excellence of
their waters. They constructed buildings about them and planted
suitable trees, also they made cisterns, some open to the heavens,
others roofed over, to be used in winter as warm baths; there were the
kings' baths, and the baths of private persons, which were kept apart;
and there were separate baths for women, and for horses and cattle,
and to each of them they gave as much adornment as was suitable. Of
the water which ran off they carried some to the grove of Poseidon,
where were growing all manner of trees of wonderful height and beauty,
owing to the excellence of the soil, while the remainder was
conveyed by aqueducts along the bridges to the outer circles; and
there were many temples built and dedicated to many gods; also gardens
and places of exercise, some for men, and others for horses in both of
the two islands formed by the zones; and in the centre of the larger
of the two there was set apart a race-course of a stadium in width,
and in length allowed to extend all round the island, for horses to
race in. Also there were guardhouses at intervals for the guards,
the more trusted of whom were appointed-to keep watch in the lesser
zone, which was nearer the Acropolis while the most trusted of all had
houses given them within the citadel, near the persons of the kings.
The docks were full of triremes and naval stores, and all things
were quite ready for use. Enough of the plan of the royal palace.

  Leaving the palace and passing out across the three you came to a
wall which began at the sea and went all round: this was everywhere
distant fifty stadia from the largest zone or harbour, and enclosed
the whole, the ends meeting at the mouth of the channel which led to
the sea. The entire area was densely crowded with habitations; and the
canal and the largest of the harbours were full of vessels and
merchants coming from all parts, who, from their numbers, kept up a
multitudinous sound of human voices, and din and clatter of all
sorts night and day.

  I have described the city and the environs of the ancient palace
nearly in the words of Solon, and now I must endeavour to represent
the nature and arrangement of the rest of the land. The whole
country was said by him to be very lofty and precipitous on the side
of the sea, but the country immediately about and surrounding the city
was a level plain, itself surrounded by mountains which descended
towards the sea; it was smooth and even, and of an oblong shape,
extending in one direction three thousand stadia, but across the
centre inland it was two thousand stadia. This part of the island
looked towards the south, and was sheltered from the north. The
surrounding mountains were celebrated for their number and size and
beauty, far beyond any which still exist, having in them also many
wealthy villages of country folk, and rivers, and lakes, and meadows
supplying food enough for every animal, wild or tame, and much wood of
various sorts, abundant for each and every kind of work.

  I will now describe the plain, as it was fashioned by nature and
by the labours of many generations of kings through long ages. It
was for the most part rectangular and oblong, and where falling out of
the straight line followed the circular ditch. The depth, and width,
and length of this ditch were incredible, and gave the impression that
a work of such extent, in addition to so many others, could never have
been artificial. Nevertheless I must say what I was told. It was
excavated to the depth of a hundred, feet, and its breadth was a
stadium everywhere; it was carried round the whole of the plain, and
was ten thousand stadia in length. It received the streams which
came down from the mountains, and winding round the plain and
meeting at the city, was there let off into the sea. Further inland,
likewise, straight canals of a hundred feet in width were cut from
it through the plain, and again let off into the ditch leading to
the sea: these canals were at intervals of a hundred stadia, and by
them they brought down the wood from the mountains to the city, and
conveyed the fruits of the earth in ships, cutting transverse passages
from one canal into another, and to the city. Twice in the year they
gathered the fruits of the earth-in winter having the benefit of the
rains of heaven, and in summer the water which the land supplied by
introducing streams from the canals.

  As to the population, each of the lots in the plain had to find a
leader for the men who were fit for military service, and the size
of a lot was a square of ten stadia each way, and the total number
of all the lots was sixty thousand. And of the inhabitants of the
mountains and of the rest of the country there was also a vast
multitude, which was distributed among the lots and had leaders
assigned to them according to their districts and villages. The leader
was required to furnish for the war the sixth portion of a
war-chariot, so as to make up a total of ten thousand chariots; also
two horses and riders for them, and a pair of chariot-horses without a
seat, accompanied by a horseman who could fight on foot carrying a
small shield, and having a charioteer who stood behind the man-at-arms
to guide the two horses; also, he was bound to furnish two heavy armed
soldiers, two slingers, three stone-shooters and three javelin-men,
who were light-armed, and four sailors to make up the complement of
twelve hundred ships. Such was the military order of the royal
city-the order of the other nine governments varied, and it would be
wearisome to recount their several differences.

  As to offices and honours, the following was the arrangement from
the first. Each of the ten kings in his own division and in his own
city had the absolute control of the citizens, and, in most cases,
of the laws, punishing and slaying whomsoever he would. Now the
order of precedence among them and their mutual relations were
regulated by the commands of Poseidon which the law had handed down.
These were inscribed by the first kings on a pillar of orichalcum,
which was situated in the middle of the island, at the temple of
Poseidon, whither the kings were gathered together every fifth and
every sixth year alternately, thus giving equal honour to the odd
and to the even number. And when they were gathered together they
consulted about their common interests, and enquired if any one had
transgressed in anything and passed judgment and before they passed
judgment they gave their pledges to one another on this wise:-There
were bulls who had the range of the temple of Poseidon; and the ten
kings, being left alone in the temple, after they had offered
prayers to the god that they might capture the victim which was
acceptable to him, hunted the bulls, without weapons but with staves
and nooses; and the bull which they caught they led up to the pillar
and cut its throat over the top of it so that the blood fell upon
the sacred inscription. Now on the pillar, besides the laws, there was
inscribed an oath invoking mighty curses on the disobedient. When
therefore, after slaying the bull in the accustomed manner, they had
burnt its limbs, they filled a bowl of wine and cast in a clot of
blood for each of them; the rest of the victim they put in the fire,
after having purified the column all round. Then they drew from the
bowl in golden cups and pouring a libation on the fire, they swore
that they would judge according to the laws on the pillar, and would
punish him who in any point had already transgressed them, and that
for the future they would not, if they could help, offend against
the writing on the pillar, and would neither command others, nor
obey any ruler who commanded them, to act otherwise than according
to the laws of their father Poseidon. This was the prayer which each
of them-offered up for himself and for his descendants, at the same
time drinking and dedicating the cup out of which he drank in the
temple of the god; and after they had supped and satisfied their
needs, when darkness came on, and the fire about the sacrifice was
cool, all of them put on most beautiful azure robes, and, sitting on
the ground, at night, over the embers of the sacrifices by which
they had sworn, and extinguishing all the fire about the temple,
they received and gave judgment, if any of them had an accusation to
bring against any one; and when they given judgment, at daybreak
they wrote down their sentences on a golden tablet, and dedicated it
together with their robes to be a memorial.

  There were many special laws affecting the several kings inscribed
about the temples, but the most important was the following: They were
not to take up arms against one another, and they were all to come
to the rescue if any one in any of their cities attempted to overthrow
the royal house; like their ancestors, they were to deliberate in
common about war and other matters, giving the supremacy to the
descendants of Atlas. And the king was not to have the power of life
and death over any of his kinsmen unless he had the assent of the
majority of the ten.

  Such was the vast power which the god settled in the lost island
of Atlantis; and this he afterwards directed against our land for
the following reasons, as tradition tells: For many generations, as
long as the divine nature lasted in them, they were obedient to the
laws, and well-affectioned towards the god, whose seed they were;
for they possessed true and in every way great spirits, uniting
gentleness with wisdom in the various chances of life, and in their
intercourse with one another. They despised everything but virtue,
caring little for their present state of life, and thinking lightly of
the possession of gold and other property, which seemed only a
burden to them; neither were they intoxicated by luxury; nor did
wealth deprive them of their self-control; but they were sober, and
saw clearly that all these goods are increased by virtue and
friendship with one another, whereas by too great regard and respect
for them, they are lost and friendship with them. By such
reflections and by the continuance in them of a divine nature, the
qualities which we have described grew and increased among them; but
when the divine portion began to fade away, and became diluted too
often and too much with the mortal admixture, and the human nature got
the upper hand, they then, being unable to bear their fortune, behaved
unseemly, and to him who had an eye to see grew visibly debased, for
they were losing the fairest of their precious gifts; but to those who
had no eye to see the true happiness, they appeared glorious and
blessed at the very time when they were full of avarice and
unrighteous power. Zeus, the god of gods, who rules according to
law, and is able to see into such things, perceiving that an
honourable race was in a woeful plight, and wanting to inflict
punishment on them, that they might be chastened and improve,
collected all the gods into their most holy habitation, which, being
placed in the centre of the world, beholds all created things. And
when he had called them together, he spake as follows-*

*  The rest of the Dialogue of Critias has been lost.

                              -THE END-


                   PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE

                           SOCRATES

                            CRITO

               SCENE: The Prison of Socrates

  Socrates. WHY have you come at this hour, Crito? it must be quite
early.

  Crito. Yes, certainly.

  Soc. What is the exact time?

  Cr. The dawn is breaking.

  Soc. I wonder the keeper of the prison would let you in.

  Cr. He knows me because I often come, Socrates; moreover. I have
done him a kindness.

  Soc. And are you only just come?

  Cr. No, I came some time ago.

  Soc. Then why did you sit and say nothing, instead of awakening me
at once?

  Cr. Why, indeed, Socrates, I myself would rather not have all this
sleeplessness and sorrow. But I have been wondering at your peaceful
slumbers, and that was the reason why I did not awaken you, because
I wanted you to be out of pain. I have always thought you happy in the
calmness of your temperament; but never did I see the like of the
easy, cheerful way in which you bear this calamity.

  Soc. Why, Crito, when a man has reached my age he ought not to be
repining at the prospect of death.

  Cr. And yet other old men find themselves in similar misfortunes,
and age does not prevent them from repining.

  Soc. That may be. But you have not told me why you come at this
early hour.

  Cr. I come to bring you a message which is sad and painful; not,
as I believe, to yourself but to all of us who are your friends, and
saddest of all to me.

  Soc. What! I suppose that the ship has come from Delos, on the
arrival of which I am to die?

  Cr. No, the ship has not actually arrived, but she will probably
be here to-day, as persons who have come from Sunium tell me that they
have left her there; and therefore to-morrow, Socrates, will be the
last day of your life.

  Soc. Very well, Crito; if such is the will of God, I am willing; but
my belief is that there will be a delay of a day.

  Cr. Why do you say this?

  Soc. I will tell you. I am to die on the day after the arrival of
the ship?

  Cr. Yes; that is what the authorities say.

  Soc. But I do not think that the ship will be here until
to-morrow; this I gather from a vision which I had last night, or
rather only just now, when you fortunately allowed me to sleep.

  Cr. And what was the nature of the vision?

  Soc. There came to me the likeness of a woman, fair and comely,
clothed in white raiment, who called to me and said: O Socrates-

     "The third day hence, to Phthia shalt thou go."

  Cr. What a singular dream, Socrates!

  Soc. There can be no doubt about the meaning Crito, I think.

  Cr. Yes: the meaning is only too clear. But, O! my beloved Socrates,
let me entreat you once more to take my advice and escape. For if
you die I shall not only lose a friend who can never be replaced,
but there is another evil: people who do not know you and me will
believe that I might have saved you if I had been willing to give
money, but that I did not care. Now, can there be a worse disgrace
than this- that I should be thought to value money more than the
life of a friend? For the many will not be persuaded that I wanted you
to escape, and that you refused.

  Soc. But why, my dear Crito, should we care about the opinion of the
many? Good men, and they are the only persons who are worth
considering, will think of these things truly as they happened.

  Cr. But do you see. Socrates, that the opinion of the many must be
regarded, as is evident in your own case, because they can do the very
greatest evil to anyone who has lost their good opinion?

  Soc. I only wish, Crito, that they could; for then they could also
do the greatest good, and that would be well. But the truth is, that
they can do neither good nor evil: they cannot make a man wise or make
him foolish; and whatever they do is the result of chance.

  Cr. Well, I will not dispute about that; but please to tell me,
Socrates, whether you are not acting out of regard to me and your
other friends: are you not afraid that if you escape hence we may
get into trouble with the informers for having stolen you away, and
lose either the whole or a great part of our property; or that even
a worse evil may happen to us? Now, if this is your fear, be at
ease; for in order to save you, we ought surely to run this or even
a greater risk; be persuaded, then, and do as I say.

  Soc. Yes, Crito, that is one fear which you mention, but by no means
the only one.

  Cr. Fear not. There are persons who at no great cost are willing
to save you and bring you out of prison; and as for the informers, you
may observe that they are far from being exorbitant in their
demands; a little money will satisfy them. My means, which, as I am
sure, are ample, are at your service, and if you have a scruple
about spending all mine, here are strangers who will give you the
use of theirs; and one of them, Simmias the Theban, has brought a
sum of money for this very purpose; and Cebes and many others are
willing to spend their money too. I say, therefore, do not on that
account hesitate about making your escape, and do not say, as you
did in the court, that you will have a difficulty in knowing what to
do with yourself if you escape. For men will love you in other
places to which you may go, and not in Athens only; there are
friends of mine in Thessaly, if you like to go to them, who will value
and protect you, and no Thessalian will give you any trouble. Nor
can I think that you are justified, Socrates, in betraying your own
life when you might be saved; this is playing into the hands of your
enemies and destroyers; and moreover I should say that you were
betraying your children; for you might bring them up and educate them;
instead of which you go away and leave them, and they will have to
take their chance; and if they do not meet with the usual fate of
orphans, there will be small thanks to you. No man should bring
children into the world who is unwilling to persevere to the end in
their nurture and education. But you are choosing the easier part,
as I think, not the better and manlier, which would rather have become
one who professes virtue in all his actions, like yourself. And,
indeed, I am ashamed not only of you, but of us who are your
friends, when I reflect that this entire business of yours will be
attributed to our want of courage. The trial need never have come
on, or might have been brought to another issue; and the end of all,
which is the crowning absurdity, will seem to have been permitted by
us, through cowardice and baseness, who might have saved you, as you
might have saved yourself, if we had been good for anything (for there
was no difficulty in escaping); and we did not see how disgraceful,
Socrates, and also miserable all this will be to us as well as to you.
Make your mind up then, or rather have your mind already made up,
for the time of deliberation is over, and there is only one thing to
be done, which must be done, if at all, this very night, and which any
delay will render all but impossible; I beseech you therefore,
Socrates, to be persuaded by me, and to do as I say.

  Soc. Dear Crito, your zeal is invaluable, if a right one; but if
wrong, the greater the zeal the greater the evil; and therefore we
ought to consider whether these things shall be done or not. For I
am and always have been one of those natures who must be guided by
reason, whatever the reason may be which upon reflection appears to me
to be the best; and now that this fortune has come upon me, I cannot
put away the reasons which I have before given: the principles which I
have hitherto honored and revered I still honor, and unless we can
find other and better principles on the instant, I am certain not to
agree with you; no, not even if the power of the multitude could
inflict many more imprisonments, confiscations, deaths, frightening us
like children with hobgoblin terrors. But what will be the fairest way
of considering the question? Shall I return to your old argument about
the opinions of men, some of which are to be regarded, and others,
as we were saying, are not to be regarded? Now were we right in
maintaining this before I was condemned? And has the argument which
was once good now proved to be talk for the sake of talking; in fact
an amusement only, and altogether vanity? That is what I want to
consider with your help, Crito: whether, under my present
circumstances, the argument appears to be in any way different or not;
and is to be allowed by me or disallowed. That argument, which, as I
believe, is maintained by many who assume to be authorities, was to
the effect, as I was saying, that the opinions of some men are to be
regarded, and of other men not to be regarded. Now you, Crito, are a
disinterested person who are not going to die to-morrow- at least,
there is no human probability of this, and you are therefore not
liable to be deceived by the circumstances in which you are placed.
Tell me, then, whether I am right in saying that some opinions, and
the opinions of some men only, are to be valued, and other opinions,
and the opinions of other men, are not to be valued. I ask you whether
I was right in maintaining this?

  Cr. Certainly.

  Soc. The good are to be regarded, and not the bad?

  Cr. Yes.

  Soc. And the opinions of the wise are good, and the opinions of
the unwise are evil?

  Cr. Certainly.

  Soc. And what was said about another matter? Was the disciple in
gymnastics supposed to attend to the praise and blame and opinion of
every man, or of one man only- his physician or trainer, whoever
that was?

  Cr. Of one man only.

  Soc. And he ought to fear the censure and welcome the praise of that
one only, and not of the many?

  Cr. That is clear.

  Soc. And he ought to live and train, and eat and drink in the way
which seems good to his single master who has understanding, rather
than according to the opinion of all other men put together?

  Cr. True.

  Soc. And if he disobeys and disregards the opinion and approval of
the one, and regards the opinion of the many who have no
understanding, will he not suffer evil?

  Cr. Certainly he will.

  Soc. And what will the evil be, whither tending and what affcting,
in the disobedient person?

  Cr. Clearly, affecting the body; that is what is destroyed by the
evil.

  Soc. Very good; and is not this true, Crito, of other things which
we need not separately enumerate? In the matter of just and unjust,
fair and foul, good and evil, which are the subjects of our present
consultation, ought we to follow the opinion of the many and to fear
them; or the opinion of the one man who has understanding, and whom we
ought to fear and reverence more than all the rest of the world: and
whom deserting we shall destroy and injure that principle in us
which may be assumed to be improved by justice and deteriorated by
injustice; is there not such a principle?

  Cr. Certainly there is, Socrates.

  Soc. Take a parallel instance; if, acting under the advice of men
who have no understanding, we destroy that which is improvable by
health and deteriorated by disease- when that has been destroyed, I
say, would life be worth having? And that is- the body?

  Cr. Yes.

  Soc. Could we live, having an evil and corrupted body?

  Cr. Certainly not.

  Soc. And will life be worth having, if that higher part of man be
depraved, which is improved by justice and deteriorated by
injustice? Do we suppose that principle, whatever it may be in man,
which has to do with justice and injustice, to be inferior to the
body?

  Cr. Certainly not.

  Soc. More honored, then?

  Cr. Far more honored.

  Soc. Then, my friend, we must not regard what the many say of us:
but what he, the one man who has understanding of just and unjust,
will say, and what the truth will say. And therefore you begin in
error when you suggest that we should regard the opinion of the many
about just and unjust, good and evil, honorable and dishonorable.
Well, someone will say, "But the many can kill us."

  Cr. Yes, Socrates; that will clearly be the answer.

  Soc. That is true; but still I find with surprise that the old
argument is, as I conceive, unshaken as ever. And I should like to
know Whether I may say the same of another proposition- that not life,
but a good life, is to be chiefly valued?

  Cr. Yes, that also remains.

  Soc. And a good life is equivalent to a just and honorable one- that
holds also?

  Cr. Yes, that holds.

  Soc. From these premises I proceed to argue the question whether I
ought or ought not to try to escape without the consent of the
Athenians: and if I am clearly right in escaping, then I will make the
attempt; but if not, I will abstain. The other considerations which
you mention, of money and loss of character, and the duty of educating
children, are, I fear, only the doctrines of the multitude, who
would be as ready to call people to life, if they were able, as they
are to put them to death- and with as little reason. But now, since
the argument has thus far prevailed, the only question which remains
to be considered is, whether we shall do rightly either in escaping or
in suffering others to aid in our escape and paying them in money
and thanks, or whether we shan not do rightly; and if the latter, then
death or any other calamity which may ensue on my remaining here
must not be allowed to enter into the calculation.

  Cr. I think that you are right, Socrates; how then shall we proceed?

  Soc. Let us consider the matter together, and do you either refute
me if you can, and I will be convinced; or else cease, my dear friend,
from repeating to me that I ought to escape against the wishes of
the Athenians: for I am extremely desirous to be persuaded by you, but
not against my own better judgment. And now please to consider my
first position, and do your best to answer me.

  Cr. I will do my best.

  Soc. Are we to say that we are never intentionally to do wrong, or
that in one way we ought and in another way we ought not to do
wrong, or is doing wrong always evil and dishonorable, as I was just
now saying, and as has been already acknowledged by us? Are all our
former admissions which were made within a few days to be thrown away?
And have we, at our age, been earnestly discoursing with one another
all our life long only to discover that we are no better than
children? Or are we to rest assured, in spite of the opinion of the
many, and in spite of consequences whether better or worse, of the
truth of what was then said, that injustice is always an evil and
dishonor to him who acts unjustly? Shall we affirm that?

  Cr. Yes.

  Soc. Then we must do no wrong?

  Cr. Certainly not.

  Soc. Nor when injured injure in return, as the many imagine; for
we must injure no one at all?

  Cr. Clearly not.

  Soc. Again, Crito, may we do evil?

  Cr. Surely not, Socrates.

  Soc. And what of doing evil in return for evil, which is the
morality of the many-is that just or not?

  Cr. Not just.

  Soc. For doing evil to another is the same as injuring him?

  Cr. Very true.

  Soc. Then we ought not to retaliate or render evil for evil to
anyone, whatever evil we may have suffered from him. But I would
have you consider, Crito, whether you really mean what you are saying.
For this opinion has never been held, and never will be held, by any
considerable number of persons; and those who are agreed and those who
are not agreed upon this point have no common ground, and can only
despise one another, when they see how widely they differ. Tell me,
then, whether you agree with and assent to my first principle, that
neither injury nor retaliation nor warding off evil by evil is ever
right. And shall that be the premise of our agreement? Or do you
decline and dissent from this? For this has been of old and is still
my opinion; but, if you are of another opinion, let me hear what you
have to say. If, however, you remain of the same mind as formerly, I
will proceed to the next step.

  Cr. You may proceed, for I have not changed my mind.

  Soc. Then I will proceed to the next step, which may be put in the
form of a question: Ought a man to do what he admits to be right, or
ought he to betray the right?

  Cr. He ought to do what he thinks right.

  Soc. But if this is true, what is the application? In leaving the
prison against the will of the Athenians, do I wrong any? or rather do
I not wrong those whom I ought least to wrong? Do I not desert the
principles which were acknowledged by us to be just? What do you say?

  Cr. I cannot tell, Socrates, for I do not know.

  Soc. Then consider the matter in this way: Imagine that I am about
to play truant (you may call the proceeding by any name which you
like), and the laws and the government come and interrogate me:
"Tell us, Socrates," they say; "what are you about? are you going by
an act of yours to overturn us- the laws and the whole State, as far
as in you lies? Do you imagine that a State can subsist and not be
overthrown, in which the decisions of law have no power, but are set
aside and overthrown by individuals?" What will be our answer,
Crito, to these and the like words? Anyone, and especially a clever
rhetorician, will have a good deal to urge about the evil of setting
aside the law which requires a sentence to be carried out; and we
might reply, "Yes; but the State has injured us and given an unjust
sentence." Suppose I say that?

  Cr. Very good, Socrates.

  Soc. "And was that our agreement with you?" the law would sar, "or
were you to abide by the sentence of the State?" And if I were to
express astonishment at their saying this, the law would probably add:
"Answer, Socrates, instead of opening your eyes: you are in the
habit of asking and answering questions. Tell us what complaint you
have to make against us which justifies you in attempting to destroy
us and the State? In the first place did we not bring you into
existence? Your father married your mother by our aid and begat you.
Say whether you have any objection to urge against those of us who
regulate marriage?" None, I should reply. "Or against those of us
who regulate the system of nurture and education of children in
which you were trained? Were not the laws, who have the charge of
this, right in commanding your father to train you in music and
gymnastic?" Right, I should reply. "Well, then, since you were brought
into the world and nurtured and educated by us, can you deny in the
first place that you are our child and slave, as your fathers were
before you? And if this is true you are not on equal terms with us;
nor can you think that you have a right to do to us what we are
doing to you. Would you have any right to strike or revile or do any
other evil to a father or to your master, if you had one, when you
have been struck or reviled by him, or received some other evil at his
hands?- you would not say this? And because we think right to
destroy you, do you think that you have any right to destroy us in
return, and your country as far as in you lies? And will you, O
professor of true virtue, say that you are justified in this? Has a
philosopher like you failed to discover that our country is more to be
valued and higher and holier far than mother or father or any
ancestor, and more to be regarded in the eyes of the gods and of men
of understanding? also to be soothed, and gently and reverently
entreated when angry, even more than a father, and if not persuaded,
obeyed? And when we are punished by her, whether with imprisonment
or stripes, the punishment is to be endured in silence; and if she
leads us to wounds or death in battle, thither we follow as is
right; neither may anyone yield or retreat or leave his rank, but
whether in battle or in a court of law, or in any other place, he must
do what his city and his country order him; or he must change their
view of what is just: and if he may do no violence to his father or
mother, much less may he do violence to his country." What answer
shall we make to this, Crito? Do the laws speak truly, or do they not?

  Cr. I think that they do.

  Soc. Then the laws will say: "Consider, Socrates, if this is true,
that in your present attempt you are going to do us wrong. For,
after having brought you into the world, and nurtured and educated
you, and given you and every other citizen a share in every good
that we had to give, we further proclaim and give the right to every
Athenian, that if he does not like us when he has come of age and
has seen the ways of the city, and made our acquaintance, he may go
where he pleases and take his goods with him; and none of us laws will
forbid him or interfere with him. Any of you who does not like us
and the city, and who wants to go to a colony or to any other city,
may go where he likes, and take his goods with him. But he who has
experience of the manner in which we order justice and administer
the State, and still remains, has entered into an implied contract
that he will do as we command him. And he who disobeys us is, as we
maintain, thrice wrong: first, because in disobeying us he is
disobeying his parents; secondly, because we are the authors of his
education; thirdly, because he has made an agreement with us that he
will duly obey our commands; and he neither obeys them nor convinces
us that our commands are wrong; and we do not rudely impose them,
but give him the alternative of obeying or convincing us; that is what
we offer and he does neither. These are the sort of accusations to
which, as we were saying, you, Socrates, will be exposed if you
accomplish your intentions; you, above all other Athenians." Suppose I
ask, why is this? they will justly retort upon me that I above all
other men have acknowledged the agreement. "There is clear proof,"
they will say, "Socrates, that we and the city were not displeasing to
you. Of all Athenians you have been the most constant resident in
the city, which, as you never leave, you may be supposed to love.
For you never went out of the city either to see the games, except
once when you went to the Isthmus, or to any other place unless when
you were on military service; nor did you travel as other men do.
Nor had you any curiosity to know other States or their laws: your
affections did not go beyond us and our State; we were your especial
favorites, and you acquiesced in our government of you; and this is
the State in which you begat your children, which is a proof of your
satisfaction. Moreover, you might, if you had liked, have fixed the
penalty at banishment in the course of the trial-the State which
refuses to let you go now would have let you go then. But you
pretended that you preferred death to exile, and that you were not
grieved at death. And now you have forgotten these fine sentiments,
and pay no respect to us, the laws, of whom you are the destroyer; and
are doing what only a miserable slave would do, running away and
turning your back upon the compacts and agreements which you made as a
citizen. And first of all answer this very question: Are we right in
saying that you agreed to be governed according to us in deed, and not
in word only? Is that true or not?" How shall we answer that, Crito?
Must we not agree?

  Cr. There is no help, Socrates.

  Soc. Then will they not say: "You, Socrates, are breaking the
covenants and agreements which you made with us at your leisure, not
in any haste or under any compulsion or deception, but having had
seventy years to think of them, during which time you were at
liberty to leave the city, if we were not to your mind, or if our
covenants appeared to you to be unfair. You had your choice, and might
have gone either to Lacedaemon or Crete, which you often praise for
their good government, or to some other Hellenic or foreign State.
Whereas you, above all other Athenians, seemed to be so fond of the
State, or, in other words, of us her laws (for who would like a
State that has no laws?), that you never stirred out of her: the halt,
the blind, the maimed, were not more stationary in her than you
were. And now you run away and forsake your agreements. Not so,
Socrates, if you will take our advice; do not make yourself ridiculous
by escaping out of the city.

  "For just consider, if you transgress and err in this sort of way,
what good will you do, either to yourself or to your friends? That
your friends will be driven into exile and deprived of citizenship, or
will lose their property, is tolerably certain; and you yourself, if
you fly to one of the neighboring cities, as, for example, Thebes or
Megara, both of which are well-governed cities, will come to them as
an enemy, Socrates, and their government will be against you, and
all patriotic citizens will cast an evil eye upon you as a subverter
of the laws, and you will confirm in the minds of the judges the
justice of their own condemnation of you. For he who is a corrupter of
the laws is more than likely to be corrupter of the young and
foolish portion of mankind. Will you then flee from well-ordered
cities and virtuous men? and is existence worth having on these terms?
Or will you go to them without shame, and talk to them, Socrates?
And what will you say to them? What you say here about virtue and
justice and institutions and laws being the best things among men?
Would that be decent of you? Surely not. But if you go away from
well-governed States to Crito's friends in Thessaly, where there is
great disorder and license, they will be charmed to have the tale of
your escape from prison, set off with ludicrous particulars of the
manner in which you were wrapped in a goatskin or some other disguise,
and metamorphosed as the fashion of runaways is- that is very
likely; but will there be no one to remind you that in your old age
you violated the most sacred laws from a miserable desire of a
little more life? Perhaps not, if you keep them in a good temper;
but if they are out of temper you will hear many degrading things; you
will live, but how?- as the flatterer of all men, and the servant of
all men; and doing what?- eating and drinking in Thessaly, having gone
abroad in order that you may get a dinner. And where will be your fine
sentiments about justice and virtue then? Say that you wish to live
for the sake of your children, that you may bring them up and
educate them- will you take them into Thessaly and deprive them of
Athenian citizenship? Is that the benefit which you would confer
upon them? Or are you under the impression that they will be better
cared for and educated here if you are still alive, although absent
from them; for that your friends will take care of them? Do you
fancy that if you are an inhabitant of Thessaly they will take care of
them, and if you are an inhabitant of the other world they will not
take care of them? Nay; but if they who call themselves friends are
truly friends, they surely will.

  "Listen, then, Socrates, to us who have brought you up. Think not of
life and children first, and of justice afterwards, but of justice
first, that you may be justified before the princes of the world
below. For neither will you nor any that belong to you be happier or
holier or juster in this life, or happier in another, if you do as
Crito bids. Now you depart in innocence, a sufferer and not a doer of
evil; a victim, not of the laws, but of men. But if you go forth,
returning evil for evil, and injury for injury, breaking the covenants
and agreements which you have made with us, and wronging those whom
you ought least to wrong, that is to say, yourself, your friends, your
country, and us, we shall be angry with you while you live, and our
brethren, the laws in the world below, will receive you as an enemy;
for they will know that you have done your best to destroy us. Listen,
then, to us and not to Crito."

  This is the voice which I seem to hear murmuring in my ears, like
the sound of the flute in the ears of the mystic; that voice, I say,
is humming in my ears, and prevents me from hearing any other. And I
know that anything more which you will say will be in vain. Yet speak,
if you have anything to say.

  Cr. I have nothing to say, Socrates.

  Soc. Then let me follow the intimations of the will of God.

                             -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES, who is the narrator; CRITO;
CLEINIAS; EUTHYDEMUS; DIONYSODORUS; CTESIPPUS. Scene: The Lyceum

  Crito. Who was the person, Socrates, with whom you were talking
yesterday at the Lyceum? There was such a crowd around you that I
could not get within hearing, but I caught a sight of him over their
heads, and I made out, as I thought, that he was a stranger with
whom you were talking: who was he?

  Socrates. There were two, Crito; which of them do you mean?

  Cri. The one whom I mean was seated second from you on the
right-hand side. In the middle was Cleinias the young son of Axiochus,
who has wonderfully grown; he is only about the age of my own
Critobulus, but he is much forwarder and very good-looking: the
other is thin and looks younger than he is.

  Soc. He whom you mean, Crito, is Euthydemus; and on my left hand
there was his brother Dionysodorus, who also took part in the
conversation.

  Cri. Neither of them are known to me, Socrates; they are a new
importation of Sophists, as I should imagine. Of what country are
they, and what is their line of wisdom?

  Soc. As to their origin, I believe that they are natives of this
part of the world, and have migrated from Chios to Thurii; they were
driven out of Thurii, and have been living for many years past in
these regions. As to their wisdom, about which you ask, Crito, they
are wonderful-consummate! I never knew what the true pancratiast was
before; they are simply made up of fighting, not like the two
Acarnanian brothers who fight with their bodies only, but this pair of
heroes, besides being perfect in the use of their bodies, are
invincible in every sort of warfare; for they are capital at
fighting in armour, and will teach the art to any one who pays them;
and also they are most skilful in legal warfare; they will plead
themselves and teach others to speak and to compose speeches which
will have an effect upon the courts. And this was only the beginning
of their wisdom, but they have at last carried out the pancratiastic
art to the very end, and have mastered the only mode of fighting which
had been hitherto neglected by them; and now no one dares even to
stand up against them: such is their skill in the war of words, that
they can refute any proposition whether true or false. Now I am
thinking, Crito, of placing myself in their hands; for they say that
in a short time they can impart their skill to any one.

  Cri. But, Socrates, are you not too old? there may be reason to fear
that.

  Soc. Certainly not, Crito; as I will prove to you, for I have the
consolation of knowing that they began this art of disputation which I
covet, quite, as I may say, in old age; last year, or the year before,
they had none of their new wisdom. I am only apprehensive that I may
bring the two strangers into disrepute, as I have done Connus the
son of Metrobius, the harp-player, who is still my music-master; for
when the boys who go to him see me going with them, they laugh at me
and call him grandpapa's master. Now I should not like the strangers
to experience similar treatment; the fear of ridicule may make them
unwilling to receive me; and therefore, Crito, I shall try and
persuade some old men to accompany me to them, as I persuaded them
to go with me to Connus, and I hope that you will make one: and
perhaps we had better take your sons as a bait; they will want to have
them as pupils, and for the sake of them willing to receive us.

  Cri. I see no objection, Socrates, if you like; but first I wish
that you would give me a description of their wisdom, that I may
know beforehand what we are going to learn.

  Soc. In less than no time you shall hear; for I cannot say that I
did not attend-I paid great attention to them, and I remember and will
endeavour to repeat the whole story. Providentially I was sitting
alone in the dressing-room of the Lyceum where you saw me, and was
about to depart; when I was getting up I recognized the familiar
divine sign: so I sat down again, and in a little while the two
brothers Euthydemus and Dionysodorus came in, and several others
with them, whom I believe to be their disciples, and they walked about
in the covered court; they had not taken more than two or three
turns when Cleinias entered, who, as you truly say, is very much
improved: he was followed by a host of lovers, one of whom was
Ctesippus the Paeanian, a well-bred youth, but also having the
wildness of youth. Cleinias saw me from the entrance as I was
sitting alone, and at once came and sat down on the right hand of
me, as you describe; and Dionysodorus and Euthydemus, when they saw
him, at first stopped and talked with one another, now and then
glancing at us, for I particularly watched them; and then Euthydemus
came and sat down by the youth, and the other by me on the left
hand; the rest anywhere. I saluted the brothers, whom I had not seen
for a long time; and then I said to Cleinias: Here are two wise men,
Euthydemus and Dionysodorus, Cleinias, wise not in a small but in a
large way of wisdom, for they know all about war,-all that a good
general ought to know about the array and command of an army, and
the whole art of fighting in armour: and they know about law too,
and can teach a man how to use the weapons of the courts when he is
injured.

  They heard me say this, but only despised me. I observed that they
looked at one another, and both of them laughed; and then Euthydemus
Those, Socrates, are matters which we no longer pursue seriously; to
us they are secondary occupations.

  Indeed, I said, if such occupations are regarded by you as
secondary, what must the principal one be; tell me, I beseech you,
what that noble study is?

  The teaching of virtue, Socrates, he replied, is our principal
occupation; and we believe that we can impart it better and quicker
than any man.

  My God! I said, and where did you learn that? I always thought, as I
was saying just now, that your chief accomplishment was the art of
fighting in armour; and I used to say as much of you, for I remember
that you professed this when you were here before. But now if you
really have the other knowledge, O forgive me: I address you as I
would superior beings, and ask you to pardon the impiety of my
former expressions. But are you quite sure about this, Dionysodorus
and Euthydemus? the promise is so vast, that a feeling of
incredulity steals over me.

  You may take our word, Socrates, for the fact.

  Then I think you happier in having such a treasure than the great
king is in the possession of his kingdom. And please to tell me
whether you intend to exhibit your wisdom; or what will you do?

  That is why we have come hither, Socrates; and our purpose is not
only to exhibit, but also to teach any one who likes to learn.

  But I can promise you, I said, that every unvirtuous person will
want to learn. I shall be the first; and there is the youth
Cleinias, and Ctesippus: and here are several others, I said, pointing
to the lovers of Cleinias, who were beginning to gather round us.
Now Ctesippus was sitting at some distance from Cleinias; and when
Euthydemus leaned forward in talking with me, he was prevented from
seeing Cleinias, who was between us; and so, partly because he
wanted to look at his love, and also because he was interested, he
jumped up and stood opposite to us: and all the other admirers of
Cleinias, as well as the disciples of Euthydemus and Dionysodorus,
followed his example. And these were the persons whom I showed to
Euthydemus, telling him that they were all eager to learn: to which
Ctesippus and all of them with one voice vehemently assented, and
bid him exhibit the power of his wisdom. Then I said: O Euthydemus and
Dionysodorus, I earnestly request you to do myself and the company the
favour to exhibit. There may be some trouble in giving the whole
exhibition; but tell me one thing,-can you make a good man of him only
who is already convinced that he ought to learn of you, or of him also
who is not convinced, either because he imagines that virtue is a
thing which cannot be taught at all, or that you are not the
teachers of it? Has your art power to persuade him, who is of the
latter temper of mind, that virtue can be taught; and that you are the
men from whom he will best learn it?

  Certainly, Socrates, said Dionysodorus; our art will do both.

  And you and your brother, Dionysodorus, I said, of all men who are
now living are the most likely to stimulate him to philosophy and to
the study of virtue?

  Yes, Socrates, I rather think that we are.

  Then I wish that you would be so good as to defer the other part
of the exhibition, and only try to persuade the youth whom you see
here that he ought to be a philosopher and study virtue. Exhibit that,
and you will confer a great favour on me and on every one present; for
the fact is I and all of us are extremely anxious that he should
become truly good. His name is Cleinias, and he is the son of
Axiochus, and grandson of the old Alcibiades, cousin of the Alcibiades
that now is. He is quite young, and we are naturally afraid that
some one may get the start of us, and turn his mind in a wrong
direction, and he may be ruined. Your visit, therefore, is most
happily timed; and I hope that you will make a trial of the young man,
and converse with him in our presence, if you have no objection.

  These were pretty nearly the expressions which I used; and
Euthydemus, in a manly and at the same time encouraging tone, replied:
There can be no objection, Socrates, if the young man is only
willing to answer questions.

  He is quite accustomed to do so, I replied; for his friends often
come and ask him questions and argue with him; and therefore he is
quite at home in answering.

  What followed, Crito, how can I rightly narrate? For not slight is
the task of rehearsing infinite wisdom, and therefore, like the poets,
I ought to commence my relation with an invocation to Memory and the
Muses. Now Euthydemus, if I remember rightly, began nearly as follows:
O Cleinias, are those who learn the wise or the ignorant?

  The youth, overpowered by the question blushed, and in his
perplexity looked at me for help; and I, knowing that he was
disconcerted, said: Take courage, Cleinias, and answer like a man
whichever you think; for my belief is that you will derive the
greatest benefit from their questions.

  Whichever he answers, said Dionysodorus, leaning forward so as to
catch my ear, his face beaming with laughter, I prophesy that he
will be refuted, Socrates.

  While he was speaking to me, Cleinias gave his answer: and therefore
I had no time to warn him of the predicament in which he was placed,
and he answered that those who learned were the wise.

  Euthydemus proceeded: There are some whom you would call teachers,
are there not?

  The boy assented.

  And they are the teachers of those who learn-the grammar-master
and the lyre master used to teach you and other boys; and you were the
learners?

  Yes.

  And when you were learners you did not as yet know the things
which you were learning?

  No, he said.

  And were you wise then?

  No, indeed, he said.

  But if you were not wise you were unlearned?

  Certainly.

  You then, learning what you did not know, were unlearned when you
were learning?

  The youth nodded assent.

  Then the unlearned learn, and not the wise, Cleinias, as you
imagine.

  At these words the followers of Euthydemus, of whom I spoke, like
a chorus at the bidding of their director, laughed and cheered.
Then, before the youth had time to recover his breath, Dionysodorus
cleverly took him in hand, and said: Yes, Cleinias; and when the
grammar master dictated anything to you, were they the wise boys or
the unlearned who learned the dictation?

  The wise, replied Cleinias.

  Then after all the wise are the learners and not the unlearned;
and your last answer to Euthydemus was wrong.

  Then once more the admirers of the two heroes, in an ecstasy at
their wisdom, gave vent to another peal of laughter, while the rest of
us were silent and amazed. Euthydemus, observing this, determined to
persevere with the youth; and in order to heighten the effect went
on asking another similar question, which might be compared to the
double turn of an expert dancer. Do those, said he, who learn, learn
what they know, or what they do not know?

  Again Dionysodorus whispered to me: That, Socrates, is just
another of the same sort.

  Good heavens, I said; and your last question was so good!

  Like all our other questions, Socrates, he replied-inevitable.

  I see the reason, I said, why you are in such reputation among
your disciples.

  Meanwhile Cleinias had answered Euthydemus that those who learned
learn what they do not know; and he put him through a series of
questions the same as before.

  Do you not know letters?

  He assented.

  All letters?

  Yes.

  But when the teacher dictates to you, does he not dictate letters?

  To this also he assented.

  Then if you know all letters, he dictates that which you know?

  This again was admitted by him.

  Then, said the other, you do not learn that which he dictates; but
he only who does not know letters learns?

  Nay, said Cleinias; but I do learn.

  Then, said he, you learn what you know, if you know all the letters?

  He admitted that.

  Then, he said, you were wrong in your answer.

  The word was hardly out of his mouth when Dionysodorus took up the
argument, like a ball which he caught, and had another throw at the
youth. Cleinias, he said, Euthydemus is deceiving you. For tell me
now, is not learning acquiring knowledge of that which one learns?

  Cleinias assented.

  And knowing is having knowledge at the time?

  He agreed.

  And not knowing is not having knowledge at the time?

  He admitted that.

  And are those who acquire those who have or have not a thing?

  Those who have not.

  And have you not admitted that those who do not know are of the
number of those who have not?

  He nodded assent.

  Then those who learn are of the class of those who acquire, and
not of those who have?

  He agreed.

  Then, Cleinias, he said, those who do not know learn, and not
those who know.

  Euthydemus was proceeding to give the youth a third fall; but I knew
that he was in deep water, and therefore, as I wanted to give him a
respite lest he should be disheartened, I said to him consolingly: You
must not be surprised, Cleinias, at the singularity of their mode of
speech: this I say because you may not understand what the two
strangers are doing with you; they are only initiating you after the
manner of the Corybantes in the mysteries; and this answers to the
enthronement, which, if you have ever been initiated, is, as you
will know, accompanied by dancing and sport; and now they are just
prancing and dancing about you, and will next proceed to initiate you;
imagine then that you have gone through the first part of the
sophistical ritual, which, as Prodicus says, begins with initiation
into the correct use of terms. The two foreign gentlemen, perceiving
that you did not know, wanted to explain to you that the word "to
learn" has two meanings, and is used, first, in the sense of acquiring
knowledge of some matter of which you previously have no knowledge,
and also, when you have the knowledge, in the sense of reviewing
this matter, whether something done or spoken by the light of this
newly-acquired knowledge; the latter is generally called "knowing"
rather than "learning," but the word "learning" is also used; and
you did not see, as they explained to you, that the term is employed
of two opposite sorts of men, of those who know, and of those who do
not know. There was a similar trick in the second question, when
they asked you whether men learn what they know or what they do not
know. These parts of learning are not serious, and therefore I say
that the gentlemen are not serious, but are only playing with you. For
if a man had all that sort of knowledge that ever was, he would not be
at all the wiser; he would only be able to play with men, tripping
them up and over setting them with distinctions of words. He would
be like a person who pulls away a stool from some one when he is about
to sit down, and then laughs and makes merry at the sight of his
friend overturned and laid on his back. And you must regard all that
has hitherto passed between you and them as merely play. But in what
is to follow I am certain that they will exhibit to you their
serious purpose, and keep their promise (I will show them how); for
they promised to give me a sample of the hortatory philosophy, but I
suppose that they wanted to have a game with you first. And now,
Euthydemus and Dionysodorus, I think that we have had enough of
this. Will you let me see you explaining to the young man how he is to
apply himself to the study of virtue and wisdom? And I will first show
you what I conceive to be the nature of the task, and what sort of a
discourse I desire to hear; and if I do this in a very inartistic
and ridiculous manner, do not laugh at me, for I only venture to
improvise before you because I am eager to hear your wisdom: and I
must therefore ask you and your disciples to refrain from laughing.
And now, O son of Axiochus, let me put a question to you: Do not all
men desire happiness? And yet, perhaps, this is one of those
ridiculous questions which I am afraid to ask, and which ought not
to be asked by a sensible man: for what human being is there who
does not desire happiness?

  There is no one, said Cleinias, who does not.

  Well, then, I said, since we all of us desire happiness, how can
we be happy?-that is the next question. Shall we not be happy if we
have many good things? And this, perhaps, is even a more simple
question than the first, for there can be no doubt of the answer.

  He assented.

  And what things do we esteem good? No solemn sage is required to
tell us this, which may be easily answered; for every one will say
that wealth is a good.

  Certainly, he said.

  And are not health and beauty goods, and other personal gifts?

  He agreed.

  Can there be any doubt that good birth, and power, and honours in
one's own land, are goods?

  He assented.

  And what other goods are there? I said. What do you say of
temperance, justice, courage: do you not verily and indeed think,
Cleinias, that we shall be more right in ranking them as goods than in
not ranking them as goods? For a dispute might possibly arise about
this. What then do you say?

  They are goods, said Cleinias.

  Very well, I said; and where in the company shall we find a place
for wisdom-among the goods or not?

  Among the goods.

  And now, I said, think whether we have left out any considerable
goods.

  I do not think that we have, said Cleinias.

  Upon recollection, I said, indeed I am afraid that we have left
out the greatest of them all.

  What is that? he asked.

  Fortune, Cleinias, I replied; which all, even the most foolish,
admit to be the greatest of goods.

  True, he said.

  On second thoughts, I added, how narrowly, O son of Axiochus, have
you and I escaped making a laughing-stock of ourselves to the
strangers.

  Why do you say so?

  Why, because we have already spoken of good-fortune, and are but
repeating ourselves.

  What do you mean?

  I mean that there is something ridiculous in again putting forward
good-fortune, which has a place in the list already, and saying the
same thing twice over.

  He asked what was the meaning of this, and I replied: Surely
wisdom is good-fortune; even a child may know that.

  The simple-minded youth was amazed; and, observing his surprise, I
said to him: Do you not know, Cleinias, that flute-players are most
fortunate and successful in performing on the flute?

  He assented.

  And are not the scribes most fortunate in writing and reading
letters?

  Certainly.

  Amid the dangers of the sea, again, are any more fortunate on the
whole than wise pilots?

  None, certainly.

  And if you were engaged in war, in whose company would you rather
take the risk-in company with a wise general, or with a foolish one?

  With a wise one.

  And if you were ill, whom would you rather have as a companion in
a dangerous illness-a wise physician, or an ignorant one?

  A wise one.

  You think, I said, that to act with a wise man is more fortunate
than to act with an ignorant one?

  He assented.

  Then wisdom always makes men fortunate: for by wisdom no man would
ever err, and therefore he must act rightly and succeed, or his wisdom
would be wisdom no longer.

  We contrived at last, somehow or other, to agree in a general
conclusion, that he who had wisdom had no need of fortune. I then
recalled to his mind the previous state of the question. You remember,
I said, our making the admission that we should be happy and fortunate
if many good things were present with us?

  He assented.

  And should we be happy by reason of the presence of good things,
if they profited us not, or if they profited us?

  If they profited us, he said.

  And would they profit us, if we only had them and did not use
them? For example, if we had a great deal of food and did not eat,
or a great deal of drink and did not drink, should we be profited?

  Certainly not, he said.

  Or would an artisan, who had all the implements necessary for his
work, and did not use them, be any the better for the possession of
them? For example, would a carpenter be any the better for having
all his tools and plenty of wood, if he never worked?

  Certainly not, he said.

  And if a person had wealth and all the goods of which we were just
now speaking, and did not use them, would he be happy because he
possessed them?

  No indeed, Socrates.

  Then, I said, a man who would be happy must not only have the good
things, but he must also use them; there is no advantage in merely
having them?

  True.

  Well, Cleinias, but if you have the use as well as the possession of
good things, is that sufficient to confer happiness?

  Yes, in my opinion.

  And may a person use them either rightly or wrongly?

  He must use them rightly.

  That is quite true, I said. And the wrong use of a thing is far
worse than the non-use; for the one is an evil, and the other is
neither a good nor an evil. You admit that?

  He assented.

  Now in the working and use of wood, is not that which gives the
right use simply the knowledge of the carpenter?

  Nothing else, he said.

  And surely, in the manufacture of vessels, knowledge is that which
gives the right way of making them?

  He agreed.

  And in the use of the goods of which we spoke at first-wealth and
health and beauty, is not knowledge that which directs us to the right
use of them, and regulates our practice about them?

  He assented.

  Then in every possession and every use of a thing, knowledge is that
which gives a man not only good-fortune but success?

  He again assented.

  And tell me, I said, O tell me, what do possessions profit a man, if
he have neither good sense nor wisdom? Would a man be better off,
having and doing many things without wisdom, or a few things with
wisdom? Look at the matter thus: If he did fewer things would he not
make fewer mistakes? if he made fewer mistakes would he not have fewer
misfortunes? and if he had fewer misfortunes would he not be less
miserable?

  Certainly, he said.

  And who would do least-a Poor man or a rich man?

  A poor man.

  A weak man or a strong man?

  A weak man.

  A noble man or a mean man?

  A mean man.

  And a coward would do less than a courageous and temperate man?

  Yes.

  And an indolent man less than an active man?

  He assented.

  And a slow man less than a quick; and one who had dull perceptions
of seeing and hearing less than one who had keen ones?

  All this was mutually allowed by us.

  Then, I said, Cleinias, the sum of the matter appears to be that the
goods of which we spoke before are not to be regarded as goods in
themselves, but the degree of good and evil in them depends on whether
they are or are not under the guidance of knowledge: under the
guidance of ignorance, they are greater evils than their opposites,
inasmuch as they are more able to minister to the evil principle which
rules them; and when under the guidance of wisdom and prudence, they
are greater goods: but in themselves are nothing?

  That, he replied, is obvious.

  What then is the result of what has been said? Is not this the
result-that other things are indifferent, and that wisdom is the
only good, and ignorance the only evil?

  He assented.

  Let us consider a further point, I said: Seeing that all men
desire happiness, and happiness, as has been shown, is gained by a
use, and a right use, of the things of life, and the right use of
them, and good fortune in the use of them, is given by
knowledge,-the inference is that everybody ought by all means to try
and make himself as wise as he can?

  Yes, he said.

  And when a man thinks that he ought to obtain this treasure, far
more than money, from a father or a guardian or a friend or a
suitor, whether citizen or stranger-the eager desire and prayer to
them that they would impart wisdom to you, is not at all
dishonourable, Cleinias; nor is any one to be blamed for doing any
honourable service or ministration to any man, whether a lover or not,
if his aim is to get wisdom. Do you agree? I said.

  Yes, he said, I quite agree, and think that you are right.

  Yes, I said, Cleinias, if only wisdom can be taught, and does not
come to man spontaneously; for this is a point which has still to be
considered, and is not yet agreed upon by you and me-

  But I think, Socrates, that wisdom can be taught, he said.

  Best of men, I said, I am delighted to hear you say so; and I am
also grateful to you for having saved me from a long and tiresome
investigation as to whether wisdom can be taught or not. But now, as
you think that wisdom can be taught, and that wisdom only can make a
man happy and fortunate will you not acknowledge that all of us
ought to love wisdom, and you individually will try to love her?

  Certainly, Socrates, he said; I will do my best.

  I was pleased at hearing this; and I turned to Dionysodorus and
Euthydemus and said: That is an example, clumsy and tedious I admit,
of the sort of exhortations which I would have you give; and I hope
that one of you will set forth what I have been saying in a more
artistic style: or at least take up the enquiry where I left off,
and proceed to show the youth whether he should have all knowledge; or
whether there is one sort of knowledge only which will make him good
and happy, and what that is. For, as I was saying at first, the
improvement of this young man in virtue and wisdom is a matter which
we have very much at heart.

  Thus I spoke, Crito, and was all attention to what was coming. I
wanted to see how they would approach the question, and where they
would start in their exhortation to the young man that he should
practise wisdom and virtue. Dionysodorus, who was the elder, spoke
first. Everybody's eyes were directed towards him, perceiving that
something wonderful might shortly be expected. And certainly they were
not far wrong; for the man, Crito, began a remarkable discourse well
worth hearing, and wonderfully persuasive regarded as an exhortation
to virtue.

  Tell me, he said, Socrates and the rest of you who say that you want
this young man to become wise, are you in jest or in real earnest?

  I was led by this to imagine that they fancied us to have been
jesting when we asked them to converse with the youth, and that this
made them jest and play, and being under this impression, I was the
more decided in saying that we were in profound earnest.
Dionysodorus said:

  Reflect, Socrates; you may have to deny your words.

  I have reflected, I said; and I shall never deny my words.

  Well, said he, and so you say that you wish Cleinias to become wise?

  Undoubtedly.

  And he is not wise as yet?

  At least his modesty will not allow him to say that he is.

  You wish him, he said, to become wise and not, to be ignorant?

  That we do.

  You wish him to be what he is not, and no longer to be what he is?

  I was thrown into consternation at this.

  Taking advantage of my consternation he added: You wish him no
longer to be what he is, which can only mean that you wish him to
perish. Pretty lovers and friends they must be who want their
favourite not to be, or to perish!

  When Ctesippus heard this he got very angry (as a lover well
might) and said: Stranger of Thurii-if politeness would allow me I
should say, A plague upon you! What can make you tell such a lie about
me and the others, which I hardly like to repeat, as that I wish
Cleinias to perish?

  Euthydemus replied: And do you think, Ctesippus, that it is possible
to tell a lie?

  Yes, said Ctesippus; I should be mad to say anything else.

  And in telling a lie, do you tell the thing of which you speak or
not?

  You tell the thing of which you speak.

  And he who tells, tells that thing which he tells, and no other?

  Yes, said Ctesippus.

  And that is a distinct thing apart from other things?

  Certainly.

  And he who says that thing says that which is?

  Yes.

  And he who says that which is, says the truth. And therefore
Dionysodorus, if he says that which is, says the truth of you and no
lie.

  Yes, Euthydemus, said Ctesippus; but in saying this, he says what is
not.

  Euthydemus answered: And that which is not is not?

  True.

  And that which is not is nowhere?

  Nowhere.

  And can any one do anything about that which has no existence, or do
to Cleinias that which is not and is nowhere?

  I think not, said Ctesippus.

  Well, but do rhetoricians, when they speak in the assembly, do
nothing?

  Nay, he said, they do something.

  And doing is making?

  Yes.

  And speaking is doing and making?

  He agreed.

  Then no one says that which is not, for in saying what is not he
would be doing something; and you have already acknowledged that no
one can do what is not. And therefore, upon your own showing, no one
says what is false; but if Dionysodorus says anything, he says what is
true and what is.

  Yes, Euthydemus, said Ctesippus; but he speaks of things in a
certain way and manner, and not as they really are.

  Why, Ctesippus, said Dionysodorus, do you mean to say that any one
speaks of things as they are?

  Yes, he said-all gentlemen and truth-speaking persons.

  And are not good things good, and evil things evil?

  He assented.

  And you say that gentlemen speak of things as they are?

  Yes.

  Then the good speak evil of evil things, if they speak of them as
they are?

  Yes, indeed, he said; and they speak evil of evil men. And if I
may give you a piece of advice, you had better take care that they
do not speak evil of you, since I can tell you that the good speak
evil of the evil.

  And do they speak great things of the great, rejoined Euthydemus,
and warm things of the warm?

  To be sure they do, said Ctesippus; and they speak coldly of the
insipid and cold dialectician.

  You are abusive, Ctesippus, said Dionysodorus, you are abusive!

  Indeed, I am not, Dionysodorus, he replied; for I love you and am
giving you friendly advice, and, if I could, would persuade you not
like a boor to say in my presence that I desire my beloved, whom I
value above all men, to perish.

  I saw that they were getting exasperated with one another, so I made
a joke with him and said: O Ctesippus, I think that we must allow
the strangers to use language in their own way, and not quarrel with
them about words, but be thankful for what they give us. If they
know how to destroy men in such a way as to make good and sensible men
out of bad and foolish ones-whether this is a discovery of their
own, or whether they have learned from some one else this new sort
of death and destruction which enables them to get rid of a bad man
and turn him into a good one-if they know this (and they do know
this-at any rate they said just now that this was the secret of
their newly-discovered art)-let them, in their phraseology, destroy
the youth and make him wise, and all of us with him. But if you
young men do not like to trust yourselves with them, then fiat
experimentum in corpore senis; I will be the Carian on whom they shall
operate. And here I offer my old person to Dionysodorus; he may put me
into the pot, like Medea the Colchian, kill me, boil me, if he will
only make me good.

  Ctesippus said: And I, Socrates, am ready to commit myself to the
strangers; they may skin me alive, if they please (and I am pretty
well skinned by them already), if only my skin is made at last, not
like that of Marsyas, into a leathern bottle, but into a piece of
virtue. And here is Dionysodorus fancying that I am angry with him,
when really I am not angry at all; I do but contradict him when I
think that he is speaking improperly to me: and you must not
confound abuse and contradiction, O illustrious Dionysodorus; for they
are quite different things.

  Contradiction! said Dionysodorus; why, there never was such a thing.

  Certainly there is, he replied; there can be no question of that. Do
you, Dionysodorus, maintain that there is not?

  You will never prove to me, he said, that you have heard any one
contradicting any one else.

  Indeed, said Ctesippus; then now you may hear me contradicting
Dionysodorus.

  Are you prepared to make that good?

  Certainly, he said.

  Well, have not all things words expressive of them?

  Yes.

  Of their existence or of their non-existence?

  Of their existence.

  Yes, Ctesippus, and we just now proved, as you may remember, that no
man could affirm a negative; for no one could affirm that which is
not.

  And what does that signify? said Ctesippus; you and I may contradict
all the same for that.

  But can we contradict one another, said Dionysodorus, when both of
us are describing the same thing? Then we must surely be speaking
the same thing?

  He assented.

  Or when neither of us is speaking of the same thing? For then
neither of us says a word about the thing at all?

  He granted that proposition also.

  But when I describe something and you describe another thing, or I
say something and you say nothing-is there any contradiction? How
can he who speaks contradict him who speaks not?

  Here Ctesippus was silent; and I in my astonishment said: What do
you mean, Dionysodorus? I have often heard, and have been amazed to
hear, this thesis of yours, which is maintained and employed by the
disciples of Protagoras, and others before them, and which to me
appears to be quite wonderful, and suicidal as well as destructive,
and I think that I am most likely to hear the truth about it from you.
The dictum is that there is no such thing as falsehood; a man must
either say what is true or say nothing. Is not that your position?

  He assented.

  But if he cannot speak falsely, may he not think falsely?

  No, he cannot, he said.

  Then there is no such thing as false opinion?

  No, he said.

  Then there is no such thing as ignorance, or men who are ignorant;
for is not ignorance, if there be such a thing, a mistake of fact?

  Certainly, he said.

  And that is impossible?

  Impossible, he replied.

  Are you saying this as a paradox, Dionysodorus; or do you
seriously maintain no man to be ignorant?

  Refute me, he said.

  But how can I refute you, if, as you say, to tell a falsehood is
impossible?

  Very true, said Euthydemus.

  Neither did I tell you just now to refute me, said Dionysodorus; for
how can I tell you to do that which is not?

  O Euthydemus, I said, I have but a dull conception of these
subtleties and excellent devices of wisdom; I am afraid that I
hardly understand them, and you must forgive me therefore if I ask a
very stupid question: if there be no falsehood or false opinion or
ignorance, there can be no such thing as erroneous action, for a man
cannot fail of acting as he is acting-that is what you mean?

  Yes, he replied.

  And now, I said, I will ask my stupid question: If there is no
such thing as error in deed, word, or thought, then what, in the
name of goodness, do you come hither to teach? And were you not just
now saying that you could teach virtue best of all men, to any one who
was willing to learn?

  And are you such an old fool, Socrates, rejoined Dionysodorus,
that you bring up now what I said at first-and if I had said
anything last year, I suppose that you would bring that up too-but are
non-plussed at the words which I have just uttered?

  Why, I said, they are not easy to answer; for they are the words
of wise men: and indeed I know not what to make of this word
"nonplussed," which you used last: what do you mean by it,
Dionysodorus? You must mean that I cannot refute your argument. Tell
me if the words have any other sense.

  No, he replied, they mean what you say. And now answer.

  What, before you, Dionysodorus? I said.

  Answer, said he.

  And is that fair?

  Yes, quite fair, he said.

  Upon what principle? I said. I can only suppose that you are a
very wise man who comes to us in the character of a great logician,
and who knows when to answer and when not to answer-and now you will
not open your mouth at all, because you know that you ought not.

  You prate, he said, instead of answering. But if, my good sir, you
admit that I am wise, answer as I tell you.

  I suppose that I must obey, for you are master. Put the question.

  Are the things which have sense alive or lifeless?

  They are alive.

  And do you know of any word which is alive?

  I cannot say that I do.

  Then why did you ask me what sense my words had?

  Why, because I was stupid and made a mistake. And yet, perhaps, I
was right after all in saying that words have a sense;-what do you
say, wise man? If I was not in error, even you will not refute me, and
all your wisdom will be non-plussed; but if I did fall into error,
then again you are wrong in saying that there is no error,-and this
remark was made by you not quite a year ago. I am inclined to think,
however, Dionysodorus and Euthydemus, that this argument lies where it
was and is not very likely to advance: even your skill in the
subtleties of logic, which is really amazing, has not found out the
way of throwing another and not falling yourself, now any more than of
old.

  Ctesippus said: Men of Chios, Thurii, or however and whatever you
call yourselves, I wonder at you, for you seem to have no objection to
talking nonsense.

  Fearing that there would be high words, I again endeavoured to
soothe Ctesippus, and said to him: To you, Ctesippus, I must repeat
what I said before to Cleinias-that you do not understand the ways
of these philosophers from abroad. They are not serious, but, like the
Egyptian wizard, Proteus, they take different forms and deceive us
by their enchantments: and let us, like Menelaus, refuse to let them
go until they show themselves to us in earnest. When they begin to
be in earnest their full beauty will appear: let us then beg and
entreat and beseech them to shine forth. And I think that I had better
once more exhibit the form in which I pray to behold them; it might be
a guide to them. I will go on therefore where I left off, as well as I
can, in the hope that I may touch their hearts and move them to
pity, and that when they see me deeply serious and interested, they
also may be serious. You, Cleinias, I said, shall remind me at what
point we left off. Did we not agree that philosophy should be studied?
and was not that our conclusion?

  Yes, he replied.

  And philosophy is the acquisition of knowledge?

  Yes, he said.

  And what knowledge ought we to acquire? May we not answer with
absolute truth-A knowledge which will do us good?

  Certainly, he said.

  And should we be any the better if we went about having a
knowledge of the places where most gold was hidden in the earth?

  Perhaps we should, he said.

  But have we not already proved, I said, that we should be none the
better off, even if without trouble and digging all the gold which
there is in the earth were ours? And if we knew how to convert
stones into gold, the knowledge would be of no value to us, unless
we also knew how to use the gold? Do you not remember? I said.

  I quite remember, he said.

  Nor would any other knowledge, whether of money-making, or of
medicine, or of any other art which knows only how to make a thing,
and not to use it when made, be of any good to us. Am I not right?

  He agreed.

  And if there were a knowledge which was able to make men immortal,
without giving them the knowledge of the way to use the immortality,
neither would there be any use in that, if we may argue from the
analogy of the previous instances?

  To all this he agreed.

  Then, my dear boy, I said, the knowledge which we want is one that
uses as well as makes?

  True, he said.

  And our desire is not to be skilful lyre-makers, or artists of
that sort-far otherwise; for with them the art which makes is one, and
the art which uses is another. Although they have to do with the same,
they are divided: for the art which makes and the art which plays on
the lyre differ widely from one another. Am I not right?

  He agreed.

  And clearly we do not want the art of the flute-maker; this is
only another of the same sort?

  He assented.

  But suppose, I said, that we were to learn the art of making
speeches-would that be the art which would make us happy?

  I should say no, rejoined Cleinias.

  And why should you say so? I asked.

  I see, he replied, that there are some composers of speeches who
do not know how to use the speeches which they make, just as the
makers of lyres do not know how to use the lyres; and also some who
are of themselves unable to compose speeches, but are able to use
the speeches which the others make for them; and this proves that
the art of making speeches is not the same as the art of using them.

  Yes, I said; and I take your words to be a sufficient proof that the
art of making speeches is not one which will make a man happy. And yet
I did think that the art which we have so long been seeking might be
discovered in that direction; for the composers of speeches,
whenever I meet them, always appear to me to be very extraordinary
men, Cleinias, and their art is lofty and divine, and no wonder. For
their art is a part of the great art of enchantment, and hardly, if at
all, inferior to it: and whereas the art of the enchanter is a mode of
charming snakes and spiders and scorpions, and other monsters and
pests, this art of theirs acts upon dicasts and ecclesiasts and bodies
of men, for the charming and pacifying of them. Do you agree with me?

  Yes, he said, I think that you are quite right.

  Whither then shall we go, I said, and to what art shall we have
recourse?

  I do not see my way, he said.

  But I think that I do, I replied.

  And what is your notion? asked Cleinias.

  I think that the art of the general is above all others the one of
which the possession is most likely to make a man happy.

  I do not think so, he said.

  Why not? I said.

  The art of the general is surely an art of hunting mankind.

  What of that? I said.

  Why, he said, no art of hunting extends beyond hunting and
capturing; and when the prey is taken the huntsman or fisherman cannot
use it; but they hand it over to the cook, and the geometricians and
astronomers and calculators (who all belong to the hunting class,
for they do not make their diagrams, but only find out that which
was previously contained in them)-they, I say, not being able to use
but only to catch their prey, hand over their inventions to the
dialectician to be applied by him, if they have any sense in them.

  Good, I said, fairest and wisest Cleinias. And is this true?

  Certainly, he said; just as a general when he takes a city or a camp
hands over his new acquisition to the statesman, for he does not
know how to use them himself; or as the quail-taker transfers the
quails to the keeper of them. If we are looking for the art which is
to make us blessed, and which is able to use that which it makes or
takes, the art of the general is not the one, and some other must be
found.

  Cri. And do you mean, Socrates, that the youngster said all this?

  Soc. Are you incredulous, Crito?

  Cri. Indeed, I am; for if he did say so, then in my opinion he needs
neither Euthydemus nor any one else to be his instructor.

  Soc. Perhaps I may have forgotten, and Ctesippus was the real
answerer.

  Cri. Ctesippus! nonsense.

  Soc. All I know is that I heard these words, and that they were
not spoken either by Euthydemus or Dionysodorus. I dare say, my good
Crito, that they may have been spoken by some superior person: that
I heard them I am certain.

  Cri. Yes, indeed, Socrates, by some one a good deal superior, as I
should be disposed to think. But did you carry the search any further,
and did you find the art which you were seeking?

  Soc. Find! my dear sir, no indeed. And we cut a poor figure; we were
like children after larks, always on the point of catching the art,
which was always getting away from us. But why should I repeat the
whole story? At last we came to the kingly art, and enquired whether
that gave and caused happiness, and then we got into a labyrinth,
and when we thought we were at the end, came out again at the
beginning, having still to seek as much as ever.

  Cri. How did that happen, Socrates?

  Soc. I will tell you; the kingly art was identified by us with the
political.

  Cri. Well, and what came of that?

  Soc. To this royal or political art all the arts, including the
art of the general, seemed to render up the supremacy, that being
the only one which knew how to use what they produce. Here obviously
was the very art which we were seeking-the art which is the source
of good government, and which may be described, in the language of
Aeschylus, as alone sitting at the helm of the vessel of state,
piloting and governing all things, and utilizing them.

  Cri. And were you not right, Socrates?

  Soc. You shall judge, Crito, if you are willing to hear what
followed; for we resumed the enquiry, and a question of this sort
was asked: Does the kingly art, having this supreme authority, do
anything for us? To be sure, was the answer. And would not you, Crito,
say the same?

  Cri. Yes, I should.

  Soc. And what would you say that the kingly art does? If medicine
were supposed to have supreme authority over the subordinate arts, and
I were to ask you a similar question about that, you would say-it
produces health?

  Cri. I should.

  Soc. And what of your own art of husbandry, supposing that to have
supreme authority over the subject arts-what does that do? Does it not
supply us with the fruits of the earth?

  Cri. Yes.

  Soc. And what does the kingly art do when invested with supreme
power? Perhaps you may not be ready with an answer?

  Cri. Indeed I am not, Socrates.

  Soc. No more were we, Crito. But at any rate you know that if this
is the art which we were seeking, it ought to be useful.

  Cri. Certainly.

  Soc. And surely it ought to do us some good?

  Cri. Certainly, Socrates.

  Soc. And Cleinias and I had arrived at the conclusion that knowledge
of some kind is the only good.

  Cri. Yes, that was what you were saying.

  Soc. All the other results of politics, and they are many, as for
example, wealth, freedom, tranquillity, were neither good nor evil
in themselves; but the political science ought to make us wise, and
impart knowledge to us, if that is the science which is likely to do
us good, and make us happy.

  Cri. Yes; that was the conclusion at which you had arrived,
according to your report of the conversation.

  Soc. And does the kingly art make men wise and good?

  Cri. Why not, Socrates?

  Soc. What, all men, and in every respect? and teach them all the
arts,-carpentering, and cobbling, and the rest of them?

  Cri. I think not, Socrates.

  Soc. But then what is this knowledge, and what are we to do with it?
For it is not the source of any works which are neither good nor evil,
and gives no knowledge, but the knowledge of itself; what then can
it be, and what are we to do with it? Shall we say, Crito, that it
is the knowledge by which we are to make other men good?

  Cri. By all means.

  Soc. And in what will they be good and useful? Shall we repeat
that they will make others good, and that these others will make
others again, without ever determining in what they are to be good;
for we have put aside the results of politics, as they are called.
This is the old, old song over again; and we are just as far as
ever, if not farther, from the knowledge of the art or science of
happiness.

  .Cri. Indeed, Socrates, you do appear to have got into a great
perplexity.

  Soc. Thereupon, Crito, seeing that I was on the point of
shipwreck, I lifted up my voice, and earnestly entreated and called
upon the strangers to save me and the youth from the whirlpool of
the argument; they were our Castor and Pollux, I said, and they should
be serious, and show us in sober earnest what that knowledge was which
would enable us to pass the rest of our lives in happiness.

  Cri. And did Euthydemus show you this knowledge?

  Soc. Yes, indeed; he proceeded in a lofty strain to the following
effect: Would you rather, Socrates, said he, that I should show you
this knowledge about which you have been doubting, or shall I prove
that you already have it?

  What, I said, are you blessed with such a power as this?

  Indeed I am.

  Then I would much rather that you should prove me to have such a
knowledge; at my time of life that will be more agreeable than
having to learn.

  Then tell me, he said, do you know anything?

  Yes, I said, I know many things, but not anything of much
importance.

  That will do, he said: And would you admit that anything is what
it is, and at the same time is not what it is?

  Certainly not.

  And did you not say that you knew something?

  I did.

  If you know, you are knowing.

  Certainly, of the knowledge which I have.

  That makes no difference;-and must you not, if you are knowing, know
all things?

  Certainly not, I said, for there are many other things which I do
not know.

  And if you do not know, you are not knowing.

  Yes, friend, of that which I do not know.

  Still you are not knowing, and you said just now that you were
knowing; and therefore you are and are not at the same time, and in
reference to the same things.

  A pretty clatter, as men say, Euthydemus, this of yours! and will
you explain how I possess that knowledge for which we were seeking? Do
you mean to say that the same thing cannot be and also not be; and
therefore, since I know one thing, that I know all, for I cannot be
knowing and not knowing at the same time, and if I know all things,
then I must have the knowledge for which we are seeking-May I assume
this to be your ingenious notion?

  Out of your own mouth, Socrates, you are convicted, he said.

  Well, but, Euthydemus, I said, has that never happened to you? for
if I am only in the same case with you and our beloved Dionysodorus, I
cannot complain. Tell me, then, you two, do you not know some
things, and not know others?

  Certainly not, Socrates, said Dionysodorus.

  What do you mean, I said; do you know nothing?

  Nay, he replied, we do know something.

  Then, I said, you know all things, if you know anything?

  Yes, all things, he said; and that is as true of you as of us.

  O, indeed, I said, what a wonderful thing, and what a great
blessing! And do all other men know all things or nothing?

  Certainly, he replied; they cannot know some things, and not know
others, and be at the same time knowing and not knowing.

  Then what is the inference? I said.

  They all know all things, he replied, if they know one thing.

  O heavens, Dionysodorus, I said, I see now that you are in
earnest; hardly have I got you to that point. And do you really and
truly know all things, including carpentering and leather cutting?

  Certainly, he said.

  And do you know stitching?

  Yes, by the gods, we do, and cobbling, too.

  And do you know things such as the numbers of the stars and of the
sand?

  Certainly; did you think we should say no to that?

  By Zeus, said Ctesippus, interrupting, I only wish that you would
give me some proof which would enable me to know whether you speak
truly.

  What proof shall I give you? he said.

  Will you tell me how many teeth Euthydemus has? and Euthydemus shall
tell how many teeth you have.

  Will you not take our word that we know all things?

  Certainly not, said Ctesippus: you must further tell us this one
thing, and then we shall know that you are speak the truth; if you
tell us the number, and we count them, and you are found to be
right, we will believe the rest. They fancied that Ctesippus was
making game of them, and they refused, and they would only say in
answer to each of his questions, that they knew all things. For at
last Ctesippus began to throw off all restraint; no question in fact
was too bad for him; he would ask them if they knew the foulest
things, and they, like wild boars, came rushing on his blows, and
fearlessly replied that they did. At last, Crito, I too was carried
away by my incredulity, and asked Euthydemus whether Dionysodorus
could dance.

  Certainly, he replied.

  And can he vault among swords, and turn upon a wheel, at his age?
has he got to such a height of skill as that?

  He can do anything, he said.

  And did you always know this?

  Always, he said.

  When you were children, and at your birth?

  They both said that they did.

  This we could not believe. And Euthydemus said: You are incredulous,
Socrates.

  Yes, I said, and I might well be incredulous, if I did not know
you to be wise men.

  But if you will answer, he said, I will make you confess to
similar marvels.

  Well, I said, there is nothing that I should like better than to
be self-convicted of this, for if I am really a wise man, which I
never knew before, and you will prove to me that I know and have
always known all things, nothing in life would be a greater gain to
me.

  Answer then, he said.

  Ask, I said, and I will answer.

  Do you know something, Socrates, or nothing?

  Something, I said.

  And do you know with what you know, or with something else?

  With what I know; and I suppose that you mean with my soul?

  Are you not ashamed, Socrates, of asking a question when you are
asked one?

  Well, I said; but then what am I to do? for I will do whatever you
bid; when I do not know what you are asking, you tell me to answer
nevertheless, and not to ask again.

  Why, you surely have some notion of my meaning, he said.

  Yes, I replied.

  Well, then, answer according to your notion of my meaning.

  Yes, I said; but if the question which you ask in one sense is
understood and answered by me in another, will that please you-if I
answer what is not to the point?

  That will please me very well; but will not please you equally well,
as I imagine.

  I certainly will not answer unless I understand you, I said.

  You will not answer, he said, according to your view of the meaning,
because you will be prating, and are an ancient.

  Now I saw that he was getting angry with me for drawing
distinctions, when he wanted to catch me in his springes of words. And
I remembered that Connus was always angry with me when I opposed
him, and then he neglected me, because he thought that I was stupid;
and as I was intending to go to Euthydemus as a pupil, I reflected
that I had better let him have his way, as he might think me a
blockhead, and refuse to take me. So I said: You are a far better
dialectician than myself, Euthydemus, for I have never made a
profession of the art, and therefore do as you say; ask your questions
once more, and I will answer.

  Answer then, he said, again, whether you know what you know with
something, or with nothing.

  Yes, I said; I know with my soul.

  The man will answer more than the question; for I did not ask you,
he said, with what you know, but whether you know with something.

  Again I replied, Through ignorance I have answered too much, but I
hope that you will forgive me. And now I will answer simply that I
always know what I know with something.

  And is that something, he rejoined, always the same, or sometimes
one thing, and sometimes another thing?

  Always, I replied, when I know, I know with this.

  Will you not cease adding to your answers?

  My fear is that this word "always" may get us into trouble.

  You, perhaps, but certainly not us. And now answer: Do you always
know with this?

  Always; since I am required to withdraw the words "when I know."

  You always know with this, or, always knowing, do you know some
things with this, and some things with something else, or do you
know all things with this?

  All that I know, I replied, I know with this.

  There again, Socrates, he said, the addition is superfluous.

  Well, then, I said, I will take away the words that I know."

  Nay, take nothing away; I desire no favours of you; but let me
ask: Would you be able to know all things, if you did not know all
things?

  Quite impossible.

  And now, he said, you may add on whatever you like, for you
confess that you know all things.

  I suppose that is true, I said, if my qualification implied in the
words "that I know" is not allowed to stand; and so I do know all
things.

  And have you not admitted that you always know all things with
that which you know, whether you make the addition of "when you know
them" or not? for you have acknowledged that you have always and at
once known all things, that is to say, when you were a child, and at
your birth, and when you were growing up, and before you were born,
and before the heaven and earth existed, you knew all things if you
always know them; and I swear that you shall always continue to know
all things, if I am of the mind to make you.

  But I hope that you will be of that mind, reverend Euthydemus, I
said, if you are really speaking the truth, and yet I a little doubt
your power to make good your words unless you have the help of your
brother Dionysodorus; then you may do it. Tell me now, both of you,
for although in the main I cannot doubt that I really do know all
things, when I am told so by men of your prodigious wisdom-how can I
say that I know such things, Euthydemus, as that the good are
unjust; come, do I know that or not?

  Certainly, you know that.

  What do I know?

  That the good are not unjust.

  Quite true, I said; and that I have always known; but the question
is, where did I learn that the good are unjust?

  Nowhere, said Dionysodorus.

  Then, I said, I do not know this.

  You are ruining the argument, said Euthydemus to Dionysodorus; he
will be proved not to know, and then after all he will be knowing
and not knowing at the same time.

  Dionysodorus blushed.

  I turned to the other, and said, What do you think, Euthydemus? Does
not your omniscient brother appear to you to have made a mistake?

  What, replied Dionysodorus in a moment; am I the brother of
Euthydemus?

  Thereupon I said, Please not to interrupt, my good friend, or
prevent Euthydemus from proving to me that I know the good to be
unjust; such a lesson you might at least allow me to learn.

  You are running away, Socrates, said Dionysodorus, and refusing to
answer.

  No wonder, I said, for I am not a match for one of you, and a
fortiori I must run away from two. I am no Heracles; and even Heracles
could not fight against the Hydra, who was a she-Sophist, and had
the wit to shoot up many new heads when one of them was cut off;
especially when he saw a second monster of a sea-crab, who was also
a Sophist, and appeared to have newly arrived from a sea-voyage,
bearing down upon him from the left, opening his mouth and biting.
When the monster was growing troublesome he called Iolaus, his nephew,
to his help, who ably succoured him; but if my Iolaus, who is my
brother Patrocles [the statuary], were to come, he would only make a
bad business worse.

  And now that you have delivered yourself of this strain, said
Dionysodorus, will you inform me whether Iolaus was the nephew of
Heracles any more than he is yours?

  I suppose that I had best answer you, Dionysodorus, I said, for
you will insist on asking that I pretty well know-out of envy, in
order to prevent me from learning the wisdom of Euthydemus.

  Then answer me, he said.

  Well then, I said, I can only reply that Iolaus was not my nephew at
all, but the nephew of Heracles; and his father was not my brother
Patrocles, but Iphicles, who has a name rather like his, and was the
brother of Heracles.

  And is Patrocles, he said, your brother?

  Yes, I said, he is my half-brother, the son of my mother, but not of
my father.

  Then he is and is not your brother.

  Not by the same father, my good man, I said, for Chaeredemus was his
father, and mine was Sophroniscus.

  And was Sophroniscus a father, and Chaeredemus also?

  Yes, I said; the former was my father, and the latter his.

  Then, he said, Chaeredemus is not a father.

  He is not my father, I said.

  But can a father be other than a father? or are you the same as a
stone?

  I certainly do not think that I am a stone, I said, though I am
afraid that you may prove me to be one.

  Are you not other than a stone?

  I am.

  And being other than a stone, you are not a stone; and being other
than gold, you are not gold?

  Very true.

  And so Chaeredemus, he said, being other than a father, is not a
father?

  I suppose that he is not a father, I replied.

  For if, said Euthydemus, taking up the argument, Chaeredemus is a
father, then Sophroniscus, being other than a father, is not a father;
and you, Socrates, are without a father.

  Ctesippus, here taking up the argument, said: And is not your father
in the same case, for he is other than my father?

  Assuredly not, said Euthydemus.

  Then he is the same?

  He is the same.

  I cannot say that I like the connection; but is he only my father,
Euthydemus, or is he the father of all other men?

  Of all other men, he replied. Do you suppose the same person to be a
father and not a father?

  Certainly, I did so imagine, said Ctesippus.

  And do you suppose that gold is not gold, or that a man is not a
man?

  They are not "in pari materia," Euthydemus, said Ctesippus, and
you had better take care, for it is monstrous to suppose that your
father is the father of all.

  But he is, he replied.

  What, of men only, said Ctesippus, or of horses and of all other
animals?

  Of all, he said.

  And your mother, too, is the mother of all?

  Yes, our mother too.

  Yes; and your mother has a progeny of sea-urchins then?

  Yes; and yours, he said.

  And gudgeons and puppies and pigs are your brothers?

  And yours too.

  And your papa is a dog?

  And so is yours, he said.

  If you will answer my questions, said Dionysodorus, I will soon
extract the same admissions from you, Ctesippus. You say that you have
a dog.

  Yes, a villain of a one, said Ctesippus.

  And he has puppies?

  Yes, and they are very like himself.

  And the dog is the father of them?

  Yes, he said, I certainly saw him and the mother of the puppies come
together.

  And is he not yours?

  To be sure he is.

  Then he is a father, and he is yours; ergo, he is your father, and
the puppies are your brothers.

  Let me ask you one little question more, said Dionysodorus,
quickly interposing, in order that Ctesippus might not get in his
word: You beat this dog?

  Ctesippus said, laughing, Indeed I do; and I only wish that I
could beat you instead of him.

  Then you beat your father, he said.

  I should have far more reason to beat yours, said Ctesippus; what
could he have been thinking of when he begat such wise sons? much good
has this father of you and your brethren the puppies got out of this
wisdom of yours.

  But neither he nor you, Ctesippus, have any need of much good.

  And have you no need, Euthydemus? he said.

  Neither I nor any other man; for tell me now, Ctesippus, if you
think it good or evil for a man who is sick to drink medicine when
he wants it; or to go to war armed rather than unarmed.

  Good, I say. And yet I know that I am going to be caught in one of
your charming puzzles.

  That, he replied, you will discover, if you answer; since you
admit medicine to be good for a man to drink, when wanted, must it not
be good for him to drink as much as possible; when he takes his
medicine, a cartload of hellebore will not be too much for him?

  Ctesippus said: Quite so, Euthydemus, that is to say, if he who
drinks is as big as the statue of Delphi.

  And seeing that in war to have arms is a good thing, he ought to
have as many spears and shields as possible?

  Very true, said Ctesippus; and do you think, Euthydemus, that he
ought to have one shield only, and one spear?

  I do.

  And would you arm Geryon and Briarcus in that way? Considering
that you and your companion fight in armour, I thought that you
would have known better.... Here Euthydemus held his peace, but
Dionysodorus returned to the previous answer of Ctesippus and said:-

  Do you not think that the possession of gold is a good thing?

  Yes, said Ctesippus, and the more the better.

  And to have money everywhere and always is a good?

  Certain a great good, he said.

  And you admit gold to be a good?

  Certainly, he replied.

  And ought not a man then to have gold everywhere and always, and
as much as possible in himself, and may he not be deemed the
happiest of men who has three talents of gold in his belly, and a
talent in his pate, and a stater of gold in either eye?

  Yes, Euthydemus, said Ctesippus; and the Scythians reckon those
who have gold in their own skulls to be the happiest and bravest of
men (that is only another instance of your manner of speaking about
the dog and father), and what is still more extraordinary, they
drink out of their own skulls gilt and see the inside of them, and
hold their own head in their hands.

  And do the Scythians and others see that which has the quality of
vision, or that which has not? said Euthydemus.

  That which has the quality of vision clearly.

  And you also see that which has the quality Of vision? he said.

  Yes, I do.

  Then do you see our garments?

  Yes.

  Then our garments have the quality of vision.

  They can see to any extent, said Ctesippus.

  What can they see?

  Nothing; but you, my sweet man, may perhaps imagine that they do not
see; and certainly, Euthydemus, you do seem to me to have been
caught napping when you were not asleep, and that if it be possible to
speak and say nothing-you are doing so.

  And may there not be a silence of the speaker? said Dionysodorus.

  Impossible, said Ctesippus.

  Or a speaking of the silent?

  That is still more impossible, he said.

  But when you speak of stones, wood, iron bars, do you not speak of
the silent?

  Not when I pass a smithy; for then the iron bars make a tremendous
noise and outcry if they are touched: so that here your wisdom is
strangely mistaken, please, however, to tell me how you can be
silent when speaking (I thought that Ctesippus was put upon his mettle
because Cleinias was present).

  When you are silent, said Euthydemus, is there not a silence of
all things?

  Yes, he said.

  But if speaking things are included in all things, then the speaking
are silent.

  What, said Ctesippus; then all things are not silent?

  Certainly not, said Euthydemus.

  Then, my good friend, do they all speak?

  Yes; those which speak.

  Nay, said Ctesippus, but the question which I ask is whether all
things are silent or speak?

  Neither and both, said Dionysodorus, quickly interposing; I am
sure that you will be "nonplussed" at that answer.

  Here Ctesippus, as his manner was, burst into a roar of laughter; he
said, That brother of yours, Euthydemus, has got into a dilemma; all
is over with him. This delighted Cleinias, whose laughter made
Ctesippus ten times as uproarious; but I cannot help thinking that the
rogue must have picked up this answer from them; for there has been no
wisdom like theirs in our time. Why do you laugh, Cleinias, I said, at
such solemn and beautiful things?

  Why, Socrates, said Dionysodorus, did you ever see a beautiful
thing?

  Yes, Dionysodorus, I replied, I have seen many.

  Were they other than the beautiful, or the same as the beautiful?

  Now I was in a great quandary at having to answer this question, and
I thought that I was rightly served for having opened my mouth at all:
I said however, They are not the same as absolute beauty, but they
have beauty present with each of them.

  And are you an ox because an ox is present with you, or are you
Dionysodorus, because Dionysodorus is present with you?

  God forbid, I replied.

  But how, he said, by reason of one thing being present with another,
will one thing be another?

  Is that your difficulty? I said. For I was beginning to imitate
their skill, on which my heart was set.

  Of course, he replied, I and all the world are in a difficulty about
the non-existent.

  What do you mean, Dionysodorus? I said. Is not the honourable
honourable and the base base?

  That, he said, is as I please.

  And do you please?

  Yes, he said.

  And you will admit that the same is the same, and the other other;
for surely the other is not the same; I should imagine that even a
child will hardly deny the other to be other. But I think,
Dionysodorus, that you must have intentionally missed the last
question; for in general you and your brother seem to me to be good
workmen in your own department, and to do the dialectician's
business excellently well.

  What, said he, is the business of a good workman? tell me, in the
first place, whose business is hammering?

  The smith's.

  And whose the making of pots?

  The potter's.

  And who has to kill and skin and mince and boil and roast?

  The cook, I said.

  And if a man does his business he does rightly?

  Certainly.

  And the business of the cook is to cut up and skin; you have
admitted that?

  Yes, I have admitted that, but you must not be too hard upon me.

  Then if some one were to kill, mince, boil, roast the cook, he would
do his business, and if he were to hammer the smith, and make a pot of
the potter, he would do their business.

  Poseidon, I said, this is the crown of wisdom; can I ever hope to
have such wisdom of my own?

  And would you be able, Socrates, to recognize this wisdom when it
has become your own?

  Certainly, I said, if you will allow me.

  What, he said, do you think that you know what is your own?

  Yes, I do, subject to your correction; for you are the bottom, and
Euthydemus is the top, of all my wisdom.

  Is not that which you would deem your own, he said, that which you
have in your own power, and which you are able to use as you would
desire, for example, an ox or a sheep would you not think that which
you could sell and give and sacrifice to any god whom you pleased,
to be your own, and that which you could not give or sell or sacrifice
you would think not to be in your own power?

  Yes, I said (for I was certain that something good would come out of
the questions, which I was impatient to hear); yes, such things, and
such things only are mine.

  Yes, he said, and you would mean by animals living beings?

  Yes, I said.

  You agree then, that-those animals only are yours with which you
have the power to do all these things which I was just naming?

  I agree.

  Then, after a pause, in which he seemed to be lost in the
contemplation of something great, he said: Tell me, Socrates, have you
an ancestral Zeus? Here, anticipating the final move, like a person
caught in a net, who gives a desperate twist that he may get away, I
said: No, Dionysodorus, I have not.

  What a miserable man you must be then, he said; you are not an
Athenian at all if you have no ancestral gods or temples, or any other
mark of gentility.

  Nay, Dionysodorus, I said, do not be rough; good words, if you
please; in the way of religion I have altars and temples, domestic and
ancestral, and all that other Athenians have.

  And have not other Athenians, he said, an ancestral Zeus?

  That name, I said, is not to be found among the Ionians, whether
colonists or citizens of Athens; an ancestral Apollo there is, who
is the father of Ion, and a family Zeus, and a Zeus guardian of the
phratry, and an Athene guardian of the phratry. But the name of
ancestral Zeus is unknown to us.

  No matter, said Dionysodorus, for you admit that you have Apollo,
Zeus, and Athene.

  Certainly, I said.

  And they are your gods, he said.

  Yes, I said, my lords and ancestors.

  At any rate they are yours, he said, did you not admit that?

  I did, I said; what is going to happen to me?

  And are not these gods animals? for you admit that all things
which have life are animals; and have not these gods life?

  They have life, I said.

  Then are they not animals?

  They are animals, I said.

  And you admitted that of animals those are yours which you could
give away or sell or offer in sacrifice, as you pleased?

  I did admit that, Euthydemus, and I have no way of escape.

  Well then, said he, if you admit that Zeus and the other gods are
yours, can you sell them or give them away or do what you will with
them, as you would with other animals?

  At this I was quite struck dumb, Crito, and lay prostrate. Ctesippus
came to the rescue.

  Bravo, Heracles, brave words, said he.

  Bravo Heracles, or is Heracles a Bravo? said Dionysodorus.

  Poseidon, said Ctesippus, what awful distinctions. I will have no
more of them; the pair are invincible.

  Then, my dear Crito, there was universal applause of the speakers
and their words, and what with laughing and clapping of hands and
rejoicings the two men were quite overpowered; for hitherto their
partisans only had cheered at each successive hit, but now the whole
company shouted with delight until the columns of the Lyceum
returned the sound, seeming to sympathize in their joy. To such a
pitch was I affected myself, that I made a speech, in which I
acknowledged that I had never seen the like of their wisdom; I was
their devoted servant, and fell to praising and admiring of them. What
marvellous dexterity of wit, I said, enabled you to acquire this great
perfection in such a short time? There is much, indeed, to admire in
your words, Euthydemus and Dionysodorus, but there is nothing that I
admire more than your magnanimous disregard of any opinion-whether
of the many, or of the grave and reverend seigniors-you regard only
those who are like yourselves. And I do verily believe that there
are few who are like you, and who would approve of such arguments; the
majority of mankind are so ignorant of their value, that they would be
more ashamed of employing them in the refutation of others than of
being refuted by them. I must further express my approval of your kind
and public-spirited denial of all differences, whether of good and
evil, white or black, or any other; the result of which is that, as
you say, every mouth is sewn up, not excepting your own, which
graciously follows the example of others; and thus all ground of
offence is taken away. But what appears to me to be more than all
is, that this art and invention of yours has been so admirably
contrived by you, that in a very short time it can be imparted to
any one. I observed that Ctesippus learned to imitate you in no
time. Now this quickness of attainment is an excellent thing; but at
the same time I would advise you not to have any more public
entertainments; there is a danger that men may undervalue an art which
they have so easy an opportunity of acquiring; the exhibition would be
best of all, if the discussion were confined to your two selves; but
if there must be an audience, let him only be present who is willing
to pay a handsome fee;-you should be careful of this;-and if you are
wise, you will also bid your disciples discourse with no man but you
and themselves. For only what is rare is valuable; and "water," which,
as Pindar says, is the "best of all things," is also the cheapest. And
now I have only to request that you will receive Cleinias and me among
your pupils.

  Such was the discussion, Crito; and after a few more words had
passed between us we went away. I hope that you will come to them with
me, since they say that they are able to teach any one who will give
them money; no age or want of capacity is an impediment. And I must
repeat one thing which they said, for your especial benefit,-that
the learning of their art did not at all interfere with the business
of money-making.

  Cri. Truly, Socrates, though I am curious and ready to learn, yet
I fear that I am not like minded with Euthydemus, but one of the other
sort, who, as you were saying, would rather be refuted by such
arguments than use them in refutation of others. And though I may
appear ridiculous in venturing to advise you, I think that you may
as well hear what was said to me by a man of very considerable
pretensions-he was a professor of legal oratory-who came away from you
while I was walking up and down. "Crito," said he to me, "are you
giving no attention to these wise men?" "No, indeed," I said to him;
"I could not get within hearing of them-there was such a crowd."
"You would have heard something worth hearing if you had." "What was
that?" I said. "You would have heard the greatest masters of the art
of rhetoric discoursing." "And what did you think of them?" I said.
"What did I think of them?" he said:-"theirs was the sort of discourse
which anybody might hear from men who were playing the fool, and
making much ado about nothing. "That was the expression which he used.
"Surely," I said, "philosophy is a charming thing." "Charming!" he
said; "what simplicity! philosophy is nought; and I think that if
you had been present you would have been ashamed of your friend-his
conduct was so very strange in placing himself at the mercy of men who
care not what they say, and fasten upon every word. And these, as I
was telling you, are supposed to be the most eminent professors of
their time. But the truth is, Crito, that the study itself and the men
themselves are utterly mean and ridiculous." Now censure of the
pursuit, Socrates, whether coming from him or from others, appears
to me to be undeserved; but as to the impropriety of holding a
public discussion with such men, there, I confess that, in my opinion,
he was in the right.

  Soc. O Crito, they are marvellous men; but what was I going to
say? First of all let me know;-What manner of man was he who came up
to you and censured philosophy; was he an orator who himself practises
in the courts, or an instructor of orators, who makes the speeches
with which they do battle?

  Cri. He was certainly not an orator, and I doubt whether he had ever
been into court; but they say that he knows the business, and is a
clever man, and composes wonderful speeches.

  Soc. Now I understand, Crito; he is one of an amphibious class, whom
I was on the point of mentioning-one of those whom Prodicus
describes as on the border-ground between philosophers and
statesmen-they think that they are the wisest of all men, and that
they are generally esteemed the wisest; nothing but the rivalry of the
philosophers stands in their way; and they are of the opinion that
if they can prove the philosophers to be good for nothing, no one will
dispute their title to the palm of wisdom, for that they are
themselves really the wisest, although they are apt to be mauled by
Euthydemus and his friends, when they get hold of them in
conversation. This opinion which they entertain of their own wisdom is
very natural; for they have a certain amount of philosophy, and a
certain amount of political wisdom; there is reason in what they
say, for they argue that they have just enough of both, and so they
keep out-of the way all risks and conflicts and reap the fruits of
their wisdom.

  Cri. What do you say of them, Socrates? There is certainly something
specious in that notion of theirs.

  Soc. Yes, Crito, there is more speciousness than truth; they
cannot be made to understand the nature of intermediates. For all
persons or things, which are intermediate between two other things,
and participate in both of them-if one of these two things is good and
the other evil, are better than the one and worse than the other;
but if they are in a mean between two good things which do not tend to
the same end, they fall short of either of their component elements in
the attainment of their ends. Only in the case when the two
component elements which do not tend to the same end are evil is the
participant better than either. Now, if philosophy and political
action are both good, but tend to different ends, and they participate
in both, and are in a mean between them, then they are talking
nonsense, for they are worse than either; or, if the one be good and
the other evil, they are better than the one and worse than the other;
only on the supposition that they are both evil could there be any
truth in what they say. I do not think that they will admit that their
two pursuits are either wholly or partly evil; but the truth is,
that these philosopher-politicians who aim at both fall short of
both in the attainment of their respective ends, and are really third,
although they would like to stand first. There is no need, however, to
be angry at this ambition of theirs-which may be forgiven; for every
man ought to be loved who says and manfully pursues and works out
anything which is at all like wisdom: at the same time we shall do
well to see them as they really are.

  Cri. I have often told you, Socrates, that I am in a constant
difficulty about my two sons. What am I to do with them? There is no
hurry about the younger one, who is only a child; but the other,
Critobulus, is getting on, and needs some one who will improve him.
I cannot help thinking, when I hear you talk, that there is a sort
of madness in many of our anxieties about our children:-in the first
place, about marrying a wife of good family to be the mother of
them, and then about heaping up money for them-and yet taking no
care about their education. But then again, when I contemplate any
of those who pretend to educate others, I am amazed. To me, if I am to
confess the truth, they all seem to be such outrageous beings: so that
I do not know how I can advise the youth to study philosophy.

  Soc. Dear Crito, do you not know that in every profession the
inferior sort are numerous and good for nothing, and the good are
few and beyond all price: for example, are not gymnastic and
rhetoric and money-making and the art of the general, noble arts?

  Cri. Certainly they are, in my judgment.

  Soc. Well, and do you not see that in each of these arts the many
are ridiculous performers?

  Cri. Yes, indeed, that is very true.

  Soc. And will you on this account shun all these pursuits yourself
and refuse to allow them to your son?

  Cri. That would not be reasonable, Socrates.

  Soc. Do you then be reasonable, Crito, and do not mind whether the
teachers of philosophy are good or bad, but think only of philosophy
herself. Try and examine her well and truly, and if she be evil seek
to turn away all men from her, and not your sons only; but if she be
what I believe that she is, then follow her and serve her, you and
your house, as the saying is, and be of good cheer.

                           -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES; EUTHYPHRO

  Scene: The Porch of the King Archon

  Euthyphro. Why have you left the Lyceum, Socrates? and what are
you doing in the Porch of the King Archon? Surely you cannot be
concerned in a suit before the King, like myself?

  Socrates. Not in a suit, Euthyphro; impeachment is the word which
the Athenians use.

  Euth. What! I suppose that some one has been prosecuting you, for
I cannot believe that you are the prosecutor of another.

  Soc. Certainly not.

  Euth. Then some one else has been prosecuting you?

  Soc. Yes.

  Euth. And who is he?

  Soc. A young man who is little known, Euthyphro; and I hardly know
him: his name is Meletus, and he is of the deme of Pitthis. Perhaps
you may remember his appearance; he has a beak, and long straight
hair, and a beard which is ill grown.

  Euth. No, I do not remember him, Socrates. But what is the charge
which he brings against you?

  Soc. What is the charge? Well, a very serious charge, which shows
a good deal of character in the young man, and for which he is
certainly not to be despised. He says he knows how the youth are
corrupted and who are their corruptors. I fancy that he must be a wise
man, and seeing that I am the reverse of a wise man, he has found me
out, and is going to accuse me of corrupting his young friends. And of
this our mother the state is to be the judge. Of all our political men
he is the only one who seems to me to begin in the right way, with the
cultivation of virtue in youth; like a good husbandman, he makes the
young shoots his first care, and clears away us who are the destroyers
of them. This is only the first step; he will afterwards attend to the
elder branches; and if he goes on as he has begun, he will be a very
great public benefactor.

  Euth. I hope that he may; but I rather fear, Socrates, that the
opposite will turn out to be the truth. My opinion is that in
attacking you he is simply aiming a blow at the foundation of the
state. But in what way does he say that you corrupt the young?

  Soc. He brings a wonderful accusation against me, which at first
hearing excites surprise: he says that I am a poet or maker of gods,
and that I invent new gods and deny the existence of old ones; this is
the ground of his indictment.

  Euth. I understand, Socrates; he means to attack you about the
familiar sign which occasionally, as you say, comes to you. He
thinks that you are a neologian, and he is going to have you up before
the court for this. He knows that such a charge is readily received by
the world, as I myself know too well; for when I speak in the assembly
about divine things, and foretell the future to them, they laugh at me
and think me a madman. Yet every word that I say is true. But they are
jealous of us all; and we must be brave and go at them.

  Soc. Their laughter, friend Euthyphro, is not a matter of much
consequence. For a man may be thought wise; but the Athenians, I
suspect, do not much trouble themselves about him until he begins to
impart his wisdom to others, and then for some reason or other,
perhaps, as you say, from jealousy, they are angry.

  Euth. I am never likely to try their temper in this way.

  Soc. I dare say not, for you are reserved in your behaviour, and
seldom impart your wisdom. But I have a benevolent habit of pouring
out myself to everybody, and would even pay for a listener, and I am
afraid that the Athenians may think me too talkative. Now if, as I was
saying, they would only laugh at me, as you say that they laugh at
you, the time might pass gaily enough in the court; but perhaps they
may be in earnest, and then what the end will be you soothsayers
only can predict.

  Euth. I dare say that the affair will end in nothing, Socrates,
and that you will win your cause; and I think that I shall win my own.

  Soc. And what is your suit, Euthyphro? are you the pursuer or the
defendant?

  Euth. I am the pursuer.

  Soc. Of whom?

  Euth. You will think me mad when I tell you.

  Soc. Why, has the fugitive wings?

  Euth. Nay, he is not very volatile at his time of life.

  Soc. Who is he?

  Euth. My father.

  Soc. Your father! my good man?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. And of what is he accused?

  Euth. Of murder, Socrates.

  Soc. By the powers, Euthyphro! how little does the common herd
know of the nature of right and truth. A man must be an
extraordinary man, and have made great strides in wisdom, before he
could have seen his way to bring such an action.

  Euth. Indeed, Socrates, he must.

  Soc. I suppose that the man whom your father murdered was one of
your relatives-clearly he was; for if he had been a stranger you would
never have thought of prosecuting him.

  Euth. I am amused, Socrates, at your making a distinction between
one who is a relation and one who is not a relation; for surely the
pollution is the same in either case, if you knowingly associate
with the murderer when you ought to clear yourself and him by
proceeding against him. The real question is whether the murdered
man has been justly slain. If justly, then your duty is to let the
matter alone; but if unjustly, then even if the murderer lives under
the same roof with you and eats at the same table, proceed against
him. Now the man who is dead was a poor dependent of mine who worked
for us as a field labourer on our farm in Naxos, and one day in a
fit of drunken passion he got into a quarrel with one of our
domestic servants and slew him. My father bound him hand and foot
and threw him into a ditch, and then sent to Athens to ask of a
diviner what he should do with him. Meanwhile he never attended to him
and took no care about him, for he regarded him as a murderer; and
thought that no great harm would be done even if he did die. Now
this was just what happened. For such was the effect of cold and
hunger and chains upon him, that before the messenger returned from
the diviner, he was dead. And my father and family are angry with me
for taking the part of the murderer and prosecuting my father. They
say that he did not kill him, and that if he did, dead man was but a
murderer, and I ought not to take any notice, for that a son is
impious who prosecutes a father. Which shows, Socrates, how little
they know what the gods think about piety and impiety.

  Soc. Good heavens, Euthyphro! and is your knowledge of religion
and of things pious and impious so very exact, that, supposing the
circumstances to be as you state them, you are not afraid lest you too
may be doing an impious thing in bringing an action against your
father?

  Euth. The best of Euthyphro, and that which distinguishes him,
Socrates, from other men, is his exact knowledge of all such
matters. What should I be good for without it?

  Soc. Rare friend! I think that I cannot do better than be your
disciple. Then before the trial with Meletus comes on I shall
challenge him, and say that I have always had a great interest in
religious questions, and now, as he charges me with rash
imaginations and innovations in religion, I have become your disciple.
You, Meletus, as I shall say to him, acknowledge Euthyphro to be a
great theologian, and sound in his opinions; and if you approve of him
you ought to approve of me, and not have me into court; but if you
disapprove, you should begin by indicting him who is my teacher, and
who will be the ruin, not of the young, but of the old; that is to
say, of myself whom he instructs, and of his old father whom he
admonishes and chastises. And if Meletus refuses to listen to me,
but will go on, and will not shift the indictment from me to you, I
cannot do better than repeat this challenge in the court.

  Euth. Yes, indeed, Socrates; and if he attempts to indict me I am
mistaken if I do not find a flaw in him; the court shall have a
great deal more to say to him than to me.

  Soc. And I, my dear friend, knowing this, am desirous of becoming
your disciple. For I observe that no one appears to notice you- not
even this Meletus; but his sharp eyes have found me out at once, and
he has indicted me for impiety. And therefore, I adjure you to tell me
the nature of piety and impiety, which you said that you knew so well,
and of murder, and of other offences against the gods. What are
they? Is not piety in every action always the same? and impiety,
again- is it not always the opposite of piety, and also the same with
itself, having, as impiety, one notion which includes whatever is
impious?

  Euth. To be sure, Socrates.

  Soc. And what is piety, and what is impiety?

  Euth. Piety is doing as I am doing; that is to say, prosecuting
any one who is guilty of murder, sacrilege, or of any similar
crime-whether he be your father or mother, or whoever he may be-that
makes no difference; and not to prosecute them is impiety. And
please to consider, Socrates, what a notable proof I will give you
of the truth of my words, a proof which I have already given to
others:-of the principle, I mean, that the impious, whoever he may be,
ought not to go unpunished. For do not men regard Zeus as the best and
most righteous of the gods?-and yet they admit that he bound his
father (Cronos) because he wickedly devoured his sons, and that he too
had punished his own father (Uranus) for a similar reason, in a
nameless manner. And yet when I proceed against my father, they are
angry with me. So inconsistent are they in their way of talking when
the gods are concerned, and when I am concerned.

  Soc. May not this be the reason, Euthyphro, why I am charged with
impiety-that I cannot away with these stories about the gods? and
therefore I suppose that people think me wrong. But, as you who are
well informed about them approve of them, I cannot do better than
assent to your superior wisdom. What else can I say, confessing as I
do, that I know nothing about them? Tell me, for the love of Zeus,
whether you really believe that they are true.

  Euth. Yes, Socrates; and things more wonderful still, of which the
world is in ignorance.

  Soc. And do you really believe that the gods, fought with one
another, and had dire quarrels, battles, and the like, as the poets
say, and as you may see represented in the works of great artists? The
temples are full of them; and notably the robe of Athene, which is
carried up to the Acropolis at the great Panathenaea, is embroidered
with them. Are all these tales of the gods true, Euthyphro?

  Euth. Yes, Socrates; and, as I was saying, I can tell you, if you
would like to hear them, many other things about the gods which
would quite amaze you.

  Soc. I dare say; and you shall tell me them at some other time
when I have leisure. But just at present I would rather hear from
you a more precise answer, which you have not as yet given, my friend,
to the question, What is "piety"? When asked, you only replied,
Doing as you do, charging your father with murder.

  Euth. And what I said was true, Socrates.

  Soc. No doubt, Euthyphro; but you would admit that there are many
other pious acts?

  Euth. There are.

  Soc. Remember that I did not ask you to give me two or three
examples of piety, but to explain the general idea which makes all
pious things to be pious. Do you not recollect that there was one idea
which made the impious impious, and the pious pious?

  Euth. I remember.

  Soc. Tell me what is the nature of this idea, and then I shall
have a standard to which I may look, and by which I may measure
actions, whether yours or those of any one else, and then I shall be
able to say that such and such an action is pious, such another
impious.

  Euth. I will tell you, if you like.

  Soc. I should very much like.

  Euth. Piety, then, is that which is dear to the gods, and impiety is
that which is not dear to them.

  Soc. Very good, Euthyphro; you have now given me the sort of
answer which I wanted. But whether what you say is true or not I
cannot as yet tell, although I make no doubt that you will prove the
truth of your words.

  Euth. Of course.

  Soc. Come, then, and let us examine what we are saying. That
thing or person which is dear to the gods is pious, and that thing
or person which is hateful to the gods is impious, these two being the
extreme opposites of one another. Was not that said?

  Euth. It was.

  Soc. And well said?

  Euth. Yes, Socrates, I thought so; it was certainly said.

  Soc. And further, Euthyphro, the gods were admitted to have enmities
and hatreds and differences?

  Euth. Yes, that was also said.

  Soc. And what sort of difference creates enmity and anger? Suppose
for example that you and I, my good friend, differ about a number;
do differences of this sort make us enemies and set us at variance
with one another? Do we not go at once to arithmetic, and put an end
to them by a sum?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. Or suppose that we differ about magnitudes, do we not quickly
end the differences by measuring?

  Euth. Very true.

  Soc. And we end a controversy about heavy and light by resorting
to a weighing machine?

  Euth. To be sure.

  Soc. But what differences are there which cannot be thus decided,
and which therefore make us angry and set us at enmity with one
another? I dare say the answer does not occur to you at the moment,
and therefore I will suggest that these enmities arise when the
matters of difference are the just and unjust, good and evil,
honourable and dishonourable. Are not these the points about which men
differ, and about which when we are unable satisfactorily to decide
our differences, you and I and all of us quarrel, when we do quarrel?

  Euth. Yes, Socrates, the nature of the differences about which we
quarrel is such as you describe.

  Soc. And the quarrels of the gods, noble Euthyphro, when they occur,
are of a like nature?

  Euth. Certainly they are.

  Soc. They have differences of opinion, as you say, about good and
evil, just and unjust, honourable and dishonourable: there would
have been no quarrels among them, if there had been no such
differences-would there now?

  Euth. You are quite right.

  Soc. Does not every man love that which he deems noble and just
and good, and hate the opposite of them?

  Euth. Very true.

  Soc. But, as you say, people regard the same things, some as just
and others as unjust,-about these they dispute; and so there arise
wars and fightings among them.

  Euth. Very true.

  Soc. Then the same things are hated by the gods and loved by the
gods, and are both hateful and dear to them?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. And upon this view the same things, Euthyphro, will be pious
and also impious?

  Euth. So I should suppose.

  Soc. Then, my friend, I remark with surprise that you have not
answered the question which I asked. For I certainly did not ask you
to tell me what action is both pious and impious: but now it would
seem that what is loved by the gods is also hated by them. And
therefore, Euthyphro, in thus chastising your father you may very
likely be doing what is agreeable to Zeus but disagreeable to Cronos
or Uranus, and what is acceptable to Hephaestus but unacceptable to
Here, and there may be other gods who have similar differences of
opinion.

  Euth. But I believe, Socrates, that all the gods would be agreed
as to the propriety of punishing a murderer: there would be no
difference of opinion about that.

  Soc. Well, but speaking of men, Euthyphro, did you ever hear any one
arguing that a murderer or any sort of evil-doer ought to be let off?

  Euth. I should rather say that these are the questions which they
are always arguing, especially in courts of law: they commit all sorts
of crimes, and there is nothing which they will not do or say in their
own defence.

  Soc. But do they admit their guilt, Euthyphro, and yet say that they
ought not to be punished?

  Euth. No; they do not.

  Soc. Then there are some things which they do not venture to say and
do: for they do not venture to argue that the guilty are to be
unpunished, but they deny their guilt, do they not?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. Then they do not argue that the evil-doer should not be
punished, but they argue about the fact of who the evil-doer is, and
what he did and when?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. And the gods are in the same case, if as you assert they
quarrel about just and unjust, and some of them say while others
deny that injustice is done among them. For surely neither God nor man
will ever venture to say that the doer of injustice is not to be
punished?

  Euth. That is true, Socrates, in the main.

  Soc. But they join issue about the particulars-gods and men alike;
and, if they dispute at all, they dispute about some act which is
called in question, and which by some is affirmed to be just, by
others to be unjust. Is not that true?

  Euth. Quite true.

  Soc. Well then, my dear friend Euthyphro, do tell me, for my
better instruction and information, what proof have you that in the
opinion of all the gods a servant who is guilty of murder, and is
put in chains by the master of the dead man, and dies because he is
put in chains before he who bound him can learn from the
interpreters of the gods what he ought to do with him, dies
unjustly; and that on behalf of such an one a son ought to proceed
against his father and accuse him of murder. How would you show that
all the gods absolutely agree in approving of his act? Prove to me
that they do, and I will applaud your wisdom as long as I live.

  Euth. It will be a difficult task; but I could make the matter
very dear indeed to you.

  Soc. I understand; you mean to say that I am not so quick of
apprehension as the judges: for to them you will be sure to prove that
the act is unjust, and hateful to the gods.

  Euth. Yes indeed, Socrates; at least if they will listen to me.

  Soc. But they will be sure to listen if they find that you are a
good speaker. There was a notion that came into my mind while you were
speaking; I said to myself: "Well, and what if Euthyphro does prove to
me that all the gods regarded the death of the serf as unjust, how
do I know anything more of the nature of piety and impiety? for
granting that this action may be hateful to the gods, still piety
and impiety are not adequately defined by these distinctions, for that
which is hateful to the gods has been shown to be also pleasing and
dear to them." And therefore, Euthyphro, I do not ask you to prove
this; I will suppose, if you like, that all the gods condemn and
abominate such an action. But I will amend the definition so far as to
say that what all the gods hate is impious, and what they love pious
or holy; and what some of them love and others hate is both or
neither. Shall this be our definition of piety and impiety?

  Euth. Why not, Socrates?

  Soc. Why not! certainly, as far as I am concerned, Euthyphro,
there is no reason why not. But whether this admission will greatly
assist you in the task of instructing me as you promised, is a
matter for you to consider.

  Euth. Yes, I should say that what all the gods love is pious and
holy, and the opposite which they all hate, impious.

  Soc. Ought we to enquire into the truth of this, Euthyphro, or
simply to accept the mere statement on our own authority and that of
others? What do you say?

  Euth. We should enquire; and I believe that the statement will stand
the test of enquiry.

  Soc. We shall know better, my good friend, in a little while. The
point which I should first wish to understand is whether the pious
or holy is beloved by the gods because it is holy, or holy because
it is beloved of the gods.

  Euth. I do not understand your meaning, Socrates.

  Soc. I will endeavour to explain: we, speak of carrying and we speak
of being carried, of leading and being led, seeing and being seen. You
know that in all such cases there is a difference, and you know also
in what the difference lies?

  Euth. I think that I understand.

  Soc. And is not that which is beloved distinct from that which
loves?

  Euth. Certainly.

  Soc. Well; and now tell me, is that which is carried in this state
of carrying because it is carried, or for some other reason?

  Euth. No; that is the reason.

  Soc. And the same is true of what is led and of what is seen?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. And a thing is not seen because it is visible, but
conversely, visible because it is seen; nor is a thing led because
it is in the state of being led, or carried because it is in the state
of being carried, but the converse of this. And now I think,
Euthyphro, that my meaning will be intelligible; and my meaning is,
that any state of action or passion implies previous action or
passion. It does not become because it is becoming, but it is in a
state of becoming because it becomes; neither does it suffer because
it is in a state of suffering, but it is in a state of suffering
because it suffers. Do you not agree?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. Is not that which is loved in some state either of becoming
or suffering?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. And the same holds as in the previous instances; the state of
being loved follows the act of being loved, and not the act the state.

  Euth. Certainly.

  Soc. And what do you say of piety, Euthyphro: is not piety,
according to your definition, loved by all the gods?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. Because it is pious or holy, or for some other reason?

  Euth. No, that is the reason.

  Soc. It is loved because it is holy, not holy because it is loved?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. And that which is dear to the gods is loved by them, and is
in a state to be loved of them because it is loved of them?

  Euth. Certainly.

  Soc. Then that which is dear to the gods, Euthyphro, is not holy,
nor is that which is holy loved of God, as you affirm; but they are
two different things.

  Euth. How do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I mean to say that the holy has been acknowledge by us to be
loved of God because it is holy, not to be holy because it is loved.

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. But that which is dear to the gods is dear to them because it
is loved by them, not loved by them because it is dear to them.

  Euth. True.

  Soc. But, friend Euthyphro, if that which is holy is the same with
that which is dear to God, and is loved because it is holy, then
that which is dear to God would have been loved as being dear to
God; but if that which dear to God is dear to him because loved by
him, then that which is holy would have been holy because loved by
him. But now you see that the reverse is the case, and that they are
quite different from one another. For one (theophiles) is of a kind to
be loved cause it is loved, and the other (osion) is loved because
it is of a kind to be loved. Thus you appear to me, Euthyphro, when
I ask you what is the essence of holiness, to offer an attribute only,
and not the essence-the attribute of being loved by all the gods.
But you still refuse to explain to me the nature of holiness. And
therefore, if you please, I will ask you not to hide your treasure,
but to tell me once more what holiness or piety really is, whether
dear to the gods or not (for that is a matter about which we will
not quarrel) and what is impiety?

  Euth. I really do not know, Socrates, how to express what I mean.
For somehow or other our arguments, on whatever ground we rest them,
seem to turn round and walk away from us.

  Soc. Your words, Euthyphro, are like the handiwork of my ancestor
Daedalus; and if I were the sayer or propounder of them, you might say
that my arguments walk away and will not remain fixed where they are
placed because I am a descendant of his. But now, since these
notions are your own, you must find some other gibe, for they
certainly, as you yourself allow, show an inclination to be on the
move.

  Euth. Nay, Socrates, I shall still say that you are the Daedalus who
sets arguments in motion; not I, certainly, but you make them move
or go round, for they would never have stirred, as far as I am
concerned.

  Soc. Then I must be a greater than Daedalus: for whereas he only
made his own inventions to move, I move those of other people as well.
And the beauty of it is, that I would rather not. For I would give the
wisdom of Daedalus, and the wealth of Tantalus, to be able to detain
them and keep them fixed. But enough of this. As I perceive that you
are lazy, I will myself endeavor to show you how you might instruct me
in the nature of piety; and I hope that you will not grudge your
labour. Tell me, then-Is not that which is pious necessarily just?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. And is, then, all which is just pious? or, is that which is
pious all just, but that which is just, only in part and not all,
pious?

  Euth. I do not understand you, Socrates.

  Soc. And yet I know that you are as much wiser than I am, as you are
younger. But, as I was saying, revered friend, the abundance of your
wisdom makes you lazy. Please to exert yourself, for there is no
real difficulty in understanding me. What I mean I may explain by an
illustration of what I do not mean. The poet (Stasinus) sings-

    Of Zeus, the author and creator of all these things,

    You will not tell: for where there is fear there is also

        reverence.

Now I disagree with this poet. Shall I tell you in what respect?

  Euth. By all means.

  Soc. I should not say that where there is fear there is also
reverence; for I am sure that many persons fear poverty and disease,
and the like evils, but I do not perceive that they reverence the
objects of their fear.

  Euth. Very true.

  Soc. But where reverence is, there is fear; for he who has a feeling
of reverence and shame about the commission of any action, fears and
is afraid of an ill reputation.

  Euth. No doubt.

  Soc. Then we are wrong in saying that where there is fear there is
also reverence; and we should say, where there is reverence there is
also fear. But there is not always reverence where there is fear;
for fear is a more extended notion, and reverence is a part of fear,
just as the odd is a part of number, and number is a more extended
notion than the odd. I suppose that you follow me now?

  Euth. Quite well.

  Soc. That was the sort of question which I meant to raise when I
asked whether the just is always the pious, or the pious always the
just; and whether there may not be justice where there is not piety;
for justice is the more extended notion of which piety is only a part.
Do you dissent?

  Euth. No, I think that you are quite right.

  Soc. Then, if piety is a part of justice, I suppose that we should
enquire what part? If you had pursued the enquiry in the previous
cases; for instance, if you had asked me what is an even number, and
what part of number the even is, I should have had no difficulty in
replying, a number which represents a figure having two equal sides.
Do you not agree?

  Euth. Yes, I quite agree.

  Soc. In like manner, I want you to tell me what part of justice is
piety or holiness, that I may be able to tell Meletus not to do me
injustice, or indict me for impiety, as I am now adequately instructed
by you in the nature of piety or holiness, and their opposites.

  Euth. Piety or holiness, Socrates, appears to me to be that part
of justice which attends to the gods, as there is the other part of
justice which attends to men.

  Soc. That is good, Euthyphro; yet still there is a little point
about which I should like to have further information, What is the
meaning of "attention"? For attention can hardly be used in the same
sense when applied to the gods as when applied to other things. For
instance, horses are said to require attention, and not every person
is able to attend to them, but only a person skilled in
horsemanship. Is it not so?

  Euth. Certainly.

  Soc. I should suppose that the art of horsemanship is the art of
attending to horses?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. Nor is every one qualified to attend to dogs, but only the
huntsman?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. And I should also conceive that the art of the huntsman is
the art of attending to dogs?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. As the art of the ox herd is the art of attending to oxen?

  Euth. Very true.

  Soc. In like manner holiness or piety is the art of attending to the
gods?-that would be your meaning, Euthyphro?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. And is not attention always designed for the good or benefit of
that to which the attention is given? As in the case of horses, you
may observe that when attended to by the horseman's art they are
benefited and improved, are they not?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. As the dogs are benefited by the huntsman's art, and the oxen
by the art of the ox herd, and all other things are tended or attended
for their good and not for their hurt?

  Euth. Certainly, not for their hurt.

  Soc. But for their good?

  Euth. Of course.

  Soc. And does piety or holiness, which has been defined to be the
art of attending to the gods, benefit or improve them? Would you say
that when you do a holy act you make any of the gods better?

  Euth. No, no; that was certainly not what I meant.

  Soc. And I, Euthyphro, never supposed that you did. I asked you
the question about the nature of the attention, because I thought that
you did not.

  Euth. You do me justice, Socrates; that is not the sort of attention
which I mean.

  Soc. Good: but I must still ask what is this attention to the gods
which is called piety?

  Euth. It is such, Socrates, as servants show to their masters.

  Soc. I understand-a sort of ministration to the gods.

  Euth. Exactly.

  Soc. Medicine is also a sort of ministration or service, having in
view the attainment of some object-would you not say of health?

  Euth. I should.

  Soc. Again, there is an art which ministers to the ship-builder with
a view to the attainment of some result?

  Euth. Yes, Socrates, with a view to the building of a ship.

  Soc. As there is an art which ministers to the housebuilder with a
view to the building of a house?

  Euth. Yes.

  Soc. And now tell me, my good friend, about the art which
ministers to the gods: what work does that help to accomplish? For you
must surely know if, as you say, you are of all men living the one who
is best instructed in religion.

  Euth. And I speak the truth, Socrates.

  Soc. Tell me then, oh tell me-what is that fair work which the
gods do by the help of our ministrations?

  Euth. Many and fair, Socrates, are the works which they do.

 Soc. Why, my friend, and so are those of a general. But the chief
of them is easily told. Would you not say that victory in war is the
chief of them?

  Euth. Certainly.

  Soc. Many and fair, too, are the works of the husbandman, if I am
not mistaken; but his chief work is the production of food from the
earth?

  Euth. Exactly.

  Soc. And of the many and fair things done by the gods, which is
the chief or principal one?

  Euth. I have told you already, Socrates, that to learn all these
things accurately will be very tiresome. Let me simply say that
piety or holiness is learning, how to please the gods in word and
deed, by prayers and sacrifices. Such piety, is the salvation of
families and states, just as the impious, which is unpleasing to the
gods, is their ruin and destruction.

  Soc. I think that you could have answered in much fewer words the
chief question which I asked, Euthyphro, if you had chosen. But I
see plainly that you are not disposed to instruct me-dearly not:
else why, when we reached the point, did you turn, aside? Had you only
answered me I should have truly learned of you by this time the-nature
of piety. Now, as the asker of a question is necessarily dependent
on the answerer, whither he leads-I must follow; and can only ask
again, what is the pious, and what is piety? Do you mean that they are
a, sort of science of praying and sacrificing?

  Euth. Yes, I do.

  Soc. And sacrificing is giving to the gods, and prayer is asking
of the gods?

  Euth. Yes, Socrates.

  Soc. Upon this view, then piety is a science of asking and giving?

   Euth. You understand me capitally, Socrates.

  Soc. Yes, my friend; the. reason is that I am a votary of your
science, and give my mind to it, and therefore nothing which you say
will be thrown away upon me. Please then to tell me, what is the
nature of this service to the gods? Do you mean that we prefer
requests and give gifts to them?

  Euth. Yes, I do.

  Soc. Is not the right way of asking to ask of them what we want?

  Euth. Certainly.

   Soc. And the right way of giving is to give to them in return
what they want of us. There would be no, in an art which gives to
any one that which he does not want.

  Euth. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. Then piety, Euthyphro, is an art which gods and men have of
doing business with one another?

  Euth. That is an expression which you may use, if you like.

  Soc. But I have no particular liking for anything but the truth. I
wish, however, that you would tell me what benefit accrues to the gods
from our gifts. There is no doubt about what they give to us; for
there is no good thing which they do not give; but how we can give any
good thing to them in return is far from being equally clear. If
they give everything and we give nothing, that must be an affair of
business in which we have very greatly the advantage of them.

  Euth. And do you imagine, Socrates, that any benefit accrues to
the gods from our gifts?

  Soc. But if not, Euthyphro, what is the meaning of gifts which are
conferred by us upon the gods?

  Euth. What else, but tributes of honour; and, as I was just now
saying, what pleases them?

  Soc. Piety, then, is pleasing to the gods, but not beneficial or
dear to them?

  Euth. I should say that nothing could be dearer.

  Soc. Then once more the assertion is repeated that piety is dear
to the gods?

  Euth. Certainly.

  Soc. And when you say this, can you wonder at your words not
standing firm, but walking away? Will you accuse me of being the
Daedalus who makes them walk away, not perceiving that there is
another and far greater artist than Daedalus who makes them go round
in a circle, and he is yourself; for the argument, as you will
perceive, comes round to the same point. Were we not saying that the
holy or pious was not the same with that which is loved of the gods?
Have you forgotten?

  Euth. I quite remember.

  Soc. And are you not saying that what is loved of the gods is
holy; and is not this the same as what is dear to them-do you see?

  Euth. True.

  Soc. Then either we were wrong in former assertion; or, if we were
right then, we are wrong now.

  Euth. One of the two must be true.

  Soc. Then we must begin again and ask, What is piety? That is an
enquiry which I shall never be weary of pursuing as far as in me lies;
and I entreat you not to scorn me, but to apply your mind to the
utmost, and tell me the truth. For, if any man knows, you are he;
and therefore I must detain you, like Proteus, until you tell. If
you had not certainly known the nature of piety and impiety, I am
confident that you would never, on behalf of a serf, have charged your
aged father with murder. You would not have run such a risk of doing
wrong in the sight of the gods, and you would have had too much
respect for the opinions of men. I am sure, therefore, that you know
the nature of piety and impiety. Speak out then, my dear Euthyphro,
and do not hide your knowledge.

  Euth. Another time, Socrates; for I am in a hurry, and must go now.

  Soc. Alas! my companion, and will you leave me in despair? I was
hoping that you would instruct me in the nature of piety and
impiety; and then I might have cleared myself of Meletus and his
indictment. I would have told him that I had been enlightened by
Euthyphro, and had given up rash innovations and speculations, in
which I indulged only through ignorance, and that now I am about to
lead a better life.

                             -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: CALLICLES; SOCRATES; CHAEREPHON; GORGIAS;
POLUS

  Scene: The house of Callicles.

  Callicles. The wise man, as the proverb says, is late for a fray,
but not for a feast.

  Socrates. And are we late for a feast?

  Cal. Yes, and a delightful feast; for Gorgias has just been
exhibiting to us many fine things.

  Soc. It is not my fault, Callicles; our friend Chaerephon is to
blame; for he would keep us loitering in the Agora.

  Chaerephon. Never mind, Socrates; the misfortune of which I have
been the cause I will also repair; for Gorgias is a friend of mine,
and I will make him give the exhibition again either now, or, if you
prefer, at some other time.

  Cal. What is the matter, Chaerephon-does Socrates want to hear
Gorgias?

  Chaer. Yes, that was our intention in coming.

  Cal. Come into my house, then; for Gorgias is staying with me, and
he shall exhibit to you.

  Soc. Very good, Callicles; but will he answer our questions? for I
want to hear from him what is the nature of his art, and what it is
which he professes and teaches; he may, as you [Chaerephon] suggest,
defer the exhibition to some other time.

  Cal. There is nothing like asking him, Socrates; and indeed to
answer questions is a part of his exhibition, for he was saying only
just now, that any one in my house might put any question to him,
and that he would answer.

  Soc. How fortunate! will you ask him, Chaerephon-?

  Chaer. What shall I ask him?

  Soc. Ask him who he is.

  Chaer. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean such a question as would elicit from him, if he had been
a maker of shoes, the answer that he is a cobbler. Do you understand?

  Chaer. I understand, and will ask him: Tell me, Gorgias, is our
friend Callicles right in saying that you undertake to answer any
questions which you are asked?

  Gorgias. Quite right, Chaerephon: I was saying as much only just
now; and I may add, that many years have elapsed since any one has
asked me a new one.

  Chaer. Then you must be very ready, Gorgias.

  Gor. Of that, Chaerephon, you can make trial.

  Polus. Yes, indeed, and if you like, Chaerephon, you may make
trial of me too, for I think that Gorgias, who has been talking a long
time, is tired.

  Chaer. And do you, Polus, think that you can answer better than
Gorgias?

  Pol. What does that matter if I answer well enough for you?

  Chaer. Not at all:-and you shall answer if you like.

  Pol. Ask:-

  Chaer. My question is this: If Gorgias had the skill of his
brother Herodicus, what ought we to call him? Ought he not to have the
name which is given to his brother?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Chaer. Then we should be right in calling him a physician?

  Pol. Yes.

  Chaer. And if he had the skill of Aristophon the son of Aglaophon,
or of his brother Polygnotus, what ought we to call him?

  Pol. Clearly, a painter.

  Chaer. But now what shall we call him-what is the art in which he is
skilled.

  Pol. O Chaerephon, there are many arts among mankind which are
experimental, and have their origin in experience, for experience
makes the days of men to proceed according to art, and inexperience
according to chance, and different persons in different ways are
proficient in different arts, and the best persons in the best arts.
And our friend Gorgias is one of the best, and the art in which he
is a proficient is the noblest.

  Soc. Polus has been taught how to make a capital speech, Gorgias;
but he is not fulfilling the promise which he made to Chaerephon.

  Gor. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I mean that he has not exactly answered the question which he
was asked.

  Gor. Then why not ask him yourself?

  Soc. But I would much rather ask you, if you are disposed to answer:
for I see, from the few words which Polus has uttered, that he has
attended more to the art which is called rhetoric than to dialectic.

  Pol. What makes you say so, Socrates?

  Soc. Because, Polus, when Chaerephon asked you what was the art
which Gorgias knows, you praised it as if you were answering some
one who found fault with it, but you never said what the art was.

  Pol. Why, did I not say that it was the noblest of arts?

  Soc. Yes, indeed, but that was no answer to the question: nobody
asked what was the quality, but what was the nature, of the art, and
by what name we were to describe Gorgias. And I would still beg you
briefly and clearly, as you answered Chaerephon when he asked you at
first, to say what this art is, and what we ought to call Gorgias:
Or rather, Gorgias, let me turn to you, and ask the same question what
are we to call you, and what is the art which you profess?

  Gor. Rhetoric, Socrates, is my art.

  Soc. Then I am to call you a rhetorician?

  Gor. Yes, Socrates, and a good one too, if you would call me that
which, in Homeric language, "I boast myself to be."

  Soc. I should wish to do so.

  Gor. Then pray do.

  Soc. And are we to say that you are able to make other men
rhetoricians?

  Gor. Yes, that is exactly what I profess to make them, not only at
Athens, but in all places.

  Soc. And will you continue to ask and answer questions, Gorgias,
as we are at present doing and reserve for another occasion the longer
mode of speech which Polus was attempting? Will you keep your promise,
and answer shortly the questions which are asked of you?

  Gor. Some answers, Socrates, are of necessity longer; but I will
do my best to make them as short as possible; for a part of my
profession is that I can be as short as any one.

  Soc. That is what is wanted, Gorgias; exhibit the shorter method
now, and the longer one at some other time.

  Gor. Well, I will; and you will certainly say, that you never
heard a man use fewer words.

  Soc. Very good then; as you profess to be a rhetorician, and a maker
of rhetoricians, let me ask you, with what is rhetoric concerned: I
might ask with what is weaving concerned, and you would reply (would
you not?), with the making of garments?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And music is concerned with the composition of melodies?

  Gor. It is.

  Soc. By Here, Gorgias, I admire the surpassing brevity of your
answers.

  Gor. Yes, Socrates, I do think myself good at that.

  Soc. I am glad to hear it; answer me in like manner about
rhetoric: with what is rhetoric concerned?

  Gor. With discourse.

  Soc. What sort of discourse, Gorgias?-such discourse as would
teach the sick under what treatment they might get well?

  Gor. No.

  Soc. Then rhetoric does not treat of all kinds of discourse?

  Gor. Certainly not.

  Soc. And yet rhetoric makes men able to speak?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And to understand that about which they speak?

  Gor. Of course.

  Soc. But does not the art of medicine, which we were just now
mentioning, also make men able to understand and speak about the sick?

  Gor. Certainly.

  Soc. Then medicine also treats of discourse?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. Of discourse concerning diseases?

  Gor. Just so.

  Soc. And does not gymnastic also treat of discourse concerning the
good or evil condition of the body?

  Gor. Very true.

  Soc. And the same, Gorgias, is true of the other arts:-all of them
treat of discourse concerning the subjects with which they severally
have to do.

  Gor. Clearly.

  Soc. Then why, if you call rhetoric the art which treats of
discourse, and all the other arts treat of discourse, do you not
call them arts of rhetoric?

  Gor. Because, Socrates, the knowledge of the other arts has only
to do with some sort of external action, as of the hand; but there
is no such action of the hand in rhetoric which works and takes effect
only through the medium of discourse. And therefore I am justified
in saying that rhetoric treats of discourse.

  Soc. I am not sure whether I entirely understand you, but I dare say
I shall soon know better; please to answer me a question:-you would
allow that there are arts?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. As to the arts generally, they are for the most part
concerned with doing, and require little or no speaking; in
painting, and statuary, and many other arts, the work may proceed in
silence; and of such arts I suppose you would say that they do not
come within the province of rhetoric.

  Gor. You perfectly conceive my meaning, Socrates.

  Soc. But there are other arts which work wholly through the medium
of language, and require either no action or very little, as, for
example, the arts of arithmetic, of calculation, of geometry, and of
playing draughts; in some of these speech is pretty nearly
co-extensive with action, but in most of them the verbal element is
greater-they depend wholly on words for their efficacy and power:
and I take your meaning to be that rhetoric is an art of this latter
sort?

  Gor. Exactly.

  Soc. And yet I do not believe that you really mean to call any of
these arts rhetoric; although the precise expression which you used
was, that rhetoric is an art which works and takes effect only through
the medium of discourse; and an adversary who wished to be captious
might say, "And so, Gorgias, you call arithmetic rhetoric." But I do
not think that you really call arithmetic rhetoric any more than
geometry would be so called by you.

  Gor. You are quite right, Socrates, in your apprehension of my
meaning.

  Soc. Well, then, let me now have the rest of my answer:-seeing
that rhetoric is one of those arts which works mainly by the use of
words, and there are other arts which also use words, tell me what
is that quality in words with which rhetoric is concerned:-Suppose
that a person asks me about some of the arts which I was mentioning
just now; he might say, "Socrates, what is arithmetic?" and I should
reply to him, as you replied to me, that arithmetic is one of those
arts which take effect through words. And then he would proceed to
ask: "Words about what?" and I should reply, Words about and even
numbers, and how many there are of each. And if he asked again:
"What is the art of calculation?" I should say, That also is one of
the arts which is concerned wholly with words. And if he further said,
"Concerned with what?" I should say, like the clerks in the
assembly, "as aforesaid" of arithmetic, but with a difference, the
difference being that the art of calculation considers not only the
quantities of odd and even numbers, but also their numerical relations
to themselves and to one another. And suppose, again, I were to say
that astronomy is only word-he would ask, "Words about what,
Socrates?" and I should answer, that astronomy tells us about the
motions of the stars and sun and moon, and their relative swiftness.

  Gor. You would be quite right, Socrates.

  Soc. And now let us have from you, Gorgias, the truth about
rhetoric: which you would admit (would you not?) to be one of those
arts which act always and fulfil all their ends through the medium
of words?

  Gor. True.

  Soc. Words which do what? I should ask. To what class of things do
the words which rhetoric uses relate?

  Gor. To the greatest, Socrates, and the best of human things.

  Soc. That again, Gorgias is ambiguous; I am still in the dark: for
which are the greatest and best of human things? I dare say that you
have heard men singing at feasts the old drinking song, in which the
singers enumerate the goods of life, first health, beauty next,
thirdly, as the writer of the song says, wealth honesty obtained.

  Gor. Yes, I know the song; but what is your drift?

  Soc. I mean to say, that the producers of those things which the
author of the song praises, that is to say, the physician, the
trainer, the money-maker, will at once come to you, and first the
physician will say: "O Socrates, Gorgias is deceiving you, for my
art is concerned with the greatest good of men and not his." And
when I ask, Who are you? he will reply, "I am a physician." What do
you mean? I shall say. Do you mean that your art produces the greatest
good? "Certainly," he will answer, "for is not health the greatest
good? What greater good can men have, Socrates?" And after him the
trainer will come and say, "I too, Socrates, shall be greatly
surprised if Gorgias can show more good of his art than I can show
of mine." To him again I shall say, Who are you, honest friend, and
what is your business? "I am a trainer," he will reply, "and my
business is to make men beautiful and strong in body." When I have
done with the trainer, there arrives the money-maker, and he, as I
expect, utterly despise them all. "Consider Socrates," he will say,
"whether Gorgias or any one-else can produce any greater good than
wealth." Well, you and I say to him, and are you a creator of
wealth? "Yes," he replies. And who are you? "A money-maker." And do
you consider wealth to be the greatest good of man? "Of course,"
will be his reply. And we shall rejoin: Yes; but our friend Gorgias
contends that his art produces a greater good than yours. And then
he will be sure to go on and ask, "What good? Let Gorgias answer." Now
I want you, Gorgias, to imagine that this question is asked of you
by them and by me; What is that which, as you say, is the greatest
good of man, and of which you are the creator? Answer us.

  Gor. That good, Socrates, which is truly the greatest, being that
which gives to men freedom in their own persons, and to individuals
the power of ruling over others in their several states.

  Soc. And what would you consider this to be?

  Gor. What is there greater than the word which persuades the
judges in the courts, or the senators in the council, or the
citizens in the assembly, or at any other political meeting?-if you
have the power of uttering this word, you will have the physician your
slave, and the trainer your slave, and the money-maker of whom you
talk will be found to gather treasures, not for himself, but for you
who are able to speak and to persuade the multitude.

  Soc. Now I think, Gorgias, that you have very accurately explained
what you conceive to be the art of rhetoric; and you mean to say, if I
am not mistaken, that rhetoric is the artificer of persuasion,
having this and no other business, and that this is her crown and end.
Do you know any other effect of rhetoric over and above that of
producing persuasion?

  Gor. No: the definition seems to me very fair, Socrates; for
persuasion is the chief end of rhetoric.

  Soc. Then hear me, Gorgias, for I am quite sure that if there ever
was a man who-entered on the discussion of a matter from a pure love
of knowing the truth, I am such a one, and I should say the same of
you.

  Gor. What is coming, Socrates?

  Soc. I will tell you: I am very well aware that do not know what,
according to you, is the exact nature, or what are the topics of
that persuasion of which you speak, and which is given by rhetoric;
although I have a suspicion about both the one and the other. And I am
going to ask-what is this power of persuasion which is given by
rhetoric, and about what? But why, if I have a suspicion, do I ask
instead of telling you? Not for your sake, but in order that the
argument may proceed in such a manner as is most likely to set forth
the truth. And I would have you observe, that I am right in asking
this further question: If I asked, "What sort of a painter is Zeuxis?"
and you said, "The painter of figures," should I not be right in
asking, What kind of figures, and where do you find them?"

  Gor. Certainly.

  Soc. And the reason for asking this second question would be, that
there are other painters besides, who paint many other figures?

  Gor. True.

  Soc. But if there had been no one but Zeuxis who painted them,
then you would have answered very well?

  Gor. Quite so.

  Soc. Now I was it to know about rhetoric in the same way;-is
rhetoric the only art which brings persuasion, or do other arts have
the same effect? I mean to say-Does he who teaches anything persuade
men of that which he teaches or not?

  Gor. He persuades, Socrates,-there can be no mistake about that.

  Soc. Again, if we take the arts of which we were just now
speaking:-do not arithmetic and the arithmeticians teach us the
properties of number?

  Gor. Certainly.

  Soc. And therefore persuade us of them?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. Then arithmetic as well as rhetoric is an artificer of
persuasion?

  Gor. Clearly.

  Soc. And if any one asks us what sort of persuasion, and about
what,-we shall answer, persuasion which teaches the quantity of odd
and even; and we shall be able to show that all the other arts of
which we were just now speaking are artificers of persuasion, and of
what sort, and about what.

  Gor. Very true.

  Soc. Then rhetoric is not the only artificer of persuasion?

  Gor. True.

  Soc. Seeing, then, that not only rhetoric works by persuasion, but
that other arts do the same, as in the case of the painter, a question
has arisen which is a very fair one: Of what persuasion is rhetoric
the artificer, and about what?-is not that a fair way of putting the
question?

  Gor. I think so.

  Soc. Then, if you approve the question, Gorgias, what is the answer?

  Gor. I answer, Socrates, that rhetoric is the art of persuasion in
courts of law and other assemblies, as I was just now saying, and
about the just and unjust.

  Soc. And that, Gorgias, was what I was suspecting to be your notion;
yet I would not have you wonder if by-and-by I am found repeating a
seemingly plain question; for I ask not in order to confute you, but
as I was saying that the argument may proceed consecutively, and
that we may not get the habit of anticipating and suspecting the
meaning of one another's words; I would have you develop your own
views in your own way, whatever may be your hypothesis.

  Gor. I think that you are quite right, Socrates.

  Soc. Then let me raise another question; there is such a thing as
"having learned"?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And there is also "having believed"?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And is the "having learned" the same "having believed," and are
learning and belief the same things?

  Gor. In my judgment, Socrates, they are not the same.

  Soc. And your judgment is right, as you may ascertain in this
way:-If a person were to say to you, "Is there, Gorgias, a false
belief as well as a true?" -you would reply, if I am not mistaken,
that there is.

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. Well, but is there a false knowledge as well as a true?

  Gor. No.

  Soc. No, indeed; and this again proves that knowledge and belief
differ.

  Gor. Very true.

  Soc. And yet those who have learned as well as those who have
believed are persuaded?

  Gor. Just so.

  Soc. Shall we then assume two sorts of persuasion,-one which is
the source of belief without knowledge, as the other is of knowledge?

  Gor. By all means.

  Soc. And which sort of persuasion does rhetoric create in courts
of law and other assemblies about the just and unjust, the sort of
persuasion which gives belief without knowledge, or that which gives
knowledge?

  Gor. Clearly, Socrates, that which only gives belief.

  Soc. Then rhetoric, as would appear, is the artificer of a
persuasion which creates belief about the just and unjust, but gives
no instruction about them?

  Gor. True.

  Soc. And the rhetorician does not instruct the courts of law or
other assemblies about things just and unjust, but he creates belief
about them; for no one can be supposed to instruct such a vast
multitude about such high matters in a short time?

  Gor. Certainly not.

  Soc. Come, then, and let us see what we really mean about
rhetoric; for I do not know what my own meaning is as yet. When the
assembly meets to elect a physician or a shipwright or any other
craftsman, will the rhetorician be taken into counsel? Surely not. For
at every election he ought to be chosen who is most skilled; and,
again, when walls have to be built or harbours or docks to be
constructed, not the rhetorician but the master workman will advise;
or when generals have to be chosen and an order of battle arranged, or
a proposition taken, then the military will advise and not the
rhetoricians: what do you say, Gorgias? Since you profess to be a
rhetorician and a maker of rhetoricians, I cannot do better than learn
the nature of your art from you. And here let me assure you that I
have your interest in view as well as my own. For likely enough some
one or other of the young men present might desire to become your
pupil, and in fact I see some, and a good many too, who have this
wish, but they would be too modest to question you. And therefore when
you are interrogated by me, I would have you imagine that you are
interrogated by them. "What is the use of coming to you, Gorgias? they
will say about what will you teach us to advise the state?-about the
just and unjust only, or about those other things also which
Socrates has just mentioned? How will you answer them?

  Gor. I like your way of leading us on, Socrates, and I will
endeavour to reveal to you the whole nature of rhetoric. You must have
heard, I think, that the docks and the walls of the Athenians and
the plan of the harbour were devised in accordance with the
counsels, partly of Themistocles, and partly of Pericles, and not at
the suggestion of the builders.

  Soc. Such is the tradition, Gorgias, about Themistocles; and I
myself heard the speech of Pericles when he advised us about the
middle wall.

  Gor. And you will observe, Socrates, that when a decision has to
be given in such matters the rhetoricians are the advisers; they are
the men who win their point.

  Soc. I had that in my admiring mind, Gorgias, when I asked what is
the nature of rhetoric, which always appears to me, when I look at the
matter in this way, to be a marvel of greatness.

  Gor. A marvel, indeed, Socrates, if you only knew how rhetoric
comprehends and holds under her sway all the inferior arts. Let me
offer you a striking example of this. On several occasions I have been
with my brother Herodicus or some other physician to see one of his
patients, who would not allow the physician to give him medicine, or
apply a knife or hot iron to him; and I have persuaded him to do for
me what he would not do for the physician just by the use of rhetoric.
And I say that if a rhetorician and a physician were to go to any
city, and had there to argue in the Ecclesia or any other assembly
as to which of them should be elected state-physician, the physician
would have no chance; but he who could speak would be chosen if he
wished; and in a contest with a man of any other profession the
rhetorician more than any one would have the power of getting
himself chosen, for he can speak more persuasively to the multitude
than any of them, and on any subject. Such is the nature and power
of the art of rhetoric And yet, Socrates, rhetoric should be used like
any other competitive art, not against everybody-the rhetorician ought
not to abuse his strength any more than a pugilist or pancratiast or
other master of fence; because he has powers which are more than a
match either for friend or enemy, he ought not therefore to strike,
stab, or slay his friends. Suppose a man to have been trained in the
palestra and to be a skilful boxer-he in the fulness of his strength
goes and strikes his father or mother or one of his familiars or
friends; but that is no reason why the trainers or fencing-masters
should be held in detestation or banished from the city-surely not.
For they taught their art for a good purpose, to be used against
enemies and evil-doers, in self-defence not in aggression, and
others have perverted their instructions, and turned to a bad use
their own strength and skill. But not on this account are the teachers
bad, neither is the art in fault, or bad in itself; I should rather
say that those who make a bad use of the art are to blame. And the
same argument holds good of rhetoric; for the rhetorician can speak
against all men and upon any subject-in short, he can persuade the
multitude better than any other man of anything which he pleases,
but he should not therefore seek to defraud the physician or any other
artist of his reputation merely because he has the power; he ought
to use rhetoric fairly, as he would also use his athletic powers.
And if after having become a rhetorician he makes a bad use of his
strength and skill, his instructor surely ought not on that account to
be held in detestation or banished. For he was intended by his teacher
to make a good use of his instructions, but he abuses them. And
therefore he is the person who ought to be held in detestation,
banished, and put to death, and not his instructor.

  Soc. You, Gorgias, like myself, have had great experience of
disputations, and you must have observed, I think, that they do not
always terminate in mutual edification, or in the definition by either
party of the subjects which they are discussing; but disagreements are
apt to arise-somebody says that another has not spoken truly or
clearly; and then they get into a passion and begin to quarrel, both
parties conceiving that their opponents are arguing from personal
feeling only and jealousy of themselves, not from any interest in
the question at issue. And sometimes they will go on abusing one
another until the company at last are quite vexed at themselves for
ever listening to such fellows. Why do I say this? Why, because I
cannot help feeling that you are now saying what is not quite
consistent or accordant with what you were saying at first about
rhetoric. And I am afraid to point this out to you, lest you should
think that I have some animosity against you, and that I speak, not
for the sake of discovering the truth, but from jealousy of you. Now
if you are one of my sort, I should like to cross-examine you, but
if not I will let you alone. And what is my sort? you will ask. I am
one of those who are very willing to be refuted if I say anything
which is not true, and very willing to refute any one else who says
what is not true, and quite as ready to be refuted as to refute-I
for I hold that this is the greater gain of the two, just as the
gain is greater of being cured of a very great evil than of curing
another. For I imagine that there is no evil which a man can endure so
great as an erroneous opinion about the matters of which we are
speaking and if you claim to be one of my sort, let us have the
discussion out, but if you would rather have done, no matter-let us
make an end of it.

  Gor. I should say, Socrates, that I am quite the man whom you
indicate; but, perhaps, we ought to consider the audience, for, before
you came, I had already given a long exhibition, and if we proceed the
argument may run on to a great length. And therefore I think that we
should consider whether we, may not be detaining some part of the
company when they are wanting to do something else.

  Chaer. You hear the audience cheering, Gorgias and Socrates, which
shows their desire to listen to you; and for myself, Heaven forbid
that I should have any business on hand which would take me Away
from a discussion so interesting and so ably maintained.

  Cal. By the gods, Chaerephon, although I have been present at many
discussions, I doubt whether I was ever so much delighted before,
and therefore if you go on discoursing all day I shall be the better
pleased.

  Soc. I may truly say, Callicles, that I am willing, if Gorgias is.

  Gor. After all this, Socrates, I should be disgraced if I refused,
especially as I have promised to answer all comers; in accordance with
the wishes of the company, them, do you begin. and ask of me any
question which you like.

  Soc. Let me tell you then, Gorgias, what surprises me in your words;
though I dare say that you may be right, and I may have understood
your meaning. You say that you can make any man, who will learn of
you, a rhetorician?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. Do you mean that you will teach him to gain the ears of the
multitude on any subject, and this not by instruction but by
persuasion?

  Gor. Quite so.

  Soc. You were saying, in fact, that the rhetorician will have,
greater powers of persuasion than the physician even in a matter of
health?

  Gor. Yes, with the multitude-that is.

  Soc. You mean to say, with the ignorant; for with those who know
he cannot be supposed to have greater powers of persuasion.

  Gor. Very true.

  Soc. But if he is to have more power of persuasion than the
physician, he will have greater power than he who knows?

  Gor. Certainly.

  Soc. Although he is not a physician:-is he?

  Gor. No.

  Soc. And he who is not a physician must, obviously, be ignorant of
what the physician knows.

  Gor. Clearly.

  Soc. Then, when the rhetorician is more persuasive than the
physician, the ignorant is more persuasive with the ignorant than he
who has knowledge?-is not that the inference?

  Gor. In the case supposed:-Yes.

  Soc. And the same holds of the relation of rhetoric to all the other
arts; the rhetorician need not know the truth about things; he has
only to discover some way of persuading the ignorant that he has
more knowledge than those who know?

  Gor. Yes, Socrates, and is not this a great comfort?-not to have
learned the other arts, but the art of rhetoric only, and yet to be in
no way inferior to the professors of them?

  Soc. Whether the rhetorician is or not inferior on this account is a
question which we will hereafter examine if the enquiry is likely to
be of any service to us; but I would rather begin by asking, whether
he is as ignorant of the just and unjust, base and honourable, good
and evil, as he is of medicine and the other arts; I mean to say, does
he really know anything of what is good and evil, base or
honourable, just or unjust in them; or has he only a way with the
ignorant of persuading them that he not knowing is to be esteemed to
know more about these things than some. one else who knows? Or must
the pupil know these things and come to you knowing them before he can
acquire the art of rhetoric? If he is ignorant, you who are the
teacher of rhetoric will not teach him-it is not your business; but
you will make him seem to the multitude to know them, when he does not
know them; and seem to be a good man, when he is not. Or will you be
unable to teach him rhetoric at all, unless he knows the truth of
these things first? What is to be said about all this? By heavens,
Gorgias, I wish that you would reveal to me the power of rhetoric,
as you were saying that you would.

  Gor. Well, Socrates, I suppose that if the pupil does chance not
to know them, he will have to learn of me these things as well.

  Soc. Say no more, for there you are right; and so he whom you make a
rhetorician must either know the nature of the just and unjust
already, or he must be taught by you.

  Gor. Certainly.

  Soc. Well, and is not he who has learned carpentering a carpenter?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And he who has learned music a musician?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And he who has learned medicine is a physician, in like manner?
He who has learned anything whatever is that which his knowledge makes
him.

  Gor. Certainly.

  Soc. And in the same way, he who has learned what is just is just?

  Gor. To be sure.

  Soc. And he who is just may be supposed to do what is just?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And must not the just man always desire to do what is just?

  Gor. That is clearly the inference.

  Soc. Surely, then, the just man will never consent to do injustice?

  Gor. Certainly not.

  Soc. And according to the argument the rhetorician must be a just
man?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. And will therefore never be willing to do injustice?

  Gor. Clearly not.

  Soc. But do you remember saying just now that the trainer is not
to be accused or banished if the pugilist makes a wrong use of his
pugilistic art; and in like manner, if the rhetorician makes a bad and
unjust use of rhetoric, that is not to be laid to the charge of his
teacher, who is not to be banished, but the wrong-doer himself who
made a bad use of his rhetoric-he is to be banished-was not that said?

  Gor. Yes, it was.

  Soc. But now we are affirming that the aforesaid rhetorician will
never have done injustice at all?

  Gor. True.

  Soc. And at the very outset, Gorgias, it was said that rhetoric
treated of discourse, not [like arithmetic] about odd and even, but
about just and unjust? Was not this said?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. I was thinking at the time, when I heard you saying so, that
rhetoric, which is always discoursing about justice, could not
possibly be an unjust thing. But when you added, shortly afterwards,
that the rhetorician might make a bad use of rhetoric I noted with
surprise the inconsistency into which you had fallen; and I said, that
if you thought, as I did, that there was a gain in being refuted,
there would be an advantage in going on with the question, but if not,
I would leave off. And in the course of our investigations, as you
will see yourself, the rhetorician has been acknowledged to be
incapable of making an unjust use of rhetoric, or of willingness to do
injustice. By the dog, Gorgias, there will be a great deal of
discussion, before we get at the truth of all this.

  Polus. And do even you, Socrates, seriously believe what you are now
saying about rhetoric? What! because Gorgias was ashamed to deny
that the rhetorician knew the just and the honourable and the good,
and admitted that to any one who came to him ignorant of them he could
teach them, and then out of this admission there arose a
contradiction-the thing which you dearly love, and to which not he,
but you, brought the argument by your captious questions-[do you
seriously believe that there is any truth in all this?] For will any
one ever acknowledge that he does not know, or cannot teach, the
nature of justice? The truth is, that there is great want of manners
in bringing the argument to such a pass.

  Soc. Illustrious Polus, the reason why we provide ourselves with
friends and children is, that when we get old and stumble, a younger
generation may be at hand to set us on our legs again in our words and
in our actions: and now, if I and Gorgias are stumbling, here are
you who should raise us up; and I for my part engage to retract any
error into which you may think that I have fallen-upon one condition:

  Pol. What condition?

  Soc. That you contract, Polus, the prolixity of speech in which
you indulged at first.

  Pol. What! do you mean that I may not use as many words as I please?

  Soc. Only to think, my friend, that having come on a visit to
Athens, which is the most free-spoken state in Hellas, you when you
got there, and you alone, should be deprived of the power of
speech-that would be hard indeed. But then consider my case:-shall not
I be very hardly used, if, when you are making a long oration, and
refusing to answer what you are asked, I am compelled to stay and
listen to you, and may not go away? I say rather, if you have a real
interest in the argument, or, to repeat my former expression, have any
desire to set it on its legs, take back any statement which you
please; and in your turn ask and answer, like myself and
Gorgias-refute and be refuted: for I suppose that you would claim to
know what Gorgias knows-would you not?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And you, like him, invite any one to ask you about anything
which he pleases, and you will know how to answer him?

  Pol. To be sure.

  Soc. And now, which will you do, ask or answer?

  Pol. I will ask; and do you answer me, Socrates, the same question
which Gorgias, as you suppose, is unable to answer: What is rhetoric?

  Soc. Do you mean what sort of an art?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. To say the truth, Polus, it is not an art at all, in my
opinion.

  Pol. Then what, in your opinion, is rhetoric?

  Soc. A thing which, as I was lately reading in a book of yours,
you say that you have made an art.

  Pol. What thing?

  Soc. I should say a sort of experience.

  Pol. Does rhetoric seem to you to be an experience?

  Soc. That is my view, but you may be of another mind.

  Pol. An experience in what?

  Soc. An experience in producing a sort of delight and gratification.

  Pol. And if able to gratify others, must not rhetoric be a fine
thing?

  Soc. What are you saying, Polus? Why do you ask me whether
rhetoric is a fine thing or not, when I have not as yet told you
what rhetoric is?

  Pol. Did I not hear you say that rhetoric was a sort of experience?

  Soc. Will you, who are so desirous to gratify others, afford a
slight gratification to me?

  Pol. I will.

  Soc. Will you ask me, what sort of an art is cookery?

  Pol. What sort of an art is cookery?

  Soc. Not an art at all, Polus.

  Pol. What then?

  Soc. I should say an experience.

  Pol. In what? I wish that you would explain to me.

  Soc. An experience in producing a sort of delight and gratification,
Polus.

  Pol. Then are cookery and rhetoric the same?

  Soc. No, they are only different parts of the same profession.

  Pol. Of what profession?

  Soc. I am afraid that the truth may seem discourteous; and I
hesitate to answer, lest Gorgias should imagine that I am making fun
of his own profession. For whether or no this is that art of
rhetoric which Gorgias practises I really cannot tell:-from what he
was just now saying, nothing appeared of what he thought of his art,
but the rhetoric which I mean is a part of a not very creditable
whole.

  Gor. A part of what, Socrates? Say what you mean, and never mind me.

  Soc. In my opinion then, Gorgias, the whole of which rhetoric is a
part is not an art at all, but the habit of a bold and ready wit,
which knows how to manage mankind: this habit I sum up under the
word "flattery"; and it appears to me to have many other parts, one of
which is cookery, which may seem to be an art, but, as I maintain,
is only an experience or routine and not an art:-another part is
rhetoric, and the art of attiring and sophistry are two others: thus
there are four branches, and four different things answering to
them. And Polus may ask, if he likes, for he has not as yet been
informed, what part of flattery is rhetoric: he did not see that I had
not yet answered him when he proceeded to ask a further question:
Whether I do not think rhetoric a fine thing? But I shall not tell him
whether rhetoric is a fine thing or not, until I have first
answered, "What is rhetoric?" For that would not be right, Polus;
but I shall be happy to answer, if you will ask me, What part of
flattery is rhetoric?

  Pol. I will ask and do you answer? What part of flattery is
rhetoric?

  Soc. Will you understand my answer? Rhetoric, according to my
view, is the ghost or counterfeit of a part of politics.

  Pol. And noble or ignoble?

  Soc. Ignoble, I should say, if I am compelled to answer, for I
call what is bad ignoble: though I doubt whether you understand what I
was saying before.

  Gor. Indeed, Socrates, I cannot say that I understand myself.

  Soc. I do not wonder, Gorgias; for I have not as yet explained
myself, and our friend Polus, colt by name and colt by nature, is
apt to run away.

  Gor. Never mind him, but explain to me what you mean by saying
that rhetoric is the counterfeit of a part of politics.

  Soc. I will try, then, to explain my notion of rhetoric, and if I am
mistaken, my friend Polus shall refute me. We may assume the existence
of bodies and of souls?

  Gor. Of course.

  Soc. You would further admit that there is a good condition of
either of them?

  Gor. Yes.

  Soc. Which condition may not be really good, but good only in
appearance? I mean to say, that there are many persons who appear to
be in good health, and whom only a physician or trainer will discern
at first sight not to be in good health.

  Gor. True.

  Soc. And this applies not only to the body, but also to the soul: in
either there may be that which gives the appearance of health and
not the reality?

  Gor. Yes, certainly.

  Soc. And now I will endeavour to explain to you more clearly what
I mean: The soul and body being two, have two arts corresponding to
them: there is the art of politics attending on the soul; and
another art attending on the body, of which I know no single name, but
which may be described as having two divisions, one of them gymnastic,
and the other medicine. And in politics there is a legislative part,
which answers to gymnastic, as justice does to medicine; and the two
parts run into one another, justice having to do with the same subject
as legislation, and medicine with the same subject as gymnastic, but
with a difference. Now, seeing that there are these four arts, two
attending on the body and two on the soul for their highest good;
flattery knowing, or rather guessing their natures, has distributed
herself into four shams or simulations of them; she puts on the
likeness of some one or other of them, and pretends to be that which
she simulates, and having no regard for men's highest interests, is
ever making pleasure the bait of the unwary, and deceiving them into
the belief that she is of the highest value to them. Cookery simulates
the disguise of medicine, and pretends to know what food is the best
for the body; and if the physician and the cook had to enter into a
competition in which children were the judges, or men who had no
more sense than children, as to which of them best understands the
goodness or badness of food, the physician would be starved to
death. A flattery I deem this to be and of an ignoble sort, Polus, for
to you I am now addressing myself, because it aims at pleasure without
any thought of the best. An art I do not call it, but only an
experience, because it is unable to explain or to give a reason of the
nature of its own applications. And I do not call any irrational thing
an art; but if you dispute my words, I am prepared to argue in defence
of them.

  Cookery, then, I maintain to be a flattery which takes the form of
medicine; and tiring, in like manner, is a flattery which takes the
form of gymnastic, and is knavish, false, ignoble, illiberal,
working deceitfully by the help of lines, and colours, and enamels,
and garments, and making men affect a spurious beauty to the neglect
of the true beauty which is given by gymnastic.

  I would rather not be tedious, and therefore I will only say,
after the manner of the geometricians (for I think that by this time
you will be able to follow)

    astiring : gymnastic :: cookery : medicine;
or rather,

    astiring : gymnastic :: sophistry : legislation;
and

    as cookery : medicine :: rhetoric : justice.

And this, I say, is the natural difference between the rhetorician and
the sophist, but by reason of their near connection, they are apt to
be jumbled up together; neither do they know what to make of
themselves, nor do other men know what to make of them. For if the
body presided over itself, and were not under the guidance of the
soul, and the soul did not discern and discriminate between cookery
and medicine, but the body was made the judge of them, and the rule of
judgment was the bodily delight which was given by them, then the word
of Anaxagoras, that word with which you, friend Polus, are so well
acquainted, would prevail far and wide: "Chaos" would come again,
and cookery, health, and medicine would mingle in an indiscriminate
mass. And now I have told you my notion of rhetoric, which is, in
relation to the soul, what cookery is to the body. I may have been
inconsistent in making a long speech, when I would not allow you to
discourse at length. But I think that I may be excused, because you
did not understand me, and could make no use of my answer when I spoke
shortly, and therefore I had to enter into explanation. And if I
show an equal inability to make use of yours, I hope that you will
speak at equal length; but if I am able to understand you, let me have
the benefit of your brevity, as is only fair: And now you may do
what you please with my answer.

  Pol. What do you mean? do you think that rhetoric is flattery?

  Soc. Nay, I said a part of flattery-if at your age, Polus, you
cannot remember, what will you do by-and-by, when you get older?

  Pol. And are the good rhetoricians meanly regarded in states,
under the idea that they are flatterers?

  Soc. Is that a question or the beginning of a speech?

  Pol. I am asking a question.

  Soc. Then my answer is, that they are not regarded at all.

  Pol. How not regarded? Have they not very great power in states?

  Soc. Not if you mean to say that power is a good to the possessor.

  Pol. And that is what I do mean to say.

  Soc. Then, if so, I think that they have the least power of all
the citizens.

  Pol. What! Are they not like tyrants? They kill and despoil and
exile any one whom they please.

  Soc. By the dog, Polus, I cannot make out at each deliverance of
yours, whether you are giving an opinion of your own, or asking a
question of me.

  Pol. I am asking a question of you.

  Soc. Yes, my friend, but you ask two questions at once.

  Pol. How two questions?

  Soc. Why, did you not say just now that the rhetoricians are like
tyrants, and that they kill and despoil or exile any one whom they
please?

  Pol. I did.

  Soc. Well then, I say to you that here are two questions in one, and
I will answer both of them. And I tell you, Polus, that rhetoricians
and tyrants have the least possible power in states, as I was just now
saying; for they do literally nothing which they will, but only what
they think best.

  Pol. And is not that a great power?

  Soc. Polus has already said the reverse.

  Soc. No, by the great-what do you call him?-not you, for you say
that power is a good to him who has the power.

  Pol. I do.

  Soc. And would you maintain that if a fool does what he think
best, this is a good, and would you call this great power?

  Pol. I should not.

  Soc. Then you must prove that the rhetorician is not a fool, and
that rhetoric is an art and not a flattery-and so you will have
refuted me; but if you leave me unrefuted, why, the rhetoricians who
do what they think best in states, and the tyrants, will have
nothing upon which to congratulate themselves, if as you say, power be
indeed a good, admitting at the same time that what is done without
sense is an evil.

  Pol. Yes; I admit that.

  Soc. How then can the rhetoricians or the tyrants have great power
in states, unless Polus can refute Socrates, and prove to him that
they do as they will?

  Pol. This fellow-

  Soc. I say that they do not do as they will-now refute me.

  Pol. Why, have you not already said that they do as they think best?

  Soc. And I say so still.

  Pol. Then surely they do as they will?

  Soc. I deny it.

  Pol. But they do what they think best?

  Soc. Aye.

  Pol. That, Socrates, is monstrous and absurd.

  Soc. Good words, good Polus, as I may say in your own peculiar
style; but if you have any questions to ask of me, either prove that I
am in error or give the answer yourself.

  Pol. Very well, I am willing to answer that I may know what you
mean.

  Soc. Do men appear to you to will that which they do, or to will
that further end for the sake of which they do a thing? when they take
medicine, for example, at the bidding of a physician, do they will the
drinking of the medicine which is painful, or the health for the
sake of which they drink?

  Pol. Clearly, the health.

  Soc. And when men go on a voyage or engage in business, they do
not will that which they are doing at the time; for who would desire
to take the risk of a voyage or the trouble of business?-But they
will, to have the wealth for the sake of which they go on a voyage.

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And is not this universally true? If a man does something for
the sake of something else, he wills not that which he does, but
that for the sake of which he does it.

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And are not all things either good or evil, or intermediate and
indifferent?

  Pol. To be sure, Socrates.

  Soc. Wisdom and health and wealth and the like you would call goods,
and their opposites evils?

  Pol. I should.

  Soc. And the things which are neither good nor evil, and which
partake sometimes of the nature of good and at other times of evil, or
of neither, are such as sitting, walking, running, sailing; or, again,
wood, stones, and the like:-these are the things which you call
neither good nor evil?

  Pol. Exactly so.

  Soc. Are these indifferent things done for the sake of the good,
or the good for the sake of the indifferent?

  Pol. Clearly, the indifferent for the sake of the good.

  Soc. When we walk we walk for the sake of the good, and under the
idea that it is better to walk, and when we stand we stand equally for
the sake of the good?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And when we kill a man we kill him or exile him or despoil
him of his goods, because, as we think, it will conduce to our good?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. Men who do any of these things do them for the sake of the
good?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And did we not admit that in doing something for the sake of
something else, we do not will those things which we do, but that
other thing for the sake of which we do them?

  Pol. Most true.

  Soc. Then we do not will simply to kill a man or to exile him or
to despoil him of his goods, but we will to do that which conduces
to our good, and if the act is not conducive to our good we do not
will it; for we will, as you say, that which is our good, but that
which is neither good nor evil, or simply evil, we do not will. Why
are you silent, Polus? Am I not right?

  Pol. You are right.

  Soc. Hence we may infer, that if any one, whether he be a tyrant
or a rhetorician, kills another or exiles another or deprives him of
his property, under the idea that the act is for his own interests
when really not for his own interests, he may be said to do what seems
best to him?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. But does he do what he wills if he does what is evil? Why do
you not answer?

  Pol. Well, I suppose not.

  Soc. Then if great power is a good as you allow, will such a one
have great power in a state?

  Pol. He will not.

  Soc. Then I was right in saying that a man may do what seems good to
him in a state, and not have great power, and not do what he wills?

  Pol. As though you, Socrates, would not like to have the power of
doing what seemed good to you in the state, rather than not; you would
not be jealous when you saw any one killing or despoiling or
imprisoning whom he pleased, Oh, no!

  Soc. Justly or unjustly, do you mean?

  Pol. In either case is he not equally to be envied?

  Soc. Forbear, Polus!

  Pol. Why "forbear"?

  Soc. Because you ought not to envy wretches who are not to be
envied, but only to pity them.

  Pol. And are those of whom spoke wretches?

  Soc. Yes, certainly they are.

  Pol. And so you think that he who slays any one whom he pleases, and
justly slays him, is pitiable and wretched?

  Soc. No, I do not say that of him: but neither do I think that he is
to be envied.

  Pol. Were you not saying just now that he is wretched?

  Soc. Yes, my friend, if he killed another unjustly, in which case he
is also to be pitied; and he is not to be envied if he killed him
justly.

  Pol. At any rate you will allow that he who is unjustly put to death
is wretched, and to be pitied?

  Soc. Not so much, Polus, as he who kills him, and not so much as
he who is justly killed.

  Pol. How can that be, Socrates?

  Soc. That may very well be, inasmuch as doing injustice is the
greatest of evils.

  Pol. But is it the greatest? Is not suffering injustice a greater
evil?

  Soc. Certainly not.

  Pol. Then would you rather suffer than do injustice?

  Soc. I should not like either, but if I must choose between them,
I would rather suffer than do.

  Pol. Then you would not wish to be a tyrant?

  Soc. Not if you mean by tyranny what I mean.

  Pol. I mean, as I said before, the power of doing whatever seems
good to you in a state, killing, banishing, doing in all things as you
like.

  Soc. Well then, illustrious friend, when I have said my say, do
you reply to me. Suppose that I go into a crowded Agora, and take a
dagger under my arm. Polus, I say to you, I have just acquired rare
power, and become a tyrant; for if I think that any of these men
whom you see ought to be put to death, the man whom I have a mind to
kill is as good as dead; and if I am disposed to break his head or
tear his garment, he will have his head broken or his garment torn
in an instant. Such is my great power in this city. And if you do
not believe me, and I show you the dagger, you would probably reply:
Socrates, in that sort of way any one may have great power-he may burn
any house which he pleases, and the docks and triremes of the
Athenians, and all their other vessels, whether public or
private-but can you believe that this mere doing as you think best
is great power?

  Pol. Certainly not such doing as this.

  Soc. But can you tell me why you disapprove of such a power?

  Pol. I can.

  Soc. Why then?

  Pol. Why, because he who did as you say would be certain to be
punished.

  Soc. And punishment is an evil?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And you would admit once more, my good sir, that great power is
a benefit to a man if his actions turn out to his advantage, and
that this is the meaning of great power; and if not, then his power is
an evil and is no power. But let us look at the matter in another
way do we not acknowledge that the things of which we were speaking,
the infliction of death, and exile, and the deprivation of property
are sometimes a good and sometimes not a good?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. About that you and I may be supposed to agree?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. Tell me, then, when do you say that they are good and when that
they are evil-what principle do you lay down?

  Pol. I would rather, Socrates, that you should answer as well as ask
that question.

  Soc. Well, Polus, since you would rather have the answer from me,
I say that they are good when they are just, and evil when they are
unjust.

  Pol. You are hard of refutation, Socrates, but might not a child
refute that statement?

  Soc. Then I shall be very grateful to the child, and equally
grateful to you if you will refute me and deliver me from my
foolishness. And I hope that refute me you will, and not weary of
doing good to a friend.

  Pol. Yes, Socrates, and I need not go far or appeal to antiquity;
events which happened only a few days ago are enough to refute you,
and to prove that many men who do wrong are happy.

  Soc. What events?

  Pol. You see, I presume, that Archelaus the son of Perdiccas is
now the ruler of Macedonia?

  Soc. At any rate I hear that he is.

  Pol. And do you think that he is happy or miserable?

  Soc. I cannot say, Polus, for I have never had any acquaintance with
him.

  Pol. And cannot you tell at once, and without having an acquaintance
with him, whether a man is happy?

  Soc. Most certainly not.

  Pol. Then clearly, Socrates, you would say that you did not even
know whether the great king was a happy man?

  Soc. And I should speak the truth; for I do not know how he stands
in the matter of education and justice.

  Pol. What! and does all happiness consist in this?

  Soc. Yes, indeed, Polus, that is my doctrine; the men and women
who are gentle and good are also happy, as I maintain, and the
unjust and evil are miserable.

  Pol. Then, according to your doctrine, the said Archelaus is
miserable?

  Soc. Yes, my friend, if he is wicked.

  Pol. That he is wicked I cannot deny; for he had no title at all
to the throne which he now occupies, he being only the son of a
woman who was the slave of Alcetas the brother of Perdiccas; he
himself therefore in strict right was the slave of Alcetas; and if
he had meant to do rightly he would have remained his slave, and then,
according to your doctrine, he would have been happy. But now he is
unspeakably miserable, for he has been guilty of the greatest
crimes: in the first place he invited his uncle and master, Alcetas,
to come to him, under the pretence that he would restore to him the
throne which Perdiccas has usurped, and after entertaining him and his
son Alexander, who was his own cousin, and nearly of an age with
him, and making them drunk, he threw them into a waggon and carried
them off by night, and slew them, and got both of them out of the way;
and when he had done all this wickedness he never discovered that he
was the most miserable of all men, was very far from repenting:
shall I tell you how he showed his remorse? he had a younger
brother, a child of seven years old, who was the legitimate son of
Perdiccas, and to him of right the kingdom belonged; Archelaus,
however, had no mind to bring him up as he ought and restore the
kingdom to him; that was not his notion of happiness; but not long
afterwards he threw him into a well and drowned him, and declared to
his mother Cleopatra that he had fallen in while running after a
goose, and had been killed. And now as he is the greatest criminal
of all the Macedonians, he may be supposed to be the most miserable
and not the happiest of them, and I dare say that there are many
Athenians, and you would be at the head of them, who would rather be
any other Macedonian than Archelaus!

  Soc. I praised you at first, Polus, for being a rhetorician rather
than a reasoner. And this, as I suppose, is the sort of argument
with which you fancy that a child might refute me, and by which I
stand refuted when I say that the unjust man is not happy. But, my
good friend, where is the refutation? I cannot admit a word which
you have been saying.

  Pol. That is because you will not; for you surely must think as I
do.

  Soc. Not so, my simple friend, but because you will refute me
after the manner which rhetoricians practise in courts of law. For
there the one party think that they refute the other when they bring
forward a number of witnesses of good repute in proof of their
allegations, and their adversary has only a single one or none at all.
But this kind of proof is of no value where truth is the aim; a man
may often be sworn down by a multitude of false witnesses who have a
great air of respectability. And in this argument nearly every one,
Athenian and stranger alike, would be on your side, if you should
bring witnesses in disproof of my statement-you may, if you will,
summon Nicias the son of Niceratus, and let his brothers, who gave the
row of tripods which stand in the precincts of Dionysus, come with
him; or you may summon Aristocrates, the son of Scellius, who is the
giver of that famous offering which is at Delphi; summon, if you will,
the whole house of Pericles, or any other great Athenian family whom
you choose-they will all agree with you: I only am left alone and
cannot agree, for you do not convince me; although you produce many
false witnesses against me, in the hope of depriving me of my
inheritance, which is the truth. But I consider that nothing worth
speaking of will have been effected by me unless I make you the one
witness of my words; nor by you, unless you make me the one witness of
yours; no matter about the rest of the world. For there are two ways
of refutation, one which is yours and that of the world in general;
but mine is of another sort-let us compare them, and see in what
they differ. For, indeed, we are at issue about matters which to
know is honourable and not to know disgraceful; to know or not to know
happiness and misery-that is the chief of them. And what knowledge can
be nobler? or what ignorance more disgraceful than this? And therefore
I will begin by asking you whether you do not think that a man who
is unjust and doing injustice can be happy, seeing that you think
Archelaus unjust, and yet happy? May I assume this to be your opinion?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. But I say that this is an impossibility-here is one point about
which we are at issue:-very good. And do you mean to say also that
if he meets with retribution and punishment he will still be happy?

  Pol. Certainly not; in that case he will be most miserable.

  Soc. On the other hand, if the unjust be not punished, then,
according to you, he will be happy?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. But in my opinion, Polus, the unjust or doer of unjust
actions is miserable in any case,-more miserable, however, if he be
not punished and does not meet with retribution, and less miserable if
he be punished and meets with retribution at the hands of gods and
men.

  Pol. You are maintaining a strange doctrine, Socrates.

  Soc. I shall try to make you agree with me, O my friend, for as a
friend I regard you. Then these are the points at issue between us-are
they not? I was saying that to do is worse than to suffer injustice?

  Pol. Exactly so.

  Soc. And you said the opposite?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. I said also that the wicked are miserable, and you refuted me?

  Pol. By Zeus, I did.

  Soc. In your own opinion, Polus.

  Pol. Yes, and I rather suspect that I was in the right.

  Soc. You further said that the wrong-doer is happy if he be
unpunished?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And I affirm that he is most miserable, and that those who
are punished are less miserable-are you going to refute this
proposition also?

  Pol. A proposition which is harder of refutation than the other,
Socrates.

  Soc. Say rather, Polus, impossible; for who can refute the truth?

  Pol. What do you mean? If a man is detected in an unjust attempt
to make himself a tyrant, and when detected is racked, mutilated,
has his eyes burned out, and after having had all sorts of great
injuries inflicted on him, and having seen his wife and children
suffer the like, is at last impaled or tarred and burned alive, will
he be happier than if he escape and become a tyrant, and continue
all through life doing what he likes and holding the reins of
government, the envy and admiration both of citizens and strangers? Is
that the paradox which, as you say, cannot be refuted?

  Soc. There again, noble Polus, you are raising hobgoblins instead of
refuting me; just now you were calling witnesses against me. But
please to refresh my memory a little; did you say-"in an unjust
attempt to make himself a tyrant"?

  Pol. Yes, I did.

  Soc. Then I say that neither of them will be happier than the
other-neither he who unjustly acquires a tyranny, nor he who suffers
in the attempt, for of two miserables one cannot be the happier, but
that he who escapes and becomes a tyrant is the more miserable of
the two. Do you laugh, Polus? Well, this is a new kind of
refutation-when any one says anything, instead of refuting him to
laugh at him.

  Pol. But do you not think, Socrates, that you have been sufficiently
refuted, when you say that which no human being will allow? Ask the
company.

  Soc. O Polus, I am not a public man, and only last year, when my
tribe were serving as Prytanes, and it became my duty as their
president to take the votes, there was a laugh at me, because I was
unable to take them. And as I failed then, you must not ask me to
count the suffrages of the company now; but if, as I was saying, you
have no better argument than numbers, let me have a turn, and do you
make trial of the sort of proof which, as I think, is required; for
I shall produce one witness only of the truth of my words, and he is
the person with whom I am arguing; his suffrage I know how to take;
but with the many I have nothing to do, and do not even address myself
to them. May I ask then whether you will answer in turn and have
your words put to the proof? For I certainly think that I and you
and every man do really believe, that to do is a greater evil than
to suffer injustice: and not to be punished than to be punished.

  Pol. And I should say neither I, nor any man: would you yourself,
for example, suffer rather than do injustice?

  Soc. Yes, and you, too; I or any man would.

  Pol. Quite the reverse; neither you, nor I, nor any man.

  Soc. But will you answer?

  Pol. To be sure, I will-for I am curious to hear what you can have
to say.

  Soc. Tell me, then, and you will know, and let us suppose that I
am beginning at the beginning: which of the two, Polus, in your
opinion, is the worst?-to do injustice or to suffer?

  Pol. I should say that suffering was worst.

  Soc. And which is the greater disgrace?-Answer.

  Pol. To do.

  Soc. And the greater disgrace is the greater evil?

  Pol. Certainly not.

  Soc. I understand you to say, if I am not mistaken, that the
honourable is not the same as the good, or the disgraceful as the
evil?

  Pol. Certainly not.

  Soc. Let me ask a question of you: When you speak of beautiful
things, such as bodies, colours, figures, sounds, institutions, do you
not call them beautiful in reference to some standard: bodies, for
example, are beautiful in proportion as they are useful, or as the
sight of them gives pleasure to the spectators; can you give any other
account of personal beauty?

  Pol. I cannot.

  Soc. And you would say of figures or colours generally that they
were beautiful, either by reason of the pleasure which they give, or
of their use, or both?

  Pol. Yes, I should.

  Soc. And you would call sounds and music beautiful for the same
reason?

  Pol. I should.

  Soc. Laws and institutions also have no beauty in them except in
so far as they are useful or pleasant or both?

  Pol. I think not.

  Soc. And may not the same be said of the beauty of knowledge?

  Pol. To be sure, Socrates; and I very much approve of your measuring
beauty by the standard of pleasure and utility.

  Soc. And deformity or disgrace may be equally measured by the
opposite standard of pain and evil?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. Then when of two beautiful things one exceeds in beauty, the
measure of the excess is to be taken in one or both of these; that
is to say, in pleasure or utility or both?

  Pol. Very true.

  Soc. And of two deformed things, that which exceeds in deformity
or disgrace, exceeds either in pain or evil-must it not be so?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. But then again, what was the observation which you just now
made, about doing and suffering wrong? Did you not say, that suffering
wrong was more evil, and doing wrong more disgraceful?

  Pol. I did.

  Soc. Then, if doing wrong is more disgraceful than suffering, the
more disgraceful must be more painful and must exceed in pain or in
evil or both: does not that also follow?

  Pol. Of course.

  Soc. First, then, let us consider whether the doing of injustice
exceeds the suffering in the consequent pain: Do the injurers suffer
more than the injured?

  Pol. No, Socrates; certainly not.

  Soc. Then they do not exceed in pain?

  Pol. No.

  Soc. But if not in pain, then not in both?

  Pol. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then they can only exceed in the other?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. That is to say, in evil?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. Then doing injustice will have an excess of evil, and will
therefore be a greater evil than suffering injustice?

  Pol. Clearly.

  Soc. But have not you and the world already agreed that to do
injustice is more disgraceful than to suffer?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And that is now discovered to be more evil?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And would you prefer a greater evil or a greater dishonour to a
less one? Answer, Polus, and fear not; for you will come to no harm if
you nobly resign yourself into the healing hand of the argument as
to a physician without shrinking, and either say "Yes" or "No" to me.

  Pol. I should say "No."

  Soc. Would any other man prefer a greater to a less evil?

  Pol. No, not according to this way of putting the case, Socrates.

  Soc. Then I said truly, Polus that neither you, nor I, nor any
man, would rather, do than suffer injustice; for to do injustice is
the greater evil of the two.

  Pol. That is the conclusion.

  Soc. You see, Polus, when you compare the two kinds of
refutations, how unlike they are. All men, with the exception of
myself, are of your way of thinking; but your single assent and
witness are enough for me-I have no need of any other, I take your
suffrage, and am regardless of the rest. Enough of this, and now let
us proceed to the next question; which is, Whether the greatest of
evils to a guilty man is to suffer punishment, as you supposed, or
whether to escape punishment is not a greater evil, as I supposed.
Consider:-You would say that to suffer punishment is another name
for being justly corrected when you do wrong?

  Pol. I should.

  Soc. And would you not allow that all just things are honourable
in so far as they are just? Please to reflect, and, tell me your
opinion.

  Pol. Yes, Socrates, I think that they are.

  Soc. Consider again:-Where there is an agent, must there not also be
a patient?

  Pol. I should say so.

  Soc. And will not the patient suffer that which the agent does,
and will not the suffering have the quality of the action? I mean, for
example, that if a man strikes, there must be something which is
stricken?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And if the striker strikes violently or quickly, that which
is struck will he struck violently or quickly?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And the suffering to him who is stricken is of the same
nature as the act of him who strikes?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And if a man burns, there is something which is burned?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And if he burns in excess or so as to cause pain, the thing
burned will be burned in the same way?

  Pol. Truly.

  Soc. And if he cuts, the same argument holds-there will be something
cut?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And if the cutting be great or deep or such as will cause pain,
the cut will be of the same nature?

  Pol. That is evident.

  Soc. Then you would agree generally to the universal proposition
which I was just now asserting: that the affection of the patient
answers to the affection of the agent?

  Pol. I agree.

  Soc. Then, as this is admitted, let me ask whether being punished is
suffering or acting?

  Pol. Suffering, Socrates; there can be no doubt of that.

  Soc. And suffering implies an agent?

  Pol. Certainly, Socrates; and he is the punisher.

  Soc. And he who punishes rightly, punishes justly?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And therefore he acts justly?

  Pol. Justly.

  Soc. Then he who is punished and suffers retribution, suffers
justly?

  Pol. That is evident.

  Soc. And that which is just has been admitted to be honourable?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. Then the punisher does what is honourable, and the punished
suffers what is honourable?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And if what is honourable, then what is good, for the
honourable is either pleasant or useful?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. Then he who is punished suffers what is good?

  Pol. That is true.

  Soc. Then he is benefited?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. Do I understand you to mean what I mean by the term
"benefited"? I mean, that if he be justly punished his soul is
improved.

  Pol. Surely.

  Soc. Then he who is punished is delivered from the evil of his soul?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And is he not then delivered from the greatest evil? Look at
the matter in this way:-In respect of a man's estate, do you see any
greater evil than poverty?

  Pol. There is no greater evil.

  Soc. Again, in a man's bodily frame, you would say that the evil
is weakness and disease and deformity?

  Pol. I should.

  Soc. And do you not imagine that the soul likewise has some evil
of her own?

  Pol. Of course.

  Soc. And this you would call injustice and ignorance and
cowardice, and the like?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. So then, in mind, body, and estate, which are three, you have
pointed out three corresponding evils-injustice, disease, poverty?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And which of the evils is the most disgraceful?-Is not the most
disgraceful of them injustice, and in general the evil of the soul?

  Pol. By far the most.

  Soc. And if the most disgraceful, then also the worst?

  Pol. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I mean to say, that is most disgraceful has been already
admitted to be most painful or hurtful, or both.

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And now injustice and all evil in the soul has been admitted by
to be most disgraceful?

  Pol. It has been admitted.

  Soc. And most disgraceful either because most painful and causing
excessive pain, or most hurtful, or both?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And therefore to be unjust and intemperate, and cowardly and
ignorant, is more painful than to be poor and sick?

  Pol. Nay, Socrates; the painfulness does not appear to me to
follow from your premises.

  Soc. Then, if, as you would argue, not more painful, the evil of the
soul is of all evils the most disgraceful; and the excess of
disgrace must be caused by some preternatural greatness, or
extraordinary hurtfulness of the evil.

  Pol. Clearly.

  Soc. And that which exceeds most in hurtfulness will be the greatest
of evils?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. Then injustice and intemperance, and in general the depravity
of the soul, are the greatest of evils!

  Pol. That is evident.

  Soc. Now, what art is there which delivers us from poverty? Does not
the art of making money?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And what art frees us from disease? Does not the art of
medicine?

  Pol. Very true.

  Soc. And what from vice and injustice? If you are not able to answer
at once, ask yourself whither we go with the sick, and to whom we take
them.

  Pol. To the physicians, Socrates.

  Soc. And to whom do we go with the unjust and intemperate?

  Pol. To the judges, you mean.

  Soc. -Who are to punish them?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And do not those who rightly punish others, punish them in
accordance with a certain rule of justice?

  Pol. Clearly.

  Soc. Then the art of money-making frees a man from poverty; medicine
from disease; and justice from intemperance and injustice?

  Pol. That is evident.

  Soc. Which, then, is the best of these three?

  Pol. Will you enumerate them?

  Soc. Money-making, medicine, and justice.

  Pol. Justice, Socrates, far excels the two others.

  Soc. And justice, if the best, gives the greatest pleasure or
advantage or both?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. But is the being healed a pleasant thing, and are those who are
being healed pleased?

  Pol. I think not.

  Soc. A useful thing, then?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. Yes, because the patient is delivered from a great evil; and
this is the advantage of enduring the pain-that you get well?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. And would he be the happier man in his bodily condition, who is
healed, or who never was out of health?

  Pol. Clearly he who was never out of health.

  Soc. Yes; for happiness surely does not consist in being delivered
from evils, but in never having had them.

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And suppose the case of two persons who have some evil in their
bodies, and that one of them is healed and delivered from evil, and
another is not healed, but retains the evil-which of them is the
most miserable?

  Pol. Clearly he who is not healed.

  Soc. And was not punishment said by us to be a deliverance from
the greatest of evils, which is vice?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And justice punishes us, and makes us more just, and is the
medicine of our vice?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. He, then, has the first place in the scale of happiness who has
never had vice in his soul; for this has been shown to be the greatest
of evils.

  Pol. Clearly.

  Soc. And he has the second place, who is delivered from vice?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. That is to say, he who receives admonition and rebuke and
punishment?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. Then he lives worst, who, having been unjust, has no
deliverance from injustice?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. That is, he lives worst who commits the greatest crimes, and
who, being the most unjust of men, succeeds in escaping rebuke or
correction or punishment; and this, as you say, has been
accomplished by Archelaus and other tyrants and rhetoricians and
potentates?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. May not their way of proceeding, my friend, be compared to
the conduct of a person who is afflicted with the worst of diseases
and yet contrives not to pay the penalty to the physician for his sins
against his constitution, and will not be cured, because, like a
child, he is afraid of the pain of being burned or cut:-Is not that
a parallel case?

  Pol. Yes, truly.

  Soc. He would seem as if he did not know the nature of health and
bodily vigour; and if we are right, Polus, in our previous
conclusions, they are in a like case who strive to evade justice,
which they see to be painful, but are blind to the advantage which
ensues from it, not knowing how far more miserable a companion a
diseased soul is than a diseased body; a soul, I say, which is corrupt
and unrighteous and unholy. And hence they do all that they can to
avoid punishment and to avoid being released from the greatest of
evils; they provide themselves with money and friends, and cultivate
to the utmost their powers of persuasion. But if we, Polus, are right,
do you see what follows, or shall we draw out the consequences in
form?

  Pol. If you please.

  Soc. Is it not a fact that injustice, and the doing of injustice, is
the greatest of evils?

  Pol. That is quite clear.

  Soc. And further, that to suffer punishment is the way to be
released from this evil?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And not to suffer, is to perpetuate the evil?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. To do wrong, then, is second only in the scale of evils; but to
do wrong and not to be punished, is first and greatest of all?

  Pol. That is true.

  Soc. Well, and was not this the point in dispute, my friend? You
deemed Archelaus happy, because he was a very great criminal and
unpunished: I, on the other hand, maintained that he or any other
who like him has done wrong and has not been punished, is, and ought
to be, the most miserable of all men; and that the doer of injustice
is more miserable than the sufferer; and he who escapes punishment,
more miserable than he who suffers.-Was not that what I said?

  Pol. Yes.

  Soc. And it has been proved to be true?

  Pol. Certainly.

  Soc. Well, Polus, but if this is true, where is the great use of
rhetoric? If we admit what has been just now said, every man ought
in every way to guard himself against doing wrong, for he will thereby
suffer great evil?

  Pol. True.

  Soc. And if he, or any one about whom he cares, does wrong, he ought
of his own accord to go where he will be immediately punished; he will
run to the judge, as he would to the physician, in order that the
disease of injustice may not be rendered chronic and become the
incurable cancer of the soul; must we not allow this consequence,
Polus, if our former admissions are to stand:-is any other inference
consistent with them?

  Pol. To that, Socrates, there can be but one answer.

  Soc. Then rhetoric is of no use to us, Polus, in helping a man to
excuse his own injustice, that of his parents or friends, or
children or country; but may be of use to any one who holds that
instead of excusing he ought to accuse-himself above all, and in the
next degree his family or any of his friends who may be doing wrong;
he should bring to light the iniquity and not conceal it, that so
the wrong-doer may suffer and be made whole; and he should even
force himself and others not to shrink, but with closed eyes like
brave men to let the physician operate with knife or searing iron, not
regarding the pain, in the hope of attaining the good and the
honourable; let him who has done things worthy of stripes, allow
himself to be scourged, if of bonds, to be bound, if of a fine, to
be fined, if of exile, to be exiled, if of death, to die, himself
being the first to accuse himself and his relations, and using
rhetoric to this end, that his and their unjust actions may be made
manifest, and that they themselves may be delivered from injustice,
which is the greatest evil. Then, Polus, rhetoric would indeed be
useful. Do you say "Yes" or "No" to that?

  Pol. To me, Socrates, what you are saying appears very strange,
though probably in agreement with your premises.

  Soc. Is not this the conclusion, if the premises are not disproven?

  Pol. Yes; it certainly is.

  Soc. And from the opposite point of view, if indeed it be our duty
to harm another, whether an enemy or not-I except the case of
self-defence-then I have to be upon my guard-but if my enemy injures a
third person, then in every sort of way, by word as well as deed, I
should try to prevent his being punished, or appearing before the
judge; and if he appears, I should contrive that he should escape, and
not suffer punishment: if he has stolen a sum of money, let him keep
what he has stolen and spend it on him and his, regardless of religion
and justice; and if he has done things worthy of death, let him not
die, but rather be immortal in his wickedness; or, if this is not
possible, let him at any rate be allowed to live as long as he can.
For such purposes, Polus, rhetoric may be useful, but is of small if
of any use to him who is not intending to commit injustice; at
least, there was no such use discovered by us in the previous
discussion.

  Cal. Tell me, Chaerephon, is Socrates in earnest, or is he joking?

  Chaer. I should say, Callicles, that he is in most profound earnest;
but you may well ask him

  Cal. By the gods, and I will. Tell me, Socrates, are you in earnest,
or only in jest? For if you are in earnest, and what you say is
true, is not the whole of human life turned upside down; and are we
not doing, as would appear, in everything the opposite of what we
ought to be doing?

  Soc. O Callicles, if there were not some community of feelings among
mankind, however varying in different persons-I mean to say, if
every man's feelings were peculiar to himself and were not shared by
the rest of his species-I do not see how we could ever communicate our
impressions to one another. I make this remark because I perceive that
you and I have a common feeling. For we are lovers both, and both of
us have two loves apiece:-I am the lover of Alcibiades, the son of
Cleinias-I and of philosophy; and you of the Athenian Demus, and of
Demus the son of Pyrilampes. Now, I observe that you, with all your
cleverness, do not venture to contradict your favourite in any word or
opinion of his; but as he changes you change, backwards and
forwards. When the Athenian Demus denies anything that you are
saying in the assembly, you go over to his opinion; and you do the
same with Demus, the fair young son of Pyrilampes. For you have not
the power to resist the words and ideas of your loves; and is a person
were to express surprise at the strangeness of what you say from
time to time when under their influence, you would probably reply to
him, if you were honest, that you cannot help saying what your loves
say unless they are prevented; and that you can only be silent when
they are. Now you must understand that my words are an echo too, and
therefore you need not wonder at me; but if you want to silence me,
silence philosophy, who is my love, for she is always telling me
what I am telling you, my friend; neither is she capricious like my
other love, for the son of Cleinias says one thing to-day and
another thing to-morrow, but philosophy is always true. She is the
teacher at whose words you are. now wondering, and you have heard
her yourself. Her you must refute, and either show, as I was saying,
that to do injustice and to escape punishment is not the worst of
all evils; or, if you leave her word unrefuted, by the dog the god
of Egypt, I declare, O Callicles, that Callicles will never be at
one with himself, but that his whole life, will be a discord. And yet,
my friend, I would rather that my lyre should be inharmonious, and
that there should be no music in the chorus which I provided; aye,
or that the whole world should be at odds with me, and oppose me,
rather than that I myself should be at odds with myself, and
contradict myself.

  Cal. O Socrates, you are a regular declaimer, and seem to be running
riot in the argument. And now you are declaiming in this way because
Polus has fallen into the same error himself of which he accused
Gorgias:-for he said that when Gorgias was asked by you, whether, if
some one came to him who wanted to learn rhetoric, and did not know
justice, he would teach him justice, Gorgias in his modesty replied
that he would, because he thought that mankind in general would be
displeased if he answered "No"; and then in consequence of this
admission, Gorgias was compelled to contradict himself, that being
just the sort of thing in which you delight. Whereupon Polus laughed
at you deservedly, as I think; but now he has himself fallen into
the same trap. I cannot say very much for his wit when he conceded
to you that to do is more dishonourable than to suffer injustice,
for this was the admission which led to his being entangled by you;
and because he was too modest to say what he thought, he had his mouth
stopped. For the truth is, Socrates, that you, who pretend to be
engaged in the pursuit of truth, are appealing now to the popular
and vulgar notions of right, which are not natural, but only
conventional. Convention and nature are generally at variance with one
another: and hence, if a person is too modest to say what he thinks,
he is compelled to contradict himself; and you, in your ingenuity
perceiving the advantage to be thereby gained, slyly ask of him who is
arguing conventionally a question which is to be determined by the
rule of nature; and if he is talking of the rule of nature, you slip
away to custom: as, for instance, you did in this very discussion
about doing and suffering injustice. When Polus was speaking of the
conventionally dishonourable, you assailed him from the point of
view of nature; for by the rule of nature, to suffer injustice is
the greater disgrace because the greater evil; but conventionally,
to do evil is the more disgraceful. For the suffering of injustice
is hot the part of a man, but of a slave, who indeed had better die
than live; since when he is wronged and trampled upon, he is unable to
help himself, or any other about whom he cares. The reason, as I
conceive, is that the makers of laws are the majority who are weak;
and they, make laws and distribute praises and censures with a view to
themselves and to their own interests; and they: terrify the
stronger sort of men, and those who are able to get the better of them
in order that they may not get the better of them; and they say,
that dishonesty is shameful and unjust; meaning, by the word
injustice, the desire of a man to have more than his neighbours; for
knowing their own inferiority, I suspect that they are too glad of
equality. And therefore the endeavour to have more than the many, is
conventionally said to be shameful and unjust, and is called
injustice, whereas nature herself intimates that it is just for the
better to have more than the worse, the more powerful than the weaker;
and in many ways she shows, among men as well as among animals, and
indeed among whole cities and races, that justice consists in the
superior ruling over and having more than the inferior. For on what
principle of justice did Xerxes invade Hellas, or his father the
Scythians? (not to speak of numberless other examples). Nay, but these
are the men who act according to nature; yes, by Heaven, and according
to the law of nature: not, perhaps, according to that artificial
law, which we invent and impose upon our fellows, of whom we take
the best and strongest from their youth upwards, and tame them like
young lions, -charming them with the sound of the voice, and saying to
them, that with equality they must be content, and that the equal is
the honourable and the just. But if there were a man who had
sufficient force, he would shake off and break through, and escape
from all this; he would trample under foot all our formulas and spells
and charms, and all our laws which are against nature: the slave would
rise in rebellion and be lord over us, and the light of natural
justice would shine forth. And this I take to be the sentiment of
Pindar, when he says in his poem, that

   Law is the king of all, of mortals as well as of immortals;

this, as he says,

   Makes might to be right, doing violence with highest hand; as I
infer from the deeds of Heracles, for without buying them-

-I do not remember the exact words, but the meaning is, that without
buying them, and without their being given to him, he carried off
the oxen of Geryon, according to the law of natural right, and that
the oxen and other possessions of the weaker and inferior properly
belong to the stronger and superior. And this is true, as you may
ascertain, if you will leave philosophy and go on to higher things:
for philosophy, Socrates, if pursued in moderation and at the proper
age, is an elegant accomplishment, but too much philosophy is the ruin
of human life. Even if a man has good parts, still, if he carries
philosophy into later life, he is necessarily ignorant of all those
things which a gentleman and a person of honour ought to know; he is
inexperienced in the laws of the State, and in the language which
ought to be used in the dealings of man with man, whether private or
public, and utterly ignorant of the pleasures and desires of mankind
and of human character in general. And people of this sort, when
they betake themselves to politics or business, are as ridiculous as I
imagine the politicians to be, when they make their appearance in
the arena of philosophy. For, as Euripides says,

   Every man shines in that and pursues that, and devotes the greatest
portion of the day to that in which he most excels,

but anything in which he is inferior, he avoids and depreciates, and
praises the opposite partiality to himself, and because he from that
he will thus praise himself. The true principle is to unite them.
Philosophy, as a part of education, is an excellent thing, and there
is no disgrace to a man while he is young in pursuing such a study;
but when he is more advanced in years, the thing becomes ridiculous,
and I feel towards philosophers as I do towards those who lisp and
imitate children. For I love to see a little child, who is not of an
age to speak plainly, lisping at his play; there is an appearance of
grace and freedom in his utterance, which is natural to his childish
years. But when I hear some small creature carefully articulating
its words, I am offended; the sound is disagreeable, and has to my
ears the twang of slavery. So when I hear a man lisping, or see him
playing like a child, his behaviour appears to me ridiculous and
unmanly and worthy of stripes. And I have the same feeling about
students of philosophy; when I see a youth thus engaged-the study
appears to me to be in character, and becoming a man of liberal
education, and him who neglects philosophy I regard as an inferior
man, who will never aspire to anything great or noble. But if I see
him continuing the study in later life, and not leaving off, I
should like to beat him, Socrates; for, as I was saying, such a one,
even though he have good natural parts, becomes effeminate. He flies
from the busy centre and the market-place, in which, as the poet says,
men become distinguished; he creeps into a corner for the rest of
his life, and talks in a whisper with three or four admiring you,
but never speaks out like a freeman in a satisfactory manner. Now I,
Socrates, am very well inclined towards you, and my feeling may be
compared with that of Zethus towards Amphion, in the play of
Euripides, whom I was mentioning just now: for I am disposed to say to
you much what Zethus said to his brother, that you, Socrates, are
careless about the things of which you ought to be careful; and that
you

    Who have a soul so noble, are remarkable for a puerile exterior;

    Neither in a court of justice could you state a case, or give any

        reason or proof, offer valiant counsel on another's behalf.

And you must not be offended, my dear Socrates, for I am speaking
out of good-will towards you, if I ask whether you are not ashamed
of being thus defenceless; which I affirm to be the condition not of
you only but of all those who will carry the study of philosophy too
far. For suppose that some one were to take you, or any one of your
sort, off to prison, declaring that you had done wrong when you had
done no wrong, you must allow that you would not know what to
do:-there you would stand giddy and gaping, and not having a word to
say; and when you went up before the Court, even if the accuser were a
poor creature and not good for much, you would die if he were disposed
to claim the penalty of death. And yet, Socrates, what is the value of

  An art which converts a man of sense into a fool,

who is helpless, and has no power to save either himself or others,
when he is in the greatest danger and is going to be despoiled by
his enemies of all his goods, and has to live, simply deprived of
his rights of citizenship?-he being a man who, if I may use the
expression, may be boxed on the ears with impunity. Then, my good
friend, take my advice, and refute no more:

    Learn the philosophy of business, and acquire the reputation

        of wisdom.

    But leave to others these niceties,

whether they are to be described as follies or absurdities:

    For they will only

    Give you poverty for the inmate of your dwelling.

  Cease, then, emulating these paltry splitters of words, and
emulate only the man of substance and honour, who is well to do.

  Soc. If my soul, Callicles, were made of gold, should I not
rejoice to discover one of those stones with which they test gold, and
the very best possible one to which I might bring my soul; and if
the stone and I agreed in approving of her training, then I should
know that I was in a satisfactory state, and that no other test was
needed by me.

  Cal. What is your meaning, Socrates?

  Soc. I will tell you; I think that I have found in you the desired
touchstone.

  Cal. Why?

  Soc. Because I am sure that if you agree with me in any of the
opinions which my soul forms, I have at last found the truth indeed.
For I consider that if a man is to make a complete trial of the good
or evil of the soul, he ought to have three qualities-knowledge,
good-will, outspokenness, which are all possessed by you. Many whom
I meet are unable to make trial of me, because they are not wise as
you are; others are wise, but they will not tell me the truth, because
they have not the same interest in me which you have; and these two
strangers, Gorgias and Polus, are undoubtedly wise men and my very
good friends, but they are not outspoken enough, and they are too
modest. Why, their modesty is so great that they are driven to
contradict themselves, first one and then the other of them, in the
face of a large company, on matters of the highest moment. But you
have all the qualities in which these others are deficient, having
received an excellent education; to this many Athenians can testify.
And are my friend. Shall I tell you why I think so? I know that you,
Callicles, and Tisander of Aphidnae, and Andron the son of
Androtion, and Nausicydes of the deme of Cholarges, studied
together: there were four of you, and I once heard you advising with
one another as to the extent to which the pursuit of philosophy should
be carried, and, as I know, you came to the conclusion that the
study should not be pushed too much into detail. You were cautioning
one another not to be overwise; you were afraid that too much wisdom
might unconsciously to yourselves be the ruin of you. And now when I
hear you giving the same advice to me which you then gave to your most
intimate friends, I have a sufficient evidence of your real goodwill
to me. And of the frankness of your nature and freedom from modesty
I am assured by yourself, and the assurance is confirmed by your
last speech. Well then, the inference in the present case clearly
is, that if you agree with me in an argument about any point, that
point will have been sufficiently tested by us, and will not require
to be submitted to any further test. For you could not have agreed
with me, either from lack of knowledge or from superfluity of modesty,
nor yet from a desire to deceive me, for you are my friend, as you
tell me yourself. And therefore when you and I are agreed, the
result will be the attainment of perfect truth. Now there is no nobler
enquiry, Callicles, than that which you censure me for making,-What
ought the character of a man to be, and what his pursuits, and how far
is he to go, both in maturer years and in youth? For be assured that
if I err in my own conduct I do not err intentionally, but from
ignorance. Do not then desist from advising me, now that you have
begun, until I have learned clearly what this is which I am to
practise, and how I may acquire it. And if you find me assenting to
your words, and hereafter not doing that to which I assented, call
me "dolt," and deem me unworthy of receiving further instruction. Once
more, then, tell me what you and Pindar mean by natural justice: Do
you not mean that the superior should take the property of the
inferior by force; that the better should rule the worse, the noble
have more than the mean? Am I not right in my recollection?

  Cal. Yes; that is what I was saying, and so I still aver.

  Soc. And do you mean by the better the same as the superior? for I
could not make out what you were saying at the time-whether you
meant by the superior the stronger, and that the weaker must obey
the stronger, as you seemed to imply when you said that great cities
attack small ones in accordance with-natural right, because they are
superior and stronger, as though the superior and stronger and
better were the same; or whether the better may be also the inferior
and weaker, and the superior the worse, or whether better is to be
defined in the same way as superior: this is the point which I want to
have cleared up. Are the superior and better and stronger the same
or different?

  Cal. I say unequivocally that they are the same.

  Soc. Then the many are by nature to the one, against whom, as you
were saying, they make the laws?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. Then the laws of the many are the laws of the superior?

  Cal. Very true.

  Soc. Then they are the laws of the better; for the superior class
are far better, as you were saying?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And since they are superior, the laws which are made by them
are by nature good?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And are not the many of opinion, as you were lately saying,
that justice is equality, and that to do is more disgraceful than to
suffer injustice?-is that so or not? Answer, Callicles, and let no
modesty be: found to come in the way; do the many think, or do they
not think thus?-I must beg of you to answer, in order that if you
agree with me I may fortify myself by the assent of so competent an
authority.

  Cal. Yes; the opinion of the many is what you say.

  Soc. Then not only custom but nature also affirms that to do is more
disgraceful than to suffer injustice, and that justice is equality; so
that you seem to have been wrong in your former assertion, when
accusing me you said that nature and custom are opposed, and that I,
knowing this, was dishonestly playing between them, appealing to
custom when the argument is about nature, and to nature when the
argument is about custom?

  Cal. This man will never cease talking nonsense. At your age,
Socrates, are you not ashamed to be catching at words and chuckling
over some verbal slip? do you not see-have I not told you already,
that by superior I mean better: do you imagine me to say, that if a
rabble of slaves and nondescripts, who are of no use except perhaps
for their physical strength, get together their ipsissima verba are
laws?

  Soc. Ho! my philosopher, is that your line?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. I was thinking, Callicles, that something of the kind must have
been in your mind, and that is why I repeated the question-What is the
superior? I wanted to know clearly what you meant; for you surely do
not think that two men are better than one, or that your slaves are
better than you because they are stronger? Then please to begin again,
and tell me who the better are, if they are not the stronger; and I
will ask you, great Sir, to be a little milder in your instructions,
or I shall have to run away from you.

  Cal. You are ironical.

  Soc. No, by the hero Zethus, Callicles, by whose aid you were just
now saying many ironical things against me, I am not:-tell me, then,
whom you mean, by the better?

  Cal. I mean the more excellent.

  Soc. Do you not see that you are yourself using words which have
no meaning and that you are explaining nothing?-will you tell me
whether you mean by the better and superior the wiser, or if not,
whom?

  Cal. Most assuredly, I do mean the wiser.

  Soc. Then according to you, one wise man may often be superior to
ten thousand fools, and he ought them, and they ought to be his
subjects, and he ought to have more than they should. This is what I
believe that you mean (and you must not suppose that I am
word-catching), if you allow that the one is superior to the ten
thousand?

  Cal. Yes; that is what I mean, and that is what I conceive to be
natural justice-that the better and wiser should rule have more than
the inferior.

  Soc. Stop there, and let me ask you what you would say in this case:
Let us suppose that we are all together as we are now; there are
several of us, and we have a large common store of meats and drinks,
and there are all sorts of persons in our company having various
degrees of strength and weakness, and one of us, being physician, is
wiser in the matter of food than all the rest, and he is probably
stronger than some and not so strong as others of us-will he not,
being wiser, be also better than we are, and our superior in this
matter of food?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. Either, then, he will have a larger share of the meats and
drinks, because he is better, or he will have the distribution of
all of them by reason of his authority, but he will not expend or make
use of a larger share of them on his own person, or if he does, he
will be punished-his share will exceed that of some, and be less
than that of others, and if he be the weakest of all, he being the
best of all will have the smallest share of all, Callicles:-am I not
right, my friend?

  Cal. You talk about meats and drinks and physicians and other
nonsense; I am not speaking of them.

  Soc. Well, but do you admit that the wiser is the better? Answer
"Yes" or "No."

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And ought not the better to have a larger share?

  Cal. Not of meats and drinks.

  Soc. I understand: then, perhaps, of coats -the skilfullest weaver
ought to have the largest coat, and the greatest number of them, and
go about clothed in the best and finest of them?

  Cal. Fudge about coats!

  Soc. Then the skilfullest and best in making shoes ought to have the
advantage in shoes; the shoemaker, clearly, should walk about in the
largest shoes, and have the greatest number of them?

  Cal. Fudge about shoes! What nonsense are you talking?

  Soc. Or, if this is not your meaning, perhaps you would say that the
wise and good and true husbandman should actually have a larger
share of seeds, and have as much seed as possible for his own land?

  Cal. How you go on, always talking in the same way, Socrates!

  Soc. Yes, Callicles, and also about the same things.

  Cal. Yes, by the Gods, you are literally always talking of
cobblers and fullers and cooks and doctors, as if this had to do
with our argument.

  Soc. But why will you not tell me in what a man must be superior and
wiser in order to claim a larger share; will you neither accept a
suggestion, nor offer one?

  Cal. I have already told you. In the first place, I mean by
superiors not cobblers or cooks, but wise politicians who understand
the administration of a state, and who are not only wise, but also
valiant and able to carry. out their designs, and not the men to faint
from want of soul.

  Soc. See now, most excellent Callicles, how different my charge
against you is from that which you bring against me, for you
reproach me with always saying the same; but I reproach you with never
saying the same about the same things, for at one time you were
defining the better and the superior to be the stronger, then again as
the wiser, and now you bring forward a new notion; the superior and
the better are now declared by you to be the more courageous: I
wish, my good friend, that you would tell me once for all, whom you
affirm to be the better and superior, and in what they are better?

  Cal. I have already told you that I mean those who are wise and
courageous in the administration of a state-they ought to be the
rulers of their states, and justice consists in their having more than
their subjects.

  Soc. But whether rulers or subjects will they or will they not
have more than themselves, my friend?

  Cal. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean that every man is his own ruler; but perhaps you think
that there is no necessity for him to rule himself; he is only
required to rule others?

  Cal. What do you mean by his "ruling over himself"?

  Soc. A simple thing enough; just what is commonly said, that a man
should be temperate and master of himself, and ruler of his own
pleasures and passions.

  Cal. What innocence! you mean those fools-the temperate?

  Soc. Certainly:-any one may know that to be my meaning.

  Cal. Quite so, Socrates; and they are really fools, for how can a
man be happy who is the servant of anything? On the contrary, I
plainly assert, that he who would truly live ought to allow his
desires to wax to the uttermost, and not to chastise them; but when
they have grown to their greatest he should have courage and
intelligence to minister to them and to satisfy all his longings.
And this I affirm to be natural justice and nobility. To this
however the many cannot attain; and they blame the strong man
because they are ashamed of their own weakness, which they desire to
conceal, and hence they say that intemperance is base. As I have
remarked already, they enslave the nobler natures, and being unable to
satisfy their pleasures, they praise temperance and justice out of
their own cowardice. For if a man had been originally the son of a
king, or had a nature capable of acquiring an empire or a tyranny or
sovereignty, what could be more truly base or evil than temperance--to
a man like him, I say, who might freely be enjoying every good, and
has no one to stand in his way, and yet has admitted custom and reason
and the opinion of other men to be lords over him?-must not he be in a
miserable plight whom the reputation of justice and temperance hinders
from giving more to his friends than to his enemies, even though he be
a ruler in his city? Nay, Socrates, for you profess to be a votary
of the truth, and the truth is this:-that luxury and intemperance
and licence, if they be provided with means, are virtue and
happiness-all the rest is a mere bauble, agreements contrary to
nature, foolish talk of men, nothing worth.

  Soc. There is a noble freedom, Callicles, in your way of approaching
the argument; for what you say is what the rest of the world think,
but do not like to say. And I must beg of you to persevere, that the
true rule of human life may become manifest. Tell me, then:-you say,
do you not, that in the rightly-developed man the passions ought not
to be controlled, but that we should let them grow to the utmost and
somehow or other satisfy them, and that this is virtue?

  Cal. Yes; I do.

  Soc. Then those who want nothing are not truly said to be happy?

  Cal. No indeed, for then stones and dead men would be the happiest
of all.

  Soc. But surely life according to your view is an awful thing; and
indeed I think that Euripides may have been right in saying,

     Who knows if life be not death and death life;

and that we are very likely dead; I have heard a philosopher say
that at this moment we are actually dead, and that the body (soma)
is our tomb (sema), and that the part of the soul which is the seat of
the desires is liable to be tossed about by words and blown up and
down; and some ingenious person, probably a Sicilian or an Italian,
playing with the word, invented a tale in which he called the
soul-because of its believing and make-believe nature-a vessel, and
the ignorant he called the uninitiated or leaky, and the place in
the souls of the uninitiated in which the desires are seated, being
the intemperate and incontinent part, he compared to a vessel full
of holes, because it can never be satisfied. He is not of your way
of thinking, Callicles, for he declares, that of all the souls in
Hades, meaning the invisible world these uninitiated or leaky
persons are the most miserable, and that they pour water into a vessel
which is full of holes out of a colander which is similarly
perforated. The colander, as my informer assures me, is the soul,
and the soul which he compares to a colander is the soul of the
ignorant, which is likewise full of holes, and therefore
incontinent, owing to a bad memory and want of faith. These notions
are strange enough, but they show the principle which, if I can, I
would fain prove to you; that you should change your mind, and,
instead of the intemperate and insatiate life, choose that which is
orderly and sufficient and has a due provision for daily needs. Do I
make any impression on you, and are you coming over to the opinion
that the orderly are happier than the intemperate? Or do I fail to
persuade you, and, however many tales I rehearse to you, do you
continue of the same opinion still?

  Cal. The latter, Socrates, is more like the truth.

  Soc. Well, I will tell you another image, which comes out of the
same school:-Let me request you to consider how far you would accept
this as an account of the two lives of the temperate and intemperate
in a figure:-There are two men, both of whom have a number of casks;
the one man has his casks sound and full, one of wine, another of
honey, and a third of milk, besides others filled with other
liquids, and the streams which fill them are few and scanty, and he
can only obtain them with a great deal of toil and difficulty; but
when his casks are once filled he has need to feed them anymore, and
has no further trouble with them or care about them. The other, in
like manner, can procure streams, though not without difficulty; but
his vessels are leaky and unsound, and night and day he is compelled
to be filling them, and if he pauses for a moment, he is in an agony
of pain. Such are their respective lives:-And now would you say that
the life of the intemperate is happier than that of the temperate?
Do I not convince you that the opposite is the truth?

  Cal. You do not convince me, Socrates, for the one who has filled
himself has no longer any pleasure left; and this, as I was just now
saying, is the life of a stone: he has neither joy nor sorrow after he
is once filled; but the pleasure depends on the superabundance of
the influx.

  Soc. But the more you pour in, the greater the waste; and the
holes must be large for the liquid to escape.

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. The life which you are now depicting is not that of a dead man,
or of a stone, but of a cormorant; you mean that he is to be hungering
and eating?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And he is to be thirsting and drinking?

  Cal. Yes, that is what I mean; he is to have all his desires about
him, and to be able to live happily in the gratification of them.

  Soc. Capital, excellent; go on as you have begun, and have no shame;
I, too, must disencumber myself of shame: and first, will you tell
me whether you include itching and scratching, provided you have
enough of them and pass your life in scratching, in your notion of
happiness?

  Cal. What a strange being you are, Socrates! a regular mob-orator.

  Soc. That was the reason, Callicles, why I scared Polus and Gorgias,
until they were too modest to say what they thought; but you will
not be too modest and will not be scared, for you are a brave man. And
now, answer my question.

  Cal. I answer, that even the scratcher would live pleasantly.

  Soc. And if pleasantly, then also happily?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. But what if the itching is not confined to the head? Shall I
pursue the question? And here, Callicles, I would have you consider
how you would reply if consequences are pressed upon you, especially
if in the last resort you are asked, whether the life of a catamite is
not terrible, foul, miserable? Or would you venture to say, that
they too are happy, if they only get enough of what they want?

  Cal. Are you not ashamed, Socrates, of introducing such topics
into the argument?

  Soc. Well, my fine friend, but am I the introducer of these
topics, or he who says without any qualification that all who feel
pleasure in whatever manner are happy, and who admits of no
distinction between good and bad pleasures? And I would still ask,
whether you say that pleasure and good are the same, or whether
there is some pleasure which is not a good?

  Cal. Well, then, for the sake of consistency, I will say that they
are the same.

  Soc. You are breaking the original agreement, Callicles, and will no
longer be a satisfactory companion in the search after truth, if you
say what is contrary to your real opinion.

  Cal. Why, that is what you are doing too, Socrates.

  Soc. Then we are both doing wrong. Still, my dear friend, I would
ask you to consider whether pleasure, from whatever source derived, is
the good; for, if this be true, then the disagreeable consequences
which have been darkly intimated must follow, and many others.

  Cal. That, Socrates, is only your opinion.

  Soc. And do you, Callicles, seriously maintain what you are saying?

  Cal. Indeed I do.

  Soc. Then, as you are in earnest, shall we proceed with the
argument?

  Cal. By all means.

  Soc. Well, if you are willing to proceed, determine this question
for me:-There is something, I presume, which you would call knowledge?

  Cal. There is.

  Soc. And were you not saying just now, that some courage implied
knowledge?

  Cal. I was.

  Soc. And you were speaking of courage and knowledge as two things
different from one another?

  Cal. Certainly I was.

  Soc. And would you say that pleasure and knowledge are the same,
or not the same?

  Cal. Not the same, O man of wisdom.

  Soc. And would you say that courage differed from pleasure?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. Well, then, let us remember that Callicles, the Acharnian, says
that pleasure and good are the same; but that knowledge and courage
are not the same, either with one another, or with the good.

  Cal. And what does our friend Socrates, of Foxton, say -does he
assent to this, or not?

  Soc. He does not assent; neither will Callicles, when he sees
himself truly. You will admit, I suppose, that good and evil fortune
are opposed to each other?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And if they are opposed to each other, then, like health and
disease, they exclude one another; a man cannot have them both, or
be without them both, at the same time?

  Cal. What do you mean?

  Soc. Take the case of any bodily affection:-a man may have the
complaint in his eyes which is called ophthalmia?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. But he surely cannot have the same eyes well and sound at the
same time?

  Cal. Certainly not.

  Soc. And when he has got rid of his ophthalmia, has he got rid of
the health of his eyes too? Is the final result, that he gets rid of
them both together?

  Cal. Certainly not.

  Soc. That would surely be marvellous and absurd?

  Cal. Very.

  Soc. I suppose that he is affected by them, and gets rid of them
in turns?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And he may have strength and weakness in the same way, by fits?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Or swiftness and slowness?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. And does he have and not have good and happiness, and their
opposites, evil and misery, in a similar alternation?

  Cal. Certainly he has.

  Soc. If then there be anything which a man has and has not at the
same time, clearly that cannot be good and evil-do we agree? Please
not to answer without consideration.

  Cal. I entirely agree.

  Soc. Go back now to our former admissions.-Did you say that to
hunger, I mean the mere state of hunger, was pleasant or painful?

  Cal. I said painful, but that to eat when you are hungry is
pleasant.

  Soc. I know; but still the actual hunger is painful: am I not right?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And thirst, too, is painful?

  Cal. Yes, very.

  Soc. Need I adduce any more instances, or would you agree that all
wants or desires are painful?

  Cal. I agree, and therefore you need not adduce any more instances.

   Soc. Very good. And you would admit that to drink, when you are
thirsty, is pleasant?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And in the sentence which you have just uttered, the word
"thirsty" implies pain?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And the word "drinking" is expressive of pleasure, and of the
satisfaction of the want?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. There is pleasure in drinking?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. When you are thirsty?

  Soc. And in pain?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Do you see the inference:-that pleasure and pain are
simultaneous, when you say that being thirsty, you drink? For are they
not simultaneous, and do they not affect at the same time the same
part, whether of the soul or the body?-which of them is affected
cannot be supposed to be of any consequence: Is not this true?

  Cal. It is.

  Soc. You said also, that no man could have good and evil fortune
at the same time?

  Cal. Yes, I did.

  Soc. But, you admitted that when in pain a man might also have
pleasure?

  Cal. Clearly.

  Soc. Then pleasure is not the same as good fortune, or pain the same
as evil fortune, and therefore the good is not the same as the
pleasant?

  Cal. I wish I knew, Socrates, what your quibbling means.

  Soc. You know, Callicles, but you affect not to know.

  Cal. Well, get on, and don't keep fooling: then you will know what a
wiseacre you are in your admonition of me.

  Soc. Does not a man cease from his thirst and from his pleasure in
drinking at the same time?

  Cal. I do not understand what you are saying.

  Gor. Nay, Callicles, answer, if only for our sakes;-we should like
to hear the argument out.

  Cal. Yes, Gorgias, but I must complain of the habitual trifling of
Socrates; he is always arguing about little and unworthy questions.

  Gor. What matter? Your reputation, Callicles, is not at stake. Let
Socrates argue in his own fashion.

  Cal. Well, then, Socrates, you shall ask these little peddling
questions, since Gorgias wishes to have them.

  Soc. I envy you, Callicles, for having been initiated into the great
mysteries before you were initiated into the lesser. I thought that
this was not allowable, But to return to our argument:-Does not a
man cease from thirsting and from pleasure of drinking at the same
moment?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. And if he is hungry, or has any other desire, does he not cease
from the desire and the pleasure at the same moment?

  Cal. Very true.

  Soc. Then he ceases from pain and pleasure at the same moment?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. But he does not cease from good and evil at the same moment, as
you have admitted: do you still adhere to what you said?

  Cal. Yes, I do; but what is the inference?

  Soc. Why, my friend, the inference is that the good is not the
same as the pleasant, or the evil the same as the painful; there is
a cessation of pleasure and pain at the same moment; but not of good
and evil, for they are different. How then can pleasure be the same as
good, or pain as evil? And I would have you look at the matter in
another light, which could hardly, I think, have been considered by
you identified them: Are not the good they have good present with
them, as the beautiful are those who have beauty present with them?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And do you call the fools and cowards good men? For you were
saying just now that the courageous and the wise are the good would
you not say so?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. And did you never see a foolish child rejoicing?

  Cal. Yes, I have.

  Soc. And a foolish man too?

  Cal. Yes, certainly; but what is your drift?

  Soc. Nothing particular, if you will only answer.

  Cal. Yes, I have.

  Soc. And did you ever see a sensible man rejoicing or sorrowing?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Which rejoice and sorrow most-the wise or the foolish?

  Cal. They are much upon a par, I think, in that respect.

  Soc. Enough: And did you ever see a coward in battle?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. And which rejoiced most at the departure of the enemy, the
coward or the brave?

  Cal. I should say "most" of both; or at any rate, they rejoiced
about equally.

  Soc. No matter; then the cowards, and not only the brave, rejoice?

  Cal. Greatly.

  Soc. And the foolish; so it would seem?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And are only the cowards pained at the approach of their
enemies, or are the brave also pained?

  Cal. Both are pained.

  Soc. And are they equally pained?

  Cal. I should imagine that the cowards are more pained.

  Soc. And are they better pleased at the enemy's departure?

  Cal. I dare say.

  Soc. Then are the foolish and the wise and the cowards and the brave
all pleased and pained, as you were saying, in nearly equal degree;
but are the cowards more pleased and pained than the brave?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. But surely the wise and brave are the good, and the foolish and
the cowardly are the bad?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then the good and the bad are pleased and pained in a nearly
equal degree?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then are the good and bad good and bad in a nearly equal
degree, or have the bad the advantage both in good and evil? [i.e.
in having more pleasure and more pain.]

  Cal I really do not know what you mean.

  Soc. Why, do you not remember saying that the good were good because
good was present with them, and the evil because evil; and that
pleasures were goods and pains evils?

  Cal. Yes, I remember.

  Soc. And are not these pleasures or goods present to those who
rejoice-if they do rejoice?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. Then those who rejoice are good when goods are present with
them?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And those who are in pain have evil or sorrow present with
them?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And would you still say that the evil are evil by reason of the
presence of evil?

  Cal. I should.

  Soc. Then those who rejoice are good, and those who are in pain
evil?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. The degrees of good and evil vary with the degrees of
pleasure and of pain?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Have the wise man and the fool, the brave and the coward, joy
and pain in nearly equal degrees? or would you say that the coward has
more?

  Cal. I should say that he has.

  Soc. Help me then to draw out the conclusion which follows from
our admissions; for it is good to repeat and review what is good twice
and thrice over, as they say. Both the wise man and the brave man we
allow to be good?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And the foolish man and the coward to be evil?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. And he who has joy is good?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And he who is in pain is evil?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. The good and evil both have joy and pain, but, perhaps, the
evil has more of them?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then must we not infer, that the bad man is as good and bad
as the good, or, perhaps, even better?-is not this a further inference
which follows equally with the preceding from the assertion that the
good and the pleasant are the same:-can this be denied, Callicles?

  Cal. I have been listening and making admissions to you, Socrates;
and I remark that if a person grants you anything in play, you, like a
child, want to keep hold and will not give it back. But do you
really suppose that I or any other human being denies that some
pleasures are good and others bad?

  Soc. Alas, Callicles, how unfair you are! you certainly treat me
as if I were a child, sometimes saying one thing, and then another, as
if you were meaning to deceive me. And yet I thought at first that you
were my friend, and would not have deceived me if you could have
helped. But I see that I was mistaken; and now I suppose that I must
make the best of a bad business, as they said of old, and take what
I can get out of you.-Well, then, as I understand you to say, I may
assume that some pleasures are good and others evil?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. The beneficial are good, and the hurtful are evil?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. And the beneficial are those which do some good, and the
hurtful are those which do some evil?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Take, for example, the bodily pleasures of eating and drinking,
which were just now mentioning-you mean to say that those which
promote health, or any other bodily excellence, are good, and their
opposites evil?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. And in the same way there are good pains and there are evil
pains?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. And ought we not to choose and use the good pleasures and
pains?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. But not the evil?

  Cal. Clearly.

  Soc. Because, if you remember, Polus and I have agreed that all
our actions are to be done for the sake of the good-and will you agree
with us in saying, that the good is the end of all our actions, and
that all our actions are to be done for the sake of the good, and
not the good, for of them?-will you add a third vote to our two?

  Cal. I will.

  Soc. Then pleasure, like everything else, is to be sought for the
sake of that which is good, and not that which is good for the sake of
pleasure?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. But can every man choose what pleasures are good and what are
evil, or must he have art or knowledge of them in detail?

  Cal. He must have art.

  Soc. Let me now remind you of what I was saying to Gorgias and
Polus; I was saying, as you will not have forgotten, that there were
some processes which aim only at pleasure, and know nothing of a
better and worse, and there are other processes which know good and
evil. And I considered that cookery, which I do not call an art, but
only an experience, was of the former class, which is concerned with
pleasure, and that the art of medicine was of the class which is
concerned with the good. And now, by the god of friendship, I must beg
you, Callicles, not to jest, or to imagine that I am jesting with you;
do not answer at random and contrary to your real opinion-for you will
observe that we are arguing about the way of human life; and to a
man who has any sense at all, what question can be more serious than
this?-whether he should follow after that way of life to which you
exhort me, and act what you call the manly part of speaking in the
assembly, and cultivating rhetoric, and engaging in public affairs,
according to the principles now in vogue; or whether he should
pursue the life of philosophy-and in what the latter way differs
from the former. But perhaps we had better first try to distinguish
them, as I did before, and when we have come to an agreement that they
are distinct, we may proceed to consider in what they differ from
one another, and which of them we should choose. Perhaps, however, you
do not even now understand what I mean?

  Cal. No, I do not.

  Soc. Then I will explain myself more clearly: seeing that you and
I have agreed that there is such a thing as good, and that there is
such a thing as pleasure, and that pleasure is not the same as good,
and that the pursuit and process of acquisition of the one, that is
pleasure, is different from the pursuit and process of acquisition
of the other, which is good-I wish that you would tell me whether
you agree with me thus far or not-do you agree?

  Cal. I do.

  Soc. Then I will proceed, and ask whether you also agree with me,
and whether you think that I spoke the truth when I further said to
Gorgias and Polus that cookery in my opinion is only an experience,
and not an art at all; and that whereas medicine is an art, and
attends to the nature and constitution of the patient, and has
principles of action and reason in each case, cookery in attending
upon pleasure never regards either the nature or reason of that
pleasure to which she devotes herself, but goes straight to her end,
nor ever considers or calculates anything, but works by experience and
routine, and just preserves the recollection of what she has usually
done when producing pleasure. And first, I would have you consider
whether I have proved what I was saying, and then whether there are
not other similar processes which have to do with the soul-some of
them processes of art, making a provision for the soul's highest
interest-others despising the interest, and, as in the previous
case, considering only the pleasure of the soul, and how this may be
acquired, but not considering what pleasures are good or bad, and
having no other aim but to afford gratification, whether good or
bad. In my opinion, Callicles, there are such processes, and this is
the sort of thing which I term flattery, whether concerned with the
body or the soul, or whenever employed with a view to pleasure and
without any consideration of good and evil. And now I wish that you
would tell me whether you agree with us in this notion, or whether you
differ.

  Cal. I do not differ; on the contrary, I agree; for in that way I
shall soonest bring the argument to an end, and shall oblige my friend
Gorgias.

  Soc. And is this notion true of one soul, or of two or more?

  Cal. Equally true of two or more.

  Soc. Then a man may delight a whole assembly, and yet have no regard
for their true interests?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Can you tell me the pursuits which delight mankind-or rather,
if you would prefer, let me ask, and do you answer, which of them
belong to the pleasurable class, and which of them not? In the first
place, what say you of flute-playing? Does not that appear to be an
art which seeks only pleasure, Callicles, and thinks of nothing else?

  Cal. I assent.

  Soc. And is not the same true of all similar arts, as, for
example, the art of playing the lyre at festivals?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And what do you say of the choral art and of dithyrambic
poetry?-are not they of the same nature? Do you imagine that
Cinesias the son of Meles cares about what will tend to the moral
improvement of his hearers, or about what will give pleasure to the
multitude?

  Cal. There can be no mistake about Cinesias, Socrates.

  Soc. And what do you say of his father, Meles the harp-player? Did
he perform with any view to the good of his hearers? Could he be
said to regard even their pleasure? For his singing was an
infliction to his audience. And of harp playing and dithyrambic poetry
in general, what would you say? Have they not been invented wholly for
the sake of pleasure?

  Cal. That is my notion of them.

  Soc. And as for the Muse of Tragedy, that solemn and august
personage-what are her aspirations? Is all her aim and desire only
to give pleasure to the spectators, or does she fight against them and
refuse to speak of their pleasant vices, and willingly proclaim in
word and song truths welcome and unwelcome?-which in your judgment
is her character?

  Cal. There can be no doubt, Socrates, that Tragedy has her face
turned towards pleasure and the gratification of the audience.

  Soc. And is not that the sort of thing, Callicles, which we were
just now describing as flattery?

  Cal. Quite true.

  Soc. Well now, suppose that we strip all poetry of song and rhythm
and metre, there will remain speech?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. And this speech is addressed to a crowd of people?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then, poetry is a sort of rhetoric?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. And do not the poets in the theatres seem to you to be
rhetoricians?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then now we have discovered a sort of rhetoric which is
addressed to a crowd of men, women, and children, freemen and
slaves. And this is not much to our taste, for we have described it as
having the nature of flattery.

  Cal. Quite true.

  Soc. Very good. And what do you say of that other rhetoric which
addresses the Athenian assembly and the assemblies of freemen in other
states? Do the rhetoricians appear to you always to aim at what is
best, and do they seek to improve the citizens by their speeches, or
are they too, like the rest of mankind, bent upon giving them
pleasure, forgetting the public good in the thought of their own
interest, playing with the people as with children, and trying to
amuse them, but never considering whether they are better or worse for
this?

  Cal. I must distinguish. There are some who have a real care of
the public in what they say, while others are such as you describe.

  Soc. I am contented with the admission that rhetoric is of two
sorts; one, which is mere flattery and disgraceful declamation; the
other, which is noble and aims at the training and improvement of
the souls of the citizens, and strives to say what is best, whether
welcome or unwelcome, to the audience; but have you ever known such
a rhetoric; or if you have, and can point out any rhetorician who is
of this stamp, who is he?

  Cal. But, indeed, I am afraid that I cannot tell you of any such
among the orators who are at present living.

  Soc. Well, then, can you mention any one of a former generation, who
may be said to have improved the Athenians, who found them worse and
made them better, from the day that he began to make speeches? for,
indeed, I do not know of such a man.

  Cal. What! did you never hear that Themistocles was a good man,
and Cimon and Miltiades and Pericles, who is just lately dead, and
whom you heard yourself?

  Soc. Yes, Callicles, they were good men, if, as you said at first,
true virtue consists only in the satisfaction of our own desires and
those of others; but if not, and if, as we were afterwards compelled
to acknowledge, the satisfaction of some desires makes us better,
and of others, worse, and we ought to gratify the one and not the
other, and there is an art in distinguishing them-can you tell me of
any of these statesmen who did distinguish them?

  Cal. No, indeed, I cannot.

  Soc. Yet, surely, Callicles, if you look you will find such a one.
Suppose that we just calmly consider whether any of these was such
as I have described. Will not the good man, who says whatever he
says with a view to the best, speak with a reference to some
standard and not at random; just as all other artists, whether the
painter, the builder, the shipwright, or any other look all of them to
their own work, and do not select and apply at random what they apply,
but strive to give a definite form to it? The artist disposes all
things in order, and compels the one part to harmonize and accord with
the other part, until he has constructed a regular and systematic
whole; and this is true of all artists, and in the same way the
trainers and physicians, of whom we spoke before, give order and
regularity to the body: do you deny this?

  Cal. No; I am ready to admit it.

  Soc. Then the house in which order and regularity prevail is good,
that in which there is disorder, evil?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And the same is true of a ship?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And the same may be said of the human body?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And what would you say of the soul? Will the good soul be
that in which disorder is prevalent, or that in which there is harmony
and order?

  Cal. The latter follows from our previous admissions.

  Soc. What is the name which is given to the effect of harmony and
order in the body?

  Cal. I suppose that you mean health and strength?

  Soc. Yes, I do; and what is the name which you would give to the
effect of harmony and order in the soul? Try and discover a name for
this as well as for the other.

  Cal. Why not give the name yourself, Socrates?

  Soc. Well, if you had rather that I should, I will; and you shall
say whether you agree with me, and if not, you shall refute and answer
me. "Healthy," as I conceive, is the name which is given to the
regular order of the body, whence comes health and every other
bodily excellence: is that true or not?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. And "lawful" and "law" are the names which are given to the
regular order and action of the soul, and these make men lawful and
orderly:-and so we have temperance and justice: have we not?

  Cal. Granted.

  Soc. And will not the true rhetorician who is honest and understands
his art have his eye fixed upon these, in all the words which he
addresses to the souls of men, and in all his actions, both in what he
gives and in what he takes away? Will not his aim be to implant
justice in the souls of his citizens mind take away injustice, to
implant temperance and take away intemperance, to implant every virtue
and take away every vice? Do you not agree?

  Cal. I agree.

  Soc. For what use is there, Callicles, in giving to the body of a
sick man who is in a bad state of health a quantity of the most
delightful food or drink or any other pleasant thing, which may be
really as bad for him as if you gave him nothing, or even worse if
rightly estimated. Is not that true?

  Cal. I will not say No to it.

  Soc. For in my opinion there is no profit in a man's life if his
body is in an evil plight-in that case his life also is evil: am I not
right?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. When a man is in health the physicians will generally allow him
to eat when he is hungry and drink when he is thirsty, and to
satisfy his desires as he likes, but when he is sick they hardly
suffer him to satisfy his desires at all: even you will admit that?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And does not the same argument hold of the soul, my good sir?
While she is in a bad state and is senseless and intemperate and
unjust and unholy, her desires ought to be controlled, and she ought
to be prevented from doing anything which does not tend to her own
improvement.

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Such treatment will be better for the soul herself?

  Cal. To be sure.

  Soc. And to restrain her from her appetites is to chastise her?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then restraint or chastisement is better for the soul than
intemperance or the-absence of control, which you were just now
preferring?

  Cal. I do not understand you, Socrates, and I wish that you would
ask some one who does.

  Soc. Here is a gentleman who cannot endure to be improved or: to
subject himself to that very chastisement of which the argument
speaks!

  Cal. I do not heed a word of what you are saying, and have only
answered hitherto out of civility to Gorgias.

  Soc. What are we to do, then? Shall we break off in the middle?

  Cal. You shall judge for yourself.

  Soc. Well, but people say that "a tale should have a head and not
break off in the middle," and I should not like to have the argument
going about without a head; please then to go on a little longer,
and put the head on.

  Cal. How tyrannical you are, Socrates! I wish that you and your
argument would rest, or that you would get some one else to argue with
you.

  Soc. But who else is willing?-I want to finish the argument.

  Cal. Cannot you finish without my help, either talking straight: on,
or questioning and answering yourself?

  Soc. Must I then say with Epicharmus, "Two men spoke before, but now
one shall be enough"? I suppose that there is absolutely no help.
And if I am to carry on the enquiry by myself, I will first of all
remark that not only, but all of us should have an ambition to know
what is true and what is false in this matter, for the discovery of
the truth is common good. And now I will proceed to argue according to
my own notion. But if any of you think that I arrive at conclusions
which are untrue you must interpose and refute me, for I do not
speak from any knowledge of what I am saying; I am an enquirer like
yourselves, and therefore, if my opponent says anything which is of
force, I shall be the first to agree with him. I am speaking on the
supposition that the argument ought to be completed; but if you
think otherwise let us leave off and go our ways.

  Gor. I think, Socrates, that we should not go our ways until you
have completed the argument; and this appears to me to be the wish
of the rest of the company; I myself should very much like to hear
what more you have to say.

  Soc. I too, Gorgias, should have liked to continue the argument with
Callicles, and then I might have given him an "Amphion" in return
for his "Zethus"; but since you, Callicles, are unwilling to continue,
I hope that you will listen, and interrupt me if I seem to you to be
in error. And if you refute me, I shall not be angry with you as you
are with me, but I shall inscribe you as the greatest of benefactors
on the tablets of my soul.

  Cal. My good fellow, never mind me, but get on.

  Soc. Listen to me, then, while I recapitulate the argument:-Is the
pleasant the same as the good? Not the same. Callicles and I are
agreed about that. And is the pleasant to be pursued for the sake of
the good? or the good for the sake of the pleasant? The pleasant is to
be pursued for the sake of the good. And that is pleasant at the
presence of which we are pleased, and that is good at the presence
of which we are good? To be sure. And we-good, and all good things
whatever are good when some virtue is present in us or them? That,
Callicles, is my conviction. But the virtue of each thing, whether
body or soul, instrument or creature, when given to them in the best
way comes to them not by chance but as the result of the order and
truth and art which are imparted to them: Am I not right? I maintain
that I am. And is not the virtue of each thing dependent on order or
arrangement? Yes, I say. And that which makes a thing good is the
proper order inhering in each thing? Such is my view. And is not the
soul which has an order of her own better than that which has no
order? Certainly. And the soul which has order is orderly? Of
course. And that which is orderly is temperate? Assuredly. And the
temperate soul is good? No other answer can I give, Callicles dear;
have you any?

  Cal. Go on, my good fellow.

  Soc. Then I shall proceed to add, that if the, temperate soul is the
good soul, the soul which is in the opposite condition, that is, the
foolish and intemperate, is the bad soul. Very true.

  And will not the temperate man do what is proper, both in relation
to the gods and to men; -for he would not be temperate if he did
not? Certainly he will do what is proper. In his relation to other men
he will do what is just; See and in his relation to the gods he will
do what is holy; and he who does what is just and holy must be just
and holy? Very true. And must he not be courageous? for the duty of
a temperate man is not to follow or to avoid what he ought not, but
what he ought, whether things or men or pleasures or pains, and
patiently to endure when he ought; and therefore, Callicles, the
temperate man, being, as we have described, also just and courageous
and holy, cannot be other than a perfectly good man, nor can the
good man do otherwise than well and perfectly whatever he does; and he
who does well must of necessity be happy and blessed, and the evil man
who does evil, miserable: now this latter is he whom you were
applauding-the intemperate who is the opposite of the temperate.
Such is my position, and these things I affirm to be true. And if they
are true, then I further affirm that he who desires to be happy must
pursue and practise temperance and run away from intemperance as
fast as his legs will carry him: he had better order his life so as
not to need punishment; but if either he or any of his friends,
whether private individual or city, are in need of punishment, then
justice must be done and he must suffer punishment, if he would be
happy. This appears to me to be the aim which a man ought to have, and
towards which he ought to direct all the energies both of himself
and of the state, acting so that he may have temperance and justice
present with him and be happy, not suffering his lusts to be
unrestrained, and in the never-ending desire satisfy them leading a
robber's life. Such; one is the friend neither of God nor man, for
he is incapable of communion, and he who is incapable of communion
is also incapable of friendship. And philosophers tell us,
Callicles, that communion and friendship and orderliness and
temperance and justice bind together heaven and earth and gods and
men, and that this universe is therefore called Cosmos or order, not
disorder or misrule, my friend. But although you are a philosopher you
seem to me never to have observed that geometrical equality is mighty,
both among gods and men; you think that you ought to cultivate
inequality or excess, and do not care about geometry.-Well, then,
either the principle that the happy are made happy by the possession
of justice and temperance, and the miserable the possession of vice,
must be refuted, or, if it is granted, what will be the
consequences? All the consequences which I drew before, Callicles, and
about which you asked me whether I was in earnest when I said that a
man ought to accuse himself and his son and his friend if he did
anything wrong, and that to this end he should use his rhetoric-all
those consequences are true. And that which you thought that Polus was
led to admit out of modesty is true, viz., that, to do injustice, if
more disgraceful than to suffer, is in that degree worse; and the
other position, which, according to Polus, Gorgias admitted out of
modesty, that he who would truly be a rhetorician ought to be just and
have a knowledge of justice, has also turned out to be true.

  And now, these things being as we have said, let us proceed in the
next place to consider whether you are right in throwing in my teeth
that I am unable to help myself or any of my friends or kinsmen, or to
save them in the extremity of danger, and that I am in the power of
another like an outlaw to whom anyone may do what he likes-he may
box my ears, which was a brave saying of yours; or take away my
goods or banish me, or even do his worst and kill me; a condition
which, as you say, is the height of disgrace. My answer to you is
one which has been already often repeated, but may as well be repeated
once more. I tell you, Callicles, that to be boxed on the ears
wrongfully is not the worst evil which can befall a man, nor to have
my purse or my body cut open, but that to smite and slay me and mine
wrongfully is far more disgraceful and more evil; aye, and to
despoil and enslave and pillage, or in any way at all to wrong me
and mine, is far more disgraceful and evil to the doer of the wrong
than to me who am the sufferer. These truths, which have been
already set forth as I state them in the previous discussion, would
seem now to have been fixed and riveted by us, if I may use an
expression which is certainly bold, in words which are like bonds of
iron and adamant; and unless you or some other still more enterprising
hero shall break them, there is no possibility of denying what I
say. For my position has always been, that I myself am ignorant how
these things are, but that I have never met any one who could say
otherwise, any more than you can, and not appear ridiculous. This is
my position still, and if what I am saying is true, and injustice is
the greatest of evils to the doer of injustice, and yet there is if
possible a greater than this greatest of evils, in an unjust man not
suffering retribution, what is that defence of which the want will
make a man truly ridiculous? Must not the defence be one which will
avert the greatest of human evils? And will not worst of all
defences be that with which a man is unable to defend himself or his
family or his friends?-and next will come that which is unable to
avert the next greatest evil; thirdly that which is unable to avert
the third greatest evil; and so of other evils. As is the greatness of
evil so is the honour of being able to avert them in their several
degrees, and the disgrace of not being able to avert them. Am I not
right Callicles?

  Cal. Yes, quite right.

  Soc. Seeing then that there are these two evils, the doing injustice
and the suffering injustice-and we affirm that to do injustice is a
greater, and to suffer injustice a lesser evil-by what devices can a
man succeed in obtaining the two advantages, the one of not doing
and the other of not suffering injustice? must he have the power, or
only the will to obtain them? I mean to ask whether a man will
escape injustice if he has only the will to escape, or must he have
provided himself with the power?

  Cal. He must have provided himself with the power; that is clear.

  Soc. And what do you say of doing injustice? Is the will only
sufficient, and will that prevent him from doing injustice, or must he
have provided himself with power and art; and if he has not studied
and practised, will he be unjust still? Surely you might say,
Callicles, whether you think that Polus and I were right in
admitting the conclusion that no one does wrong voluntarily, but
that all do wrong against their will?

  Cal. Granted, Socrates, if you will only have done.

  Soc. Then, as would appear, power and art have to be provided in
order that we may do no injustice?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. And what art will protect us from suffering injustice, if not
wholly, yet as far as possible? I want to know whether you agree
with me; for I think that such an art is the art of one who is
either a ruler or even tyrant himself, or the equal and companion of
the ruling power.

  Cal. Well said, Socrates; and please to observe how ready I am to
praise you when you talk sense.

  Soc. Think and tell me whether you would approve of another view
of mine: To me every man appears to be most the friend of him who is
most like to him-like to like, as ancient sages say: Would you not
agree to this?

  Cal. I should.

  Soc. But when the tyrant is rude and uneducated, he may be
expected to fear any one who is his superior in virtue, and will never
be able to be perfectly friendly with him.

  Cal. That is true.

  Soc. Neither will he be the friend of any one who greatly his
inferior, for the tyrant will despise him, and will never seriously
regard him as a friend.

  Cal. That again is true.

  Soc. Then the only friend worth mentioning, whom the tyrant can
have, will be one who is of the same character, and has the same likes
and dislikes, and is at the same time willing to be subject and
subservient to him; he is the man who will have power in the state,
and no one will injure him with impunity:-is not that so?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And if a young man begins to ask how he may become great and
formidable, this would seem to be the way-he will accustom himself,
from his youth upward, to feel sorrow and joy on, the same occasions
as his master, and will contrive to be as like him as possible?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And in this way he will have accomplished, as you and your
friends would. say, the end of becoming a great man and not
suffering injury?

  Cal. Very true.

  Soc. But will he also escape from doing injury? Must not the very
opposite be true,-if he is to be like the tyrant in his injustice, and
to have influence with him? Will he not rather contrive to do as
much wrong as possible, and not be punished?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. And by the imitation of his master and by the power which he
thus acquires will not his soul become bad and corrupted, and will not
this be the greatest evil to him?

  Cal. You always contrive somehow or other, Socrates, to invert
everything: do you not know that he who imitates the tyrant will, if
he has a mind, kill him who does not imitate him and take away his
goods?

  Soc. Excellent Callicles, I am not deaf, and I have heard that a
great many times from you and from Polus and from nearly every man
in the city, but I wish that you would hear me too. I dare say that he
will kill him if he has a mind-the bad man will kill the good and
true.

  Cal. And is not that just the provoking thing?

  Soc. Nay, not to a man of sense, as the argument shows: do you think
that all our cares should be directed to prolonging life to the
uttermost, and to the study of those arts which secure us from
danger always; like that art of rhetoric which saves men in courts
of law, and which you advise me to cultivate?

  Cal. Yes, truly, and very good advice too.

  Soc. Well, my friend, but what do you think of swimming; is that
an art of any great pretensions?

  Cal. No, indeed.

  Soc. And yet surely swimming saves a man from death, there are
occasions on which he must know how to swim. And if you despise the
swimmers, I will tell you of another and greater art, the art of the
pilot, who not only saves the souls of men, but also their bodies
and properties from the extremity of danger, just like rhetoric. Yet
his art is modest and unpresuming: it has no airs or pretences of
doing anything extraordinary, and, in return for the same salvation
which is given by the pleader, demands only two obols, if he brings us
from Aegina to Athens, or for the longer voyage from Pontus or
Egypt, at the utmost two drachmae, when he has saved, as I was just
now saying, the passenger and his wife and children and goods, and
safely disembarked them at the Piraeus -this is the payment which he
asks in return for so great a boon; and he who is the master of the
art, and has done all this, gets out and walks about on the
sea-shore by his ship in an unassuming way. For he is able to
reflect and is aware that he cannot tell which of his
fellow-passengers he has benefited, and which of them he has injured
in not allowing them to be drowned. He knows that they are just the
same when he has disembarked them as when they embarked, and not a
whit better either in their bodies or in their souls; and he considers
that if a man who is afflicted by great and incurable bodily
diseases is only to be pitied for having escaped, and is in no way
benefited by him in having been saved from drowning, much less he
who has great and incurable diseases, not of the body, but of the
soul, which is the more valuable part of him; neither is life worth
having nor of any profit to the bad man, whether he be delivered
from the sea, or the law-courts, or any other devourer-and so he
reflects that such a one had better not live, for he cannot live well.

  And this is the reason why the pilot, although he is our saviour, is
not usually conceited, any more than the engineer, who is not at all
behind either the general, or the pilot, or any one else, in his
saving power, for he sometimes saves whole cities. Is there any
comparison between him and the pleader? And if he were to talk,
Callicles, in your grandiose style, he would bury you under a mountain
of words, declaring and insisting that we ought all of us to be
engine-makers, and that no other profession is worth thinking about;
he would have plenty to say. Nevertheless you despise him and his art,
and sneeringly call him an engine-maker, and you will not allow your
daughters to marry his son, or marry your son to his daughters. And
yet, on your principle, what justice or reason is there in your
refusal? What right have you to despise the engine-maker, and the
others whom I was just now mentioning? I know that you will say, "I am
better, better born." But if the better is not what I say, and
virtue consists only in a man saving himself and his, whatever may
be his character, then your censure of the engine-maker, and of the
physician, and of the other arts of salvation, is ridiculous. O my
friend! I want you to see that the noble and the good may possibly
be something different from saving and being saved:-May not he who
is truly a man cease to care about living a certain time?-he knows, as
women say, that no man can escape fate, and therefore he is not fond
of life; he leaves all that with God, and considers in what way he can
best spend his appointed term-whether by assimilating himself to the
constitution under which he lives, as you at this moment have to
consider how you may become as like as possible to the Athenian
people, if you mean to be in their good graces, and to have power in
the state; whereas I want you to think and see whether this is for the
interest of either of us-I would not have us risk that which is
dearest on the acquisition of this power, like the Thessalian
enchantresses, who, as they say, bring down the moon from heaven at
the risk of their own perdition. But if you suppose that any man
will show you the art of becoming great in the city, and yet not
conforming yourself to the ways of the city, whether for better or
worse, then I can only say that you are mistaken, Callides; for he who
would deserve to be the true natural friend of the Athenian Demus,
aye, or of Pyrilampes' darling who is called after them, must be by
nature like them, and not an imitator only. He, then, who will make
you most like them, will make you as you desire, a statesman and
orator: for every man is pleased when he is spoken to in his own
language and spirit, and dislikes any other. But perhaps you, sweet
Callicles, may be of another mind. What do you say?

  Cal. Somehow or other your words, Socrates, always appear to me to
be good words; and yet, like the rest of the world, I am not quite
convinced by them.

  Soc. The reason is, Callicles, that the love of Demus which abides
in your soul is an adversary to me; but I dare say that if we recur to
these same matters, and consider them more thoroughly, you may be
convinced for all that. Please, then, to remember that there are two
processes of training all things, including body and soul; in the one,
as we said, we treat them with a view to pleasure, and in the other
with a view to the highest good, and then we do not indulge but resist
them: was not that the distinction which we drew?

  Cal. Very true.

  Soc. And the one which had pleasure in view was just a vulgar
flattery:-was not that another of our conclusions?

  Cal. Be it so, if you will have it.

  Soc. And the other had in view the greatest improvement of that
which was ministered to, whether body or soul?

  Cal. Quite true.

  Soc. And must we not have the same end in view in the treatment of
our city and citizens? Must we not try and make-them as good as
possible? For we have already discovered that there is no use in
imparting to them any other good, unless the mind of those who are
to have the good, whether money, or office, or any other sort of
power, be gentle and good. Shall we say that?

  Cal. Yes, certainly, if you like.

  Soc. Well, then, if you and I, Callicles, were intending to set
about some public business, and were advising one another to undertake
buildings, such as walls, docks or temples of the largest size,
ought we not to examine ourselves, first, as to whether we know or
do not know the art of building, and who taught us?-would not that
be necessary, Callicles?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. In the second place, we should have to consider whether we
had ever constructed any private house, either of our own or for our
friends, and whether this building of ours was a success or not; and
if upon consideration we found that we had had good and eminent
masters, and had been successful in constructing many fine
buildings, not only with their assistance, but without them, by our
own unaided skill-in that case prudence would not dissuade us from
proceeding to the construction of public works. But if we had no
master to show, and only a number of worthless buildings or none at
all, then, surely, it would be ridiculous in us to attempt public
works, or to advise one another to undertake them. Is not this true?

  Cal. Certainly.

  Soc. And does not the same hold in all other cases? If you and I
were physicians, and were advising one another that we were
competent to practise as state-physicians, should I not ask about you,
and would you not ask about me, Well, but how about Socrates
himself, has he good health? and was any one else ever known to be
cured by him, whether slave or freeman? And I should make the same
enquiries about you. And if we arrived at the conclusion that no
one, whether citizen or stranger, man or woman, had ever been any
the better for the medical skill of either of us, then, by Heaven,
Callicles, what an absurdity to think that we or any human being
should be so silly as to set up as state-physicians and advise
others like ourselves to do the same, without having first practised
in private, whether successfully or not, and acquired experience of
the art! Is not this, as they say, to begin with the big jar when
you are learning the potter's art; which is a foolish thing?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. And now, my friend, as you are already beginning to be a public
character, and are admonishing and reproaching me for not being one,
suppose that we ask a few questions of one another. Tell me, then,
Callicles, how about making any of the citizens better? Was there ever
a man who was once vicious, or unjust, or intemperate, or foolish, and
became by the help of Callicles good and noble? Was there ever such
a man, whether citizen or stranger, slave or freeman? Tell me,
Callicles, if a person were to ask these questions of you, what
would you answer? Whom would you say that-you had improved by your
conversation? There may have been good deeds of this sort which were
done by you as a private person, before you came forward in public.
Why will you not answer?

  Cal. You are contentious, Socrates.

  Soc. Nay, I ask you, not from a love of contention, but because I
really want to know in what way you think that affairs should be
administered among us-whether, when you come to the administration
of them, you have any other aim but the improvement of the citizens?
Have we not already admitted many times over that such is the duty
of a public man? Nay, we have surely said so; for if you will not
answer for yourself I must answer for you. But if this is what the
good man ought to effect for the benefit of his own state, allow me to
recall to you the names of those whom you were just now mentioning,
Pericles, and Cimon, and Miltiades, and Themistocles, and ask
whether you still think that they were good citizens.

  Cal. I do.

  Soc. But if they were good, then clearly each of them must have made
the citizens better instead of worse?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And, therefore, when Pericles first began to speak in the
assembly, the Athenians were not so good as when he spoke last?

  Cal. Very likely.

  Soc. Nay, my friend, "likely" is not the word; for if he was a
good citizen, the inference is certain.

  Cal. And what difference does that make?

  Soc. None; only I should like further to know whether the
Athenians are supposed to have been made better by Pericles, or, on
the contrary, to have been corrupted by him; for I hear that he was
the first who gave the people pay, and made them idle and cowardly,
and encouraged them in the love of talk and money.

  Cal. You heard that, Socrates, from the laconising set who bruise
their ears.

  Soc. But what I am going to tell you now is not mere hearsay, but
well known both to you and me: that at first, Pericles was glorious
and his character unimpeached by any verdict of the Athenians-this was
during the time when they were not so good-yet afterwards, when they
had been made good and gentle by him, at the very end of his life they
convicted him of theft, and almost put him to death, clearly under the
notion that he was a malefactor.

  Cal. Well, but how does that prove Pericles' badness?

  Soc. Why, surely you would say that he was a bad manager of asses or
horses or oxen, who had received them originally neither kicking nor
butting nor biting him, and implanted in them all these savage tricks?
Would he not be a bad manager of any animals who received them gentle,
and made them fiercer than they were when he received them? What do
you say?

  Cal. I will do you the favour of saying "yes."

  Soc. And will you also do me the favour of saying whether man is
an animal?

  Cal. Certainly he is.

  Soc. And was not Pericles a shepherd of men?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. And if he was a good political shepherd, ought not the
animals who were his subjects, as we were just now acknowledging, to
have become more just, and not more unjust?

  Cal. Quite true.

  Soc. And are not just men gentle, as Homer says?-or are you of
another mind?

  Cal. I agree.

  Soc. And yet he really did make them more savage than he received
them, and their savageness was shown towards himself; which he must
have been very far from desiring.

  Cal. Do you want me to agree with you?

  Soc. Yes, if I seem to you to speak the truth.

  Cal. Granted then.

  Soc. And if they were more savage, must they not have been more
unjust and inferior?

  Cal. Granted again.

  Soc. Then upon this view, Pericles was not a good statesman?

  Cal. That is, upon your view.

  Soc. Nay, the view is yours, after what you have admitted. Take
the case of Cimon again. Did not the very persons whom he was
serving ostracize him, in order that they might not hear his voice for
ten years? and they did just the same to Themistocles, adding the
penalty of exile; and they voted that Miltiades, the hero of Marathon,
should be thrown into the pit of death, and he was only saved by the
Prytanis. And yet, if they had been really good men, as you say, these
things would never have happened to them. For the good charioteers are
not those who at first keep their place, and then, when they have
broken-in their horses, and themselves become better charioteers,
are thrown out-that is not the way either in charioteering or in any
profession-What do you think?

  Cal. I should think not.

  Soc. Well, but if so, the truth is as I have said already, that in
the Athenian State no one has ever shown himself to be a good
statesman-you admitted that this was true of our present statesmen,
but not true of former ones, and you preferred them to the others; yet
they have turned out to be no better than our present ones; and
therefore, if they were rhetoricians, they did not use the true art of
rhetoric or of flattery, or they would not have fallen out of favour.

  Cal. But surely, Socrates, no living man ever came near any one of
them in his performances.

  Soc. O, my dear friend, I say nothing against them regarded as the
serving-men of the State; and I do think that they were certainly more
serviceable than those who are living now, and better able to
gratify the wishes of the State; but as to transforming those
desires and not allowing them to have their way, and using the
powers which they had, whether of persuasion or of force, in the
improvement of their fellow citizens, which is the prime object of the
truly good citizen, I do not see that in these respects they were a
whit superior to our present statesmen, although I do admit that
they were more clever at providing ships and walls and docks, and
all that. You and I have a ridiculous way, for during the whole time
that we are arguing, we are always going round and round to the same
point, and constantly misunderstanding one another. If I am not
mistaken, you have admitted and acknowledged more than once, that
there are two kinds of operations which have to do with the body,
and two which have to do with the soul: one of the two is ministerial,
and if our bodies are hungry provides food for them, and if they are
thirsty gives them drink, or if they are cold supplies them with
garments, blankets, shoes, and all that they crave. I use the same
images as before intentionally, in order that you may understand me
the better. The purveyor of the articles may provide them either
wholesale or retail, or he may be the maker of any of them,-the baker,
or the cook, or the weaver, or the shoemaker, or the currier; and in
so doing, being such as he is, he is naturally supposed by himself and
every one to minister to the body. For none of them know that there is
another art-an art of gymnastic and medicine which is the true
minister of the body, and ought to be the mistress of all the rest,
and to use their results according to the knowledge which she has
and they have not, of the real good or bad effects of meats and drinks
on the body. All other arts which have to do with the body are servile
and menial and illiberal; and gymnastic and medicine are, as they
ought to be, their mistresses.

  Now, when I say that all this is equally true of the soul, you
seem at first to know and understand and assent to my words, and
then a little while afterwards you come repeating, Has not the State
had good and noble citizens? and when I ask you who they are, you
reply, seemingly quite in earnest as if I had asked, Who are or have
been good trainers?-and you had replied, Thearion, the baker,
Mithoecus, who wrote the Sicilian cookery-book, Sarambus, the vintner:
these are ministers of the body, first-rate in their art; for the
first makes admirable loaves, the second excellent dishes, and the
third capital wine-to me these appear to be the exact parallel of
the statesmen whom you mention. Now you would not be altogether
pleased if I said to you, My friend, you know nothing of gymnastics;
those of whom you are speaking to me are only the ministers and
purveyors of luxury, who have no good or noble notions of their art,
and may very likely be filling and fattening men's bodies and
gaining their approval, although the result is that they lose their
original flesh in the long run, and become thinner than they were
before; and yet they, in their simplicity, will not attribute their
diseases and loss of flesh to their entertainers; but when in after
years the unhealthy surfeit brings the attendant penalty of disease,
he who happens to be near them at the time, and offers them advice, is
accused and blamed by them, and if they could they would do him some
harm; while they proceed to eulogize the men who have been the real
authors of the mischief.

  And that, Callicles, is just what you are now doing. You praise
the men who feasted the citizens and satisfied their desires, and
people say that they have made the city great, not seeing that the
swollen And ulcerated condition of the State is to be attributed to
these elder statesmen; for they have filled the city full of
harbours and docks and walls and revenues and all that, and have
left no room for justice and temperance. And when the crisis of the
disorder comes, the people will blame the advisers of the hour, and
applaud Themistocles and Cimon and Pericles, who are the real
authors of their calamities; and if you are not careful they may
assail you and my friend Alcibiades, when they are losing not only
their new acquisitions, but also their original possessions; not
that you are the authors of these misfortunes of theirs, although
you may perhaps be accessories to them. A great piece of work is
always being made, as I see and am told, now as of old; about our
statesmen. When the State treats any of them as malefactors, I observe
that there is a great uproar and indignation at the supposed wrong
which is done to them; "after all their many services to the State,
that they should unjustly perish"-so the tale runs. But the cry is all
a lie; for no statesman ever could be unjustly put to death by the
city of which he is the head. The case of the professed statesman
is, I believe, very much like that of the professed sophist; for the
sophists, although they are wise men, are nevertheless guilty of a
strange piece of folly; professing to be teachers of virtue, they will
often accuse their disciples of wronging them, and defrauding them
of their pay, and showing no gratitude for their services. Yet what
can be more absurd than that men who have become just and good, and
whose injustice has been taken away from them, and who have had
justice implanted in them by their teachers, should act unjustly by
reason of the injustice which is not in them? Can anything be more
irrational, my friends, than this? You, Callicles, compel me to be a
mob-orator, because you will not answer.

   Cal. And you are the man who cannot speak unless there is some
one to answer?

  Soc. I suppose that I can; just now, at any rate, the speeches which
I am making are long enough because you refuse to answer me. But I
adjure you by the god of friendship, my good sir, do tell me whether
there does not appear to you to be a great inconsistency in saying
that you have made a man good, and then blaming him for being bad?

  Cal. Yes, it appears so to me.

  Soc. Do you never hear our professors of education speaking in
this inconsistent manner?

  Cal. Yes, but why talk of men who are good for nothing?

  Soc. I would rather say, why talk of men who profess to be rulers,
and declare that they are devoted to the improvement of the city,
and nevertheless upon occasion declaim against the utter vileness of
the city:-do you think that there is any difference between one and
the other? My good friend, the sophist and the rhetorician, as I was
saying to Polus, are the same, or nearly the same; but you
ignorantly fancy that rhetoric is a perfect thing, sophistry a thing
to be despised; whereas the truth is, that sophistry is as much
superior to rhetoric as legislation is to the practice of law, or
gymnastic to medicine. The orators and sophists, as I am inclined to
think, are the only class who cannot complain of the mischief
ensuing to themselves from that which they teach others, without in
the same breath accusing themselves of having done no good to those
whom they profess to benefit. Is not this a fact?

  Cal. Certainly it is.

  Soc. If they were right in saying that they make men better, then
they are the only class who can afford to leave their remuneration
to those who have been benefited by them. Whereas if a man has been
benefited in any other way, if, for example, he has been taught to run
by a trainer, he might possibly defraud him of his pay, if the trainer
left the matter to him, and made no agreement with him that he
should receive money as soon as he had given him the utmost speed; for
not because of any deficiency of speed do men act unjustly, but by
reason of injustice.

  Cal. Very true.

  Soc. And he who removes injustice can be in no danger of being
treated unjustly: he alone can safely leave the honorarium to his
pupils, if he be really able to make them good-am I not right?

  Cal. Yes.

  Soc. Then we have found the reason why there is no dishonour in a
man receiving pay who is called in to advise about building or any
other art?

  Cal. Yes, we have found the reason.

  Soc. But when the point is, how a man may become best himself, and
best govern his family and state, then to say that you will give no
advice gratis is held to be dishonourable?

  Cal. True.

  Soc. And why? Because only such benefits call forth a desire to
requite them, and there is evidence that a benefit has been
conferred when the benefactor receives a return; otherwise not. Is
this true?

  Cal. It is.

  Soc. Then to which service of the State do you invite me?
determine for me. Am I to be the physician of the State who will
strive and struggle to make the Athenians as good as possible; or am I
to be the servant and flatterer of the State? Speak out, my good
friend, freely and fairly as you did at first and ought to do again,
and tell me your entire mind.

  Cal. I say then that you should be the servant of the State.

  Soc. The flatterer? well, sir, that is a noble invitation.

  Cal. The Mysian, Socrates, or what you please. For if you refuse,
the consequences will be-

  Soc. Do not repeat the old story-that he who likes will kill me
and get my money; for then I shall have to repeat the old answer, that
he will be a bad man and will kill the good, and that the money will
be of no use to him, but that he will wrongly use that which he
wrongly took, and if wrongly, basely, and if basely, hurtfully.

  Cal. How confident you are, Socrates, that you will never come to
harm! you seem to think that you are living in another country, and
can never be brought into a court of justice, as you very likely may
be brought by some miserable and mean person.

  Soc. Then I must indeed be a fool, Callicles, if I do not know
that in the Athenian State any man may suffer anything. And if I am
brought to trial and incur the dangers of which you speak, he will
be a villain who brings me to trial-of that I am very sure, for no
good man would accuse the innocent. Nor shall I be surprised if I am
put to death. Shall I tell you why I anticipate this?

  Cal. By all means.

  Soc. I think that I am the only or almost the only Athenian living
who practises the true art of politics; I am the only politician of my
time. Now, seeing that when I speak my words are not uttered with
any view of gaining favour, and that I look to what is best and not to
what is most pleasant, having no mind to use those arts and graces
which you recommend, I shall have nothing to say in the justice court.
And you might argue with me, as I was arguing with Polus: -I shall
be tried just as a physician would be tried in a court of little
boys at the indictment of the cook. What Would he reply under such
circumstances, if some one were to accuse him, saying, "O my boys,
many evil things has this man done to you: he is the death of you,
especially of the younger ones among you, cutting and burning and
starving and suffocating you, until you know not what to do; he
gives you the bitterest potions, and compels you to hunger and thirst.
How unlike the variety of meats and sweets on which I feasted you!"
What do you suppose that the physician would be able to reply when
he found himself in such a predicament? If he told the truth he
could only say, "All these evil things, my boys, I did for your
health," and then would there not just be a clamour among a jury
like that? How they would cry out!

  Cal. I dare say.

  Soc. Would he not be utterly at a loss for a reply?

  Cal. He certainly would.

  Soc. And I too shall be treated in the same way, as I well know,
if I am brought before the court. For I shall not be able to
rehearse to the people the pleasures which I have procured for them,
and which, although I am not disposed to envy either the procurers
or enjoyers of them, are deemed by them to be benefits and advantages.
And if any one says that I corrupt young men, and perplex their minds,
or that I speak evil of old men, and use bitter words towards them,
whether in private or public, it is useless for me to reply, as I
truly might:-"All this I do for the sake of justice, and with a view
to your interest, my judges, and to nothing else." And therefore there
is no saying what may happen to me.

  Cal. And do you think, Socrates, that a man who is thus
defenceless is in a good position?

  Soc. Yes, Callicles, if he have that defence, which as you have
often acknowledged he should have-if he be his own defence, and have
never said or done anything wrong, either in respect of gods or men;
and this has been repeatedly acknowledged by us to be the best sort of
defence. And if anyone could convict me of inability to defend
myself or others after this sort, I should blush for shame, whether
I was convicted before many, or before a few, or by myself alone;
and if I died from want of ability to do so, that would indeed
grieve me. But if I died because I have no powers of flattery or
rhetoric, I am very sure that you would not find me repining at death.
For no man who is not an utter fool and coward is afraid of death
itself, but he is afraid of doing wrong. For to go to the world
below having one's soul full of injustice is the last and worst of all
evils. And in proof of what I say, if you have no objection, I
should like to tell you a story.

  Cal. Very well, proceed; and then we shall have done.

  Soc. Listen, then, as story-tellers say, to a very pretty tale,
which I dare say that you may be disposed to regard as a fable only,
but which, as I believe, is a true tale, for I mean to speak the
truth. Homer tells us, how Zeus and Poseidon and Pluto divided the
empire which they inherited from their father. Now in the days of
Cronos there existed a law respecting the destiny of man, which has
always been, and still continues to be in Heaven-that he who has lived
all his life in justice and holiness shall go, when he is dead, to the
Islands of the Blessed, and dwell there in perfect happiness out of
the reach of evil; but that he who has lived unjustly and impiously
shall go to the house of vengeance and punishment, which is called
Tartarus. And in the time of Cronos, and even quite lately in the
reign of Zeus, the judgment was given on the very day on which the men
were to die; the judges were alive, and the men were alive; and the
consequence was that the judgments were not well given. Then Pluto and
the authorities from the Islands of the Blessed came to Zeus, and said
that the souls found their way to the wrong places. Zeus said: "I
shall put a stop to this; the judgments are not well given, because
the persons who are judged have their clothes on, for they are
alive; and there are many who, having evil souls, are apparelled in
fair bodies, or encased in wealth or rank, and, when the day of
judgment arrives, numerous witnesses come forward and testify on their
behalf that they have lived righteously. The judges are awed by
them, and they themselves too have their clothes on when judging;
their eyes and ears and their whole bodies are interposed as a well
before their own souls. All this is a hindrance to them; there are the
clothes of the judges and the clothes of the judged-What is to be
done? I will tell you:-In the first place, I will deprive men of the
foreknowledge of death, which they possess at present: this power
which they have Prometheus has already received my orders to take from
them: in the second place, they shall be entirely stripped before they
are judged, for they shall be judged when they are dead; and the judge
too shall be naked, that is to say, dead-he with his naked soul
shall pierce into the other naked souls; and they shall die suddenly
and be deprived of all their kindred, and leave their brave attire
strewn upon the earth-conducted in this manner, the judgment will be
just. I knew all about the matter before any of you, and therefore I
have made my sons judges; two from Asia, Minos and Rhadamanthus, and
one from Europe, Aeacus. And these, when they are dead, shall give
judgment in the meadow at the parting of the ways, whence the two
roads lead, one to the Islands of the Blessed, and the other to
Tartarus. Rhadamanthus shall judge those who come from Asia, and
Aeacus those who come from Europe. And to Minos I shall give the
primacy, and he shall hold a court of appeal, in case either of the
two others are in any doubt:-then the judgment respecting the last
journey of men will be as just as possible."

  From this tale, Callicles, which I have heard and believe, I draw
the following inferences:-Death, if I am right, is in the first
place the separation from one another of two things, soul and body;
nothing else. And after they are separated they retain their several
natures, as in life; the body keeps the same habit, and the results of
treatment or accident are distinctly visible in it: for example, he
who by nature or training or both, was a tall man while he was
alive, will remain as he was, after he is dead; and the fat man will
remain fat; and so on; and the dead man, who in life had a fancy to
have flowing hair, will have flowing hair. And if he was marked with
the whip and had the prints of the scourge, or of wounds in him when
he was alive, you might see the same in the dead body; and if his
limbs were broken or misshapen when he was alive, the same
appearance would be visible in the dead. And in a word, whatever was
the habit of the body during life would be distinguishable after
death, either perfectly, or in a great measure and for a certain time.
And I should imagine that this is equally true of the soul, Callicles;
when a man is stripped of the body, all the natural or acquired
affections of the soul are laid open to view. And when they come to
the judge, as those from Asia come to Rhadamanthus, he places them
near him and inspects them quite impartially, not knowing whose the
soul is: perhaps he may lay hands on the soul of the great king, or of
some other king or potentate, who has no soundness in him, but his
soul is marked with the whip, and is full of the prints and scars of
perjuries and crimes with which each action has stained him, and he is
all crooked with falsehood and imposture, and has no straightness,
because he has lived without truth. Him Rhadamanthus beholds, full
of all deformity and disproportion, which is caused by licence and
luxury and insolence and incontinence, and despatches him
ignominiously to his prison, and there he undergoes the punishment
which he deserves.

  Now the proper office of punishment is twofold: he who is rightly
punished ought either to become better and profit by it, or he ought
to be made an example to his fellows, that they may see what he
suffers, and fear and become better. Those who are improved when
they are punished by gods and men, are those whose sins are curable;
and they are improved, as in this world so also in another, by pain
and suffering; for there is no other way in which they can be
delivered from their evil. But they who have been guilty of the
worst crimes, and are incurable by reason of their crimes, are made
examples; for, as they are incurable, the time has passed at which
they can receive any benefit. They get no good themselves, but
others get good when they behold them enduring for ever the most
terrible and painful and fearful sufferings as the penalty of their
sins-there they are, hanging up as examples, in the prison-house of
the world below, a spectacle and a warning to all unrighteous men
who come thither. And among them, as I confidently affirm, will be
found Archelaus, if Polus truly reports of him, and any other tyrant
who is like him. Of these fearful examples, most, as I believe, are
taken from the class of tyrants and kings and potentates and public
men, for they are the authors of the greatest and most impious crimes,
because they have the power. And Homer witnesses to the truth of this;
for they are always kings and potentates whom he has described as
suffering everlasting punishment in the world below: such were
Tantalus and Sisyphus and Tityus. But no one ever described Thersites,
or any private person who was a villain, as suffering everlasting
punishment, or as incurable. For to commit the worst crimes, as I am
inclined to think, was not in his power, and he was happier than those
who had the power. No, Callicles, the very bad men come from the class
of those who have power. And yet in that very class there may arise
good men, and worthy of all admiration they are, for where there is
great power to do wrong, to live and to die justly is a hard thing,
and greatly to be praised, and few there are who attain to this.
Such good and true men, however, there have been, and will be again,
at Athens and in other states, who have fulfilled their trust
righteously; and there is one who is quite famous all over Hellas,
Aristeides, the son of Lysimachus. But, in general, great men are also
bad, my friend.

  As I was saying, Rhadamanthus, when he gets a soul of the bad
kind, knows nothing about him, neither who he is, nor who his
parents are; he knows only that he has got hold of a villain; and
seeing this, he stamps him as curable or incurable, and sends him away
to Tartarus, whither he goes and receives his proper recompense. Or,
again, he looks with admiration on the soul of some just one who has
lived in holiness and truth; he may have been a private man or not;
and I should say, Callicles, that he is most likely to have been a
philosopher who has done his own work, and not troubled himself with
the doings of other in his lifetime; him Rhadamanthus sends to the
Islands of the Blessed. Aeacus does the same; and they both have
sceptres, and judge; but Minos alone has a golden sceptre and is
seated looking on, as Odysseus in Homer declares that he saw him:

    Holding a sceptre of gold, and giving laws to the dead.

Now I, Callicles, am persuaded of the truth of these things, and I
consider how I shall present my soul whole and undefiled before the
judge in that day. Renouncing the honours at which the world aims, I
desire only to know the truth, and to live as well as I can, and, when
I die, to die as well as I can. And, to the utmost of my power, I
exhort all other men to do the same. And, in return for your
exhortation of me, I exhort you also to take part in the great combat,
which is the combat of life, and greater than every other earthly
conflict. And I retort your reproach of me, and say, that you will not
be able to help yourself when the day of trial and judgment, of
which I was speaking, comes upon you; you will go before the judge,
the son of Aegina, and, when he has got you in his grip and is
carrying you off, you will gape and your head will swim round, just as
mine would in the courts of this world, and very likely some one
will shamefully box you on the ears, and put upon you any sort of
insult.

  Perhaps this may appear to you to be only an old wife's tale,
which you will contemn. And there might be reason in your contemning
such tales, if by searching we could find out anything better or
truer: but now you see that you and Polus and Gorgias, who are the
three wisest of the Greeks of our day, are not able to show that we
ought to live any life which does not profit in another world as
well as in this. And of all that has been said, nothing remains
unshaken but the saying, that to do injustice is more to be avoided
than to suffer injustice, and that the reality and not the
appearance of virtue is to be followed above all things, as well in
public as in private life; and that when any one has been wrong in
anything, he is to be chastised, and that the next best thing to a man
being just is that he should become just, and be chastised and
punished; also that he should avoid all flattery of himself as well as
of others, of the few or of the many: and rhetoric and any other art
should be used by him, and all his actions should be done always, with
a view to justice.

  Follow me then, and I will lead you where you will be happy in
life and after death, as the argument shows. And never mind if some
one despises you as a fool, and insults you, if he has a mind; let him
strike you, by Zeus, and do you be of good cheer, and do not mind
the insulting blow, for you will never come to any harm in the
practise of virtue, if you are a really good and true man. When we
have practised virtue together, we will apply ourselves to politics,
if that seems desirable, or we will advise about whatever else may
seem good to us, for we shall be better able to judge then. In our
present condition we ought not to give ourselves airs, for even on the
most important subjects we are always changing our minds; so utterly
stupid are we! Let us, then, take the argument as our guide, which has
revealed to us that the best way of life is to practise justice and
every virtue in life and death. This way let us go; and in this exhort
all men to follow, not in the way to which you trust and in which
you exhort me to follow you; for that way, Callicles, is nothing
worth.

                              -THE END-


  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES; ION

  Socrates. Welcome, Ion. Are you from your native city of Ephesus?

  Ion. No, Socrates; but from Epidaurus, where I attended the festival
of Asclepius.

  Soc. And do the Epidaurians have contests of rhapsodes at the
festival?

  Ion. O yes; and of all sorts of musical performers.

  Soc. And were you one of the competitors- and did you succeed?

  Ion. I obtained the first prize of all, Socrates.

  Soc. Well done; and I hope that you will do the same for us at the
Panathenaea.

  Ion. And I will, please heaven.

  Soc. I often envy the profession of a rhapsode, Ion; for you have
always to wear fine clothes, and to look as beautiful as you can is
a part of your art. Then, again, you are obliged to be continually
in the company of many good poets; and especially of Homer, who is the
best and most divine of them; and to understand him, and not merely
learn his words by rote, is a thing greatly to be envied. And no man
can be a rhapsode who does not understand the meaning of the poet. For
the rhapsode ought to interpret the mind of the poet to his hearers,
but how can he interpret him well unless he knows what he means? All
this is greatly to be envied.

  Ion. Very true, Socrates; interpretation has certainly been the most
laborious part of my art; and I believe myself able to speak about
Homer better than any man; and that neither Metrodorus of Lampsacus,
nor Stesimbrotus of Thasos, nor Glaucon, nor any one else who ever
was, had as good ideas about Homer as I have, or as many.

  Soc. I am glad to hear you say so, Ion; I see that you will not
refuse to acquaint me with them.

  Ion. Certainly, Socrates; and you really ought to hear how
exquisitely I render Homer. I think that the Homeridae should give
me a golden crown.

  Soc. I shall take an opportunity of hearing your embellishments of
him at some other time. But just now I should like to ask you a
question: Does your art extend to Hesiod and Archilochus, or to
Homer only?

  Ion. To Homer only; he is in himself quite enough.

  Soc. Are there any things about which Homer and Hesiod agree?

  Ion. Yes; in my opinion there are a good many.

  Soc. And can you interpret better what Homer says, or what Hesiod
says, about these matters in which they agree?

  Ion. I can interpret them equally well, Socrates, where they agree.

  Soc. But what about matters in which they do not agree?- for
example, about divination, of which both Homer and Hesiod have
something to say-

  Ion. Very true:

  Soc. Would you or a good prophet be a better interpreter of what
these two poets say about divination, not only when they agree, but
when they disagree?

  Ion. A prophet.

  Soc. And if you were a prophet, would you be able to interpret
them when they disagree as well as when they agree?

  Ion. Clearly.

  Soc. But how did you come to have this skill about Homer only, and
not about Hesiod or the other poets? Does not Homer speak of the
same themes which all other poets handle? Is not war his great
argument? and does he not speak of human society and of intercourse of
men, good and bad, skilled and unskilled, and of the gods conversing
with one another and with mankind, and about what happens in heaven
and in the world below, and the generations of gods and heroes? Are
not these the themes of which Homer sings?

  Ion. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. And do not the other poets sing of the same?

  Ion. Yes, Socrates; but not in the same way as Homer.

  Soc. What, in a worse way?

  Ion. Yes, in a far worse.

  Soc. And Homer in a better way?

  Ion. He is incomparably better.

  Soc. And yet surely, my dear friend Ion, in a discussion about
arithmetic, where many people are speaking, and one speaks better than
the rest, there is somebody who can judge which of them is the good
speaker?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And he who judges of the good will be the same as he who judges
of the bad speakers?

  Ion. The same.

  Soc. And he will be the arithmetician?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. Well, and in discussions about the wholesomeness of food,
when many persons are speaking, and one speaks better than the rest,
will he who recognizes the better speaker be a different person from
him who recognizes the worse, or the same?

  Ion. Clearly the same.

  Soc. And who is he, and what is his name?

  Ion. The physician.

  Soc. And speaking generally, in all discussions in which the subject
is the same and many men are speaking, will not he who knows the
good know the bad speaker also? For if he does not know the bad,
neither will he know the good when the same topic is being discussed.

  Ion. True.

  Soc. Is not the same person skilful in both?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And you say that Homer and the other poets, such as Hesiod
and Archilochus, speak of the same things, although not in the same
way; but the one speaks well and the other not so well?

  Ion. Yes; and I am right in saying so.

  Soc. And if you knew the good speaker, you would also know the
inferior speakers to be inferior?

  Ion. That is true.

  Soc. Then, my dear friend, can I be mistaken in saying that Ion is
equally skilled in Homer and in other poets, since he himself
acknowledges that the same person will be a good judge of all those
who speak of the same things; and that almost all poets do speak of
the same things?

  Ion. Why then, Socrates, do I lose attention and go to sleep and
have absolutely no ideas of the least value, when any one speaks of
any other poet; but when Homer is mentioned, I wake up at once and
am all attention and have plenty to say?

  Soc. The reason, my friend, is obvious. No one can fail to see
that you speak of Homer without any art or knowledge. If you were able
to speak of him by rules of art, you would have been able to speak
of all other poets; for poetry is a whole.

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And when any one acquires any other art as a whole, the same
may be said of them. Would you like me to explain my meaning, Ion?

  Ion. Yes, indeed, Socrates; I very much wish that you would: for I
love to hear you wise men talk.

  Soc. O that we were wise, Ion, and that you could truly call us
so; but you rhapsodes and actors, and the poets whose verses you sing,
are wise; whereas I am a common man, who only speak the truth. For
consider what a very commonplace and trivial thing is this which I
have said- a thing which any man might say: that when a man has
acquired a knowledge of a whole art, the enquiry into good and bad
is one and the same. Let us consider this matter; is not the art of
painting a whole?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And there are and have been many painters good and bad?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And did you ever know any one who was skilful in pointing out
the excellences and defects of Polygnotus the son of Aglaophon, but
incapable of criticizing other painters; and when the work of any
other painter was produced, went to sleep and was at a loss, and had
no ideas; but when he had to give his opinion about Polygnotus, or
whoever the painter might be, and about him only, woke up and was
attentive and had plenty to say?

  Ion. No indeed, I have never known such a person.

  Soc. Or did you ever know of any one in sculpture, who was skilful
in expounding the merits of Daedalus the son of Metion, or of Epeius
the son of Panopeus, or of Theodorus the Samian, or of any
individual sculptor; but when the works of sculptors in general were
produced, was at a loss and went to sleep and had nothing to say?

  Ion. No indeed; no more than the other.

  Soc. And if I am not mistaken, you never met with any one among
flute-players or harp- players or singers to the harp or rhapsodes who
was able to discourse of Olympus or Thamyras or Orpheus, or Phemius
the rhapsode of Ithaca, but was at a loss when he came to speak of Ion
of Ephesus, and had no notion of his merits or defects?

  Ion. I cannot deny what you say, Socrates. Nevertheless I am
conscious in my own self, and the world agrees with me in thinking
that I do speak better and have more to say about Homer than any other
man. But I do not speak equally well about others- tell me the
reason of this.

  Soc. I perceive, Ion; and I will proceed to explain to you what I
imagine to be the reason of this. The gift which you possess of
speaking excellently about Homer is not an art, but, as I was just
saying, an inspiration; there is a divinity moving you, like that
contained in the stone which Euripides calls a magnet, but which is
commonly known as the stone of Heraclea. This stone not only
attracts iron rings, but also imparts to them a similar power of
attracting other rings; and sometimes you may see a number of pieces
of iron and rings suspended from one another so as to form quite a
long chain: and all of them derive their power of suspension from
the original stone. In like manner the Muse first of all inspires
men herself; and from these inspired persons a chain of other
persons is suspended, who take the inspiration. For all good poets,
epic as well as lyric, compose their beautiful poems not by art, but
because they are inspired and possessed. And as the Corybantian
revellers when they dance are not in their right mind, so the lyric
poets are not in their right mind when they are composing their
beautiful strains: but when falling under the power of music and metre
they are inspired and possessed; like Bacchic maidens who draw milk
and honey from the rivers when they are under the influence of
Dionysus but not when they are in their right mind. And the soul of
the lyric poet does the same, as they themselves say; for they tell us
that they bring songs from honeyed fountains, culling them out of
the gardens and dells of the Muses; they, like the bees, winging their
way from flower to flower. And this is true. For the poet is a light
and winged and holy thing, and there is no invention in him until he
has been inspired and is out of his senses, and the mind is no
longer in him: when he has not attained to this state, he is powerless
and is unable to utter his oracles.

  Many are the noble words in which poets speak concerning the actions
of men; but like yourself when speaking about Homer, they do not speak
of them by any rules of art: they are simply inspired to utter that to
which the Muse impels them, and that only; and when inspired, one of
them will make dithyrambs, another hymns of praise, another choral
strains, another epic or iambic verses- and he who is good at one is
not good any other kind of verse: for not by art does the poet sing,
but by power divine. Had he learned by rules of art, he would have
known how to speak not of one theme only, but of all; and therefore
God takes away the minds of poets, and uses them as his ministers,
as he also uses diviners and holy prophets, in order that we who
hear them may know them to be speaking not of themselves who utter
these priceless words in a state of unconsciousness, but that God
himself is the speaker, and that through them he is conversing with
us. And Tynnichus the Chalcidian affords a striking instance of what I
am saying: he wrote nothing that any one would care to remember but
the famous paean which; in every one's mouth, one of the finest
poems ever written, simply an invention of the Muses, as he himself
says. For in this way, the God would seem to indicate to us and not
allow us to doubt that these beautiful poems are not human, or the
work of man, but divine and the work of God; and that the poets are
only the interpreters of the Gods by whom they are severally
possessed. Was not this the lesson which the God intended to teach
when by the mouth of the worst of poets he sang the best of songs?
Am I not right, Ion?

  Ion. Yes, indeed, Socrates, I feel that you are; for your words
touch my soul, and I am persuaded that good poets by a divine
inspiration interpret the things of the Gods to us.

  Soc. And you rhapsodists are the interpreters of the poets?

  Ion. There again you are right.

  Soc. Then you are the interpreters of interpreters?

  Ion. Precisely.

  Soc. I wish you would frankly tell me, Ion, what I am going to ask
of you: When you produce the greatest effect upon the audience in
the recitation of some striking passage, such as the apparition of
Odysseus leaping forth on the floor, recognized by the suitors and
casting his arrows at his feet, or the description of Achilles rushing
at Hector, or the sorrows of Andromache, Hecuba, or Priam,- are you in
your right mind? Are you not carried out of yourself, and does not
your soul in an ecstasy seem to be among the persons or places of
which you are speaking, whether they are in Ithaca or in Troy or
whatever may be the scene of the poem?

  Ion. That proof strikes home to me, Socrates. For I must frankly
confess that at the tale of pity, my eyes are filled with tears, and
when I speak of horrors, my hair stands on end and my heart throbs.

  Soc. Well, Ion, and what are we to say of a man who at a sacrifice
or festival, when he is dressed in holiday attire and has golden
crowns upon his head, of which nobody has robbed him, appears sweeping
or panic-stricken in the presence of more than twenty thousand
friendly faces, when there is no one despoiling or wronging him;- is
he in his right mind or is he not?

  Ion. No indeed, Socrates, I must say that, strictly speaking, he
is not in his right mind.

  Soc. And are you aware that you produce similar effects on most
spectators?

  Ion. Only too well; for I look down upon them from the stage, and
behold the various emotions of pity, wonder, sternness, stamped upon
their countenances when I am speaking: and I am obliged to give my
very best attention to them; for if I make them cry I myself shall
laugh, and if I make them laugh I myself shall cry when the time of
payment arrives.

  Soc. Do you know that the spectator is the last of the rings
which, as I am saying, receive the power of the original magnet from
one another? The rhapsode like yourself and the actor are intermediate
links, and the poet himself is the first of them. Through all these
the God sways the souls of men in any direction which he pleases,
and makes one man hang down from another. Thus there is a vast chain
of dancers and masters and undermasters of choruses, who are
suspended, as if from the stone, at the side of the rings which hang
down from the Muse. And every poet has some Muse from whom he is
suspended, and by whom he is said to be possessed, which is nearly the
same thing; for he is taken hold of. And from these first rings, which
are the poets, depend others, some deriving their inspiration from
Orpheus, others from Musaeus; but the greater number are possessed and
held by Homer. Of whom, Ion, you are one, and are possessed by
Homer; and when any one repeats the words of another poet you go to
sleep, and know not what to say; but when any one recites a strain
of Homer you wake up in a moment, and your soul leaps within you,
and you have plenty to say; for not by art or knowledge about Homer do
you say what you say, but by divine inspiration and by possession;
just as the Corybantian revellers too have a quick perception of
that strain only which is appropriated to the God by whom they are
possessed, and have plenty of dances and words for that, but take no
heed of any other. And you, Ion, when the name of Homer is mentioned
have plenty to say, and have nothing to say of others. You ask, "Why
is this?" The answer is that you praise Homer not by art but by divine
inspiration.

  Ion. That is good, Socrates; and yet I doubt whether you will ever
have eloquence enough to persuade me that I praise Homer only when I
am mad and possessed; and if you could hear me speak of him I am
sure you would never think this to be the case.

  Soc. I should like very much to hear you, but not until you have
answered a question which I have to ask. On what part of Homer do
you speak well?- not surely about every part.

  Ion. There is no part, Socrates, about which I do not speak well
of that I can assure you.

  Soc. Surely not about things in Homer of which you have no
knowledge?

  Ion. And what is there in Homer of which I have no knowledge?

  Soc. Why, does not Homer speak in many passages about arts? For
example, about driving; if I can only remember the lines I will repeat
them.

  Ion. I remember, and will repeat them.

  Soc. Tell me then, what Nestor says to Antilochus, his son, where he
bids him be careful of the turn at the horse-race in honour of
Patroclus.

  Ion. He says:

  Bend gently in the polished chariot to the left of them, and urge
the horse on the right hand with whip and voice; and slacken the rein.
And when you are at the goal, let the left horse draw near, yet so
that the nave of the well-wrought wheel may not even seem to touch the
extremity; and avoid catching the stone.

  Soc. Enough. Now, Ion, will the charioteer or the physician be the
better judge of the propriety of these lines?

  Ion. The charioteer, clearly.

  Soc. And will the reason be that this is his art, or will there be
any other reason?

  Ion. No, that will be the reason.

  Soc. And every art is appointed by God to have knowledge of a
certain work; for that which we know by the art of the pilot we do not
know by the art of medicine?

  Ion. Certainly not.

  Soc. Nor do we know by the art of the carpenter that which we know
by the art of medicine?

  Ion. Certainly not.

  Soc. And this is true of all the arts;- that which we know with
one art we do not know with the other? But let me ask a prior
question: You admit that there are differences of arts?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. You would argue, as I should, that when one art is of one
kind of knowledge and another of another, they are different?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. Yes, surely; for if the subject of knowledge were the same,
there would be no meaning in saying that the arts were different,-
if they both gave the same knowledge. For example, I know that here
are five fingers, and you know the same. And if I were to ask
whether I and you became acquainted with this fact by the help of
the same art of arithmetic, you would acknowledge that we did?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. Tell me, then, what I was intending to ask you- whether this
holds universally? Must the same art have the same subject of
knowledge, and different arts other subjects of knowledge?

  Ion. That is my opinion, Socrates.

  Soc. Then he who has no knowledge of a particular art will have no
right judgment of the sayings and doings of that art?

  Ion. Very true.

  Soc. Then which will be a better judge of the lines which you were
reciting from Homer, you or the charioteer?

  Ion. The charioteer.

  Soc. Why, yes, because you are a rhapsode and not a charioteer.

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And the art of the rhapsode is different from that of the
charioteer?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And if a different knowledge, then a knowledge of different
matters?

  Ion. True.

  Soc. You know the passage in which Hecamede, the concubine of
Nestor, is described as giving to the wounded Machaon a posset, as
he says,

  Made with Pramnian wine; and she grated cheese of goat's milk with a
grater of bronze, and at his side placed an onion which gives a relish
to drink.

Now would you say that the art of the rhapsode or the art of
medicine was better able to judge of the propriety of these lines?

  Ion. The art of medicine.

  Soc. And when Homer says,

  And she descended into the deep like a leaden plummet, which, set in
the horn of ox that ranges in the fields, rushes along carrying
death among the ravenous fishes,-

will the art of the fisherman or of the rhapsode be better able to
judge whether these lines are rightly expressed or not?

  Ion. Clearly, Socrates, the art of the fisherman.

  Soc. Come now, suppose that you were to say to me: "Since you,
Socrates, are able to assign different passages in Homer to their
corresponding arts, I wish that you would tell me what are the
passages of which the excellence ought to be judged by the prophet and
prophetic art"; and you will see how readily and truly I shall
answer you. For there are many such passages, particularly in the
Odyssey; as, for example, the passage in which Theoclymenus the
prophet of the house of Melampus says to the suitors:-

  Wretched men! what is happening to you? Your heads and your faces
and your limbs underneath are shrouded in night; and the voice of
lamentation bursts forth, and your cheeks are wet with tears. And
the vestibule is full, and the court is full, of ghosts descending
into the darkness of Erebus, and the sun has perished out of heaven,
and an evil mist is spread abroad.

  And there are many such passages in the Iliad also; as for example
in the description of the battle near the rampart, where he says:-

  As they were eager to pass the ditch, there came to them an omen:
a soaring eagle, holding back the people on the left, bore a huge
bloody dragon in his talons, still living and panting; nor had he
yet resigned the strife, for he bent back and smote the bird which
carried him on the breast by the neck, and he in pain let him fall
from him to the ground into the midst of the multitude. And the eagle,
with a cry, was borne afar on the wings of the wind.

  These are the sort of things which I should say that the prophet
ought to consider and determine.

  Ion. And you are quite right, Socrates, in saying so.

  Soc. Yes, Ion, and you are right also. And as I have selected from
the Iliad and Odyssey for you passages which describe the office of
the prophet and the physician and the fisherman, do you, who know
Homer so much better than I do, Ion, select for me passages which
relate to the rhapsode and the rhapsode's art, and which the
rhapsode ought to examine and judge of better than other men.

  Ion. All passages, I should say, Socrates.

  Soc. Not all, Ion, surely. Have you already forgotten what you
were saying? A rhapsode ought to have a better memory.

  Ion. Why, what am I forgetting?

  Soc. Do you not remember that you declared the art of the rhapsode
to be different from the art of the charioteer?

  Ion. Yes, I remember.

  Soc. And you admitted that being different they would have different
subjects of knowledge?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. Then upon your own showing the rhapsode, and the art of the
rhapsode, will not know everything?

  Ion. I should exclude certain things, Socrates.

  Soc. You mean to say that you would exclude pretty much the subjects
of the other arts. As he does not know all of them, which of them will
he know?

  Ion. He will know what a man and what a woman ought to say, and what
a freeman and what a slave ought to say, and what a ruler and what a
subject.

  Soc. Do you mean that a rhapsode will know better than the pilot
what the ruler of a sea-tossed vessel ought to say?

  Ion. No; the pilot will know best.

  Soc. Or will the rhapsode know better than the physician what the
ruler of a sick man ought to say?

  Ion. He will not.

  Soc. But he will know what a slave ought to say?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. Suppose the slave to be a cowherd; the rhapsode will know
better than the cowherd what he ought to say in order to soothe the
infuriated cows?

  Ion. No, he will not.

  Soc. But he will know what a spinning-woman ought to say about the
working of wool?

  Ion. No.

  Soc. At any rate he will know what a general ought to say when
exhorting his soldiers?

  Ion. Yes, that is the sort of thing which the rhapsode will be
sure to know.

  Soc. Well, but is the art of the rhapsode the art of the general?

  Ion. I am sure that I should know what a general ought to say.

  Soc. Why, yes, Ion, because you may possibly have a knowledge of the
art of the general as well as of the rhapsode; and you may also have a
knowledge of horsemanship as well as of the lyre: and then you would
know when horses were well or ill managed. But suppose I were to ask
you: By the help of which art, Ion, do you know whether horses are
well managed, by your skill as a horseman or as a performer on the
lyre- what would you answer?

  Ion. I should reply, by my skill as a horseman.

  Soc. And if you judged of performers on the lyre, you would admit
that you judged of them as a performer on the lyre, and not as a
horseman?

  Ion. Yes.

  Soc. And in judging of the general's art, do you judge of it as a
general or a rhapsode?

  Ion. To me there appears to be no difference between them.

  Soc. What do you mean? Do you mean to say that the art of the
rhapsode and of the general is the same?

  Ion. Yes, one and the same.

  Soc. Then he who is a good rhapsode is also a good general?

  Ion. Certainly, Socrates.

  Soc. And he who is a good general is also a good rhapsode?

  Ion. No; I do not say that.

  Soc. But you do say that he who is a good rhapsode is also a good
general.

  Ion. Certainly.

  Soc. And you are the best of Hellenic rhapsodes?

  Ion. Far the best, Socrates.

  Soc. And are you the best general, Ion?

  Ion. To be sure, Socrates; and Homer was my master.

  Soc. But then, Ion, what in the name of goodness can be the reason
why you, who are the best of generals as well as the best of rhapsodes
in all Hellas, go about as a rhapsode when you might be a general?
Do you think that the Hellenes want a rhapsode with his golden
crown, and do not want a general?

  Ion. Why, Socrates, the reason is, that my countrymen, the
Ephesians, are the servants and soldiers of Athens, and do not need
a general; and you and Sparta are not likely to have me, for you think
that you have enough generals of your own.

  Soc. My good Ion, did you never hear of Apollodorus of Cyzicus?

  Ion. Who may he be?

  Soc. One who, though a foreigner, has often been chosen their
general by the Athenians: and there is Phanosthenes of Andros, and
Heraclides of Clazomenae, whom they have also appointed to the command
of their armies and to other offices, although aliens, after they
had shown their merit. And will they not choose Ion the Ephesian to be
their general, and honour him, if he prove himself worthy? Were not
the Ephesians originally Athenians, and Ephesus is no mean city?
But, indeed, Ion, if you are correct in saying that by art and
knowledge you are able to praise Homer, you do not deal fairly with
me, and after all your professions of knowing many, glorious things
about Homer, and promises that you would exhibit them, you are only
a deceiver, and so far from exhibiting the art of which you are a
master, will not, even after my repeated entreaties, explain to me the
nature of it. You have literally as many forms as Proteus; and now you
go all manner of ways, twisting and turning, and, like Proteus, become
all manner of people at once, and at last slip away from me in the
disguise of a general, in order that you may escape exhibiting your
Homeric lore. And if you have art, then, as I was saying, in
falsifying your promise that you would exhibit Homer, you are not
dealing fairly with me. But if, as I believe, you have no art, but
speak all these beautiful words about Homer unconsciously under his
inspiring influence, then I acquit you of dishonesty, and shall only
say that you are inspired. Which do you prefer to be thought,
dishonest or inspired?

  Ion. There is a great difference, Socrates, between the two
alternatives; and inspiration is by far the nobler.

  Soc. Then, Ion, I shall assume the nobler alternative; and attribute
to you in your praises of Homer inspiration, and not art.

                          -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: LYSIMACHUS, son of Aristides; MELESIAS, son
of Thucydides; THEIR SONS; NICIAS; LACHES; SOCRATES.

  Lys. You have seen the exhibition of the man fighting in armour,
Nicias and Laches, but we did not tell you at the time the reason
why my friend Melesias and I asked you to go with us and see him. I
think that we may as well confess what this was, for we certainly
ought not to have any reserve with you. The reason was, that we were
intending to ask your advice. Some laugh at the very notion of
advising others, and when they are asked will not say what they think.
They guess at the wishes of the person who asks them, and answer
according to his, and not according to their own, opinion. But as we
know that you are good judges, and will say exactly what you think, we
have taken you into our counsels. The matter about which I am making
all this preface is as follows: Melesias and I have two sons; that
is his son, and he is named Thucydides, after his grandfather; and
this is mine, who is also called after his grandfather, Aristides.
Now, we are resolved to take the greatest care of the youths, and
not to let them run about as they like, which is too often the way
with the young, when they are no longer children, but to begin at once
and do the utmost that we can for them. And knowing you to have sons
of your own, we thought that you were most likely to have attended
to their training and improvement, and, if perchance you have not
attended to them, we may remind you that you ought to have done so,
and would invite you to assist us in the fulfillment of a common duty.
I will tell you, Nicias and Laches, even at the risk of being tedious,
how we came to think of this. Melesias and I live together, and our
sons live with us; and now, as I was saying at first, we are going
to confess to you. Both of us often talk to the lads about the many
noble deeds which our own fathers did in war and peace-in the
management of the allies, and in the administration of the city; but
neither of us has any deeds of his own which he can show. The truth is
that we are ashamed of this contrast being seen by them, and we
blame our fathers for letting us be spoiled in the days of our
youth, while they were occupied with the concerns of others; and we
urge all this upon the lads, pointing out to them that they will not
grow up to honour if they are rebellious and take no pains about
themselves; but that if they take pains they may, perhaps, become
worthy of the names which they bear. They, on their part, promise to
comply with our wishes; and our care is to discover what studies or
pursuits are likely to be most improving to them. Some one commended
to us the art of fighting in armour, which he thought an excellent
accomplishment for a young man to learn; and he praised the man
whose exhibition you have seen, and told us to go and see him. And
we determined that we would go, and get you to accompany us; and we
were intending at the same time, if you did not object, to take
counsel with you about the education of our sons. That is the matter
which we wanted to talk over with you; and we hope that you will
give us your opinion about this art of fighting in armour, and about
any other studies or pursuits which may or may not be desirable for
a young man to learn. Please to say whether you agree to our proposal.

  Nic. As far as I am concerned, Lysimachus and Melesias, I applaud
your purpose, and will gladly assist you; and I believe that you,
Laches, will be equally glad.

  La. Certainly, Nicias; and I quite approve of the remark which
Lysimachus made about his own father and the father of Melesias, and
which is applicable, not only to them, but to us, and to every one who
is occupied with public affairs. As he says, such persons are too
apt to be negligent and careless of their own children and their
private concerns. There is much truth in that remark of yours,
Lysimachus. But why, instead of consulting us, do you not consult
our friend Socrates about the education of the youths? He is of the
same deme with you, and is always passing his time in places where the
youth have any noble study or pursuit, such as you are enquiring
after.

  Lys. Why, Laches, has Socrates ever attended to matters of this
sort?

  La. Certainly, Lysimachus.

  Nic. That I have the means of knowing as well as Laches; for quite
lately he supplied me with a teacher of music for my sons,-Damon,
the disciple of Agathocles, who is a most accomplished man in every
way, as well as a musician, and a companion of inestimable value for
young men at their age.

  Lys. Those who have reached my time of life, Socrates and Nicias and
Laches, fall out of acquaintance with the young, because they are
generally detained at home by old age; but you, O son of Sophroniscus,
should let your fellow demesman have the benefits of any advice
which you are able to give. Moreover I have a claim upon you as an old
friend of your father; for I and he were always companions and
friends, and to the hour of his death there never was a difference
between us; and now it comes back to me, at the mention of your
name, that I have heard these lads talking to one another at home, and
often speaking of Socrates in terms of the highest praise; but I
have never thought to ask them whether the son of Sophroniscus was the
person whom they meant. Tell me, my boys, whether this is the Socrates
of whom you have often spoken?

  Son. Certainly, father, this is he.

  Lys. I am delighted to hear, Socrates, that you maintain the name of
your father, who was a most excellent man; and I further rejoice at
the prospect of our family ties being renewed.

  La. Indeed, Lysimachus, you ought not to give him up; for I can
assure you that I have seen him maintaining, not only his father's,
but also his country's name. He was my companion in the retreat from
Delium, and I can tell you that if others had only been like him,
the honour of our country would have been upheld, and the great defeat
would never have occurred.

  Lys. That is very high praise which is accorded to you, Socrates, by
faithful witnesses and for actions like those which they praise. Let
me tell you the pleasure which I feel in hearing of your fame; and I
hope that you will regard me as one of your warmest friends. You ought
to have visited us long ago, and made yourself at home with us; but
now, from this day forward, as we have at last found one another
out, do as I say-come and make acquaintance with me, and with these
young men, that I may continue your friend, as I was your father's.
I shall expect you to do so, and shall venture at some future time
to remind you of your duty. But what say you of the matter of which we
were beginning to speak-the art of fighting in armour? Is that a
practice in which the lads may be advantageously instructed?

  Soc. I will endeavour to advise you, Lysimachus, as far as I can
in this matter, and also in every way will comply with your wishes;
but as I am younger and not so experienced, I think that I ought
certainly to hear first what my elders have to say, and to learn of
them, and if I have anything to add, then I may venture to give my
opinion to them as well as to you. Suppose, Nicias, that one or
other of you begin.

  Nic. I have no objection, Socrates; and my opinion is that the
acquirement of this art is in many ways useful to young men. It is
an advantage to them that among the favourite amusements of their
leisure hours they should have one which tends to improve and not to
injure their bodily health. No gymnastics could be better or harder
exercise; and this, and the art of riding, are of all arts most
befitting to a freeman; for they only who are thus trained in the
use of arms are the athletes of our military profession, trained in
that on which the conflict turns. Moreover in actual battle, when
you have to fight in a line with a number of others, such an
acquirement will be of some use, and will be of the greatest
whenever the ranks are broken and you have to fight singly, either
in pursuit, when you are attacking some one who is defending
himself, or in flight, when you have to defend yourself against an
assailant. Certainly he who possessed the art could not meet with
any harm at the hands of a single person, or perhaps of several; and
in any case he would have a great advantage. Further, this sort of
skill inclines a man to the love of other noble lessons; for every man
who has learned how to fight in armour will desire to learn the proper
arrangement of an army, which is the sequel of the lesson: and when he
has learned this, and his ambition is once fired, he will go on to
learn the complete art of the general. There is no difficulty in
seeing that the knowledge and practice of other military arts will
be honourable and valuable to a man; and this lesson may be the
beginning of them. Let me add a further advantage, which is by no
means a slight one,-that this science will make any man a great deal
more valiant and self-possessed in the field. And I will not disdain
to mention, what by some may he thought to be a small matter;-he
will make a better appearance at the right time; that is to say, at
the time when his appearance will strike terror into his enemies. My
opinion then, Lysimachus, is, as I say, that the youths should be
instructed in this art, and for the reasons which I have given. But
Laches may take a different view; and I shall be very glad to hear
what he has to say.

  La. I should not like to maintain, Nicias, that any kind of
knowledge is not to be learned; for all knowledge appears to be a
good: and if, as Nicias and as the teachers of the art affirm, this
use of arms is really a species of knowledge, then it ought to be
learned; but if not, and if those who profess to teach it are
deceivers only; or if it be knowledge, but not of a valuable sort,
then what is the use of learning it? I say this, because I think
that if it had been really valuable, the Lacedaemonians, whose whole
life is passed in finding out and practising the arts which give
them an advantage over other nations in war, would have discovered
this one. And even if they had not, still these professors of the
art would certainly not have failed to discover that of all the
Hellenes the Lacedaemonians have the greatest interest in such
matters, and that a master of the art who was honoured among them
would be sure to make his fortune among other nations, just as a
tragic poet would who is honoured among ourselves; which is the reason
why he who fancies that he can write a tragedy does not go about
itinerating in the neighbouring states, but rushes straight, and
exhibits at Athens; and this is natural. Whereas I perceive that these
fighters in armour regard Lacedaemon as a sacred inviolable territory,
which they do not touch with the point of their foot; but they make
a circuit of the neighbouring states, and would rather exhibit to
any others than to the Spartans; and particularly to those who would
themselves acknowledge that they are by no means first-rate in the
arts of war. Further, Lysimachus, I have encountered a good many of
these gentlemen in actual service, and have taken their measure, which
I can give you at once; for none of these masters of fence have ever
been distinguished in war,-there has been a sort of fatality about
them; while in all other arts the men of note have been always those
who have practised the art, they appear to be a most unfortunate
exception. For example, this very Stesilaus, whom you and I have
just witnessed exhibiting in all that crowd and making such great
professions of his powers, I have seen at another time making, in
sober truth, an involuntary exhibition of himself, which was a far
better spectacle. He was a marine on board a ship which struck a
transport vessel, and was armed with a weapon, half spear half scythe;
the singularity of this weapon was worthy of the singularity of the
man. To make a long story short, I will only tell you what happened to
this notable invention of the scythe-spear. He was fighting, and the
scythe was caught in the rigging of the other ship, and stuck fast;
and he tugged, but was unable to get his weapon free. The two ships
were passing one another. He first ran along his own ship holding on
to the spear; but as the other ship passed by and drew him after as he
was holding on, he let the spear slip through his hand until he
retained only the end of the handle. The people in the transport
clapped their hands, and laughed at his ridiculous figure; and when
some one threw a stone, which fell on the deck at his feet, and he
quitted of the scythe-spear, the crew of his own trireme also burst
out laughing; they could not refrain when they beheld the weapon
waving in the air, suspended from the transport. Now I do not deny
that there may be something in such an art, as Nicias asserts, but I
tell you my experience; and, as I said at first, whether this be an
art of which the advantage is so slight, or not an art at all, but
only an imposition, in either case such an acquirement is not worth
having. For my opinion is, that if the professor of this art be a
coward, he will be likely to become rash, and his character will be
only more notorious; or if he be brave, and fail ever so little, other
men will be on the watch, and he will be greatly traduced; for there
is a jealousy of such pretenders; and unless a man be preeminent in
valour, he cannot help being ridiculous, if he says that he has this
sort of skill. Such is my judgment, Lysimachus, of the desirableness
of this art; but, as I said at first, ask Socrates, and do not let him
go until he has given you his opinion of the matter.

  Lys. I am going to ask this favour of you, Socrates; as is the
more necessary because the two councillors disagree, and some one is
in a manner still needed who will decide between them. Had they
agreed, no arbiter would have been required. But as Laches has voted
one way and Nicias another, I should like to hear with which of our
two friends you agree.

  Soc. What, Lysimachus, are you going to accept the opinion of the
majority?

  Lys. Why, yes, Socrates; what else am I to do?

  Soc. And would you do so too, Melesias? If you were deliberating
about the gymnastic training of your son, would you follow the
advice of the majority of us, or the opinion of the one who had been
trained and exercised under a skilful master?

  Mel. The latter, Socrates; as would surely be reasonable.

  Soc. His one vote would be worth more than the vote of all us four?

  Mel. Certainly.

  Soc. And for this reason, as I imagine,-because a good decision is
based on knowledge and not on numbers?

  Mel. To be sure.

  Soc. Must we not then first of all ask, whether there is any one
of us who has knowledge of that about which we are deliberating? If
there is, let us take his advice, though he be one only, and not
mind the rest; if there is not, let us seek further counsel. Is this a
slight matter about which you and Lysimachus are deliberating? Are you
not risking the greatest of your possessions? For children are your
riches; and upon their turning out well or ill depends the whole order
of their father's house.

  Mel. That is true.

  Soc. Great care, then, is required in this matter?

  Mel. Certainly.

  Soc. Suppose, as I was just now saying, that we were considering, or
wanting to consider, who was the best trainer. Should we not select
him who knew and had practised the art, and had the best teachers?

  Mel. I think that we should.

  Soc. But would there not arise a prior question about the nature
of the art of which we want to find the masters?

  Mel. I do not understand.

  Soc. Let me try to make my meaning plainer then. I do not think that
we have as yet decided what that is about which we are consulting,
when we ask which of us is or is not skilled in the art, and has or
has not had a teacher of the art.

  Nic. Why, Socrates, is not the question whether young men ought or
ought not to learn the art of fighting in armour?

  Soc. Yes, Nicias; but there is also a prior question, which I may
illustrate in this way: When a person considers about applying a
medicine to the eyes, would you say that he is consulting about the
medicine or about the eyes?

  Nic. About the eyes.

  Soc. And when he considers whether he shall set a bridle on a
horse and at what time, he is thinking of the horse and not of the
bridle?

  Nic. True.

  Soc. And in a word, when he considers anything for the sake of
another thing, he thinks of the end and not of the means?

  Nic. Certainly.

  Soc. And when you call in an adviser, you should see whether he
too is skilful in the accomplishment of the end which you have in
view?

  Nic. Most true.

  Soc. And at present we have in view some knowledge, of which the end
is the soul of youth?

  Nic. Yes.

  Soc. And we are enquiring, Which of us is skilful or successful in
the treatment of the soul, and which of us has had good teachers?

  La. Well but, Socrates; did you never observe that some persons, who
have had no teachers, are more skilful than those who have, in some
things?

  Soc. Yes, Laches, I have observed that; but you would not be very
willing to trust them if they only professed to be masters of their
art, unless they could show some proof of their skill or excellence in
one or more works.

  La. That is true.

  Soc. And therefore, Laches and Nicias, as Lysimachus and Melesias,
in their anxiety to improve the minds of their sons, have asked our
advice about them, we too should tell them who our teachers were, if
we say that we have had any, and prove them to be in the first place
men of merit and experienced trainers of the minds of youth and also
to have been really our teachers. Or if any of us says that he has
no teacher, but that he has works of his own to show; then he should
point out to them what Athenians or strangers, bond or free, he is
generally acknowledged to have improved. But if he can show neither
teachers nor works, then he should tell them to look out for others;
and not run the risk of spoiling the children of friends, and
thereby incurring the most formidable accusation which can be
brought against any one by those nearest to him. As for myself,
Lysimachus and Melesias, I am the first to confess that I have never
had a teacher of the art of virtue; although I have always from my
earliest youth desired to have one. But I am too poor to give money to
the Sophists, who are the only professors of moral improvement; and to
this day I have never been able to discover the art myself, though I
should not be surprised if Nicias or Laches may have discovered or
learned it; for they are far wealthier than I am, and may therefore
have learnt of others. And they are older too; so that they have had
more time to make the discovery. And I really believe that they are
able to educate a man; for unless they had been confident in their own
knowledge, they would never have spoken thus decidedly of the pursuits
which are advantageous or hurtful to a young man. I repose
confidence in both of them; but I am surprised to find that they
differ from one another. And therefore, Lysimachus, as Laches
suggested that you should detain me, and not let me go until I
answered, I in turn earnestly beseech and advise you to detain
Laches and Nicias, and question them. I would have you say to them:
Socrates avers that he has no knowledge of the matter-he is unable
to decide which of you speaks truly; neither discoverer nor student is
he of anything of the kind. But you, Laches and Nicias, should each of
you tell us who is the most skilful educator whom you have ever known;
and whether you invented the art yourselves, or learned of another;
and if you learned, who were your respective teachers, and who were
their brothers in the art; and then, if you are too much occupied in
politics to teach us yourselves, let us go to them, and present them
with gifts, or make interest with them, or both, in the hope that they
may be induced to take charge of our children and of yours; and then
they will not grow up inferior, and disgrace their ancestors. But if
you are yourselves original discoverers in that field, give us some
proof of your skill. Who are they who, having been inferior persons,
have become under your care good and noble? For if this is your
first attempt at education, there is a danger that you may be trying
the experiment, not on the "vile corpus" of a Carian slave, but on
your own sons, or the sons of your friend, and, as the proverb says,
"break the large vessel in learning to make pots." Tell us then,
what qualities you claim or do not claim. Make them tell you that,
Lysimachus, and do not let them off.

  Lys. I very much approve of the words of Socrates, my friends; but
you, Nicias and Laches, must determine whether you will be questioned,
and give an explanation about matters of this sort. Assuredly, I and
Melesias would be greatly pleased to hear you answer the questions
which Socrates asks, if you will: for I began by saying that we took
you into our counsels because we thought that you would have
attended to the subject, especially as you have children who, like our
own, are nearly of an age to be educated. Well, then, if you have no
objection, suppose that you take Socrates into partnership; and do you
and he ask and answer one another's questions: for, as he has well
said, we are deliberating about the most important of our concerns.
I hope that you will see fit to comply with our request.

  Nic. I see very clearly, Lysimachus, that you have only known
Socrates' father, and have no acquaintance with Socrates himself: at
least, you can only have known him when he was a child, and may have
met him among his fellow wardsmen, in company with his father, at a
sacrifice, or at some other gathering. You clearly show that you
have never known him since he arrived at manhood.

  Lys. Why do you say that, Nicias?

  Nic. Because you seem not to be aware that any one who has an
intellectual affinity to Socrates and enters into conversation with
him is liable to be drawn into an argument; and whatever subject he
may start, he will be continually carried round and round by him,
until at last he finds that he has to give an account both of his
present and past life; and when he is once entangled, Socrates will
not let him go until he has completely and thoroughly sifted him.
Now I am used to his ways; and I know that he will certainly do as I
say, and also that I myself shall be the sufferer; for I am fond of
his conversation, Lysimachus. And I think that there is no harm in
being reminded of any wrong thing which we are, or have been, doing:
he who does not fly from reproof will be sure to take more heed of his
after-life; as Solon says, he will wish and desire to be learning so
long as he lives, and will not think that old age of itself brings
wisdom. To me, to be cross examined by Socrates is neither unusual nor
unpleasant; indeed, I knew all along that where Socrates was, the
argument would soon pass from our sons to ourselves; and therefore,
I say that for my part, I am quite willing to discourse with
Socrates in his own manner; but you had better ask our friend Laches
what his feeling may be.

  La. I have but one feeling, Nicias, or (shall I say?) two
feelings, about discussions. Some would think that I am a lover, and
to others I may seem to be a hater of discourse; for when I hear a man
discoursing of virtue, or of any sort of wisdom, who is a true man and
worthy of his theme, I am delighted beyond measure: and I compare
the man and his words, and note the harmony and correspondence of
them. And such an one I deem to be the true musician, attuned to a
fairer harmony than that of the lyre, or any pleasant instrument of
music; for truly he has in his own life a harmony of words and deeds
arranged, not in the Ionian, or in the Phrygian mode, nor yet in the
Lydian, but in the true Hellenic mode, which is the Dorian, and no
other. Such an one makes me merry with the sound of his voice; and
when I hear him I am thought to be a lover of discourse; so eager am I
in drinking in his words. But a man whose actions do not agree with
his words is an annoyance to me; and the better he speaks the more I
hate him, and then I seem to be a hater of discourse. As to
Socrates, I have no knowledge of his words, but of old, as would seem,
I have had experience of his deeds; and his deeds show that free and
noble sentiments are natural to him. And if his words accord, then I
am of one mind with him, and shall be delighted to be interrogated
by a man such as he is, and shall not be annoyed at having to learn of
him: for I too agree with Solon, "that I would fain grow old, learning
many things." But I must be allowed to add "of the good only."
Socrates must be willing to allow that he is a good teacher, or I
shall be a dull and uncongenial pupil: but that the teacher is
younger, or not as yet in repute-anything of that sort is of no
account with me. And therefore, Socrates, I give you notice that you
may teach and confute me as much as ever you like, and also learn of
me anything which I know. So high is the opinion which I have
entertained of you ever since the day on which you were my companion
in danger, and gave a proof of your valour such as only the man of
merit can give. Therefore, say whatever you like, and do not mind
about the difference of our ages.

  Soc. I cannot say that either of you show any reluctance to take
counsel and advise with me.

  Lys. But this is our proper business; and yours as well as ours, for
I reckon you as one of us. Please then to take my place, and find
out from Nicias and Laches what we want to know, for the sake of the
youths, and talk and consult with them: for I am old, and my memory is
bad; and I do not remember the questions which I am going to ask, or
the answers to them; and if there is any interruption I am quite lost.
I will therefore beg of you to carry on the proposed discussion by
yourselves; and I will listen, and Melesias and I will act upon your
conclusions.

  Soc. Let us, Nicias and Laches, comply with the request of
Lysimachus and Melesias. There will be no harm in asking ourselves the
question which was first proposed to us: "Who have been our own
instructors in this sort of training, and whom have we made better?"
But the other mode of carrying on the enquiry will bring us equally to
the same point, and will be more like proceeding from first
principles. For if we knew that the addition of something would
improve some other thing, and were able to make the addition, then,
clearly, we must know how that about which we are advising may be best
and most easily attained. Perhaps you do not understand what I mean.
Then let me make my meaning plainer in this way. Suppose we knew
that the addition of sight makes better the eyes which possess this
gift, and also were able to impart sight to the eyes, then, clearly,
we should know the nature of sight, and should be able to advise how
this gift of sight may be best and most easily attained; but if we
knew neither what sight is, nor what hearing is, we should not be very
good medical advisers about the eyes or the ears, or about the best
mode of giving sight and hearing to them.

  La. That is true, Socrates.

  Soc. And are not our two friends, Laches, at this very moment
inviting us to consider in what way the gift of virtue may be imparted
to their sons for the improvement of their minds?

  La. Very true.

  Soc. Then must we not first know the nature of virtue? For how can
we advise any one about the best mode of attaining something of
which we are wholly ignorant?

  La. I do not think that we can, Socrates.

  Soc. Then, Laches, we may presume that we know the nature of virtue?

  La. Yes.

  Soc. And that which we know we must surely be able to tell?

  La. Certainly.

  Soc. I would not have us begin, my friend, with enquiring about
the whole of virtue; for that may be more than we can accomplish;
let us first consider whether we have a sufficient knowledge of a
part; the enquiry will thus probably be made easier to us.

  La. Let us do as you say, Socrates.

  Soc. Then which of the parts of virtue shall we select? Must we
not select that to which the art of fighting in armour is supposed
to conduce? And is not that generally thought to be courage?

  La. Yes, certainly.

  Soc. Then, Laches, suppose that we first set about determining the
nature of courage, and in the second place proceed to enquire how
the young men may attain this quality by the help of studies and
pursuits. Tell me, if you can, what is courage.

  La. Indeed, Socrates, I see no difficulty in answering; he is a
man of courage who does not run away, but remains at his post and
fights against the enemy; there can be no mistake about that.

  Soc. Very good, Laches; and yet I fear that I did not express myself
clearly; and therefore you have answered not the question which I
intended to ask, but another.

  La. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I will endeavour to explain; you would call a man courageous
who remains at his post, and fights with the enemy?

  La. Certainly I should.

  Soc. And so should I; but what would you say of another man, who
fights flying, instead of remaining?

  La. How flying?

  Soc. Why, as the Scythians are said to fight, flying as well as
pursuing; and as Homer says in praise of the horses of Aeneas, that
they knew "how to pursue, and fly quickly hither and thither"; and
he passes an encomium on Aeneas himself, as having a knowledge of fear
or flight, and calls him "an author of fear or flight."

  La. Yes, Socrates, and there Homer is right: for he was speaking
of chariots, as you were speaking of the Scythian cavalry, who have
that way of fighting; but the heavy-armed Greek fights, as I say,
remaining in his rank.

  Soc. And yet, Laches, you must except the Lacedaemonians at Plataea,
who, when they came upon the light shields of the Persians, are said
not to have been willing to stand and fight, and to have fled; but
when the ranks of the Persians were broken, they turned upon them like
cavalry, and won the battle of Plataea.

  La. That is true.

  Soc. That was my meaning when I said that I was to blame in having
put my question badly, and that this was the reason of your
answering badly. For I meant to ask you not only about the courage
of heavy-armed soldiers, but about the courage of cavalry and every
other style of soldier; and not only who are courageous in war, but
who are courageous in perils by sea, and who in disease, or in
poverty, or again in politics, are courageous; and not only who are
courageous against pain or fear, but mighty to contend against desires
and pleasures, either fixed in their rank or turning upon their enemy.
There is this sort of courage-is there not, Laches?

  La. Certainly, Socrates.

  Soc. And all these are courageous, but some have courage in
pleasures, and some in pains: some in desires, and some in fears,
and some are cowards under the same conditions, as I should imagine.

  La. Very true.

  Soc. Now I was asking about courage and cowardice in general. And
I will begin with courage, and once more ask, What is that common
quality, which is the same in all these cases, and which is called
courage? Do you now understand what I mean?

  La. Not over well.

  Soc. I mean this: As I might ask what is that quality which is
called quickness, and which is found in running, in playing the
lyre, in speaking, in learning, and in many other similar actions,
or rather which we possess in nearly every action that is worth
mentioning of arms, legs, mouth, voice, mind;-would you not apply
the term quickness to all of them?

  La. Quite true.

  Soc. And suppose I were to be asked by some one: What is that common
quality, Socrates, which, in all these uses of the word, you call
quickness? I should say the quality which accomplishes much in a
little time-whether in running, speaking, or in any other sort of
action.

  La. You would be quite correct.

  Soc. And now, Laches, do you try and tell me in like manner, What is
that common quality which is called courage, and which includes all
the various uses of the term when applied both to pleasure and pain,
and in all the cases to which I was just now referring?

  La. I should say that courage is a sort of endurance of the soul, if
I am to speak of the universal nature which pervades them all.

  Soc. But that is what we must do if we are to answer the question.
And yet I cannot say that every kind of endurance is, in my opinion,
to be deemed courage. Hear my reason: I am sure, Laches, that you
would consider courage to be a very noble quality.

  La. Most noble, certainly.

  Soc. And you would say that a wise endurance is also good and noble?

  La. Very noble.

  Soc. But what would you say of a foolish endurance? Is not that,
on the other hand, to be regarded as evil and hurtful?

  La. True.

  Soc. And is anything noble which is evil and hurtful?

  La. I ought not to say that, Socrates.

  Soc. Then you would not admit that sort of endurance to be
courage-for it is not noble, but courage is noble?

  La. You are right.

  Soc. Then, according to you, only the wise endurance is courage?

  La. True.

  Soc. But as to the epithet "wise,"-wise in what? In all things small
as well as great? For example, if a man shows the quality of endurance
in spending his money wisely, knowing that by spending he will acquire
more in the end, do you call him courageous?

  La. Assuredly not.

  Soc. Or, for example, if a man is a physician, and his son, or
some patient of his, has inflammation of the lungs, and begs that he
may be allowed to eat or drink something, and the other is firm and
refuses; is that courage?

  La. No; that is not courage at all, any more than the last.

  Soc. Again, take the case of one who endures in war, and is
willing to fight, and wisely calculates and knows that others will
help him, and that there will be fewer and inferior men against him
than there are with him; and suppose that he has also advantages of
position; would you say of such a one who endures with all this wisdom
and preparation, that he, or some man in the opposing army who is in
the opposite circumstances to these and yet endures and remains at his
post, is the braver?

  La. I should say that the latter, Socrates, was the braver.

  Soc. But, surely, this is a foolish endurance in comparison with the
other?

  La. That is true.

  Soc. Then you would say that he who in an engagement of cavalry
endures, having the knowledge of horsemanship, is not so courageous as
he who endures, having no such knowledge?

  La. So I should say.

  Soc. And he who endures, having a knowledge of the use of the sling,
or the bow, or of any other art, is not so courageous as he who
endures, not having such a knowledge?

  La. True.

  Soc. And he who descends into a well, and dives, and holds out in
this or any similar action, having no knowledge of diving, or the
like, is, as you would say, more courageous than those who have this
knowledge?

  La. Why, Socrates, what else can a man say?

  Soc. Nothing, if that be what he thinks.

  La. But that is what I do think.

  Soc. And yet men who thus run risks and endure are foolish,
Laches, in comparison of those who do the same things, having the
skill to do them.

  La. That is true.

  Soc. But foolish boldness and endurance appeared before to be base
and hurtful to us.

  La. Quite true.

  Soc. Whereas courage was acknowledged to be a noble quality.

  La. True.

  Soc. And now on the contrary we are saying that the foolish
endurance, which was before held in dishonour, is courage.

  La. Very true.

  Soc. And are we right in saying so?

  La. Indeed, Socrates, I am sure that we are not right.

  Soc. Then according to your statement, you and I, Laches, are not
attuned to the Dorian mode, which is a harmony of words and deeds; for
our deeds are not in accordance with our words. Any one would say that
we had courage who saw us in action, but not, I imagine, he who
heard us talking about courage just now.

  La. That is most true.

  Soc. And is this condition of ours satisfactory?

  La. Quite the reverse.

  Soc. Suppose, however, that we admit the principle of which we are
speaking to a certain extent.

  La. To what extent and what principle do you mean?

  Soc. The principle of endurance. We too must endure and persevere in
the enquiry, and then courage will not laugh at our faintheartedness
in searching for courage; which after all may, very likely, be
endurance.

  La. I am ready to go on, Socrates; and yet I am unused to
investigations of this sort. But the spirit of controversy has been
aroused in me by what has been said; and I am really grieved at
being thus unable to-express my meaning. For I fancy that I do know
the nature of courage; but, somehow or other, she has slipped away
from me, and I cannot get hold of her and tell her nature.

  Soc. But, my dear friend, should not the good sportsman follow the
track, and not be lazy?

  La. Certainly, he should.

  Soc. And shall we invite Nicias to join us? he may be better at
the sport than we are. What do you say?

  La. I should like that.

  Soc. Come then, Nicias, and do what you can to help your friends,
who are tossing on the waves of argument, and at the last gasp: you
see our extremity, and may save us and also settle your own opinion,
if you will tell us what you think about courage.

  Nic. I have been thinking, Socrates, that you and Laches are not
defining courage in the right way; for you have forgotten an excellent
saying which I have heard from your own lips.

  Soc. What is it, Nicias?

  Nic. I have often heard you say that "Every man is good in that in
which he is wise, and bad in that in which he is unwise."

  Soc. That is certainly true, Nicias.

  Nic. And therefore if the brave man is good, he is also wise.

  Soc. Do you hear him, Laches?

  La. Yes, I hear him, but I do not very well understand him.

  Soc. I think that I understand him; and he appears to me to mean
that courage is a sort of wisdom.

  La. What can he possibly mean, Socrates?

  Soc. That is a question which you must ask of himself.

  La. Yes.

  Soc. Tell him then, Nicias, what you mean by this wisdom; for you
surely do not mean the wisdom which plays the flute?

  Nic. Certainly not.

  Soc. Nor the wisdom which plays the lyre?

  Nic. No.

  Soc. But what is this knowledge then, and of what?

  La. I think that you put the question to him very well, Socrates;
and I would like him to say what is the nature of this knowledge or
wisdom.

  Nic. I mean to say, Laches, that courage is the knowledge of that
which inspires fear or confidence in war, or in anything.

  La. How strangely he is talking, Socrates.

  Soc. Why do you say so, Laches?

  La. Why, surely courage is one thing, and wisdom another.

  Soc. That is just what Nicias denies.

  La. Yes, that is what he denies; but he is so.

  Soc. Suppose that we instruct instead of abusing him?

  Nic. Laches does not want to instruct me, Socrates; but having
been proved to be talking nonsense himself, he wants to prove that I
have been doing the same.

  La. Very true, Nicias; and you are talking nonsense, as I shall
endeavour to show. Let me ask you a question: Do not physicians know
the dangers of disease? or do the courageous know them? or are the
physicians the same as the courageous?

  Nic. Not at all.

  La. No more than the husbandmen who know the dangers of husbandry,
or than other craftsmen, who have a knowledge of that which inspires
them with fear or confidence in their own arts, and yet they are not
courageous a whit the more for that.

  Soc. What is Laches saying, Nicias? He appears to be saying
something of importance.

  Nic. Yes, he is saying something, but it is not true.

  Soc. How so?

  Nic. Why, because he does not see that the physician's knowledge
only extends to the nature of health and disease: he can tell the sick
man no more than this. Do you imagine, Laches, that the physician
knows whether health or disease is the more terrible to a man? Had not
many a man better never get up from a sick bed? I should like to
know whether you think that life is always better than death. May
not death often be the better of the two?

  La. Yes certainly so in my opinion.

  Nic. And do you think that the same things are terrible to those who
had better die, and to those who had better live?

  La. Certainly not.

  Nic. And do you suppose that the physician or any other artist knows
this, or any one indeed, except he who is skilled in the grounds of
fear and hope? And him I call the courageous.

  Soc. Do you understand his meaning, Laches?

  La. Yes; I suppose that, in his way of speaking, the soothsayers are
courageous. For who but one of them can know to whom to die or to live
is better? And yet Nicias, would you allow that you are yourself a
soothsayer, or are you neither a soothsayer nor courageous?

  Nic. What! do you mean to say that the soothsayer ought to know
the grounds of hope or fear?

  La. Indeed I do: who but he?

  Nic. Much rather I should say he of whom I speak; for the soothsayer
ought to know only the signs of things that are about to come to pass,
whether death or disease, or loss of property, or victory, or defeat
in war, or in any sort of contest; but to whom the suffering or not
suffering of these things will be for the best, can no more be decided
by the soothsayer than by one who is no soothsayer.

  La. I cannot understand what Nicias would be at, Socrates; for he
represents the courageous man as neither a soothsayer, nor a
physician, nor in any other character, unless he means to say that
he is a god. My opinion is that he does not like honestly to confess
that he is talking nonsense, but that he shuffles up and down in order
to conceal the difficulty into which he has got himself. You and I,
Socrates, might have practised a similar shuffle just now, if we had
only wanted to avoid the appearance of inconsistency. And if we had
been arguing in a court of law there might have been reason in so
doing; but why should a man deck himself out with vain words at a
meeting of friends such as this?

  Soc. I quite agree with you, Laches, that he should not. But perhaps
Nicias is serious, and not merely talking for the sake of talking. Let
us ask him just to explain what he means, and if he has reason on
his side we will agree with him; if not, we will instruct him.

  La. Do you, Socrates, if you like, ask him: I think that I have
asked enough.

  Soc. I do not see why I should not; and my question will do for both
of us.

  La. Very good.

  Soc. Then tell me, Nicias, or rather tell us, for Laches and I are
partners in the argument: Do you mean to affirm that courage is the
knowledge of the grounds of hope and fear?

  Nic. I do.

  Soc. And not every man has this knowledge; the physician and the
soothsayer have it not; and they will not be courageous unless they
acquire it-that is what you were saying?

  Nic. I was.

  Soc. Then this is certainly not a thing which every pig would
know, as the proverb says, and therefore he could not be courageous.

  Nic. I think not.

  Soc. Clearly not, Nicias; not even such a big pig as the Crommyonian
sow would be called by you courageous. And this I say not as a joke,
but because I think that he who assents to your doctrine, that courage
is the knowledge of the grounds of fear and hope, cannot allow that
any wild beast is courageous, unless he admits that a lion, or a
leopard, or perhaps a boar, or any other animal, has such a degree
of wisdom that he knows things which but a few human beings ever
know by reason of their difficulty. He who takes your view of
courage must affirm that a lion, and a stag, and a bull, and a monkey,
have equally little pretensions to courage.

  La. Capital, Socrates; by the gods, that is truly good. And I
hope, Nicias, that you will tell us whether these animals, which we
all admit to be courageous, are really wiser than mankind; or
whether you will have the boldness, in the face of universal
opinion, to deny their courage.

  Nic. Why, Laches, I do not call animals or any other things which
have no fear of dangers, because they are ignorant of them,
courageous, but only fearless and senseless. Do you imagine that I
should call little children courageous, which fear no dangers
because they know none? There is a difference, to my way of
thinking, between fearlessness and courage. I am of opinion that
thoughtful courage is a quality possessed by very few, but that
rashness and boldness, and fearlessness, which has no forethought, are
very common qualities possessed by many men, many women, many
children, many animals. And you, and men in general, call by the
term "courageous" actions which I call rash;-my courageous actions are
wise actions.

  La. Behold, Socrates, how admirably, as he thinks, he dresses
himself out in words, while seeking to deprive of the honour of
courage those whom all the world acknowledges to be courageous.

  Nic. Not so, Laches, but do not be alarmed; for I am quite willing
to say of you and also of Lamachus, and of many other Athenians,
that you are courageous and therefore wise.

  La. I could answer that; but I would not have you cast in my teeth
that I am a haughty Aexonian.

  Soc. Do not answer him, Laches; I rather fancy that you are not
aware of the source from which his wisdom is derived. He has got all
this from my friend Damon, and Damon is always with Prodicus, who,
of all the Sophists, is considered to be the best puller to pieces
of words of this sort.

  La. Yes, Socrates; and the examination of such niceties is a much
more suitable employment for a Sophist than for a great statesman whom
the city chooses to preside over her.

  Soc. Yes, my sweet friend, but a great statesman is likely to have a
great intelligence. And I think that the view which is implied in
Nicias' definition of courage is worthy of examination.

  La. Then examine for yourself, Socrates.

  Soc. That is what I am going to do, my dear friend. Do not, however,
suppose I shall let you out of the partnership; for I shall expect you
to apply your mind, and join with me in the consideration of the
question.

  La. I will if you think that I ought.

  Soc. Yes, I do; but I must beg of you, Nicias, to begin again. You
remember that we originally considered courage to be a part of virtue.

  Nic. Very true.

  Soc. And you yourself said that it was a part; and there were many
other parts, all of which taken together are called virtue.

  Nic. Certainly.

  Soc. Do you agree with me about the parts? For I say that justice,
temperance, and the like, are all of them parts of virtue as well as
courage. Would you not say the same?

  Nic. Certainly.

  Soc. Well then, so far we are agreed. And now let us proceed a step,
and try to arrive at a similar agreement about the fearful and the
hopeful: I do not want you to be thinking one thing and myself
another. Let me then tell you my own opinion, and if I am wrong you
shall set me in my opinion the terrible and the are the things which
do or do not create fear, and fear is not of the present, nor of the
past, but is of future and expected evil. Do you not agree to that,
Laches?

  La. Yes, Socrates, entirely.

  Soc. That is my view, Nicias; the terrible things, as I should
say, are the evils which are future; and the hopeful are the good or
not evil things which are future. Do you or do you not agree with me?

  Nic. I agree.

  Soc. And the knowledge of these things you call courage?

  Nic. Precisely.

  Soc. And now let me see whether you agree with Laches and myself
as to a third point.

  Nic. What is that?

  Soc. I will tell you. He and I have a notion that there is not one
knowledge or science of the past, another of the present, a third of
what is likely to be best and what will be best in the future; but
that of all three there is one science only: for example, there is one
science of medicine which is concerned with the inspection of health
equally in all times, present, past, and future; and one science of
husbandry in like manner, which is concerned with the productions of
the earth in all times. As to the art of the general, you yourselves
will be my witnesses that he has an excellent foreknowledge of the
future, and that he claims to be the master and not the servant of the
soothsayer, because he knows better what is happening or is likely
to happen in war: and accordingly the law places the soothsayer
under the general, and not the general under the soothsayer. Am I
not correct in saying so, Laches?

  La. Quite correct.

  Soc. And do you, Nicias, also acknowledge that the same science
has understanding of the same things, whether future, present, or
past?

  Nic. Yes, indeed Socrates; that is my opinion.

  Soc. And courage, my friend, is, as you say, a knowledge of the
fearful and of the hopeful?

  Nic. Yes.

  Soc. And the fearful, and the hopeful, are admitted to be future
goods and future evils?

  Nic. True.

  Soc. And the same science has to do with the same things in the
future or at any time?

  Nic. That is true.

  Soc. Then courage is not the science which is concerned with the
fearful and hopeful, for they are future only; courage, like the other
sciences, is concerned not only with good and evil of the future,
but of the present and past, and of any time?

  Nic. That, as I suppose, is true.

  Soc. Then the answer which you have given, Nicias, includes only a
third part of courage; but our question extended to the whole nature
of courage: and according to your view, that is, according to your
present view, courage is not only the knowledge of the hopeful and the
fearful, but seems to include nearly every good and evil without
reference to time. What do you say to that alteration in your
statement?

  Nic. I agree, Socrates.

  Soc. But then, my dear friend, if a man knew all good and evil,
and how. they are, and have been, and will be produced, would he not
be perfect, and wanting in no virtue, whether justice, or
temperance, or holiness? He would possess them all, and he would
know which were dangers' and which were not, and guard against them
whether they were supernatural or natural; and he would provide the
good, as he would know how to deal both with gods or men.

  Nic. I think, Socrates, that there is a great deal of truth in
what you say.

  Soc. But then, Nicias, courage, according to this new definition
of yours, instead of being a part of virtue only, will be all virtue?

  Nic. It would seem so.

  Soc. But we were saying that courage is one of the parts of virtue?

  Nic. Yes, that was what we were saying.

  Soc. And that is in contradiction with our present view?

  Nic. That appears to be the case.

  Soc. Then, Nicias, we have not discovered what courage is.

  Nic. We have not.

  La. And yet, friend Nicias,l imagined that you would have made the
discovery, when you were so contemptuous of the answers which I made
to Socrates. I had very great hopes that you would have been
enlightened by the wisdom of Damon.

  Nic. I perceive, Laches, that you think nothing of having
displayed your ignorance of the nature of courage, but you look only
to see whether I have not made a similar display; and if we are both
equally ignorant of the things which a man who is good for anything
should know, that, I suppose, will be of no consequence. You certainly
appear to me very like the rest of the world, looking at your
neighbour and not at yourself. I am of opinion that enough has been
said on the subject which we have been discussing; and if anything has
been imperfectly said, that may be hereafter corrected by the help
of Damon, whom you think to laugh down, although you have never seen
him, and with the help of others. And when I am satisfied myself, I
will freely impart my satisfaction to you, for I think that you are
very much in want of knowledge.

  La. You are a philosopher, Nicias; of that I am aware:
nevertheless I would recommend Lysimachus and Melesias not to take you
and me as advisers about the education of their children; but, as I
said at first, they should ask Socrates and not let him off; if my own
sons were old enough, I would have asked him myself.

  Nic. To that I quite agree, if Socrates is willing to take them
under his charge. I should not wish for any one else to be the tutor
of Niceratus. But I observe that when I mention the matter to him he
recommends to me some other tutor and refuses himself. Perhaps he
may be more ready to listen to you, Lysimachus.

  Lys. He ought, Nicias: for certainly I would do things for him which
I would not do for many others. What do you say, Socrates-will you
comply? And are you ready to give assistance in the improvement of the
youths?

  Soc. Indeed, Lysimachus, I should be very wrong in refusing to aid
in the improvement of anybody. And if I had shown in this conversation
that I had a knowledge which Nicias and Laches have not, then I
admit that you would be right in inviting me to perform this duty; but
as we are all in the same perplexity, why should one of us be
preferred to another? I certainly think that no one should; and
under these circumstances, let me offer you a piece of advice (and
this need not go further than ourselves). I maintain, my friends, that
every one of us should seek out the best teacher whom he can find,
first for ourselves, who are greatly in need of one, and then for
the youth, regardless of expense or anything. But I cannot advise that
we remain as we are. And if any one laughs at us for going to school
at our age, I would quote to them the authority of Homer, who says,
that

       Modesty is not good for a needy man.

Let us, then, regardless of what may be said of us, make the education
of the youths our own education.

  Lys. I like your proposal, Socrates; and as I am the oldest, I am
also the most eager to go to school with the boys. Let me beg a favour
of you: Come to my house to-morrow at dawn, and we will advise about
these matters. For the present, let us make an end of the
conversation.

  Soc. I will come to you to-morrow, Lysimachus, as you propose, God
willing.

                           -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES, who is the narrator; MENEXENUS;
HIPPOTHALES; LYSIS; CTESIPPUS. Scene: A newly-erected Palaestra
outside the walls of Athens.

  I was going from the Academy straight to the Lyceum, intending to
take the outer road, which is close under the wall. When I came to the
postern gate of the city, which is by the fountain of Panops, I fell
in with Hippothales, the son of Hieronymus, and Ctesippus the
Paeanian, and a company of young men who were standing with them.
Hippothales, seeing me approach, asked whence I came and whither I was
going.

  I am going, I replied, from the Academy straight to the Lyceum.

  Then come straight to us, he said, and put in here; you may as well.

  Who are you, I said; and where am I to come?

  He showed me an enclosed space and an open door over against the
wall. And there, he said, is the building at which we all meet: and
a goodly company we are.

  And what is this building, I asked; and what sort of entertainment
have you?

  The building, he replied, is a newly erected Palaestra; and the
entertainment is generally conversation, to which you are welcome.

  Thank you, I said; and is there any teacher there?

  Yes, he said, your old friend and admirer, Miccus.

  Indeed, I replied; he is a very eminent professor.

  Are you disposed, he said, to go with me and see them?

  Yes, I said; but I should like to know first, what is expected of
me, and who is the favourite among you?

  Some persons have one favourite, Socrates, and some another, he
said.

  And who is yours? I asked: tell me that, Hippothales.

  At this he blushed; and I said to him, O Hippothales, thou son of
Hieronymus! do not say that you are, or that you are not, in love; the
confession is too late; for I see that you are not only in love, but
are already far gone in your love. Simple and foolish as I am, the
Gods have given me the power of understanding affections of this kind.

  Whereupon he blushed more and more.

  Ctesippus said: I like to see you blushing, Hippothales, and
hesitating to tell Socrates the name; when, if he were with you but
for a very short time, you would have plagued him to death by
talking about nothing else. Indeed, Socrates, he has literally
deafened us, and stopped our ears with the praises of Lysis; and if he
is a little intoxicated, there is every likelihood that we may have
our sleep murdered with a cry of Lysis. His performances in prose
are bad enough, but nothing at all in comparison with his verse; and
when he drenches us with his poems and other compositions, it is
really too bad; and worse still is his manner of singing them to his
love; he has a voice which is truly appalling, and we cannot help
hearing him: and now having a question put to him by you, behold he is
blushing.

  Who is Lysis? I said: I suppose that he must be young; for the
name does not recall any one to me.

  Why, he said, his father being a very well known man, he retains his
patronymic, and is not as yet commonly called by his own name; but,
although you do not know his name, I am sure that you must know his
face, for that is quite enough to distinguish him.

  But tell me whose son he is, I said.

  He is the eldest son of Democrates, of the deme of Aexone.

  Ah, Hippothales, I said; what a noble and really perfect love you
have found! I wish that you would favour me with the exhibition
which you have been making to the rest of the company, and then I
shall be able to judge whether you know what a lover ought to say
about his love, either to the youth himself, or to others.

  Nay, Socrates, he said; you surely do not attach any importance to
what he is saying.

  Do you mean, I said, that you disown the love of the person whom
he says that you love?

  No; but I deny that I make verses or address compositions to him.

  He is not in his right mind, said Ctesippus; he is talking nonsense,
and is stark mad.

  O Hippothales, I said, if you have ever made any verses or songs
in honour of your favourite, I do not want to hear them; but I want to
know the purport of them, that I may be able to judge of your mode
of approaching your fair one.

  Ctesippus will be able to tell you, he said; for if, as he avers,
the sound of my words is always dinning in his ears, he must have a
very accurate knowledge and recollection of them.

  Yes, indeed, said Ctesippus; I know only too well; and very
ridiculous the tale is: for although he is a lover, and very devotedly
in love, he has nothing particular to talk about to his beloved
which a child might not say. Now is not that ridiculous? He can only
speak of the wealth of Democrates, which the whole city celebrates,
and grandfather Lysis, and the other ancestors of the youth, and their
stud of horses, and their victory at the Pythian games, and at the
Isthmus, and at Nemea with four horses and single horses-these are the
tales which he composes and repeats. And there is greater twaddle
still. Only the day before yesterday he made a poem in which he
described the entertainment of Heracles, who was a connexion of the
family, setting forth how in virtue of this relationship he was
hospitably received by an ancestor of Lysis; this ancestor was himself
begotten of Zeus by the daughter of the founder of the deme. And these
are the sort of old wives' tales which he sings and recites to us, and
we are obliged to listen to him.

  When I heard this, I said: O ridiculous Hippothales! how can you
be making and singing hymns in honour of yourself before you have won?

  But my songs and verses, he said, are not in honour of myself,
Socrates.

  You think not? I said.

  Nay, but what do you think? he replied.

  Most assuredly, I said, those songs are all in your own honour;
for if you win your beautiful love, your discourses and songs will
be a glory, to you, and may be truly regarded as hymns of praise
composed in honour of you who have conquered and won such a love;
but if he slips away from you, the more you have praised him, the more
ridiculous you will look at having lost this fairest and best of
blessings; and therefore the wise lover does not praise his beloved
until he has won him, because he is afraid of accidents. There is also
another danger; the fair, when any one praises or magnifies them,
are filled with the spirit of pride and vain-glory. Do you not agree
with me?

  Yes, he said.

  And the more vain-glorious they are, the more difficult is the
capture of them?

  I believe you.

  What should you say of a hunter who frightened away his prey, and
made the capture of the animals which he is hunting more difficult?

  He would be a bad hunter, undoubtedly.

  Yes; and if, instead of soothing them, he were to infuriate them
with words and songs, that would show a great want of wit: do you
not agree.

  Yes.

  And now reflect, Hippothales, and see whether you are not guilty
of all these errors in writing poetry. For I can hardly suppose that
you will affirm a man to be a good poet who injures himself by his
poetry.

  Assuredly not, he said; such a poet would be a fool. And this is the
reason why I take you into my counsels, Socrates, and I shall be
glad of any further advice which you may have to offer. Will you
tell me by what words or actions I may become endeared to my love?

  That is not easy to determine, I said; but if you will bring your
love to me, and will let me talk with him, I may perhaps be able to
show you how to converse with him, instead of singing and reciting
in the fashion of which you are accused.

  There will be no difficulty in bringing him, he replied; if you will
only go with Ctesippus into the Palaestra, and sit down and talk, I
believe that he will come of his own accord; for he is fond of
listening, Socrates. And as this is the festival of the Hermaea, the
young men and boys are all together, and there is no separation
between them. He will be sure to come: but if he does not, Ctesippus
with whom he is familiar, and whose relation Menexenus is his great
friend, shall call him.

  That will be the way, I said. Thereupon I led Ctesippus into the
Palaestra, and the rest followed.

  Upon entering we found that the boys had just been sacrificing;
and this part of the festival was nearly at an end. They were all in
their white array, and games at dice were going on among them. Most of
them were in the outer court amusing themselves; but some were in a
corner of the Apodyterium playing at odd and even with a number of
dice, which they took out of little wicker baskets. There was also a
circle of lookers-on; among them was Lysis. He was standing with the
other boys and youths, having a crown upon his head, like a fair
vision, and not less worthy of praise for his goodness than for his
beauty. We left them, and went over to the opposite side of the
room, where, finding a quiet place, we sat down; and then we began
to talk. This attracted Lysis, who was constantly turning round to
look at us -he was evidently wanting to come to us. For a time he
hesitated and had not the courage to come alone; but first of all, his
friend Menexenus, leaving his play, entered the Palaestra from the
court, and when he saw Ctesippus and myself, was going to take a
seat by us; and then Lysis, seeing him, followed, and sat down by
his side; and the other boys joined. I should observe that
Hippothales, when he saw the crowd, got behind them, where he
thought that he would be out of sight of Lysis, lest he should anger
him; and there he stood and listened.

  I turned to Menexenus, and said: Son of Demophon, which of you two
youths is the elder?

  That is a matter of dispute between us, he said.

  And which is the nobler? Is that also a matter of dispute?

  Yes, certainly.

  And another disputed point is, which is the fairer?

  The two boys laughed.

  I shall not ask which is the richer of the two, I said; for you
are friends, are you not?

  Certainly, they replied.

  And friends have all things in common, so that one of you can be
no richer than the other, if you say truly that you are friends.

  They assented. I was about to ask which was the juster of the two,
and which was the wiser of the two; but at this moment Menexenus was
called away by some one who came and said that the gymnastic-master
wanted him. I supposed that he had to offer sacrifice. So he went
away, and I asked Lysis some more questions. I dare say, Lysis, I
said, that your father and mother love you very much.

  Certainly, he said.

  And they would wish you to be perfectly happy.

  Yes.

  But do you think that any one is happy who is in the condition of
a slave, and who cannot do what he likes?

  I should think not indeed, he said.

  And if your father and mother love you, and desire that you should
be happy, no one can doubt that they are very ready to promote your
happiness.

  Certainly, he replied.

  And do they then permit you to do what you like, and never rebuke
you or hinder you from doing what you desire?

  Yes, indeed, Socrates; there are a great many things which they
hinder me from doing.

  What do you mean? I said. Do they want you to be happy, and yet
hinder you from doing what you like? For example, if you want to mount
one of your father's chariots, and take the reins at a race, they will
not allow you to do so-they will prevent you?

  Certainly, he said, they will not allow me to do so.

  Whom then will they allow?

  There is a charioteer, whom my father pays for driving.

  And do they trust a hireling more than you? and may he do what he
likes with the horses? and do they pay him for this?

  They do.

  But I dare say that you may take the whip and guide the mule-cart if
you like;-they will permit that?

  Permit me! indeed they will not.

  Then, I said, may no one use the whip to the mules?

  Yes, he said, the muleteer.

  And is he a slave or a free man?

  A slave, he said.

  And do they esteem a slave of more value than you who are their son?
And do they entrust their property to him rather than to you? and
allow him to do what he likes, when they prohibit you? Answer me
now: Are you your own master, or do they not even allow that?

  Nay, he said; of course they do not allow it.

  Then you have a master?

  Yes, my tutor; there he is.

  And is he a slave?

  To be sure; he is our slave, he replied.

  Surely, I said, this is a strange thing, that a free man should be
governed by a slave. And what does he do with you?

  He takes me to my teachers.

  You do not mean to say that your teachers also rule over you?

  Of course they do.

  Then I must say that your father is pleased to inflict many lords
and masters on you. But at any rate when you go home to your mother,
she will let you have your own way, and will not interfere with your
happiness; her wool, or the piece of cloth which she is weaving, are
at your disposal: I am sure that there is nothing to hinder you from
touching her wooden spathe, or her comb, or any other of her
spinning implements.

  Nay, Socrates, he replied, laughing; not only does she hinder me,
but I should be beaten if I were to touch one of them.

  Well, I said, this is amazing. And did you ever behave ill to your
father or your mother?

  No, indeed, he replied.

  But why then are they so terribly anxious to prevent you from
being happy, and doing as you like?-keeping you all day long in
subjection to another, and, in a word, doing nothing which you desire;
so that you have no good, as would appear, out of their great
possessions, which are under the control of anybody rather than of
you, and have no use of your own fair person, which is tended and
taken care of by another; while you, Lysis, are master of nobody,
and can do nothing?

  Why, he said, Socrates, the reason is that I am not of age.

  I doubt whether that is the real reason, I said; for I should
imagine that your father Democrates, and your mother, do permit you to
do many things already, and do not wait until you are of age: for
example, if they want anything read or written, you, I presume,
would be the first person in the house who is summoned by them.

  Very true.

  And you would be allowed to write or read the letters in any order
which you please, or to take up the lyre and tune the notes, and
play with the fingers, or strike with the plectrum, exactly as you
please, and neither father nor mother would interfere with you.

  That is true, he said.

  Then what can be the reason, Lysis, I said, why they allow you to do
the one and not the other?

  I suppose, he said, because I understand the one, and not the other.

  Yes, my dear youth, I said, the reason is not any deficiency of
years, but a deficiency of knowledge; and whenever your father
thinks that you are wiser than he is, he will instantly commit himself
and his possessions to you.

  I think so.

  Aye, I said; and about your neighbour, too, does not the same rule
hold as about your father? If he is satisfied that you know more of
housekeeping than he does, will he continue to administer his
affairs himself, or will he commit them to you?

  I think that he will commit them to me.

  Will not the Athenian people, too, entrust their affairs to you when
they see that you have wisdom enough to manage them?

  Yes.

  And oh! let me put another case, I said: There is the great king,
and he has an eldest son, who is the Prince of Asia;-suppose that
you and I go to him and establish to his satisfaction that we are
better cooks than his son, will he not entrust to us the prerogative
of making soup, and putting in anything that we like while the pot
is boiling, rather than to the Prince of Asia, who is his son?

  To us, clearly.

  And we shall be allowed to throw in salt by handfuls, whereas the
son will not be allowed to put in as much as he can take up between
his fingers?

  Of course.

  Or suppose again that the son has bad eyes, will he allow him, or
will he not allow him, to touch his own eyes if he thinks that he
has no knowledge of medicine?

  He will not allow him.

  Whereas, if he supposes us to have a knowledge of medicine, he
will allow us to do what we like with him-even to open the eyes wide
and sprinkle ashes upon them, because he supposes that we know what is
best?

  That is true.

  And everything in which we appear to him to be wiser than himself or
his son he will commit to us?

  That is very true, Socrates, he replied.

  Then now, my dear Lysis, I said, you perceive that in things which
we know every one will trust us-Hellenes and barbarians, men and
women-and we may do as we please about them, and no one will like to
interfere with us; we shall be free, and masters of others; and
these things will be really ours, for we shall be benefited by them.
But in things of which we have no understanding, no one will trust
us to do as seems good to us-they will hinder us as far as they can;
and not only strangers, but father and mother, and the friend, if
there be one, who is dearer still, will also hinder us; and we shall
be subject to others; and these things will not be ours, for we
shall not be benefited by them. Do you agree?

  He assented.

  And shall we be friends to others, and will any others love us, in
as far as we are useless to them?

  Certainly not.

  Neither can your father or mother love you, nor can anybody love
anybody else, in so far as they are useless to them?

  No.

  And therefore, my boy, if you are wise, -all men will be your
friends and kindred, for you will be useful and good; but if you are
not wise, neither father, nor mother, nor kindred, nor any one else,
will be your friends. And in matters of which you have as yet no
knowledge, can you have any conceit of knowledge?

  That is impossible, he replied.

  And you, Lysis, if you require a teacher, have not yet attained to
wisdom.

  True.

  And therefore you are not conceited, having nothing of which to be
conceited.

  Indeed, Socrates, I think not.

  When I heard him say this, I turned to Hippothales, and was very
nearly making a blunder, for I was going to say to him: That is the
way, Hippothales, in which you should talk to your beloved, humbling
and lowering him, and not as you do, puffing him up and spoiling
him. But I saw that he was in great excitement and confusion at what
had been said, and I remembered that, although he was in the
neighbourhood, he did not want to be seen by Lysis; so upon second
thoughts I refrained.

  In the meantime Menexenus came back and sat down in his place by
Lysis; and Lysis, in a childish and affectionate manner, whispered
privately in my ear, so that Menexenus should not hear: Do,
Socrates, tell Menexenus what you have been telling me.

  Suppose that you tell him yourself, Lysis, I replied; for I am
sure that you were attending.

  Certainly, he replied.

  Try, then, to remember the words, and be as exact as you can in
repeating them to him, and if you have forgotten anything, ask me
again the next time that you see me.

  I will be sure to do so, Socrates; but go on telling him something
new, and let me hear, as long as I am allowed to stay.

  I certainly cannot refuse, I said, since you ask me; but then, as
you know, Menexenus is very pugnacious, and therefore you must come to
the rescue if he attempts to upset me.

  Yes, indeed, he said; he is very pugnacious, and that is the
reason why I want you to argue with him.

  That I may make a fool of myself?

  No, indeed, he said; but I want you to put him down.

  That is no easy matter, I replied; for he is a terrible fellow-a
pupil of Ctesippus. And there is Ctesippus himself: do you see him?

  Never mind, Socrates, you shall argue with him.

  Well, I suppose that I must, I replied.

  Hereupon Ctesippus complained that we were talking in secret, and
keeping the feast to ourselves.

  I shall be happy, I said, to let you have a share. Here is Lysis,
who does not understand something that I was saying, and wants me to
ask Menexenus, who, as he thinks, is likely to know.

  And why do you not ask him? he said.

  Very well, I said, I will; and do you, Menexenus, answer. But
first I must tell you that I am one who from my childhood upward
have set my heart upon a certain thing. All people have their fancies;
some desire horses, and others dogs; and some are fond of gold, and
others of honour. Now, I have no violent desire of any of these
things; but I have a passion for friends; and I would rather have a
good friend than the best cock or quail in the world: I would even
go further, and say the best horse or dog. Yea, by the dog of Egypt, I
should greatly prefer a real friend to all the gold of Darius, or even
to Darius himself: I am such a lover of friends as that. And when I
see you and Lysis, at your early age, so easily possessed of this
treasure, and so soon, he of you, and you of him, I am amazed and
delighted, seeing that I myself, although I am now advanced in
years, am so far from having made a similar acquisition, that I do not
even know in what way a friend is acquired. But want to ask you a
question about this, for you have experience: tell me then, when one
loves another, is the lover or the beloved the friend; or may either
be the friend?

  Either may, I should think, be the friend of either.

  Do you mean, I said, that if only one of them loves the other,
they are mutual friends?

  Yes, he said; that is my meaning.

  But what if the lover is not loved in return? which is a very
possible case.

  Yes.

  Or is, perhaps, even hated? which is a fancy which sometimes is
entertained by lovers respecting their beloved. Nothing can exceed
their love; and yet they imagine either that they are not loved in
return, or that they are hated. Is not that true?

  Yes, he said, quite true.

  In that case, the one loves, and the other is loved?

  Yes.

  Then which is the friend of which? Is the lover the friend of the
beloved, whether he be loved in return, or hated; or is the beloved
the friend; or is there no friendship at all on either side, unless
they both love one another?

  There would seem to be none at all.

  Then this notion is not in accordance with our previous one. We were
saying that both were friends, if one only loved; but now, unless they
both love, neither is a friend.

  That appears to be true.

  Then nothing which does not love in return is beloved by a lover?

  I think not.

  Then they are not lovers of horses, whom the horses do not love in
return; nor lovers of quails, nor of dogs, nor of wine, nor of
gymnastic exercises, who have no return of love; no, nor of wisdom,
unless wisdom loves them in return. Or shall we say that they do
love them, although they are not beloved by them; and that the poet
was wrong who sings-

  Happy the man to whom his children are dear, and steeds having
single hoofs, and dogs of chase, and the stranger of another land?

  I do not think that he was wrong.

  You think that he is right?

  Yes.

  Then, Menexenus, the conclusion is, that what is beloved, whether
loving or hating, may be dear to the lover of it: for example, very
young children, too young to love, or even hating their father or
mother when they are punished by them, are never dearer to them than
at the time when they are being hated by them.

  I think that what you say is true.

  And, if so, not the lover, but the beloved, is the friend or dear
one?

  Yes.

  And the hated one, and not the hater, is the enemy?

  Clearly.

  Then many men are loved by their enemies, and hated by their
friends, and are the friends of their enemies, and the enemies of
their friends. Yet how absurd, my dear friend, or indeed impossible is
this paradox of a man being an enemy to his friend or a friend to
his enemy.

  I quite agree, Socrates, in what you say.

  But if this cannot be, the lover will be the friend of that which is
loved?

  True.

  And the hater will be the enemy of that which is hated?

  Certainly.

  Yet we must acknowledge in this, as in the preceding instance,
that a man may be the friend of one who is not his friend, or who
may be his enemy, when he loves that which does not love him or
which even hates him. And he may be the enemy of one who is not his
enemy, and is even his friend: for example, when he hates that which
does not hate him, or which even loves him.

  That appears to be true.

  But if the lover is not a friend, nor the beloved a friend, nor both
together, what are we to say? Whom are we to call friends to one
another? Do any remain?

  Indeed, Socrates, I cannot find any.

  But, O Menexenus! I said, may we not have been altogether wrong in
our conclusions?

  I am sure that we have been wrong, Socrates, said Lysis. And he
blushed as he spoke, the words seeming to come from his lips
involuntarily, because his whole mind was taken up with the
argument; there was no mistaking his attentive look while he was
listening.

  I was pleased at the interest which was shown by Lysis, and I wanted
to give Menexenus a rest, so I turned to him and said, I think, Lysis,
that what you say is true, and that, if we had been right, we should
never have gone so far wrong; let us proceed no further in this
direction (for the road seems to be getting troublesome), but take the
other path into which we turned, and see what the poets have to say;
for they are to us in a manner the fathers and authors of wisdom,
and they speak of friends in no light or trivial manner, but God
himself, as they say, makes them and draws them to one another; and
this they express, if I am not mistaken, in the following words:-

        God is ever drawing like towards like, and

               making them acquainted.

I dare say that you have heard those words.

  Yes, he said; I have.

  And have you not also met with the treatises of philosophers who say
that like must love like? they are the people who argue and write
about nature and the universe.

  Very true, he replied.

  And are they right in saying this?

  They may be.

  Perhaps, I said, about half, or possibly, altogether, right, if
their meaning were rightly apprehended by us. For the more a bad man
has to do with a bad man, and the more nearly he is brought into
contact with him, the more he will be likely to hate him, for he
injures him; and injurer and injured cannot be friends. Is not that
true?

  Yes, he said.

  Then one half of the saying is untrue, if the wicked are like one
another?

  That is true.

  But the real meaning of the saying, as I imagine, is, that, the good
are like one another, friends to one another; and that the bad, as
is often said of them, are never at unity with one another or with
themselves; for they are passionate and restless, and anything which
is at variance and enmity with itself is not likely to be in union
or harmony with any other thing. Do you not agree?

  Yes, I do.

  Then, my friend, those who say that the like is friendly to the like
mean to intimate, if I rightly apprehend them, that the good only is
the friend of the good, and of him only; but that the evil never
attains to any real friendship, either with good or evil. Do you
agree?

  He nodded assent.

  Then now we know how to answer the question "Who are friends? for
the argument declares "That the good are friends."

  Yes, he said, that is true.

  Yes, I replied; and yet I am not quite satisfied with this answer.
By heaven, and shall I tell you what I suspect? I will. Assuming
that like, inasmuch as he is like, is the friend of like, and useful
to him-or rather let me try another way of putting the matter: Can
like do any good or harm to like which he could not do to himself,
or suffer anything from his like which he would not suffer from
himself? And if neither can be of any use to the other, how can they
be loved by one another? Can they now?

  They cannot.

  And can he who is not loved be a friend?

  Certainly not.

  But say that the like is not the friend of the like in so far as
he is like; still the good may be the friend of the good in so far
as he is good?

  True.

  But then again, will not the good, in so far as he is good, be
sufficient for himself? Certainly he will. And he who is sufficient
wants nothing-that is implied in the word sufficient.

  Of course not.

  And he who wants nothing will desire nothing?

  He will not.

  Neither can he love that which he does not desire?

  He cannot.

  And he who not is not a lover of friend?

  Clearly not.

  What place then is there for friendship, if, when absent, good men
have no need of one another (for even when alone they are sufficient
for themselves), and when present have no use of one another? How
can such persons ever be induced to value one another?

  They cannot.

  And friends they cannot be, unless they value one another?

  Very true.

  But see now, Lysis, whether we are not being deceived in all
this-are we not indeed entirely wrong?

  How so? he replied.

  Have I not heard some one say, as I just now recollect, that the
like is the greatest enemy of the like, the good of the good?-Yes, and
he quoted the authority of Hesiod, who says:

     Potter quarrels with potter, hard with bard,

     Beggar with beggar;

and of all other things he affirmed, in like manner, "That of
necessity the most like are most full of envy, strife, and hatred of
one another, and the most unlike, of friendship. For the poor man is
compelled to be the friend of the rich, and the weak requires the
aid of the strong, and the sick man of the physician; and every one
who is ignorant, has to love and court him who knows." And indeed he
went on to say in grandiloquent language, that the idea of
friendship existing between similars is not the truth, but the very
reverse of the truth, and that the most opposed are the most friendly;
for that everything desires not like but that which is most unlike:
for example, the dry desires the moist, the cold the hot, the bitter
the sweet, the sharp the blunt, the void the full, the full the
void, and so of all other things; for the opposite is the food of
the opposite, whereas like receives nothing from like. And I thought
that he who said this was a charming man, and that he spoke well. What
do the rest of you say?

  I should say, at first hearing, that he is right, said Menexenus.

  Then we are to say that the greatest friendship is of opposites?

  Exactly.

  Yes, Menexenus; but will not that be a monstrous answer? and will
not the all-wise eristics be down upon us in triumph, and ask,
fairly enough, whether love is not the very opposite of hate; and what
answer shall we make to them-must we not admit that they speak the
truth?

  We must.

  They will then proceed to ask whether the enemy is the friend of the
friend, or the friend the friend of the enemy?

  Neither, he replied.

  Well, but is a just man the friend of the unjust, or the temperate
of the intemperate, or the good of the bad?

  I do not see how that is possible.

  And yet, I said, if friendship goes by contraries, the contraries
must be friends.

  They must.

  Then neither like and like nor unlike and unlike are friends.

  I suppose not.

  And yet there is a further consideration: may not all these
notions of friendship be erroneous? but may not that which is
neither good nor evil still in some cases be the friend of the good?

  How do you mean? he said.

  Why really, I said, the truth is that I do not know; but my head
is dizzy with thinking of the argument, and therefore I hazard the
conjecture, that "the beautiful is the friend," as the old proverb
says. Beauty is certainly a soft, smooth, slippery thing, and
therefore of a nature which easily slips in and permeates our souls.
For I affirm that the good is the beautiful. You will agree to that?

  Yes.

  This I say from a sort of notion that what is neither good nor
evil is the friend of the beautiful and the good, and I will tell
you why I am inclined to think so: I assume that there are three
principles-the good, the bad, and that which is neither good nor
bad. You would agree-would you not?

  I agree.

  And neither is the good the friend of the good, nor the evil of
the good, nor the good of the evil;-these alternatives are excluded by
the previous argument; and therefore, if there be such a thing as
friendship or love at all, we must infer that what is neither good nor
evil must be the friend, either of the good, or of that which is
neither good nor evil, for nothing can be the friend of the bad.

  True.

  But neither can like be the friend of like, as we were just now
saying.

  True.

  And if so, that which is neither good nor evil can have no friend
which is neither good nor evil.

  Clearly not.

  Then the good alone is the friend of that only which is neither good
nor evil.

  That may be assumed to be certain.

  And does not this seem to put us in the right way? Just remark, that
the body which is in health requires neither medical nor any other
aid, but is well enough; and the healthy man has no love of the
physician, because he is in health.

  He has none.

  But the sick loves him, because he is sick?

  Certainly.

  And sickness is an evil, and the art of medicine a good and useful
thing?

  Yes.

  But the human body, regarded as a body, is neither good nor evil?

  True.

  And the body is compelled by reason of disease to court and make
friends of the art of medicine?

  Yes.

  Then that which is neither good nor evil becomes the friend of good,
by reason of the presence of evil?

  So we may infer.

  And clearly this must have happened before that which was neither
good nor evil had become altogether corrupted with the element of
evil-if itself had become evil it would not still desire and love
the good; for, as we were saying, the evil cannot be the friend of the
good.

  Impossible.

  Further, I must observe that some substances are assimilated when
others are present with them; and there are some which are not
assimilated: take, for example, the case of an ointment or colour
which is put on another substance.

  Very good.

  In such a case, is the substance which is anointed the same as the
colour or ointment?

  What do you mean? he said.

  This is what I mean: Suppose that I were to cover your auburn
locks with white lead, would they be really white, or would they
only appear to be white?

  They would only appear to be white, he replied.

  And yet whiteness would be present in them?

  True.

  But that would not make them at all the more white,
notwithstanding the presence of white in them-they would not be
white any more than black?

  No.

  But when old age infuses whiteness into them, then they become
assimilated, and are white by the presence of white.

  Certainly.

  Now I want to know whether in all cases a substance is assimilated
by the presence of another substance; or must the presence be after
a peculiar sort?

  The latter, he said.

  Then that which is neither good nor evil may be in the presence of
evil, but not as yet evil, and that has happened before now?

  Yes.

  And when anything is in the presence of evil, not being as yet evil,
the presence of good arouses the desire of good in that thing; but the
presence of evil, which makes a thing evil, takes away the desire
and friendship of the good; for that which was once both good and evil
has now become evil only, and the good was supposed to have no
friendship with the evil?

  None.

  And therefore we say that those who are already wise, whether Gods
or men, are no longer lovers of wisdom; nor can they be lovers of
wisdom who are ignorant to the extent of being evil, for no evil or
ignorant person is a lover of wisdom. There remain those who have
the misfortune to be ignorant, but are not yet hardened in their
ignorance, or void of understanding, and do not as yet fancy that they
know what they do not know: and therefore those who are the lovers
of wisdom are as yet neither good nor bad. But the bad do not love
wisdom any more than the good; for, as we have already seen, neither
is unlike the friend of unlike, nor like of like. You remember that?

  Yes, they both said.

  And so, Lysis and Menexenus, we have discovered the nature of
friendship-there can be no doubt of it: Friendship is the love which
by reason of the presence of evil the neither good nor evil has of the
good, either in the soul, or in the body, or anywhere.

  They both agreed and entirely assented, and for a moment I
rejoiced and was satisfied like a huntsman just holding fast his prey.
But then a most unaccountable suspicion came across me, and I felt
that the conclusion was untrue. I was pained, and said, Alas! Lysis
and Menexenus, I am afraid that we have been grasping at a shadow
only.

  Why do you say so? said Menexenus.

  I am afraid, I said, that the argument about friendship is false:
arguments, like men, are often pretenders.

  How do you mean? he asked.

  Well, I said; look at the matter in this way: a friend is the friend
of some one; is he not?

  Certainly he is.

  And has he a motive and object in being a friend, or has he no
motive and object?

  He has a motive and object.

  And is the object which makes him a friend, dear to him, neither
dear nor hateful to him?

  I do not quite follow you, he said.

  I do not wonder at that, I said. But perhaps, if I put the matter in
another way, you will be able to follow me, and my own meaning will be
clearer to myself. The sick man, as I was just now saying, is the
friend of the physician-is he not?

  Yes.

  And he is the friend of the physician because of disease, and for
the sake of health?

  Yes.

  And disease is an evil?

  Certainly.

  And what of health? I said. Is that good or evil, or neither?

  Good, he replied.

  And we were saying, I believe, that the body being neither good
nor evil, because of disease, that is to say because of evil, is the
friend of medicine, and medicine is a good: and medicine has entered
into this friendship for the sake of health, and health is a good.

  True.

  And is health a friend, or not a friend?

  A friend.

  And disease is an enemy?

  Yes.

  Then that which is neither good nor evil is the friend of the good
because of the evil and hateful, and for the sake of the good and
the friend?

  Clearly.

  Then the friend is a friend for the sake of the friend, and
because of the enemy?

  That is to be inferred.

  Then at this point, my boys, let us take heed, and be on our guard
against deceptions. I will not again repeat that the friend is the
friend of the friend, and the like of the like, which has been
declared by us to be an impossibility; but, in order that this new
statement may not delude us, let us attentively examine another point,
which I will proceed to explain: Medicine, as we were saying, is a
friend, dear to us for the sake of health?

  Yes.

  And health is also dear?

  Certainly.

  And if dear, then dear for the sake of something?

  Yes.

  And surely this object must also be dear, as is implied in our
previous admissions?

  Yes.

  And that something dear involves something else dear?

  Yes.

  But then, proceeding in this way, shall we not arrive at some
first principle of friendship or dearness which is not capable of
being referred to any other, for the sake of which, as we maintain,
all other things are dear, and, having there arrived, we shall stop?

  True.

  My fear is that all those other things, which, as we say, are dear
for the sake of another, are illusions and deceptions only, but
where that first principle is, there is the true ideal of
friendship. Let me put the matter thus: Suppose the case of a great
treasure (this may be a son, who is more precious to his father than
all his other treasures); would not the father, who values his son
above all things, value other things also for the sake of his son? I
mean, for instance, if he knew that his son had drunk hemlock, and the
father thought that wine would save him, he would value the wine?

  He would.

  And also the vessel which contains the wine?

  Certainly.

  But does he therefore value the three measures of wine, or the
earthen vessel which contains them, equally with his son? Is not
this rather the true state of the case? All his anxiety has regard not
to the means which are provided for the sake of an object, but to
the object for the sake of which they are provided. And although we
may often say that gold and silver are highly valued by us, that is
not the truth; for there is a further object, whatever it may be,
which we value most of all, and for the sake of which gold and all out
other possessions are acquired by us. Am I not right?

  Yes, certainly.

  And may not the same be said of the friend? That which is only
dear to us for the sake of something else is improperly said to be
dear, but the truly dear is that in which all these so called dear
friendships terminate.

  That, he said, appears to be true.

  And the truly dear or ultimate principle of friendship is not for
the sake of any other or further dear.

  True.

  Then we have done with the notion that friendship has any further
object. May we then infer that the good is the friend?

  I think so.

  And the good is loved for the sake of the evil? Let me put the
case in this way: Suppose that of the three principles, good, evil,
and that which is neither good nor evil, there remained only the
good and the neutral, and that evil went far away, and in no way
affected soul or body, nor ever at all that class of things which,
as we say, are neither good nor evil in themselves;-would the good
be of any use, or other than useless to us? For if there were
nothing to hurt us any longer, we should have no need of anything that
would do us good. Then would be clearly seen that we did but love
and desire the good because of the evil, and as the remedy of the
evil, which was the disease; but if there had been no disease, there
would have been no need of a remedy. Is not this the nature of the
good-to be loved by us who are placed between the two, because of
the evil? but there is no use in the good for its own sake.

  I suppose not.

  Then the final principle of friendship, in which all other
friendships terminated, those, I mean, which are relatively dear and
for the sake of something else, is of another and a different nature
from them. For they are called dear because of another dear or friend.
But with the true friend or dear, the case is quite the reverse; for
that is proved to be dear because of the hated, and if the hated
were away it would be no longer dear.

  Very true, he replied: at any rate not if our present view holds
good.

  But, oh! will you tell me, I said, whether if evil were to perish,
we should hunger any more, or thirst any more, or have any similar
desire? Or may we suppose that hunger will remain while men and
animals remain, but not so as to be hurtful? And the same of thirst
and the other desires,-that they will remain, but will not be evil
because evil has perished? Or rather shall I say, that to ask what
either will be then or will not be is ridiculous, for who knows?
This we do know, that in our present condition hunger may injure us,
and may also benefit us:-Is not that true?

  Yes.

  And in like manner thirst or any similar desire may sometimes be a
good and sometimes an evil to us, and sometimes neither one nor the
other?

  To be sure.

  But is there any reason why, because evil perishes, that which is
not evil should perish with it?

  None.

  Then, even if evil perishes, the desires which are neither good
nor evil will remain?

  Clearly they will.

  And must not a man love that which he desires and affects?

  He must.

  Then, even if evil perishes, there may still remain some elements of
love or friendship?

  Yes.

  But not if evil is the cause of friendship: for in that case nothing
will be the friend of any other thing after the destruction of evil;
for the effect cannot remain when the cause is destroyed.

  True.

  And have we not admitted already that the friend loves something for
a reason? and at the time of making the admission we were of opinion
that the neither good nor evil loves the good because of the evil?

  Very true.

  But now our view is changed, and we conceive that there must be some
other cause of friendship?

  I suppose so.

  May not the truth be rather, as we were saying just now, that desire
is the cause of friendship; for that which desires is dear to that
which is desired at the time of desiring it? and may not the other
theory have been only a long story about nothing?

  Likely enough.

  But surely, I said, he who desires, desires that of which he is in
want?

  Yes.

  And that of which he is in want is dear to him?

  True.

  And he is in want of that of which he is deprived?

  Certainly.

  Then love, and desire, and friendship would appear to be of the
natural or congenial. Such, Lysis and Menexenus, is the inference.

  They assented.

  Then if you are friends, you must have natures which are congenial
to one another?

  Certainly, they both said.

  And I say, my boys, that no one who loves or desires another would
ever have loved or desired or affected him, if he had not been in some
way congenial to him, either in his soul, or in his character, or in
his manners, or in his form.

  Yes, yes, said Menexenus. But Lysis was silent.

  Then, I said, the conclusion is, that what is of a congenial
nature must be loved.

  It follows, he said.

  Then the lover, who is true and no counterfeit, must of necessity be
loved by his love.

  Lysis and Menexenus gave a faint assent to this; and Hippothales
changed into all manner of colours with delight.

  Here, intending to revise the argument, I said: Can we point out any
difference between the congenial and the like? For if that is
possible, then I think, Lysis and Menexenus, there may be some sense
in our argument about friendship. But if the congenial is only the
like, how will you get rid of the other argument, of the uselessness
of like to like in as far as they are like; for to say that what is
useless is dear, would be absurd? Suppose, then, that we agree to
distinguish between the congenial and the like-in the intoxication
of argument, that may perhaps be allowed.

  Very true.

  And shall we further say that the good is congenial, and the evil
uncongenial to every one? Or again that the evil is congenial to the
evil, and the good to the good; and that which is neither good nor
evil to that which is neither good nor evil?

  They agreed to the latter alternative.

  Then, my boys, we have again fallen into the old discarded error;
for the unjust will be the friend of the unjust, and the bad of the
bad, as well as the good of the good.

  That appears to be the result.

  But again, if we say that the congenial is the same as the good,
in that case the good and he only will be the friend of the good.

  True.

  But that too was a position of ours which, as you will remember, has
been already refuted by ourselves.

  We remember.

  Then what is to be done? Or rather is there anything to be done? I
can only, like the wise men who argue in courts, sum up the
arguments:-If neither the beloved, nor the lover, nor the like, nor
the unlike, nor the good, nor the congenial, nor any other of whom
we spoke-for there were such a number of them that I cannot remember
all-if none of these are friends, I know not what remains to be said.

  Here I was going to invite the opinion of some older person, when
suddenly we were interrupted by the tutors of Lysis and Menexenus, who
came upon us like an evil apparition with their brothers, and bade
them go home, as it was getting late. At first, we and the
bystanders drove them off; but afterwards, as they would not mind, and
only went on shouting in their barbarous dialect, and got angry, and
kept calling the boys-they appeared to us to have been drinking rather
too much at the Hermaea, which made them difficult to manage we fairly
gave way and broke up the company.

  I said, however, a few words to the boys at parting: O Menexenus and
Lysis, how ridiculous that you two boys, and I, an old boy, who
would fain be one of you, should imagine ourselves to be
friends-this is what the by-standers will go away and say-and as yet
we have not been able to discover what is a friend!

                            -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE MENO; SOCRATES; A SLAVE OF MENO;
ANYTUS

  Meno. Can you tell me, Socrates, whether virtue is acquired by
teaching or by practice; or if neither by teaching nor practice,
then whether it comes to man by nature, or in what other way?

  Socrates. O Meno, there was a time when the Thessalians were
famous among the other Hellenes only for their riches and their
riding; but now, if I am not mistaken, they are equally famous for
their wisdom, especially at Larisa, which is the native city of your
friend Aristippus. And this is Gorgias' doing; for when he came there,
the flower of the Aleuadae, among them your admirer Aristippus, and
the other chiefs of the Thessalians, fell in love with his wisdom. And
he has taught you the habit of answering questions in a grand and bold
style, which becomes those who know, and is the style in which he
himself answers all comers; and any Hellene who likes may ask him
anything. How different is our lot! my dear Meno. Here at Athens there
is a dearth of the commodity, and all wisdom seems to have emigrated
from us to you. I am certain that if you were to ask any Athenian
whether virtue was natural or acquired, he would laugh in your face,
and say: "Stranger, you have far too good an opinion of me, if you
think that I can answer your question. For I literally do not know
what virtue is, and much less whether it is acquired by teaching or
not." And I myself, Meno, living as I do in this region of poverty, am
as poor as the rest of the world; and I confess with shame that I know
literally nothing about virtue; and when I do not know the "quid" of
anything how can I know the "quale"? How, if I knew nothing at all
of Meno, could I tell if he was fair, or the opposite of fair; rich
and noble, or the reverse of rich and noble? Do you think that I
could?

  Men. No, Indeed. But are you in earnest, Socrates, in saying that
you do not know what virtue is? And am I to carry back this report
of you to Thessaly?

  Soc. Not only that, my dear boy, but you may say further that I have
never known of any one else who did, in my judgment.

  Men. Then you have never met Gorgias when he was at Athens?

  Soc. Yes, I have.

  Men. And did you not think that he knew?

  Soc. I have not a good memory, Meno, and therefore I cannot now tell
what I thought of him at the time. And I dare say that he did know,
and that you know what he said: please, therefore, to remind me of
what he said; or, if you would rather, tell me your own view; for I
suspect that you and he think much alike.

  Men. Very true.

  Soc. Then as he is not here, never mind him, and do you tell me:
By the gods, Meno, be generous, and tell me what you say that virtue
is; for I shall be truly delighted to find that I have been
mistaken, and that you and Gorgias do really have this knowledge;
although I have been just saying that I have never found anybody who
had.

  Men. There will be no difficulty, Socrates, in answering your
question. Let us take first the virtue of a man-he should know how
to administer the state, and in the administration of it to benefit
his friends and harm his enemies; and he must also be careful not to
suffer harm himself. A woman's virtue, if you wish to know about that,
may also be easily described: her duty is to order her house, and keep
what is indoors, and obey her husband. Every age, every condition of
life, young or old, male or female, bond or free, has a different
virtue: there are virtues numberless, and no lack of definitions of
them; for virtue is relative to the actions and ages of each of us
in all that we do. And the same may be said of vice, Socrates.

  Soc. How fortunate I am, Meno! When I ask you for one virtue, you
present me with a swarm of them, which are in your keeping. Suppose
that I carry on the figure of the swarm, and ask of you, What is the
nature of the bee? and you answer that there are many kinds of bees,
and I reply: But do bees differ as bees, because there are many and
different kinds of them; or are they not rather to be distinguished by
some other quality, as for example beauty, size, or shape? How would
you answer me?

  Men. I should answer that bees do not differ from one another, as
bees.

  Soc. And if I went on to say: That is what I desire to know, Meno;
tell me what is the quality in which they do not differ, but are all
alike;-would you be able to answer?

  Men. I should.

  Soc. And so of the virtues, however many and different they may
be, they have all a common nature which makes them virtues; and on
this he who would answer the question, "What is virtue?" would do well
to have his eye fixed: Do you understand?

  Men. I am beginning to understand; but I do not as yet take hold
of the question as I could wish.

  Soc. When you say, Meno, that there is one virtue of a man,
another of a woman, another of a child, and so on, does this apply
only to virtue, or would you say the same of health, and size, and
strength? Or is the nature of health always the same, whether in man
or woman?

  Men. I should say that health is the same, both in man and woman.

  Soc. And is not this true of size and strength? If a woman is
strong, she will be strong by reason of the same form and of the
same strength subsisting in her which there is in the man. I mean to
say that strength, as strength, whether of man or woman, is the
same. Is there any difference?

  Men. I think not.

  Soc. And will not virtue, as virtue, be the same, whether in a child
or in a grown-up person, in a woman or in a man?

  Men. I cannot help feeling, Socrates, that this case is different
from the others.

  Soc. But why? Were you not saying that the virtue of a man was to
order a state, and the virtue of a woman was to order a house?

  Men. I did say so.

  Soc. And can either house or state or anything be well ordered
without temperance and without justice?

  Men. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then they who order a state or a house temperately or justly
order them with temperance and justice?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Then both men and women, if they are to be good men and
women, must have the same virtues of temperance and justice?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And can either a young man or an elder one be good, if they are
intemperate and unjust?

  Men. They cannot.

  Soc. They must be temperate and just?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Then all men are good in the same way, and by participation
in the same virtues?

  Men. Such is the inference.

  Soc. And they surely would not have been good in the same way,
unless their virtue had been the same?

  Men. They would not.

  Soc. Then now that the sameness of all virtue has been proven, try
and remember what you and Gorgias say that virtue is.

  Men. Will you have one definition of them all?

  Soc. That is what I am seeking.

  Men. If you want to have one definition of them all, I know not what
to say, but that virtue is the power of governing mankind.

  Soc. And does this definition of virtue include all virtue? Is
virtue the same in a child and in a slave, Meno? Can the child
govern his father, or the slave his master; and would he who
governed be any longer a slave?

  Men. I think not, Socrates.

  Soc. No, indeed; there would be small reason in that. Yet once more,
fair friend; according to you, virtue is "the power of governing"; but
do you not add "justly and not unjustly"?

  Men. Yes, Socrates; I agree there; for justice is virtue.

  Soc. Would you say "virtue," Meno, or "a virtue"?

  Men. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean as I might say about anything; that a round, for
example, is "a figure" and not simply "figure," and I should adopt
this mode of speaking, because there are other figures.

  Men. Quite right; and that is just what I am saying about
virtue-that there are other virtues as well as justice.

  Soc. What are they? tell me the names of them, as I would tell you
the names of the other figures if you asked me.

  Men. Courage and temperance and wisdom and magnanimity are
virtues; and there are many others.

  Soc. Yes, Meno; and again we are in the same case: in searching
after one virtue we have found many, though not in the same way as
before; but we have been unable to find the common virtue which runs
through them all.

  Men. Why, Socrates, even now I am not able to follow you in the
attempt to get at one common notion of virtue as of other things.

  Soc. No wonder; but I will try to get nearer if I can, for you
know that all things have a common notion. Suppose now that some one
asked you the question which I asked before: Meno, he would say,
what is figure? And if you answered "roundness," he would reply to
you, in my way of speaking, by asking whether you would say that
roundness is "figure" or "a figure"; and you would answer "a figure."

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And for this reason-that there are other figures?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And if he proceeded to ask, What other figures are there? you
would have told him.

  Men. I should.

  Soc. And if he similarly asked what colour is, and you answered
whiteness, and the questioner rejoined, Would you say that whiteness
is colour or a colour? you would reply, A colour, because there are
other colours as well.

  Men. I should.

  Soc. And if he had said, Tell me what they are?-you would have
told him of other colours which are colours just as much as whiteness.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And suppose that he were to pursue the matter in my way, he
would say: Ever and anon we are landed in particulars, but this is not
what I want; tell me then, since you call them by a common name, and
say that they are all figures, even when opposed to one another,
what is that common nature which you designate as figure-which
contains straight as well as round, and is no more one than the
other-that would be your mode of speaking?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And in speaking thus, you do not mean to say that the round
is round any more than straight, or the straight any more straight
than round?

  Men. Certainly not.

  Soc. You only assert that the round figure is not more a figure than
the straight, or the straight than the round?

  Men. Very true.

  Soc. To what then do we give the name of figure? Try and answer.
Suppose that when a person asked you this question either about figure
or colour, you were to reply, Man, I do not understand what you
want, or know what you are saying; he would look rather astonished and
say: Do you not understand that I am looking for the "simile in
multis"? And then he might put the question in another form: Mono,
he might say, what is that "simile in multis" which you call figure,
and which includes not only round and straight figures, but all? Could
you not answer that question, Meno? I wish that you would try; the
attempt will be good practice with a view to the answer about virtue.

  Men. I would rather that you should answer, Socrates.

  Soc. Shall I indulge you?

  Men. By all means.

  Soc. And then you will tell me about virtue?

  Men. I will.

  Soc. Then I must do my best, for there is a prize to be won.

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Well, I will try and explain to you what figure is. What do you
say to this answer?-Figure is the only thing which always follows
colour. Will you be satisfied with it, as I am sure that I should
be, if you would let me have a similar definition of virtue?

  Men. But, Socrates, it is such a simple answer.

  Soc. Why simple?

  Men. Because, according to you, figure is that which always
follows colour.

  (Soc. Granted.)

  Men. But if a person were to say that he does not know what colour
is, any more than what figure is-what sort of answer would you have
given him?

  Soc. I should have told him the truth. And if he were a
philosopher of the eristic and antagonistic sort, I should say to him:
You have my answer, and if I am wrong, your business is to take up the
argument and refute me. But if we were friends, and were talking as
you and I are now, I should reply in a milder strain and more in the
dialectician's vein; that is to say, I should not only speak the
truth, but I should make use of premisses which the person
interrogated would be willing to admit. And this is the way in which I
shall endeavour to approach you. You will acknowledge, will you not,
that there is such a thing as an end, or termination, or
extremity?-all which words use in the same sense, although I am
aware that Prodicus might draw distinctions about them: but still you,
I am sure, would speak of a thing as ended or terminated-that is all
which I am saying-not anything very difficult.

  Men. Yes, I should; and I believe that I understand your meaning.

  Soc. And you would speak of a surface and also of a solid, as for
example in geometry.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Well then, you are now in a condition to understand my
definition of figure. I define figure to be that in which the solid
ends; or, more concisely, the limit of solid.

  Men. And now, Socrates, what is colour?

  Soc. You are outrageous, Meno, in thus plaguing a poor old man to
give you an answer, when you will not take the trouble of
remembering what is Gorgias' definition of virtue.

  Men. When you have told me what I ask, I will tell you, Socrates.

  Soc. A man who was blindfolded has only to hear you talking, and
he would know that you are a fair creature and have still many lovers.

  Men. Why do you think so?

  Soc. Why, because you always speak in imperatives: like all beauties
when they are in their prime, you are tyrannical; and also, as I
suspect, you have found out that I have weakness for the fair, and
therefore to humour you I must answer.

  Men. Please do.

  Soc. Would you like me to answer you after the manner of Gorgias,
which is familiar to you?

  Men. I should like nothing better.

  Soc. Do not he and you and Empedocles say that there are certain
effluences of existence?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And passages into which and through which the effluences pass?

  Men. Exactly.

  Soc. And some of the effluences fit into the passages, and some of
them are too small or too large?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And there is such a thing as sight?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And now, as Pindar says, "read my meaning" colour is an
effluence of form, commensurate with sight, and palpable to sense.

  Men. That, Socrates, appears to me to be an admirable answer.

  Soc. Why, yes, because it happens to be one which you have been in
the habit of hearing: and your wit will have discovered, I suspect,
that you may explain in the same way the nature of sound and smell,
and of many other similar phenomena.

  Men. Quite true.

  Soc. The answer, Meno, was in the orthodox solemn vein, and
therefore was more acceptable to you than the other answer about
figure.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And yet, O son of Alexidemus, I cannot help thinking that the
other was the better; and I am sure that you would be of the same
opinion, if you would only stay and be initiated, and were not
compelled, as you said yesterday, to go away before the mysteries.

  Men. But I will stay, Socrates, if you will give me many such
answers.

  Soc. Well then, for my own sake as well as for yours, I will do my
very best; but I am afraid that I shall not be able to give you very
many as good: and now, in your turn, you are to fulfil your promise,
and tell me what virtue is in the universal; and do not make a
singular into a plural, as the facetious say of those who break a
thing, but deliver virtue to me whole and sound, and not broken into a
number of pieces: I have given you the pattern.

  Men. Well then, Socrates, virtue, as I take it, is when he, who
desires the honourable, is able to provide it for himself; so the poet
says, and I say too-

   Virtue is the desire of things honourable and the power of
attaining them.

  Soc. And does he who desires the honourable also desire the good?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Then are there some who desire the evil and others who desire
the good? Do not all men, my dear sir, desire good?

  Men. I think not.

  Soc. There are some who desire evil?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Do you mean that they think the evils which they desire, to
be good; or do they know that they are evil and yet desire them?

  Men. Both, I think.

  Soc. And do you really imagine, Meno, that a man knows evils to be
evils and desires them notwithstanding?

  Men. Certainly I do.

  Soc. And desire is of possession?

  Men. Yes, of possession.

  Soc. And does he think that the evils will do good to him who
possesses them, or does he know that they will do him harm?

  Men. There are some who think that the evils will do them good,
and others who know that they will do them harm.

  Soc. And, in your opinion, do those who think that they will do them
good know that they are evils?

  Men. Certainly not.

  Soc. Is it not obvious that those who are ignorant of their nature
do not desire them; but they desire what they suppose to be goods
although they are really evils; and if they are mistaken and suppose
the evils to be good they really desire goods?

  Men. Yes, in that case.

  Soc. Well, and do those who, as you say, desire evils, and think
that evils are hurtful to the possessor of them, know that they will
be hurt by them?

  Men. They must know it.

  Soc. And must they not suppose that those who are hurt are miserable
in proportion to the hurt which is inflicted upon them?

  Men. How can it be otherwise?

  Soc. But are not the miserable ill-fated?

  Men. Yes, indeed.

  Soc. And does any one desire to be miserable and ill-fated?

  Men. I should say not, Socrates.

  Soc. But if there is no one who desires to be miserable, there is no
one, Meno, who desires evil; for what is misery but the desire and
possession of evil?

  Men. That appears to be the truth, Socrates, and I admit that nobody
desires evil.

  Soc. And yet, were you not saying just now that virtue is the desire
and power of attaining good?

  Men. Yes, I did say so.

  Soc. But if this be affirmed, then the desire of good is common to
all, and one man is no better than another in that respect?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And if one man is not better than another in desiring good,
he must be better in the power of attaining it?

  Men. Exactly.

  Soc. Then, according to your definition, virtue would appear to be
the power of attaining good?

  Men. I entirely approve, Socrates, of the manner in which you now
view this matter.

  Soc. Then let us see whether what you say is true from another point
of view; for very likely you may be right:-You affirm virtue to be the
power of attaining goods?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And the goods which mean are such as health and wealth and
the possession of gold and silver, and having office and honour in the
state-those are what you would call goods?

  Men. Yes, I should include all those.

  Soc. Then, according to Meno, who is the hereditary friend of the
great king, virtue is the power of getting silver and gold; and
would you add that they must be gained piously, justly, or do you deem
this to be of no consequence? And is any mode of acquisition, even
if unjust and dishonest, equally to be deemed virtue?

  Men. Not virtue, Socrates, but vice.

  Soc. Then justice or temperance or holiness, or some other part of
virtue, as would appear, must accompany the acquisition, and without
them the mere acquisition of good will not be virtue.

  Men. Why, how can there be virtue without these?

  Soc. And the non-acquisition of gold and silver in a dishonest
manner for oneself or another, or in other words the want of them, may
be equally virtue?

  Men. True.

  Soc. Then the acquisition of such goods is no more virtue than the
non-acquisition and want of them, but whatever is accompanied by
justice or honesty is virtue, and whatever is devoid of justice is
vice.

  Men. It cannot be otherwise, in my judgment.

  Soc. And were we not saying just now that justice, temperance, and
the like, were each of them a part of virtue?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And so, Meno, this is the way in which you mock me.

  Men. Why do you say that, Socrates?

  Soc. Why, because I asked you to deliver virtue into my hands
whole and unbroken, and I gave you a pattern according to which you
were to frame your answer; and you have forgotten already, and tell me
that virtue is the power of attaining good justly, or with justice;
and justice you acknowledge to be a part of virtue.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Then it follows from your own admissions, that virtue is
doing what you do with a part of virtue; for justice and the like
are said by you to be parts of virtue.

  Men. What of that?

  Soc. What of that! Why, did not I ask you to tell me the nature of
virtue as a whole? And you are very far from telling me this; but
declare every action to be virtue which is done with a part of virtue;
as though you had told me and I must already know the whole of virtue,
and this too when frittered away into little pieces. And, therefore,
my dear I fear that I must begin again and repeat the same question:
What is virtue? for otherwise, I can only say, that every action
done with a part of virtue is virtue; what else is the meaning of
saying that every action done with justice is virtue? Ought I not to
ask the question over again; for can any one who does not know
virtue know a part of virtue?

   Men. No; I do not say that he can.

   Soc. Do you remember how, in the example of figure, we rejected any
answer given in terms which were as yet unexplained or unadmitted?

   Men. Yes, Socrates; and we were quite right in doing so.

   Soc. But then, my friend, do not suppose that we can explain to any
one the nature of virtue as a whole through some unexplained portion
of virtue, or anything at all in that fashion; we should only have
to ask over again the old question, What is virtue? Am I not right?

   Men. I believe that you are.

   Soc. Then begin again, and answer me, What, according to you and
your friend Gorgias, is the definition of virtue?

   Men. O Socrates, I used to be told, before I knew you, that you
were always doubting yourself and making others doubt; and now you are
casting your spells over me, and I am simply getting bewitched and
enchanted, and am at my wits' end. And if I may venture to make a jest
upon you, you seem to me both in your appearance and in your power
over others to be very like the flat torpedo fish, who torpifies those
who come near him and touch him, as you have now torpified me, I
think. For my soul and my tongue are really torpid, and I do not
know how to answer you; and though I have been delivered of an
infinite variety of speeches about virtue before now, and to many
persons-and very good ones they were, as I thought-at this moment I
cannot even say what virtue is. And I think that. you are very wise in
not voyaging and going away from home, for if you did in other
places as do in Athens, you would be cast into prison as a magician.

  Soc. You are a rogue, Meno, and had all but caught me.

  Men. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I can tell why you made a simile about me.

  Men. Why?

  Soc. In order that I might make another simile about you. For I know
that all pretty young gentlemen like to have pretty similes made about
them-as well they may-but I shall not return the compliment. As to
my being a torpedo, if the torpedo is torpid as well as the cause of
torpidity in others, then indeed I am a torpedo, but not otherwise;
for I perplex others, not because I am clear, but because I am utterly
perplexed myself. And now I know not what virtue is, and you seem to
be in the same case, although you did once perhaps know before you
touched me. However, I have no objection to join with you in the
enquiry.

  Men. And how will you enquire, Socrates, into that which you do
not know? What will you put forth as the subject of enquiry? And if
you find what you want, how will you ever know that this is the
thing which you did not know?

  Soc. I know, Meno, what you mean; but just see what a tiresome
dispute you are introducing. You argue that man cannot enquire
either about that which he knows, or about that which he does not
know; for if he knows, he has no need to enquire; and if not, he
cannot; for he does not know the, very subject about which he is to
enquire.

  Men. Well, Socrates, and is not the argument sound?

  Soc. I think not.

  Men. Why not?

  Soc. I will tell you why: I have heard from certain wise men and
women who spoke of things divine that-

  Men. What did they say?

  Soc. They spoke of a glorious truth, as I conceive.

  Men. What was it? and who were they?

  Soc. Some of them were priests and priestesses, who had studied
how they might be able to give a reason of their profession: there,
have been poets also, who spoke of these things by inspiration, like
Pindar, and many others who were inspired. And they say-mark, now, and
see whether their words are true-they say that the soul of man is
immortal, and at one time has an end, which is termed dying, and at
another time is born again, but is never destroyed. And the moral
is, that a man ought to live always in perfect holiness. "For in the
ninth year Persephone sends the souls of those from whom she has
received the penalty of ancient crime back again from beneath into the
light of the sun above, and these are they who become noble kings
and mighty men and great in wisdom and are called saintly heroes in
after ages." The soul, then, as being immortal, and having been born
again many times, rand having seen all things that exist, whether in
this world or in the world below, has knowledge of them all; and it is
no wonder that she should be able to call to remembrance all that
she ever knew about virtue, and about everything; for as all nature is
akin, and the soul has learned all things; there is no difficulty in
her eliciting or as men say learning, out of a single recollection
-all the rest, if a man is strenuous and does not faint; for all
enquiry and all learning is but recollection. And therefore we ought
not to listen to this sophistical argument about the impossibility
of enquiry: for it will make us idle; and is sweet only to the
sluggard; but the other saying will make us active and inquisitive. In
that confiding, I will gladly enquire with you into the nature of
virtue.

  Men. Yes, Socrates; but what do you mean by saying that we do not
learn, and that what we call learning is only a process of
recollection? Can you teach me how this is?

  Soc. I told you, Meno, just now that you were a rogue, and now you
ask whether I can teach you, when I am saying that there is no
teaching, but only recollection; and thus you imagine that you will
involve me in a contradiction.

  Men. Indeed, Socrates, I protest that I had no such intention. I
only asked the question from habit; but if you can prove to me that
what you say is true, I wish that you would.

  Soc. It will be no easy matter, but I will try to please you to
the utmost of my power. Suppose that you call one of your numerous
attendants, that I may demonstrate on him.

  Men. Certainly. Come hither, boy.

  Soc. He is Greek, and speaks Greek, does he not?

  Men. Yes, indeed; he was born in the house.

  Soc. Attend now to the questions which I ask him, and observe
whether he learns of me or only remembers.

  Men. I will.

  Soc. Tell me, boy, do you know that a figure like this is a square?

  Boy. I do.

  Soc. And you know that a square figure has these four lines equal?

  Boy. Certainly.

  Soc. And these lines which I have drawn through the middle of the
square are also equal?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. A square may be of any size?

  Boy. Certainly.

  Soc. And if one side of the figure be of two feet, and the other
side be of two feet, how much will the whole be? Let me explain: if in
one direction the space was of two feet, and in other direction of one
foot, the whole would be of two feet taken once?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. But since this side is also of two feet, there are twice two
feet?

  Boy. There are.

  Soc. Then the square is of twice two feet?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And how many are twice two feet? count and tell me.

  Boy. Four, Socrates.

  Soc. And might there not be another square twice as large as this,
and having like this the lines equal?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And of how many feet will that be?

  Boy. Of eight feet.

  Soc. And now try and tell me the length of the line which forms
the side of that double square: this is two feet-what will that be?

  Boy. Clearly, Socrates, it will be double.

  Soc. Do you observe, Meno, that I am not teaching the boy
anything, but only asking him questions; and now he fancies that he
knows how long a line is necessary in order to produce a figure of
eight square feet; does he not?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And does he really know?

  Men. Certainly not.

  Soc. He only guesses that because the square is double, the line
is double.

  Men. True.

  Soc. Observe him while he recalls the steps in regular order. (To
the Boy.) Tell me, boy, do you assert that a double space comes from a
double line? Remember that I am not speaking of an oblong, but of a
figure equal every way, and twice the size of this-that is to say of
eight feet; and I want to know whether you still say that a double
square comes from double line?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. But does not this line become doubled if we add another such
line here?

  Boy. Certainly.

  Soc. And four such lines will make a space containing eight feet?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. Let us describe such a figure: Would you not say that this is
the figure of eight feet?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And are there not these four divisions in the figure, each of
which is equal to the figure of four feet?

  Boy. True.

  Soc. And is not that four times four?

  Boy. Certainly.

  Soc. And four times is not double?

  Boy. No, indeed.

  Soc. But how much?

  Boy. Four times as much.

  Soc. Therefore the double line, boy, has given a space, not twice,
but four times as much.

  Boy. True.

  Soc. Four times four are sixteen-are they not?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. What line would give you a space of right feet, as this gives
one of sixteen feet;-do you see?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And the space of four feet is made from this half line?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. Good; and is not a space of eight feet twice the size of
this, and half the size of the other?

  Boy. Certainly.

  Soc. Such a space, then, will be made out of a line greater than
this one, and less than that one?

  Boy. Yes; I think so.

  Soc. Very good; I like to hear you say what you think. And now
tell me, is not this a line of two feet and that of four?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. Then the line which forms the side of eight feet ought to be
more than this line of two feet, and less than the other of four feet?

  Boy. It ought.

  Soc. Try and see if you can tell me how much it will be.

  Boy. Three feet.

  Soc. Then if we add a half to this line of two, that will be the
line of three. Here are two and there is one; and on the other side,
here are two also and there is one: and that makes the figure of which
you speak?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. But if there are three feet this way and three feet that way,
the whole space will be three times three feet?

  Boy. That is evident.

  Soc. And how much are three times three feet?

  Boy. Nine.

  Soc. And how much is the double of four?

  Boy. Eight.

  Soc. Then the figure of eight is not made out of a of three?

  Boy. No.

  Soc. But from what line?-tell me exactly; and if you would rather
not reckon, try and show me the line.

  Boy. Indeed, Socrates, I do not know.

  Soc. Do you see, Meno, what advances he has made in his power of
recollection? He did not know at first, and he does not know now, what
is the side of a figure of eight feet: but then he thought that he
knew, and answered confidently as if he knew, and had no difficulty;
now he has a difficulty, and neither knows nor fancies that he knows.

  Men. True.

  Soc. Is he not better off in knowing his ignorance?

  Men. I think that he is.

  Soc. If we have made him doubt, and given him the "torpedo's shock,"
have we done him any harm?

  Men. I think not.

  Soc. We have certainly, as would seem, assisted him in some degree
to the discovery of the truth; and now he will wish to remedy his
ignorance, but then he would have been ready to tell all the world
again and again that the double space should have a double side.

  Men. True.

  Soc. But do you suppose that he would ever have enquired into or
learned what he fancied that he knew, though he was really ignorant of
it, until he had fallen into perplexity under the idea that he did not
know, and had desired to know?

  Men. I think not, Socrates.

  Soc. Then he was the better for the torpedo's touch?

  Men. I think so.

  Soc. Mark now the farther development. I shall only ask him, and not
teach him, and he shall share the enquiry with me: and do you watch
and see if you find me telling or explaining anything to him,
instead of eliciting his opinion. Tell me, boy, is not this a square
of four feet which I have drawn?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And now I add another square equal to the former one?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And a third, which is equal to either of them?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. Suppose that we fill up the vacant corner?

  Boy. Very good.

  Soc. Here, then, there are four equal spaces?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And how many times larger is this space than this other?

  Boy. Four times.

  Soc. But it ought to have been twice only, as you will remember.

  Boy. True.

  Soc. And does not this line, reaching from corner to corner,
bisect each of these spaces?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And are there not here four equal lines which contain this
space?

  Boy. There are.

  Soc. Look and see how much this space is.

  Boy. I do not understand.

  Soc. Has not each interior line cut off half of the four spaces?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And how many spaces are there in this section?

  Boy. Four.

  Soc. And how many in this?

  Boy. Two.

  Soc. And four is how many times two?

  Boy. Twice.

  Soc. And this space is of how many feet?

  Boy. Of eight feet.

  Soc. And from what line do you get this figure?

  Boy. From this.

  Soc. That is, from the line which extends from corner to corner of
the figure of four feet?

  Boy. Yes.

  Soc. And that is the line which the learned call the diagonal. And
if this is the proper name, then you, Meno's slave, are prepared to
affirm that the double space is the square of the diagonal?

  Boy. Certainly, Socrates.

  Soc. What do you say of him, Meno? Were not all these answers
given out of his own head?

  Men. Yes, they were all his own.

  Soc. And yet, as we were just now saying, he did not know?

  Men. True.

  Soc. But still he had in him those notions of his-had he not?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Then he who does not know may still have true notions of that
which he does not know?

  Men. He has.

  Soc. And at present these notions have just been stirred up in
him, as in a dream; but if he were frequently asked the same
questions, in different forms, he would know as well as any one at
last?

  Men. I dare say.

  Soc. Without any one teaching him he will recover his knowledge
for himself, if he is only asked questions?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And this spontaneous recovery of knowledge in him is
recollection?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And this knowledge which he now has must he not either have
acquired or always possessed?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. But if he always possessed this knowledge he would always
have known; or if he has acquired the knowledge he could not have
acquired it in this life, unless he has been taught geometry; for he
may be made to do the same with all geometry and every other branch of
knowledge. Now, has any one ever taught him all this? You must know
about him, if, as you say, he was born and bred in your house.

  Men. And I am certain that no one ever did teach him.

  Soc. And yet he has the knowledge?

  Men. The fact, Socrates, is undeniable.

  Soc. But if he did not acquire the knowledge in this life, then he
must have had and learned it at some other time?

  Men. Clearly he must.

  Soc. Which must have been the time when he was not a man?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And if there have been always true thoughts in him, both at the
time when he was and was not a man, which only need to be awakened
into knowledge by putting questions to him, his soul must have
always possessed this knowledge, for he always either was or was not a
man?

  Men. Obviously.

  Soc. And if the truth of all things always existed in the soul, then
the soul is immortal. Wherefore be of good cheer, and try to recollect
what you do not know, or rather what you do not remember.

  Men. I feel, somehow, that I like what you are saying.

  Soc. And I, Meno, like what I am saying. Some things I have said
of which I am not altogether confident. But that we shall be better
and braver and less helpless if we think that we ought to enquire,
than we should have been if we indulged in the idle fancy that there
was no knowing and no use in seeking to know what we do not know;-that
is a theme upon which I am ready to fight, in word and deed, to the
utmost of my power.

  Men. There again, Socrates, your words seem to me excellent.

  Soc. Then, as we are agreed that a man should enquire about that
which he does not know, shall you and I make an effort to enquire
together into the nature of virtue?

  Men. By all means, Socrates. And yet I would much rather return to
my original question, Whether in seeking to acquire virtue we should
regard it as a thing to be taught, or as a gift of nature, or as
coming to men in some other way?

  Soc. Had I the command of you as well as of myself, Meno, I would
not have enquired whether virtue is given by instruction or not, until
we had first ascertained "what it is." But as you think only of
controlling me who am your slave, and never of controlling
yourself,-such being your notion of freedom, I must yield to you,
for you are irresistible. And therefore I have now to enquire into the
qualities of a thing of which I do not as yet know the nature. At
any rate, will you condescend a little, and allow the question
"Whether virtue is given by instruction, or in any other way," to be
argued upon hypothesis? As the geometrician, when he is asked
whether a certain triangle is capable being inscribed in a certain
circle, will reply: "I cannot tell you as yet; but I will offer a
hypothesis which may assist us in forming a conclusion: If the
figure be such that when you have produced a given side of it, the
given area of the triangle falls short by an area corresponding to the
part produced, then one consequence follows, and if this is impossible
then some other; and therefore I wish to assume a hypothesis before
I tell you whether this triangle is capable of being inscribed in
the circle":-that is a geometrical hypothesis. And we too, as we
know not the nature and -qualities of virtue, must ask, whether virtue
is or not taught, under a hypothesis: as thus, if virtue is of such
a class of mental goods, will it be taught or not? Let the first
hypothesis be-that virtue is or is not knowledge,-in that case will it
be taught or not? or, as we were just now saying, remembered"? For
there is no use in disputing about the name. But is virtue taught or
not? or rather, does not everyone see that knowledge alone is taught?

  Men. I agree.

  Soc. Then if virtue is knowledge, virtue will be taught?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Then now we have made a quick end of this question: if virtue
is of such a nature, it will be taught; and if not, not?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. The next question is, whether virtue is knowledge or of another
species?

  Men. Yes, that appears to be the -question which comes next in
order.

  Soc. Do we not say that virtue is a good?-This is a hypothesis which
is not set aside.

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Now, if there be any sort-of good which is distinct from
knowledge, virtue may be that good; but if knowledge embraces all
good, then we shall be right in think in that virtue is knowledge?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And virtue makes us good?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And if we are good, then we are profitable; for all good things
are profitable?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Then virtue is profitable?

  Men. That is the only inference.

  Soc. Then now let us see what are the things which severally
profit us. Health and strength, and beauty and wealth-these, and the
like of these, we call profitable?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And yet these things may also sometimes do us harm: would you
not think so?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And what is the guiding principle which makes them profitable
or the reverse? Are they not profitable when they are rightly used,
and hurtful when they are not rightly used?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Next, let us consider the goods of the soul: they are
temperance, justice, courage, quickness of apprehension, memory,
magnanimity, and the like?

  Men. Surely.

  Soc. And such of these as are not knowledge, but of another sort,
are sometimes profitable and sometimes hurtful; as, for example,
courage wanting prudence, which is only a sort of confidence? When a
man has no sense he is harmed by courage, but when he has sense he
is profited?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And the same may be said of temperance and quickness of
apprehension; whatever things are learned or done with sense are
profitable, but when done without sense they are hurtful?

  Men. Very true.

  Soc. And in general, all that the attempts or endures, when under
the guidance of wisdom, ends in happiness; but when she is under the
guidance of folly, in the opposite?

  Men. That appears to be true.

  Soc. If then virtue is a quality of the soul, and is admitted to
be profitable, it must be wisdom or prudence, since none of the things
of the soul are either profitable or hurtful in themselves, but they
are all made profitable or hurtful by the addition of wisdom or of
folly; and therefore and therefore if virtue is profitable, virtue
must be a sort of wisdom or prudence?

  Men. I quite agree.

  Soc. And the other goods, such as wealth and the like, of which we
were just now saying that they are sometimes good and sometimes
evil, do not they also become profitable or hurtful, accordingly as
the soul guides and uses them rightly or wrongly; just as the things
of the soul herself are benefited when under the guidance of wisdom
and harmed by folly?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And the wise soul guides them rightly, and the foolish soul
wrongly.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And is not this universally true of human nature? All other
things hang upon the soul, and the things of the soul herself hang
upon wisdom, if they are to be good; and so wisdom is inferred to be
that which profits-and virtue, as we say, is profitable?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And thus we arrive at the conclusion that virtue is either
wholly or partly wisdom?

  Men. I think that what you are saying, Socrates, is very true.

  Soc. But if this is true, then the good are not by nature good?

  Men. I think not.

  Soc. If they had been, there would assuredly have been discerners of
characters among us who would have known our future great men; and
on their showing we should have adopted them, and when we had got
them, we should have kept them in the citadel out of the way of
harm, and set a stamp upon them far rather than upon a piece of
gold, in order that no one might tamper with them; and when they
grew up they would have been useful to the state?

  Men. Yes, Socrates, that would have been the right way.

  Soc. But if the good are not by nature good, are they made good by
instruction?

  Men. There appears to be no other alternative, Socrates. On the
supposition that virtue is knowledge, there can be no doubt that
virtue is taught.

  Soc. Yes, indeed; but what if the supposition is erroneous?

  Men. I certainly thought just now that we were right.

  Soc. Yes, Meno; but a principle which has any soundness should stand
firm not only just now, but always.

  Men. Well; and why are you so slow of heart to believe that
knowledge is virtue?

  Soc. I will try and tell you why, Meno. I do not retract the
assertion that if virtue is knowledge it may be taught; but I fear
that I have some reason in doubting whether virtue is knowledge: for
consider now. and say whether virtue, and not only virtue but anything
that is taught, must not have teachers and disciples?

  Men. Surely.

  Soc. And conversely, may not the art of which neither teachers nor
disciples exist be assumed to be incapable of being taught?

  Men. True; but do you think that there are no teachers of virtue?

  Soc. I have certainly often enquired whether there were any, and
taken great pains to find them, and have never succeeded; and many
have assisted me in the search, and they were the persons whom I
thought the most likely to know. Here at the moment when he is
wanted we fortunately have sitting by us Anytus, the very person of
whom we should make enquiry; to him then let us repair. In the first
Place, he is the son of a wealthy and wise father, Anthemion, who
acquired his wealth, not by accident or gift, like Ismenias the Theban
(who has recently made himself as rich as Polycrates), but by his
own skill and industry, and who is a well-conditioned, modest man, not
insolent, or over-bearing, or annoying; moreover, this son of his
has received a good education, as the Athenian people certainly appear
to think, for they choose him to fill the highest offices. And these
are the sort of men from whom you are likely to learn whether there
are any teachers of virtue, and who they are. Please, Anytus, to
help me and your friend Meno in answering our question, Who are the
teachers? Consider the matter thus: If we wanted Meno to be a good
physician, to whom should we send him? Should we not send him to the
physicians?

  Any. Certainly.

  Soc. Or if we wanted him to be a good cobbler, should we not send
him to the cobblers?

  Any. Yes.

  Soc. And so forth?

  Any. Yes.

  Soc. Let me trouble you with one more question. When we say that
we should be right in sending him to the physicians if we wanted him
to be a physician, do we mean that we should be right in sending him
to those who profess the art, rather than to those who do not, and
to those who demand payment for teaching the art, and profess to teach
it to any one who will come and learn? And if these were our
reasons, should we not be right in sending him?

  Any. Yes.

  Soc. And might not the same be said of flute-playing, and of the
other arts? Would a man who wanted to make another a flute-player
refuse to send him to those who profess to teach the art for money,
and be plaguing other persons to give him instruction, who are not
professed teachers and who never had a single disciple in that
branch of knowledge which he wishes him to acquire-would not such
conduct be the height of folly?

  Any. Yes, by Zeus, and of ignorance too.

  Soc. Very good. And now you are in a position to advise with me
about my friend Meno. He has been telling me, Anytus, that he
desires to attain that kind of wisdom and-virtue by which men order
the state or the house, and honour their parents, and know when to
receive and when to send away citizens and strangers, as a good man
should. Now, to whom should he go in order that he may learn this
virtue? Does not the previous argument imply clearly that we should
send him to those who profess and avouch that they are the common
teachers of all Hellas, and are ready to impart instruction to any one
who likes, at a fixed price?

  Any. Whom do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. You surely know, do you not, Anytus, that these are the
people whom mankind call Sophists?

  Any. By Heracles, Socrates, forbear! I only hope that no friend or
kinsman or acquaintance of mine, whether citizen or stranger, will
ever be so mad as to allow himself to be corrupted by them; for they
are a manifest pest and corrupting influences to those who have to
do with them.

  Soc. What, Anytus? Of all the people who profess that they know
how to do men good, do you mean to say that these are the only ones
who not only do them no good, but positively corrupt those who are
entrusted to them, and in return for this disservice have the face
to demand money? Indeed, I cannot believe you; for I know of a
single man, Protagoras, who made more out of his craft than the
illustrious Pheidias, who created such noble works, or any ten other
statuaries. How could that A mender of old shoes, or patcher up of
clothes, who made the shoes or clothes worse than he received them,
could not have remained thirty days undetected, and would very soon
have starved; whereas during more than forty years, Protagoras was
corrupting all Hellas, and sending his disciples from him worse than
he received them, and he was never found out. For, if I am not
mistaken,-he was about seventy years old at his death, forty of
which were spent in the practice of his profession; and during all
that time he had a good reputation, which to this day he retains:
and not only Protagoras, but many others are well spoken of; some
who lived before him, and others who are still living. Now, when you
say that they deceived and corrupted the youth, are they to be
supposed to have corrupted them consciously or unconsciously? Can
those who were deemed by many to be the wisest men of Hellas have been
out of their minds?

  Any. Out of their minds! No, Socrates; the young men who gave
their money to them, were out of their minds, and their relations
and guardians who entrusted their youth to the care of these men
were still more out of their minds, and most of all, the cities who
allowed them to come in, and did not drive them out, citizen and
stranger alike.

  Soc. Has any of the Sophists wronged you, Anytus? What makes you
so angry with them?

  Any. No, indeed, neither I nor any of my belongings has ever had,
nor would I suffer them to have, anything to do with them.

  Soc. Then you are entirely unacquainted with them?

  Any. And I have no wish to be acquainted.

  Soc. Then, my dear friend, how can you know whether a thing is
good or bad of which you are wholly ignorant?

  Any. Quite well; I am sure that I know what manner of men these are,
whether I am acquainted with them or not.

  Soc. You must be a diviner, Anytus, for I really cannot make out,
judging from your own words, how, if you are not acquainted with them,
you know about them. But I am not enquiring of you who are the
teachers who will corrupt Meno (let them be, if you please, the
Sophists); I only ask you to tell him who there is in this great
city who will teach him how to become eminent in the virtues which I
was just, now describing. He is the friend of your family, and you
will oblige him.

  Any. Why do you not tell him yourself?

  Soc. I have told him whom I supposed to be the teachers of these
things; but I learn from you that I am utterly at fault, and I dare
say that you are right. And now I wish that you, on your part, would
tell me to whom among the Athenians he should go. Whom would you name?

 Any. Why single out individuals? Any Athenian gentleman, taken at
random, if he will mind him, will do far more, good to him than the
Sophists.

  Soc. And did those gentlemen grow of themselves; and without
having been taught by any one, were they nevertheless able to teach
others that which they had never learned themselves?

  Any. I imagine that they learned of the previous generation of
gentlemen. Have there not been many good men in this city?

  Soc. Yes, certainly, Anytus; and many good statesmen also there
always have been and there are still, in the city of Athens. But the
question is whether they were also good teachers of their own
virtue;-not whether there are, or have been, good men in this part
of the world, but whether virtue can be taught, is the question
which we have been discussing. Now, do we mean to say that the good
men our own and of other times knew how to impart to others that
virtue which they had themselves; or is virtue a thing incapable of
being communicated or imparted by one man to another? That is the
question which I and Meno have been arguing. Look at the matter in
your own way: Would you not admit that Themistocles was a good man?

  Any. Certainly; no man better.

  Soc. And must not he then have been a good teacher, if any man
ever was a good teacher, of his own virtue?

  Any. Yes certainly,-if he wanted to be so.

  Soc. But would he not have wanted? He would, at any rate, have
desired to make his own son a good man and a gentleman; he could not
have been jealous of him, or have intentionally abstained from
imparting to him his own virtue. Did you never hear that he made his
son Cleophantus a famous horseman; and had him taught to stand upright
on horseback and hurl a javelin, and to do many other marvellous
things; and in anything which could be learned from a master he was
well trained? Have you not heard from our elders of him?

  Any. I have.

  Soc. Then no one could say that his son showed any want of capacity?

  Any. Very likely not.

  Soc. But did any one, old or young, ever say in your hearing that
Cleophantus, son of Themistocles, was a wise or good man, as his
father was?

  Any. I have certainly never heard any one say so.

  Soc. And if virtue could have been taught, would his father
Themistocles have sought to train him in these minor
accomplishments, and allowed him who, as you must remember, was his
own son, to be no better than his neighbours in those qualities in
which he himself excelled?

  Any. Indeed, indeed, I think not.

  Soc. Here was a teacher of virtue whom you admit to be among the
best men of the past. Let us take another,-Aristides, the son of
Lysimachus: would you not acknowledge that he was a good man?

  Any. To be sure I should.

  Soc. And did not he train his son Lysimachus better than any other
Athenian in all that could be done for him by the help of masters? But
what has been the result? Is he a bit better than any other mortal? He
is an acquaintance of yours, and you see what he is like. There is
Pericles, again, magnificent in his wisdom; and he, as you are
aware, had two sons, Paralus and Xanthippus.

  Any. I know.

  Soc. And you know, also, that he taught them to be unrivalled
horsemen, and had them trained in music and gymnastics and all sorts
of arts-in these respects they were on a level with the best-and had
he no wish to make good men of them? Nay, he must have wished it.
But virtue, as I suspect, could not be taught. And that you may not
suppose the incompetent teachers to be only the meaner sort of
Athenians and few in number, remember again that Thucydides had two
sons, Melesias and Stephanus, whom, besides giving them a good
education in other things, he trained in wrestling, and they were
the best wrestlers in Athens: one of them he committed to the care
of Xanthias, and the other of Eudorus, who had the reputation of being
the most celebrated wrestlers of that day. Do you remember them?

  Any. I have heard of them.

  Soc. Now, can there be a doubt that Thucydides, whose children
were taught things for which he had to spend money, would have
taught them to be good men, which would have cost him nothing, if
virtue could have been taught? Will you reply that he was a mean
man, and had not many friends among the Athenians and allies? Nay, but
he was of a great family, and a man of influence at Athens and in
all Hellas, and, if virtue could have been taught, he would have found
out some Athenian or foreigner who would have made good men of his
sons, if he could not himself spare the time from cares of state. Once
more, I suspect, friend Anytus, that virtue is not a thing which can
be taught?

  Any. Socrates, I think that you are too ready to speak evil of
men: and, if you will take my advice, I would recommend you to be
careful. Perhaps there is no city in which it is not easier to do
men harm than to do them good, and this is certainly the case at
Athens, as I believe that you know.

  Soc. O Meno, think that Anytus is in a rage. And he may well be in a
rage, for he thinks, in the first place, that I am defaming these
gentlemen; and in the second place, he is of opinion that he is one of
them himself. But some day he will know what is the meaning of
defamation, and if he ever does, he will forgive me. Meanwhile I
will return to you, Meno; for I suppose that there are gentlemen in
your region too?

  Men. Certainly there are.

  Soc. And are they willing to teach the young? and do they profess to
be teachers? and do they agree that virtue is taught?

  Men. No indeed, Socrates, they are anything but agreed; you may hear
them saying at one time that virtue can be taught, and then again
the reverse.

  Soc. Can we call those teachers who do not acknowledge the
possibility of their own vocation?

  Men. I think not, Socrates.

  Soc. And what do you think of these Sophists, who are the only
professors? Do they seem to you to be teachers of virtue?

  Men. I often wonder, Socrates, that Gorgias is never heard promising
to teach virtue: and when he hears others promising he only laughs
at them; but he thinks that men should be taught to speak.

  Soc. Then do you not think that the Sophists are teachers?

  Men. I cannot tell you, Socrates; like the rest of the world, I am
in doubt, and sometimes I think that they are teachers and sometimes
not.

  Soc. And are you aware that not you only and other politicians
have doubts whether virtue can be taught or not, but that Theognis the
poet says the very same thing?

  Men. Where does he say so?

  Soc. In these elegiac verses:

  Eat and drink and sit with the mighty, and make yourself agreeable
to them; for from the good you will learn what is good, but if you mix
with the bad you will lose the intelligence which you already have.

Do you observe that here he seems to imply that virtue can be taught?

  Men. Clearly.

  Soc. But in some other verses he shifts about and says:

  If understanding could be created and put into a man, then they [who
were able to perform this feat] would have obtained great rewards.

And again:-

  Never would a bad son have sprung from a good sire, for he would
have heard the voice of instruction; but not by teaching will you ever
make a bad man into a good one.

And this, as you may remark, is a contradiction of the other.

  Men. Clearly.

  Soc. And is there anything else of which the professors are affirmed
not only not to be teachers of others, but to be ignorant
themselves, and bad at the knowledge of that which they are professing
to teach? or is there anything about which even the acknowledged
"gentlemen" are sometimes saying that "this thing can be taught,"
and sometimes the opposite? Can you say that they are teachers in
any true sense whose ideas are in such confusion?

  Men. I should say, certainly not.

  Soc. But if neither the Sophists nor the gentlemen are teachers,
clearly there can be no other teachers?

  Men. No.

  Soc. And if there are no teachers, neither are there disciples?

  Men. Agreed.

  Soc. And we have admitted that a thing cannot be taught of which
there are neither teachers nor disciples?

  Men. We have.

  Soc. And there are no teachers of virtue to be found anywhere?

  Men. There are not.

  Soc. And if there are no teachers, neither are there scholars?

  Men. That, I think, is true.

  Soc. Then virtue cannot be taught?

  Men. Not if we are right in our view. But I cannot believe,
Socrates, that there are no good men: And if there are, how did they
come into existence?

  Soc. I am afraid, Meno, that you and I are not good for much, and
that Gorgias has been as poor an educator of you as Prodicus has
been of me. Certainly we shall have to look to ourselves, and try to
find some one who will help in some way or other to improve us. This I
say, because I observe that in the previous discussion none of us
remarked that right and good action is possible to man under other
guidance than that of knowledge (episteme);-and indeed if this be
denied, there is no seeing how there can be any good men at all.

  Men. How do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I mean that good men are necessarily useful or profitable. Were
we not right in admitting this? It must be so.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And in supposing that they will be useful only if they are true
guides to us of action-there we were also right?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. But when we said that a man cannot be a good guide unless he
have knowledge (phrhonesis), this we were wrong.

  Men. What do you mean by the word "right"?

  Soc. I will explain. If a man knew the way to Larisa, or anywhere
else, and went to the place and led others thither, would he not be
a right and good guide?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And a person who had a right opinion about the way, but had
never been and did not know, might be a good guide also, might he not?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And while he has true opinion about that which the other knows,
he will be just as good a guide if he thinks the truth, as he who
knows the truth?

  Men. Exactly.

  Soc. Then true opinion is as good a guide to correct action as
knowledge; and that was the point which we omitted in our
speculation about the nature of virtue, when we said that knowledge
only is the guide of right action; whereas there is also right
opinion.

  Men. True.

  Soc. Then right opinion is not less useful than knowledge?

  Men. The difference, Socrates, is only that he who has knowledge
will always be right; but he who has right opinion will sometimes be
right, and sometimes not.

  Soc. What do you mean? Can he be wrong who has right opinion, so
long as he has right opinion?

  Men. I admit the cogency of your argument, and therefore,
Socrates, I wonder that knowledge should be preferred to right
opinion-or why they should ever differ.

  Soc. And shall I explain this wonder to you?

  Men. Do tell me.

  Soc. You would not wonder if you had ever observed the images of
Daedalus; but perhaps you have not got them in your country?

  Men. What have they to do with the question?

  Soc. Because they require to be fastened in order to keep them,
and if they are not fastened they will play truant and run away.

  Men. Well. what of that?

  Soc. I mean to say that they are not very valuable possessions if
they are at liberty, for they will walk off like runaway slaves; but
when fastened, they are of great value, for they are really
beautiful works of art. Now this is an illustration of the nature of
true opinions: while they abide with us they are beautiful and
fruitful, but they run away out of the human soul, and do not remain
long, and therefore they are not of much value until they are fastened
by the tie of the cause; and this fastening of them, friend Meno, is
recollection, as you and I have agreed to call it. But when they are
bound, in the first place, they have the nature of knowledge; and,
in the second place, they are abiding. And this is why knowledge is
more honourable and excellent than true opinion, because fastened by a
chain.

  Men. What you are saying, Socrates, seems to be very like the truth.

  Soc. I too speak rather in ignorance; I only conjecture. And yet
that knowledge differs from true opinion is no matter of conjecture
with me. There are not many things which I profess to know, but this
is most certainly one of them.

  Men. Yes, Socrates; and you are quite right in saying so.

  Soc. And am I not also right in saying that true opinion leading the
way perfects action quite as well as knowledge?

  Men. There again, Socrates, I think you are right.

  Soc. Then right opinion is not a whit inferior to knowledge, or less
useful in action; nor is the man who has right opinion inferior to him
who has knowledge?

  Men. True.

  Soc. And surely the good man has been acknowledged by us to be
useful?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Seeing then that men become good and useful to states, not only
because they have knowledge, but because they have right opinion,
and that neither knowledge nor right opinion is given to man by nature
or acquired by him-(do you imagine either of them to be given by
nature?

  Men. Not I.)

  Soc. Then if they are not given by nature, neither are the good by
nature good?

  Men. Certainly not.

  Soc. And nature being excluded, then came the question whether
virtue is acquired by teaching?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. If virtue was wisdom [or knowledge], then, as we thought, it
was taught?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And if it was taught it was wisdom?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And if there were teachers, it might be taught; and if there
were no teachers, not?

  Men. True.

  Soc. But surely we acknowledged that there were no teachers of
virtue?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. Then we acknowledged that it was not taught, and was not
wisdom?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And yet we admitted that it was a good?

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And the right guide is useful and good?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. And the only right guides are knowledge and true
opinion-these are the guides of man; for things which happen by chance
are not under the guidance of man: but the guides of man are true
opinion and knowledge.

  Men. I think so too.

  Soc. But if virtue is not taught, neither is virtue knowledge.

  Men. Clearly not.

  Soc. Then of two good and useful things, one, which is knowledge,
has been set aside, and cannot be supposed to be our guide in
political life.

  Men. I think not.

  Soc. And therefore not by any wisdom, and not because they were
wise, did Themistocles and those others of whom Anytus spoke govern
states. This was the reason why they were unable to make others like
themselves-because their virtue was not grounded on knowledge.

  Men. That is probably true, Socrates.

  Soc. But if not by knowledge, the only alternative which remains
is that statesmen must have guided states by right opinion, which is
in politics what divination is in religion; for diviners and also
prophets say many things truly, but they know not what they say.

  Men. So I believe.

  Soc. And may we not, Meno, truly call those men "divine" who, having
no understanding, yet succeed in many a grand deed and word?

  Men. Certainly.

  Soc. Then we shall also be right in calling divine those whom we
were just now speaking of as diviners and prophets, including the
whole tribe of poets. Yes, and statesmen above all may be said to be
divine and illumined, being inspired and possessed of God, in which
condition they say many grand things, not knowing what they say.

  Men. Yes.

  Soc. And the women too, Meno, call good men divine-do they not?
and the Spartans, when they praise a good man, say "that he is a
divine man."

  Men. And I think, Socrates, that they are right; although very
likely our friend Anytus may take offence at the word.

  Soc. I da not care; as for Anytus, there will be another opportunity
of talking with him. To sum up our enquiry-the result seems to be,
if we are at all right in our view, that virtue is neither natural nor
acquired, but an instinct given by God to the virtuous. Nor is the
instinct accompanied by reason, unless there may be supposed to be
among statesmen some one who is capable of educating statesmen. And if
there be such an one, he may be said to be among the living what Homer
says that Tiresias was among the dead, "he alone has understanding;
but the rest are flitting shades"; and he and his virtue in like
manner will be a reality among shadows.

  Men. That is excellent, Socrates.

  Soc. Then, Meno, the conclusion is that virtue comes to the virtuous
by the gift of God. But we shall never know the certain truth until,
before asking how virtue is given, we enquire into the actual nature
of virtue. I fear that I must go away, but do you, now that you are
persuaded yourself, persuade our friend Anytus. And do not let him
be so exasperated; if you can conciliate him, you will have done
good service to the Athenian people.

                            -THE END-




  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: CEPHALUS; ADEIMANTUS; GLAUCON; ANTIPHON;
PYTHODORUS; SOCRATES; ZENO; PARMENIDES; ARISTOTELES. Cephalus
rehearses a dialogue which is supposed to have been narrated in his
presence by Antiphon, the half-brother of Adeimantus and Glaucon, to
certain Clazomenians.

  We had come from our home at Clazomenae to Athens, and met
Adeimantus and Glaucon in the Agora. Welcome, Cephalus, said
Adeimantus, taking me by the hand; is there anything which we can do
for you in Athens?

  Yes; that is why I am here; I wish to ask a favour of you.

  What may that be? he said.

  I want you to tell me the name of your half brother, which I have
forgotten; he was a mere child when I last came hither from
Clazomenae, but that was a long time ago; his father's name, if I
remember rightly, was Pyrilampes?

  Yes, he said, and the name of our brother, Antiphon; but why do
you ask?

  Let me introduce some countrymen of mine, I said; they are lovers of
philosophy, and have heard that Antiphon was intimate with a certain
Pythodorus, a friend of Zeno, and remembers a conversation which
took place between Socrates, Zeno, and Parmenides many years ago,
Pythodorus having often recited it to him.

  Quite true.

  And could we hear it? I asked.

  Nothing easier, he replied; when he was a youth he made a careful
study of the piece; at present his thoughts run in another
direction; like his grandfather Antiphon he is devoted to horses. But,
if that is what you want, let us go and look for him; he dwells at
Melita, which is quite near, and he has only just left us to go home.

  Accordingly we went to look for him; he was at home, and in the
act of giving a bridle to a smith to be fitted. When he had done
with the smith, his brothers told him the purpose of our visit; and he
saluted me as an acquaintance whom he remembered from my former visit,
and we asked him to repeat the dialogue. At first he was not very
willing, and complained of the trouble, but at length he consented. He
told us that Pythodorus had described to him the appearance of
Parmenides and Zeno; they came to Athens, as he said, at the great
Panathenaea; the former was, at the time of his visit, about 65
years old, very white with age, but well favoured. Zeno was nearly
40 years of age, tall and fair to look upon; in the days of his
youth he was reported to have been beloved by Parmenides. He said that
they lodged with Pythodorus in the Ceramicus, outside the wall,
whither Socrates, then a very young man, came to see them, and many
others with him; they wanted to hear the writings of Zeno, which had
been brought to Athens for the first time on the occasion of their
visit. These Zeno himself read to them in the absence of Parmenides,
and had very nearly finished when Pythodorus entered, and with him
Parmenides and Aristoteles who was afterwards one of the Thirty, and
heard the little that remained of the dialogue. Pythodorus had heard
Zeno repeat them before.

  When the recitation was completed, Socrates requested that the first
thesis of the first argument might be read over again, and this having
been done, he said: What is your meaning, Zeno? Do you maintain that
if being is many, it must be both like and unlike, and that this is
impossible, for neither can the like be unlike, nor the unlike like-is
that your position?

  Just so, said Zeno.

  And if the unlike cannot be like, or the like unlike, then according
to you, being could not be many; for this would involve an
impossibility. In all that you say have you any other purpose except
to disprove the being of the many? and is not each division of your
treatise intended to furnish a separate proof of this, there being
in all as many proofs of the not-being of the many as you have
composed arguments? Is that your meaning, or have I misunderstood you?

  No, said Zeno; you have correctly understood my general purpose.

  I see, Parmenides, said Socrates, that Zeno would like to be not
only one with you in friendship but your second self in his writings
too; he puts what you say in another way, and would fain make
believe that he is telling us something which is new. For you, in your
poems, say The All is one, and of this you adduce excellent proofs;
and he on the other hand says There is no many; and on behalf of
this he offers overwhelming evidence. You affirm unity, he denies
plurality. And so you deceive the world into believing that you are
saying different things when really you are saying much the same. This
is a strain of art beyond the reach of most of us.

  Yes, Socrates, said Zeno. But although you are as keen as a
Spartan hound in pursuing the track, you do not fully apprehend the
true motive of the composition, which is not really such an artificial
work as you imagine; for what you speak of was an accident; there
was no pretence of a great purpose; nor any serious intention of
deceiving the world. The truth is, that these writings of mine were
meant to protect the arguments of Parmenides against those who make
fun of him and seek to show the many ridiculous and contradictory
results which they suppose to follow from the affirmation of the
one. My answer is addressed to the partisans of the many, whose attack
I return with interest by retorting upon them that their hypothesis of
the being of many, if carried out, appears to be still more ridiculous
than the hypothesis of the being of one. Zeal for my master led me
to write the book in the days of my youth, but some one stole the
copy; and therefore I had no choice whether it should be published
or not; the motive, however, of writing, was not the ambition of an
elder man, but the pugnacity of a young one. This you do not seem to
see, Socrates; though in other respects, as I was saying, your
notion is a very just one.

  I understand, said Socrates, and quite accept your account. But tell
me, Zeno, do you not further think that there is an idea of likeness
in itself, and another idea of unlikeness, which is the opposite of
likeness, and that in these two, you and I and all other things to
which we apply the term many, participate-things which participate
in likeness become in that degree and manner like; and so far as
they participate in unlikeness become in that degree unlike, or both
like and unlike in the degree in which they participate in both? And
may not all things partake of both opposites, and be both like and
unlike, by reason of this participation?-Where is the wonder? Now if a
person could prove the absolute like to become unlike, or the absolute
unlike to become like, that, in my opinion, would indeed be a
wonder; but there is nothing extraordinary, Zeno, in showing that
the things which only partake of likeness and unlikeness experience
both. Nor, again, if a person were to show that all is one by
partaking of one, and at the same time many by partaking of many,
would that be very astonishing. But if he were to show me that the
absolute one was many, or the absolute many one, I should be truly
amazed. And so of all the rest: I should be surprised to hear that the
natures or ideas themselves had these opposite qualities; but not if a
person wanted to prove of me that I was many and also one. When he
wanted to show that I was many he would say that I have a right and
a left side, and a front and a back, and an upper and a lower half,
for I cannot deny that I partake of multitude; when, on the other
hand, he wants to prove that I am one, he will say, that we who are
here assembled are seven, and that I am one and partake of the one. In
both instances he proves his case. So again, if a person shows that
such things as wood, stones, and the like, being many are also one, we
admit that he shows the coexistence the one and many, but he does
not show that the many are one or the one many; he is uttering not a
paradox but a truism. If however, as I just now suggested, some one
were to abstract simple notions of like, unlike, one, many, rest,
motion, and similar ideas, and then to show that these admit of
admixture and separation in themselves, I should be very much
astonished. This part of the argument appears to be treated by you,
Zeno, in a very spirited manner; but, as I was saying, I should be far
more amazed if any one found in the ideas themselves which are
apprehended by reason, the same puzzle and entanglement which you have
shown to exist in visible objects.

  While Socrates was speaking, Pythodorus thought that Parmenides
and Zeno were not altogether pleased at the successive steps of the
argument; but still they gave the closest attention and often looked
at one another, and smiled as if in admiration of him. When he had
finished, Parmenides expressed their feelings in the following words:-

  Socrates, he said, I admire the bent of your mind towards
philosophy; tell me now, was this your own distinction between ideas
in themselves and the things which partake of them? and do you think
that there is an idea of likeness apart from the likeness which we
possess, and of the one and many, and of the other things which Zeno
mentioned?

  I think that there are such ideas, said Socrates.

  Parmenides proceeded: And would you also make absolute ideas of
the just and the beautiful and the good, and of all that class?

  Yes, he said, I should.

  And would you make an idea of man apart from us and from all other
human creatures, or of fire and water?

  I am often undecided, Parmenides, as to whether I ought to include
them or not.

  And would you feel equally undecided, Socrates, about things of
which the mention may provoke a smile?-I mean such things as hair,
mud, dirt, or anything else which is vile and paltry; would you
suppose that each of these has an idea distinct from the actual
objects with which we come into contact, or not?

  Certainly not, said Socrates; visible things like these are such
as they appear to us, and I am afraid that there would be an absurdity
in assuming any idea of them, although I sometimes get disturbed,
and begin to think that there is nothing without an idea; but then
again, when I have taken up this position, I run away, because I am
afraid that I may fall into a bottomless pit of nonsense, and
perish; and so I return to the ideas of which I was just now speaking,
and occupy myself with them.

  Yes, Socrates, said Parmenides; that is because you are still young;
the time will come, if I am not mistaken, when philosophy will have
a firmer grasp of you, and then you will not despise even the
meanest things; at your age, you are too much disposed to regard
opinions of men. But I should like to know whether you mean that there
are certain ideas of which all other things partake, and from which
they derive their names; that similars, for example, become similar,
because they partake of similarity; and great things become great,
because they partake of greatness; and that just and beautiful
things become just and beautiful, because they partake of justice
and beauty?

  Yes, certainly, said Socrates that is my meaning.

  Then each individual partakes either of the whole of the idea or
else of a part of the idea? Can there be any other mode of
participation?

  There cannot be, he said.

  Then do you think that the whole idea is one, and yet, being one, is
in each one of the many?

  Why not, Parmenides? said Socrates.

  Because one and the same thing will exist as a whole at the same
time in many separate individuals, and will therefore be in a state of
separation from itself.

  Nay, but the idea may be like the day which is one and the same in
many places at once, and yet continuous with itself; in this way
each idea may be one; and the same in all at the same time.

  I like your way, Socrates, of making one in many places at once. You
mean to say, that if I were to spread out a sail and cover a number of
men, there would be one whole including many-is not that your meaning?

  I think so.

  And would you say that the whole sail includes each man, or a part
of it only, and different parts different men?

  The latter.

  Then, Socrates, the ideas themselves will be divisible, and things
which participate in them will have a part of them only and not the
whole idea existing in each of them?

  That seems to follow.

  Then would you like to say, Socrates, that the one idea is really
divisible and yet remains one?

  Certainly not, he said.

  Suppose that you divide absolute greatness, and that of the many
great things, each one is great in virtue of a portion of greatness
less than absolute greatness-is that conceivable?

  No.

  Or will each equal thing, if possessing some small portion of
equality less than absolute equality, be equal to some other thing
by virtue of that portion only?

  Impossible.

  Or suppose one of us to have a portion of smallness; this is but a
part of the small, and therefore the absolutely small is greater; if
the absolutely small be greater, that to which the part of the small
is added will be smaller and not greater than before.

  How absurd!

  Then in what way, Socrates, will all things participate in the
ideas, if they are unable to participate in them either as parts or
wholes?

  Indeed, he said, you have asked a question which is not easily
answered.

  Well, said Parmenides, and what do you say of another question?

  What question?

  I imagine that the way in which you are led to assume one idea of
each kind is as follows: -You see a number of great objects, and
when you look at them there seems to you to be one and the same idea
(or nature) in them all; hence you conceive of greatness as one.

  Very true, said Socrates.

  And if you go on and allow your mind in like manner to embrace in
one view the idea of greatness and of great things which are not the
idea, and -to compare them, will not another greatness arise, which
will appear to be the source of all these?

  It would seem so.

  Then another idea of greatness now comes into view over and above
absolute greatness, and the individuals which partake of it; and
then another, over and above all these, by virtue of which they will
all be great, and so each idea instead of being one will be infinitely
multiplied.

  But may not the ideas, asked Socrates, be thoughts only, and have no
proper existence except in our minds, Parmenides? For in that case
each idea may still be one, and not experience this infinite
multiplication.

  And can there be individual thoughts which are thoughts of nothing?

  Impossible, he said.

  The thought must be of something?

  Yes.

  Of something which is or which is not?

  Of something which is.

  Must it not be of a single something, which the thought recognizes
as attaching to all, being a single form or nature?

  Yes.

  And will not the something which is apprehended as one and the
same in all, be an idea?

  From that, again, there is no escape.

  Then, said Parmenides, if you say that everything else
participates in the ideas, must you not say either that everything
is made up of thoughts, and that all things think; or that they are
thoughts but have no thought?

  The latter view, Parmenides, is no more rational than the previous
one. In my opinion, the ideas are, as it were, patterns fixed in
nature, and other things are like them, and resemblances of
them-what is meant by the participation of other things in the
ideas, is really assimilation to them.

  But if, said he, the individual is like the idea, must not the
idea also be like the individual, in so far as the individual is a
resemblance of the idea? That which is like, cannot be conceived of as
other than the like of like.

  Impossible.

  And when two things are alike, must they not partake of the same
idea?

  They must.

  And will not that of which the two partake, and which makes them
alike, be the idea itself?

  Certainly.

  Then the idea cannot be like the individual, or the individual
like the idea; for if they are alike, some further idea of likeness
will always be coming to light, and if that be like anything else,
another; and new ideas will be always arising, if the idea resembles
that which partakes of it?

  Quite true.

  The theory, then that other things participate in the ideas by
resemblance, has to be given up, and some other mode of
participation devised?

  It would seem so.

  Do you see then, Socrates, how great is the difficulty of
affirming the ideas to be absolute?

  Yes, indeed.

  And, further, let me say that as yet you only understand a small
part of the difficulty which is involved if you make of each thing a
single idea, parting it off from other things.

  What difficulty? he said.

  There are many, but the greatest of all is this:-If an opponent
argues that these ideas, being such as we say they ought to be, must
remain unknown, no one can prove to him that he is wrong, unless he
who denies their existence be a man of great ability and knowledge,
and is willing to follow a long and laborious demonstration; he will
remain unconvinced, and still insist that they cannot be known.

  What do you mean, Parmenides? said Socrates.

  In the first place, I think, Socrates, that you, or any one who
maintains the existence of absolute essences, will admit that they
cannot exist in us.

  No, said Socrates; for then they would be no longer absolute.

  True, he said; and therefore when ideas are what they are in
relation to one another, their essence is determined by a relation
among themselves, and has nothing to do with the resemblances, or
whatever they are to be termed, which are in our sphere, and from
which we receive this or that name when we partake of them. And the
things which are within our sphere and have the same names with
them, are likewise only relative to one another, and not to the
ideas which have the same names with them, but belong to themselves
and not to them.

  What do you mean? said Socrates.

  I may illustrate my meaning in this way, said Parmenides:-A master
has a slave; now there is nothing absolute in the relation between
them, which is simply a relation of one man to another. But there is
also an idea of mastership in the abstract, which is relative to the
idea of slavery in the abstract. These natures have nothing to do with
us, nor we with them; they are concerned with themselves only, and
we with ourselves. Do you see my meaning?

  Yes, said Socrates, I quite see your meaning.

  And will not knowledge-I mean absolute knowledge-answer to
absolute truth?

  Certainly.

  And each kind of absolute knowledge will answer to each kind of
absolute being?

  Yes.

  But the knowledge which we have, will answer to the truth which we
have; and again, each kind of knowledge which we have, will be a
knowledge of each kind of being which we have?

  Certainly.

  But the ideas themselves, as you admit, we have not, and cannot
have?

  No, we cannot.

  And the absolute natures or kinds are known severally by the
absolute idea of knowledge?

  Yes.

  And we have not got the idea of knowledge?

  No.

  Then none of the ideas are known to us, because we have no share
in absolute knowledge?

  I suppose not.

  Then the nature of the beautiful in itself, and of the good in
itself, and all other ideas which we suppose to exist absolutely,
are unknown to us?

  It would seem so.

  I think that there is a stranger consequence still.

  What is it?

  Would you, or would you not say, that absolute knowledge, if there
is such a thing, must be a far more exact knowledge than our
knowledge; and the same of beauty and of the rest?

  Yes.

  And if there be such a thing as participation in absolute knowledge,
no one is more likely than God to have this most exact knowledge?

  Certainly.

  But then, will God, having absolute knowledge, have a knowledge of
human things?

  Why not?

  Because, Socrates, said Parmenides, we have admitted that the
ideas are not valid in relation to human things; nor human things in
relation to them; the relations of either are limited to their
respective spheres.

  Yes, that has been admitted.

  And if God has this perfect authority, and perfect knowledge, his
authority cannot rule us, nor his knowledge know us, or any human
thing; just as our authority does not extend to the gods, nor our
knowledge know anything which is divine, so by parity of reason
they, being gods, are not our masters, neither do they know the things
of men.

  Yet, surely, said Socrates, to deprive God of knowledge is
monstrous.

  These, Socrates, said Parmenides, are a few, and only a few of the
difficulties in which we are involved if ideas really are and we
determine each one of them to be an absolute unity. He who hears
what may be said against them will deny the very existence of them-and
even if they do exist, he will say that they must of necessity be
unknown to man; and he will seem to have reason on his side, and as we
were remarking just now, will be very difficult to convince; a man
must be gifted with very considerable ability before he can learn that
everything has a class and an absolute essence; and still more
remarkable will he be who discovers all these things for himself,
and having thoroughly investigated them is able to teach them to
others.

  I agree with you, Parmenides, said Socrates; and what you say is
very much to my mind.

  And yet, Socrates, said Parmenides, if a man, fixing his attention
on these and the like difficulties, does away with ideas of things and
will not admit that every individual thing has its own determinate
idea which is always one and the same, he will have nothing on which
his mind can rest; and so he will utterly destroy the power of
reasoning, as you seem to me to have particularly noted.

  Very true, he said.

  But, then, what is to become of philosophy? Whither shall we turn,
if the ideas are unknown?

  I certainly do not see my way at present.

  Yes, said Parmenides; and I think that this arises, Socrates, out of
your attempting to define the beautiful, the just, the good, and the
ideas generally, without sufficient previous training. I noticed
your deficiency, when I heard you talking here with your friend
Aristoteles, the day before yesterday. The impulse that carries you
towards philosophy is assuredly noble and divine; but there is an
art which is called by the vulgar idle talking, and which is of
imagined to be useless; in that you must train and exercise
yourself, now that you are young, or truth will elude your grasp.

  And what is the nature of this exercise, Parmenides, which you would
recommend?

  That which you heard Zeno practising; at the same time, I give you
credit for saying to him that you did not care to examine the
perplexity in reference to visible things, or to consider the question
that way; but only in reference to objects of thought, and to what may
be called ideas.

  Why, yes, he said, there appears to me to be no difficulty in
showing by this method that visible things are like and unlike and may
experience anything.

  Quite true, said Parmenides; but I think that you should go a step
further, and consider not only the consequences which flow from a
given hypothesis, but also the consequences which flow from denying
the hypothesis; and that will be still better training for you.

  What do you mean? he said.

  I mean, for example, that in the case of this very hypothesis of
Zeno's about the many, you should inquire not only what will be the
consequences to the many in relation to themselves and to the one, and
to the one in relation to itself and the many, on the hypothesis of
the being of the many, but also what will be the consequences to the
one and the many in their relation to themselves and to each other, on
the opposite hypothesis. Or, again, if likeness is or is not, what
will be the consequences in either of these cases to the subjects of
the hypothesis, and to other things, in relation both to themselves
and to one another, and so of unlikeness; and the same holds good of
motion and rest, of generation and destruction, and even of being
and not-being. In a word, when you suppose anything to be or not to
be, or to be in any way affected, you must look at the consequences in
relation to the thing itself, and to any other things which you
choose-to each of them singly, to more than one, and to all; and so of
other things, you must look at them in relation to themselves and to
anything else which you suppose either to be or not to be, if you
would train yourself perfectly and see the real truth.

  That, Parmenides, is a tremendous business of which you speak, and I
do not quite understand you; will you take some hypothesis and go
through the steps?-then I shall apprehend you better.

  That, Socrates, is a serious task to impose on a man of my years.

  Then will you, Zeno? said Socrates.

  Zeno answered with a smile:-Let us make our petition to Parmenides
himself, who is quite right in saying that you are hardly aware of the
extent of the task which you are imposing on him; and if there were
more of us I should not ask him, for these are not subjects which
any one, especially at his age, can well speak of before a large
audience; most people are not aware that this round-about progress
through all things is the only way in which the mind can attain
truth and wisdom. And therefore, Parmenides, I join in the request
of Socrates, that I may hear the process again which I have not
heard for a long time.

  When Zeno had thus spoken, Pythodorus, according to Antiphon's
report of him, said, that he himself and Aristoteles and the whole
company entreated Parmenides to give an example of the process. I
cannot refuse, said Parmenides; and yet I feel rather like Ibycus,
who, when in his old age, against his will, he fell in love,
compared himself to an old racehorse, who was about to run in a
chariot race, shaking with fear at the course he knew so well-this was
his simile of himself. And I also experience a trembling when I
remember through what an ocean of words I have to wade at my time of
life. But I must indulge you, as Zeno says that I ought, and we are
alone. Where shall I begin? And what shall be our first hypothesis, if
I am to attempt this laborious pastime? Shall I begin with myself, and
take my own hypothesis the one? and consider the consequences which
follow on the supposition either of the being or of the not being of
one?

  By all means, said Zeno.

  And who will answer me? he said. Shall I propose the youngest? He
will not make difficulties and will be the most likely to say what
he thinks; and his answers will give me time to breathe.

  I am the one whom you mean, Parmenides, said Aristoteles; for I am
the youngest and at your service. Ask, and I will answer.

  Parmenides proceeded: If one is, he said, the one cannot be many?

  Impossible.

  Then the one cannot have parts, and cannot be a whole?

  Why not?

  Because every part is part of a whole; is it not?

  Yes.

  And what is a whole? would not that of which no part is wanting be a
whole?

  Certainly.

  Then, in either case, the one would be made up of parts; both as
being a whole, and also as having parts?

  To be sure.

  And in either case, the one would be many, and not one?

  True.

  But, surely, it ought to be one and not many?

  It ought.

  Then, if the one is to remain one, it will not be a whole, and
will not have parts?

  No.

  But if it has no parts, it will have neither beginning, middle,
nor end; for these would of course be parts of it.

  Right.

  But then, again, a beginning and an end are the limits of
everything?

  Certainly.

  Then the one, having neither beginning nor end, is unlimited?

  Yes, unlimited.

  And therefore formless; for it cannot partake either of round or
straight.

  But why?

  Why, because the round is that of which all the extreme points are
equidistant from the centre?

  Yes.

  And the straight is that of which the centre intercepts the view
of the extremes?

  True.

  Then the one would have parts and would be many, if it partook
either of a straight or of a circular form?

  Assuredly.

  But having no parts, it will be neither straight nor round?

  Right.

  And, being of such a nature, it cannot be in any place, for it
cannot be either in another or in itself.

  How so?

  Because if it were in another, it would be encircled by that in
which it was, and would touch it at many places and with many parts;
but that which is one and indivisible, and does not partake of a
circular nature, cannot be touched all round in many places.

  Certainly not.

  But if, on the other hand, one were in itself, it would also be
contained by nothing else but itself; that is to say, if it were
really in itself; for nothing can be in anything which does not
contain it.

  Impossible.

  But then, that which contains must be other than that which is
contained? for the same whole cannot do and suffer both at once; and
if so, one will be no longer one, but two?

  True.

  Then one cannot be anywhere, either in itself or in another?

  No.

  Further consider, whether that which is of such a nature can have
either rest or motion.

  Why not?

  Why, because the one, if it were moved, would be either moved in
place or changed in nature; for these are the only kinds of motion.

  Yes.

  And the one, when it changes and ceases to be itself, cannot be
any longer one.

  It cannot.

  It cannot therefore experience the sort of motion which is change of
nature?

  Clearly not.

  Then can the motion of the one be in place?

  Perhaps.

  But if the one moved in place, must it not either move round and
round in the same place, or from one place to another?

  It must.

  And that which moves in a circle must rest upon a centre; and that
which goes round upon a centre must have parts which are different
from the centre; but that which has no centre and no parts cannot
possibly be carried round upon a centre?

  Impossible.

  But perhaps the motion of the one consists in change of place?

  Perhaps so, if it moves at all.

  And have we not already shown that it cannot be in anything?

  Yes.

  Then its coming into being in anything is still more impossible;
is it not?

  I do not see why.

  Why, because anything which comes into being in anything, can
neither as yet be in that other thing while still coming into being,
nor be altogether out of it, if already coming into being in it.

  Certainly not.

  And therefore whatever comes into being in another must have
parts, and then one part may be in, and another part out of that
other; but that which has no parts can never be at one and the same
time neither wholly within nor wholly without anything.

  True.

  And is there not a still greater impossibility in that which has
no parts, and is not a whole, coming into being anywhere, since it
cannot come into being either as a part or as a whole?

  Clearly.

  Then it does not change place by revolving in the same spot, not
by going somewhere and coming into being in something; nor again, by
change in itself?

  Very true.

  Then in respect of any kind of motion the one is immoveable?

  Immoveable.

  But neither can the one be in anything, as we affirm.

  Yes, we said so.

  Then it is never in the same?

  Why not?

  Because if it were in the same it would be in something.

  Certainly.

  And we said that it could not be in itself, and could not be in
other?

  True.

  Then one is never in the same place?

  It would seem not.

  But that which is never in the same place is never quiet or at rest?

  Never.

  One then, as would seem, is neither rest nor in motion?

  It certainly appears so.

  Neither will it be the same with itself or other; nor again, other
than itself or other.

  How is that?

  If other than itself it would be other than one, and would not be
one.

  True.

  And if the same with other, it would be that other, and not
itself; so that upon this supposition too, it would not have the
nature of one, but would be other than one?

  It would.

  Then it will not be the same with other, or other than itself?

  It will not.

  Neither will it be other than other, while it remains one; for not
one, but only other, can be other than other, and nothing else.

  True.

  Then not by virtue of being one will it be other?

  Certainly not.

  But if not by virtue of being one, not by virtue of itself; and if
not by virtue of itself, not itself, and itself not being other at
all, will not be other than anything?

  Right.

  Neither will one be the same with itself.

  How not?

  Surely the nature of the one is not the nature of the same.

  Why not?

  It is not when anything becomes the same with anything that it
becomes one.

  What of that?

  Anything which becomes the same with the many, necessarily becomes
many and not one.

  True.

  But, if there were no difference between the one and the same,
when a thing became the same, it would always become one; and when
it became one, the same?

  Certainly.

  And, therefore, if one be the same with itself, it is not one with
itself, and will therefore be one and also not one.

  Surely that is impossible.

  And therefore the one can neither be other than other, nor the
same with itself.

  Impossible.

  And thus the one can neither be the same, nor other, either in
relation to itself or other?

  No.

  Neither will the one be like anything or unlike itself or other.

  Why not?

  Because likeness is sameness of affections.

  Yes.

  And sameness has been shown to be of a nature distinct from oneness?

  That has been shown.

  But if the one had any other affection than that of being one, it
would be affected in such a way as to be more than one; which is
impossible.

  True.

  Then the one can never be so affected as to be the same either
with another or with itself?

  Clearly not.

  Then it cannot be like another, or like itself?

  No.

  Nor can it be affected so as to be other, for then it would be
affected in such a way as to be more than one.

  It would.

  That which is affected otherwise than itself or another, will be
unlike itself or another, for sameness of affections is likeness.

  True.

  But the one, as appears, never being affected otherwise, is never
unlike itself or other?

  Never.

  Then the one will never be either like or unlike itself or other?

  Plainly not.

  Again, being of this nature, it can neither be equal nor unequal
either to itself or to other.

  How is that?

  Why, because the one if equal must be of the same measures as that
to which it is equal.

  True.

  And if greater or less than things which are commensurable with
it, the one will have more measures than that which is less, and fewer
than that which is greater?

  Yes.

  And so of things which are not commensurate with it, the one will
have greater measures than that which is less and smaller than that
which is greater.

  Certainly.

  But how can that which does not partake of sameness, have either the
same measures or have anything else the same?

  Impossible.

  And not having the same measures, the one cannot be equal either
with itself or with another?

  It appears so.

  But again, whether it have fewer or more measures, it will have as
many parts as it has measures; and thus again the one will be no
longer one but will have as many parts as measures.

  Right.

  And if it were of one measure, it would be equal to that measure;
yet it has been shown to be incapable of equality.

  It has.

  Then it will neither partake of one measure, nor of many, nor of
few, nor of the same at all, nor be equal to itself or another; nor be
greater or less than itself, or other?

  Certainly.

  Well, and do we suppose that one can be older, or younger than
anything, or of the same age with it?

  Why not?

  Why, because that which is of the same age with itself or other,
must partake of equality or likeness of time; and we said that the one
did not partake either of equality or of likeness?

  We did say so.

  And we also said, that it did not partake of inequality or
unlikeness.

  Very true.

  How then can one, being of this nature, be either older or younger
than anything, or have the same age with it?

  In no way.

  Then one cannot be older or younger, or of the same age, either with
itself or with another?

  Clearly not.

  Then the one, being of this nature, cannot be in time at all; for
must not that which is in time, be always growing older than itself?

  Certainly.

  And that which is older, must always be older than something which
is younger?

  True.

  Then, that which becomes older than itself, also becomes at the same
time younger than itself, if it is to have something to become older
than.

  What do you mean?

  I mean this:-A thing does not need to become different from
another thing which is already different; it is different, and if
its different has become, it has become different; if its different
will be, it will be different; but of that which is becoming
different, there cannot have been, or be about to be, or yet be, a
different-the only different possible is one which is becoming.

  That is inevitable.

  But, surely, the elder is a difference relative to the younger,
and to nothing else.

  True.

  Then that which becomes older than itself must also, at the same
time, become younger than itself?

  Yes.

  But again, it is true that it cannot become for a longer or for a
shorter time than itself, but it must become, and be, and have become,
and be about to be, for the same time with itself?

  That again is inevitable.

  Then things which are in time, and partake of time, must in every
case, I suppose, be of the same age with themselves; and must also
become at once older and younger than themselves?

  Yes.

  But the one did not partake of those affections?

  Not at all.

  Then it does not partake of time, and is not in any time?

  So the argument shows.

  Well, but do not the expressions "was," and "has become," and "was
becoming," signify a participation of past time?

  Certainly.

  And do not "will be," "will become," "will have become," signify a
participation of future time?

  Yes.

  And "is," or "becomes," signifies a participation of present time?

  Certainly.

  And if the one is absolutely without participation in time, it never
had become, or was becoming, or was at any time, or is now become or
is becoming, or is, or will become, or will have become, or will be,
hereafter.

  Most true.

  But are there any modes of partaking of being other than these?

  There are none.

  Then the one cannot possibly partake of being?

  That is the inference.

  Then the one is not at all?

  Clearly not.

  Then the one does not exist in such way as to be one; for if it were
and partook of being, it would already be; but if the argument is to
be trusted, the one neither is nor is one?

  True.

  But that which is not admits of no attribute or relation?

  Of course not.

  Then there is no name, nor expression, nor perception, nor
opinion, nor knowledge of it?

  Clearly not.

  Then it is neither named, nor expressed, nor opined, nor known,
nor does anything that is perceive it.

  So we must infer.

  But can all this be true about the one?

  I think not.

  Suppose, now, that we return once more to the original hypothesis;
let us see whether, on a further review, any new aspect of the
question appears.

  I shall be very happy to do so.

  We say that we have to work out together all the consequences,
whatever they may be, which follow, if the one is?

  Yes.

  Then we will begin at the beginning:-If one is, can one be, and
not partake of being?

  Impossible.

  Then the one will have being, but its being will not be the same
with the one; for if the same, it would not be the being of the one;
nor would the one have participated in being, for the proposition that
one is would have been identical with the proposition that one is one;
but our hypothesis is not if one is one, what will follow, but if
one is:-am I not right?

  Quite right.

  We mean to say, that being has not the same significance as one?

  Of course.

  And when we put them together shortly, and say "One is," that is
equivalent to saying, "partakes of being"?

  Quite true.

  Once more then let us ask, if one is what will follow. Does not this
hypothesis necessarily imply that one is of such a nature as to have
parts?

  How so?

  In this way:-If being is predicated of the one, if the one is, and
one of being, if being is one; and if being and one are not the
same; and since the one, which we have assumed, is, must not the
whole, if it is one, itself be, and have for its parts, one and being?

  Certainly.

  And is each of these parts-one and being to be simply called a part,
or must the word "part" be relative to the word "whole"?

  The latter.

  Then that which is one is both a whole and has a part?

  Certainly.

  Again, of the parts of the one, if it is-I mean being and one-does
either fail to imply the other? is the one wanting to being, or
being to the one?

  Impossible.

  Thus, each of the parts also has in turn both one and being, and
is at the least made up of two parts; and the same principle goes on
for ever, and every part whatever has always these two parts; for
being always involves one, and one being; so that one is always
disappearing, and becoming two.

  Certainly.

  And so the one, if it is, must be infinite in multiplicity?

  Clearly.

  Let us take another direction.

  What direction?

  We say that the one partakes of being and therefore it is?

  Yes.

  And in this way, the one, if it has being, has turned out to be
many?

  True.

  But now, let us abstract the one which, as we say, partakes of
being, and try to imagine it apart from that of which, as we say, it
partakes-will this abstract one be one only or many?

  One, I think.

  Let us see:-Must not the being of one be other than one? for the one
is not being, but, considered as one, only partook of being?

  Certainly.

  If being and the one be two different things, it is not because
the one is one that it is other than being; nor because being is being
that it is other than the one; but they differ from one another in
virtue of otherness and difference.

  Certainly.

  So that the other is not the same either with the one or with being?

  Certainly not.

  And therefore whether we take being and the other, or being and
the one, or the one and the other, in every such case we take two
things, which may be rightly called both.

  How so.

  In this way-you may speak of being?

  Yes.

  And also of one?

  Yes.

  Then now we have spoken of either of them?

  Yes.

  Well, and when I speak of being and one, I speak of them both?

  Certainly.

  And if I speak of being and the other, or of the one and the
other-in any such case do I not speak of both?

  Yes.

  And must not that which is correctly called both, be also two?

  Undoubtedly.

  And of two things how can either by any possibility not be one?

  It cannot.

  Then, if the individuals of the pair are together two, they must
be severally one?

  Clearly.

  And if each of them is one, then by the addition of any one to any
pair, the whole becomes three?

  Yes.

  And three are odd, and two are even?

  Of course.

  And if there are two there must also be twice, and if there are
three there must be thrice; that is, if twice one makes two, and
thrice one three?

  Certainly.

  There are two, and twice, and therefore there must be twice two; and
there are three, and there is thrice, and therefore there must be
thrice three?

  Of course.

  If there are three and twice, there is twice three; and if there are
two and thrice, there is thrice two?

  Undoubtedly.

  Here, then, we have even taken even times, and odd taken odd
times, and even taken odd times, and odd taken even times.

  True.

  And if this is so, does any number remain which has no necessity
to be?

  None whatever.

  Then if one is, number must also be?

  It must.

  But if there is number, there must also be many, and infinite
multiplicity of being; for number is infinite in multiplicity, and
partakes also of being: am I not right?

  Certainly.

  And if all number participates in being, every part of number will
also participate?

  Yes.

  Then being is distributed over the whole multitude of things, and
nothing that is, however small or however great, is devoid of it? And,
indeed, the very supposition of this is absurd, for how can that which
is, be devoid of being?

  In no way.

  And it is divided into the greatest and into the smallest, and
into being of all sizes, and is broken up more than all things; the
divisions of it have no limit.

  True.

  Then it has the greatest number of parts?

  Yes, the greatest number.

  Is there any of these which is a part of being, and yet no part?

  Impossible.

  But if it is at all and so long as it is, it must be one, and cannot
be none?

  Certainly.

  Then the one attaches to every single part of being, and does not
fail in any part, whether great or small, or whatever may be the
size of it?

  True.

  But reflect:-an one in its entirety, be in many places at the same
time?

  No; I see the impossibility of that.

  And if not in its entirety, then it is divided; for it cannot be
present with all the parts of being, unless divided.

  True.

  And that which has parts will be as many as the parts are?

  Certainly.

  Then we were wrong in saying just now, that being was distributed
into the greatest number of parts. For it is not distributed into
parts more than the one, into parts equal to the one; the one is never
wanting to being, or being to the one, but being two they are co-equal
and coextensive.

  Certainly that is true.

  The one itself, then, having been broken up into parts by being,
is many and infinite?

  True.

  Then not only the one which has being is many, but the one itself
distributed by being, must also be many?

  Certainly.

  Further, inasmuch as the parts are parts of a whole, the one, as a
whole, will be limited; for are not the parts contained the whole?

  Certainly.

  And that which contains, is a limit?

  Of course.

  Then the one if it has being is one and many, whole and parts,
having limits and yet unlimited in number?

  Clearly.

  And because having limits, also having extremes?

  Certainly.

  And if a whole, having beginning and middle and end. For can
anything be a whole without these three? And if any one of them is
wanting to anything, will that any longer be a whole?

  No.

  Then the one, as appears, will have beginning, middle, and end.

  It will.

  But, again, the middle will be equidistant from the extremes; or
it would not be in the middle?

  Yes.

  Then the one will partake of figure, either rectilinear or round, or
a union of the two?

  True.

  And if this is the case, it will be both in itself and in another
too.

  How?

  Every part is in the whole, and none is outside the whole.

  True.

  And all the parts are contained by the whole?

  Yes.

  And the one is all its parts, and neither more nor less than all?

  No.

  And the one is the whole?

  Of course.

  But if all the parts are in the whole, and the one is all of them
and the whole, and they are all contained by the whole, the one will
be contained by the one; and thus the one will be in itself.

  That is true.

  But then, again, the whole is not in the parts-neither in all the
parts, nor in some one of them. For if it is in all, it must be in
one; for if there were any one in which it was not, it could not be in
all the parts; for the part in which it is wanting is one of all,
and if the whole is not in this, how can it be in them all?

  It cannot.

  Nor can the whole be in some of the parts; for if the whole were
in some of the parts, the greater would be in the less, which is
impossible.

  Yes, impossible.

  But if the whole is neither in one, nor in more than one, nor in all
of the parts, it must be in something else, or cease to be anywhere at
all?

  Certainly.

  If it were nowhere, it would be nothing; but being a whole, and
not being in itself, it must be in another.

  Very true.

  The one then, regarded as a whole, is in another, but regarded as
being all its parts, is in itself; and therefore the one must be
itself in itself and also in another.

  Certainly.

  The one then, being of this nature, is of necessity both at rest and
in motion?

  How?

  The one is at rest since it is in itself, for being in one, and
not passing out of this, it is in the same, which is itself.

  True.

  And that which is ever in the same, must be ever at rest?

  Certainly.

  Well, and must not that, on the contrary, which is ever in other,
never be in the same; and if never in the same, never at rest, and
if not at rest, in motion?

  True.

  Then the one being always itself in itself and other, must always be
both at rest and in motion?

  Clearly.

  And must be the same with itself, and other than itself; and also
the same with the others, and other than the others; this follows from
its previous affections.

  How so?

  Every thing in relation to every other thing, is either the same
or other; or if neither the same nor other, then in the relation of
a part to a whole, or of a whole to a part.

  Clearly.

  And is the one a part of itself?

  Certainly not.

  Since it is not a part in relation to itself it cannot be related to
itself as whole to part?

  It cannot.

  But is the one other than one?

  No.

  And therefore not other than itself?

  Certainly not.

  If then it be neither other, nor a whole, nor a part in relation
to itself, must it not be the same with itself?

  Certainly.

  But then, again, a thing which is in another place from "itself," if
this "itself" remains in the same place with itself, must be other
than "itself," for it will be in another place?

  True.

  Then the one has been shown to be at once in itself and in another?

  Yes.

  Thus, then, as appears, the one will be other than itself?

  True.

  Well, then, if anything be other than anything, will it not be other
than that which is other?

  Certainly.

  And will not all things that are not one, be other than the one, and
the one other than the not-one?

  Of course.

  Then the one will be other than the others?

  True.

  But, consider:-Are not the absolute same, and the absolute other,
opposites to one another?

  Of course.

  Then will the same ever be in the other, or the other in the same?

  They will not.

  If then the other is never in the same, there is nothing in which
the other is during any space of time; for during that space of
time, however small, the other would be in the game. Is not that true?

  Yes.

 And since the other-is never in the same, it can never be in anything
that is.

  True.

  Then the other will never be either in the not one, or in the one?

  Certainly not.

  Then not by reason of otherness is the one other than the not-one,
or the not-one other than the one.

  No.

  Nor by reason of themselves will they be other than one another,
if not partaking of the other.

  How can they be?

  But if they are not other, either by reason of themselves or of
the other, will they not altogether escape being other than one
another?

  They will.

  Again, the not-one cannot partake of the one; otherwise it would not
have been not-one, but would have been in some way one.

  True.

  Nor can the not-one be number; for having number, it would not
have been not-one at all.

  It would not.

  Again, is the not-one part of the one; or rather, would it not in
that case partake of the one?

  It would.

  If then, in every point of view, the one and the not-one are
distinct, then neither is the one part or whole of the not-one, nor is
the not-one part or whole of the one?

  No.

  But we said that things which are neither parts nor wholes of one
another, nor other than one another, will be the same with one
another: -so we said?

  Yes.

  Then shall we say that the one, being in this relation to the
not-one, is the same with it?

  Let us say so.

  Then it is the same with itself and the others, and also other
than itself and the others.

  That appears to be the inference. And it will also be like and
unlike itself and the others?

  Perhaps.

  Since the one was shown to be other than the others, the others will
also be other than the one.

  Yes.

  And the one is other than the others in the same degree that the
others are other than it, and neither more nor less?

  True.

  And if neither more nor less, then in a like degree?

  Yes.

  In virtue of the affection by which the one is other than others and
others in like manner other than it, the one will be affected like the
others and the others like the one.

  How do you mean?

  I may take as an illustration the case of names: You give a name
to a thing?

  Yes.

  And you may say the name once or oftener?

  Yes.

  And when you say it once, you mention that of which it is the
name? and when more than once, is it something else which you mention?
or must it always be the same thing of which you speak, whether you
utter the name once or more than once?

  Of course it is the same.

  And is not "other" a name given to a thing?

  Certainly.

  Whenever, then, you use the word "other," whether once or oftener,
you name that of which it is the name, and to no other do you give the
name?

  True.

  Then when we say that the others are other than the one, and the one
other than the others, in repeating the word "other" we speak of
that nature to which the name is applied, and of no other?

  Quite true.

  Then the one which is other than others, and the other which is
other than the one, in that the word "other" is applied to both,
will be in the same condition; and that which is in the same condition
is like?

  Yes.

  Then in virtue of the affection by which the one is other than the
others, every thing will be like every thing, for every thing is other
than every thing.

  True.

  Again, the like is opposed to the unlike?

  Yes.

  And the other to the same?

  True again.

  And the one was also shown to be the same with the others?

  Yes.

  And to be, the same with the others is the opposite of being other
than the others?

  Certainly.

  And in that it was other it was shown to be like?

  Yes.

  But in that it was the same it will be unlike by virtue of the
opposite affection to that which made it and this was the affection of
otherness.

  Yes.

  The same then will make it unlike; otherwise it will not be the
opposite of the other.

  True.

  Then the one will be both like and unlike the others; like in so far
as it is other, and unlike in so far as it is the same.

  Yes, that argument may be used.

  And there is another argument.

  What?

  In so far as it is affected in the same way it is not affected
otherwise, and not being affected otherwise is not unlike, and not
being unlike, is like; but in so far as it is affected by other it
is otherwise, and being otherwise affected is unlike.

  True.

  Then because the one is the same with the others and other than
the others, on either of these two grounds, or on both of them, it
will be both like and unlike the others?

  Certainly.

  And in the same way as being other than itself, and the same with
itself on either of these two grounds and on both of them, it will
be like and unlike itself.

  Of course.

  Again, how far can the one touch or not touch itself and
others?-Consider.

  I am considering.

  The one was shown to be in itself which was a whole?

  True.

  And also in other things?

  Yes.

  In so far as it is in other things it would touch other things,
but in so far as it is in itself it would be debarred from touching
them, and would touch itself only.

  Clearly.

  Then the inference is that it would touch both?

  It would.

  But what do you say to a new point of view? Must not that which is
to touch another be next to that which it is to touch, and occupy
the place nearest to that in which what it touches is situated?

  True.

  Then the one, if it is to touch itself, ought to be situated next to
itself, and occupy the place next to that in which itself is?

  It ought.

  And that would require that the one should be two, and be in two
places at once, and this, while it is one, will never happen.

  No.

  Then the one cannot touch itself any more than it can be two?

  It cannot.

  Neither can it touch others.

  Why not?

  The reason is, that whatever is to touch another must be in
separation from, and next to, that which it is to touch, and no
third thing can be between them.

  True.

  Two things, then, at the least ate necessary to make contact
possible?

  They are.

  And if to the two a third be added in due order, the number of terms
will be three, and the contacts two?

  Yes.

  And every additional term makes one additional contact, whence it
follows that the contacts are one less in number than the terms; the
first two terms exceeded the number of contacts by one, and the
whole number of terms exceeds the whole number of contacts by one in
like manner; and for every one which is afterwards added to the number
of terms, one contact is added to the contacts.

  True.

  Whatever is the whole number of things, the contacts will be
always one less.

  True.

  But if there be only one, and not two, there will be no contact?

  How can there be?

  And do we not say that the others being other than the one are not
one and have no part in the one?

  True.

  Then they have no number, if they have no one in them?

  Of course not.

  Then the others are neither one nor two, nor are they called by
the name of any number?

  No.

  One, then, alone is one, and two do not exist?

  Clearly not.

  And if there are not two, there is no contact?

  There is not.

  Then neither does the one touch the others, nor the others the
one, if there is no contact?

  Certainly not.

  For all which reasons the one touches and does not touch itself
and the others?

  True.

  Further-is the one equal and unequal to itself and others?

  How do you mean?

  If the one were greater or less than the others, or the others
greater or less than the one, they would not be greater or less than
each other in virtue of their being the one and the others; but, if in
addition to their being what they are they had equality, they would be
equal to one another, or if the one had smallness and the others
greatness, or the one had greatness and the others smallness-whichever
kind had greatness would be greater, and whichever had smallness would
be smaller?

  Certainly.

  Then there are two such ideas as greatness and smallness; for if
they were not they could not be opposed to each other and be present
in that which is.

  How could they?

  If, then, smallness is present in the one it will be present
either in the whole or in a part of the whole?

  Certainly.

  Suppose the first; it will be either co-equal and co-extensive
with the whole one, or will contain the one?

  Clearly.

  If it be co-extensive with the one it will be coequal with the
one, or if containing the one it will be greater than the one?

  Of course.

  But can smallness be equal to anything or greater than anything, and
have the functions of greatness and equality and not its own
functions?

  Impossible.

  Then smallness cannot be in the whole of one, but, if at all, in a
part only?

  Yes.

  And surely not in all of a part, for then the difficulty of the
whole will recur; it will be equal to or greater than any part in
which it is.

  Certainly.

  Then smallness will not be in anything, whether in a whole or in a
part; nor will there be anything small but actual smallness.

  True.

  Neither will greatness be in the one, for if greatness be in
anything there will be something greater other and besides greatness
itself, namely, that in which greatness is; and this too when the
small itself is not there, which the one, if it is great, must exceed;
this, however, is impossible, seeing that smallness is wholly absent.

  True.

  But absolute greatness is only greater than absolute smallness,
and smallness is only smaller than absolute greatness.

  Very true.

  Then other things not greater or less than the one, if they have
neither greatness nor smallness; nor have greatness or smallness any
power of exceeding or being exceeded in relation to the one, but
only in relation to one another; nor will the one be greater or less
than them or others, if it has neither greatness nor smallness.

  Clearly not.

  Then if the one is neither greater nor less than the others, it
cannot either exceed or be exceeded by them?

  Certainly not.

  And that which neither exceeds nor is exceeded, must be on an
equality; and being on an equality, must be equal.

  Of course.

  And this will be true also of the relation of the one to itself;
having neither greatness nor smallness in itself, it will neither
exceed nor be exceeded by itself, but will be on an equality with
and equal to itself.

  Certainly.

  Then the one will be equal to both itself and the others?

  Clearly so.

  And yet the one, being itself in itself, will also surround and be
without itself; and, as containing itself, will be greater than
itself; and, as contained in itself, will be less; and will thus be
greater and less than itself.

  It will.

  Now there cannot possibly be anything which is not included in the
one and the others?

  Of course not.

  But, surely, that which is must always be somewhere?

  Yes.

  But that which is in anything will be less, and that in which it
is will be greater; in no other way can one thing be in another.

  True.

  And since there is nothing other or besides the one and the
others, and they must be in something, must they not be in one
another, the one in the others and the others in the one, if they
are to be anywhere?

  That is clear.

  But inasmuch as the one is in the others, the others will be greater
than the one, because they contain the one, which will be less than
the others, because it is contained in them; and inasmuch as the
others are in the one, the one on the same principle will be greater
than the others, and the others less than the one.

  True.

  The one, then, will be equal to and greater and less than itself and
the others?

  Clearly.

  And if it be greater and less and equal, it will be of equal and
more and less measures or divisions than itself and the others, and if
of measures, also of parts?

  Of course.

  And if of equal and more and less measures or divisions, it will
be in number more or less than itself and the others, and likewise
equal in number to itself and to the others?

  How is that?

  It will be of more measures than those things which it exceeds,
and of as many parts as measures; and so with that to which it is
equal, and that than which it is less.

  True.

  And being greater and less than itself, and equal to itself, it will
be of equal measures with itself and of more and fewer measures than
itself; and if of measures then also of parts?

  It will.

  And being of equal parts with itself, it will be numerically equal
to itself; and being of more parts, more, and being of less, less than
itself?

  Certainly.

  And the same will hold of its relation to other things; inasmuch
as it is greater than them, it will be more in number than them; and
inasmuch as it is smaller, it will be less in number; and inasmuch
as it is equal in size to other things, it will be equal to them in
number.

  Certainly.

  Once more then, as would appear, the one will be in number both
equal to and more and less than both itself and all other things.

  It will.

  Does the one also partake of time? And is it and does it become
older and younger than itself and others, and again, neither younger
nor older than itself and others, by virtue of participation in time?

  How do you mean?

  If one is, being must be predicated of it?

  Yes.

  But to be (einai) is only participation of being in present time,
and to have been is the participation of being at a past time, and
to be about to be is the participation of being at a future time?

  Very true.

  Then the one, since it partakes of being, partakes of time?

  Certainly.

  And is not time always moving forward?

  Yes.

  Then the one is always becoming older than itself, since it moves
forward in time?

  Certainly.

  And do you remember that the older becomes older than that which
becomes younger?

  I remember.

  Then since the one becomes older than itself, it becomes younger
at the same time?

  Certainly.

  Thus, then, the one becomes older as well as younger than itself?

  Yes.

  And it is older (is it not?) when in becoming, it gets to the
point of time. between "was" and "will be," which is "now": for surely
in going from the past to the future, it cannot skip the present?

  No.

  And when it arrives at the present it stops from becoming older, and
no longer becomes, but is older, for if it went on it would never be
reached by the present, for it is the nature of that which goes on, to
touch both the present and the future, letting go the present and
seizing the future, while in process of becoming between them.

  True.

  But that which is becoming cannot skip the present; when it
reaches the present it ceases to become, and is then whatever it may
happen to be becoming.

  Clearly.

  And so the one, when in becoming older it reaches the present,
ceases to become, and is then older.

  Certainly.

  And it is older than that than which it was becoming older, and it
was becoming older than itself.

  Yes.

  And that which is older is older than that which is younger?

  True.

  Then the one is younger than itself, when in becoming older it
reaches the present?

  Certainly.

  But the present is always present with the one during all its being;
for whenever it is it is always now.

  Certainly.

  Then the one always both is and becomes older and younger than
itself?

  Truly.

  And is it or does it become a longer time than itself or an equal
time with itself?

  An equal time.

  But if it becomes or is for an equal time with itself, it is of
the same age with itself?

  Of course.

  And that which is of the same age, is neither older nor younger?

  No.

  The one, then, becoming and being the same time with itself, neither
is nor becomes older or younger than itself?

  I should say not.

  And what are its relations to other things? Is it or does it
become older or younger than they?

  I cannot tell you.

  You can at least tell me that others than the one are more than
the one-other would have been one, but the others have multitude,
and are more than one?

  They will have multitude.

  And a multitude implies a number larger than one?

  Of course.

  And shall we say that the lesser or the greater is the first to come
or to have come into existence?

  The lesser.

  Then the least is the first? And that is the one?

  Yes.

  Then the one of all things that have number is the first to come
into being; but all other things have also number, being plural and
not singular.

  They have.

  And since it came into being first it must be supposed to have
come into being prior to the others, and the others later; and the
things which came into being later, are younger than that which
preceded them? And so the other things will be younger than the one,
and the one older than other things?

  True.

  What would you say of another question? Can the one have come into
being contrary to its own nature, or is that impossible?

  Impossible.

  And yet, surely, the one was shown to have parts; and if parts, then
a beginning, middle and end?

  Yes.

  And a beginning, both of the one itself and of all other things,
comes into being first of all; and after the beginning, the others
follow, until you reach the end?

  Certainly.

  And all these others we shall affirm to be parts of the whole and of
the one, which, as soon as the end is reached, has become whole and
one?

  Yes; that is what we shall say.

  But the end comes last, and the one is of such a nature as to come
into being with the last; and, since the one cannot come into being
except in accordance with its own nature, its nature will require that
it should come into being after the others, simultaneously with the
end.

  Clearly.

  Then the one is younger than the others and the others older than
the one.

  That also is clear in my judgment.

  Well, and must not a beginning or any other part of the one or of
anything, if it be a part and not parts, being a part, be also of
necessity one?

  Certainly.

  And will not the one come into being together with each
part-together with the first part when that comes into being, and
together with the second part and with all the rest, and will not be
wanting to any part, which is added to any other part until it has
reached the last and become one whole; it will be wanting neither to
the middle, nor to the first, nor to the last, nor to any of them,
while the process of becoming is going on?

  True.

  Then the one is of the same age with all the others, so that if
the one itself does not contradict its own nature, it will be
neither prior nor posterior to the others, but simultaneous; and
according to this argument the one will be neither older nor younger
than the others, nor the others than the one, but according to the
previous argument the one will be older and younger than the others
and the others than the one.

  Certainly.

  After this manner then the one is and has become. But as to its
becoming older and younger than the others, and the others than the
one, and neither older. nor younger, what shall we say? Shall we say
as of being so also of becoming, or otherwise?

  I cannot answer.

  But I can venture to say, that even if one thing were older or
younger than another, it could not become older or younger in a
greater degree than it was at first; for equals added to unequals,
whether to periods of time or to anything else, leave the difference
between them the same as at first.

  Of course. Then that which is, cannot become older or younger than
that which is, since the difference of age is always the same; the one
is and has become older and the other younger; but they are no
longer becoming so.

  True.

  And the one which is does not therefore become either older or
younger than the others which are

  No.

  But consider whether they may not become older and younger in
another way.

  In what way?

  Just as the one was proven to be older than the others and the
others than the one.

  And what of that?

  If the one is older than the others, has come into being a longer
time than the others.

  Yes.

  But consider again; if we add equal time to a greater and a less
time, will the greater differ from the less time by an equal or by a
smaller portion than before?

  By a smaller portion.

  Then the difference between the age of the one and the age of the
others will not be afterwards so great as at first, but if an equal
time be added to both of them they will differ less and less in age?

  Yes.

  And that which differs in age from some other less than formerly,
from being older will become younger in relation to that other than
which it was older?

  Yes, younger.

  And if the one becomes younger the others aforesaid will become
older than they were before, in relation to the one.

  Certainly.

  Then that which had become younger becomes older relatively to
that which previously had become and was older; it never really is
older, but is always becoming, for the one is always growing on the
side of youth and the other on the side of age. And in like manner the
older is always in process of becoming younger than the younger; for
as they are always going in opposite directions they become in ways
the opposite to one another, the younger older than the older and
the older younger than the younger. They cannot, however have
become; for if they had already become they would be and not merely
become. But that is impossible; for they are always becoming both
older and younger than one another: the one becomes younger than the
others because it was seen to be older and prior, and the others
become older than the one because they came into being later; and in
the same way the others are in the same relation to the one, because
they were seen to be older, and prior to the one.

  That is clear.

  Inasmuch then, one thing does not become older or younger than
another, in that they always differ from each other by an equal
number, the one cannot become older or younger than the others, nor
the other than the one; but inasmuch as that which came into being
earlier and that which came into being later must continually differ
from each other by a different portion-in this point of view the
others must become older and younger than the one, and the one than
the others.

  Certainly.

  For all these reasons, then, the one is and becomes older and
younger than itself and the others, and neither is nor becomes older
or younger than itself or the others.

  Certainly.

  But since the one partakes of time, and partakes of becoming older
and younger, must it not also partake of the past, the present, and
the future?

  Of course it must.

  Then the one was and is and will be, and was becoming and is
becoming and will become?

  Certainly.

  And there is and was and will be something which is in relation to
it and belongs to it?

  True.

  And since we have at this moment opinion and knowledge and
perception of the one, there is opinion and knowledge and perception
of it?

  Quite right.

  Then there is name and expression for it, and it is named and
expressed, and everything of this kind which appertains to other:
things appertains to the one.

  Certainly, that is true.

  Yet once more and for the third time, let us consider: If the one is
both one and many, as we have described, and is, neither one nor many,
and participates in time, must it not, in as far as it is one, at
times partake of being, and in as far as it is not one, at times not
partake of being?

  Certainly.

  But can it partake of being when not partaking of being, or not
partake of being when partaking of being?

  Impossible.

  Then the one partakes and does not partake of being at different
times, for that is the only way in which it can partake and not
partake of the same.

  True.

  And is there not also a time at which it assumes being and
relinquishes being-for how can it have and not have the same thing
unless it receives and also gives it up at; some time?

  Impossible.

  And the assuming of being is what you would call becoming?

  I should.

  And the relinquishing of being you would call destruction?

  I should.

  The one then, as would appear, becomes and is destroyed by taking
and giving up being.

  Certainly.

  And being one and many and in process of becoming and being
destroyed, when it becomes one it ceases to be many, and when many, it
ceases to be one?

  Certainly.

  And as it becomes one and many, must it not inevitably experience
separation and aggregation?

  Inevitably.

  And whenever it becomes like and unlike it must be assimilated and
dissimilated?

  Yes.

  And when it becomes greater or less or equal it must grow or
diminish or be equalized?

  True.

  And when being in motion it rests, and when being at rest it changes
to motion, it can surely be in no time at all?

  How can it?

  But that a thing which is previously at rest should be afterwards in
motion, or previously in motion and afterwards at rest, without
experiencing change, is impossible.

  Impossible.

  And surely there cannot be a time in which a thing can be at once
neither in motion nor at rest?

  There cannot.

  But neither can it change without changing.

  True.

  When then does it change; for it cannot change either when at
rest, or when in motion, or when in time?

  It cannot.

  And does this strange thing in which it is at the time of changing
really exist?

  What thing?

  The moment. For the moment seems to imply a something out of which
change takes place into either of two states; for the change is not
from the state of rest as such, nor, from the state of motion as such;
but there is this curious nature, which we call the moment lying
between rest and motion, not being in any time; and into this and
out of this what is in motion changes into rest, and what is at rest
into motion.

  So it appears.

  And the one then, since it is at rest and also in motion, will
change to either, for only in this way can it be in both. And in
changing it changes in a moment, and when it is changing it will be in
no time, and will not then be either in motion or at rest.

  It will not.

  And it will be in the same case in relation to the other changes,
when it passes from being into cessation of being, or from not-being
into becoming-then it passes between certain states of motion and
rest, and, neither is nor is not, nor becomes nor is destroyed.

  Very true.

  And on the same principle, in the passage from one to many and
from many to one, the one is neither one nor many, neither separated
nor aggregated; and in the passage from like to unlike, and from
unlike to like, it is neither like nor unlike, neither in a state of
assimilation nor of dissimilation; and in the passage from small to
great and equal and back again, it will be neither small nor great,
nor equal, nor in a state of increase, or diminution, or equalization.

  True.

  All these, then, are the affections of the one, if the one has
being.

  Of course.

  But if one is, what will happen to the others -is not that also to
be considered?

  Yes.

  Let us show then, if one is, what will be the affections of the
others than the one.

  Let us do so.

  Inasmuch as there are things other than the one, the others are
not the one; for if they were they could not be other than the one.
Very true.

  Very true.

  Nor are the others altogether without the one, but in a certain
way they participate in the one.

  In what way?

  Because the others are other than the one inasmuch as they have
parts; for if they had no parts they would be simply one.

  Right.

  And parts, as we affirm, have relation to a whole?

  So we say.

  And a whole must necessarily be one made up of many; and the parts
will be parts of the one, for each of the parts is not a part of many,
but of a whole.

  How do you mean?

  If anything were a part of many, being itself one of them, it will
surely be a part of itself, which is impossible, and it will be a part
of each one of the other parts, if of all; for if not a part of some
one, it will be a part of all the others but this one, and thus will
not be a part of each one; and if not a part of each, one it will
not be a part of anyone of the many; and not being a part of any
one, it cannot be a part or anything else of all those things of
none of which it is anything.

  Clearly not.

  Then the part is not a part of the many, nor of all, but is of a
certain single form, which we call a whole, being one perfect unity
framed out of all-of this the part will be a part.

  Certainly.

  If, then, the others have parts, they will participate in the
whole and in the one.

  True.

  Then the others than the one must be one perfect whole, having
parts.

  Certainly.

  And the same argument holds of each part, for the part must
participate in the one; for if each of the parts is a part, this
means, I suppose, that it is one separate from the rest and
self-related; otherwise it is not each.

  True.

  But when we speak of the part participating in the one, it must
clearly be other than one; for if not, it would merely have
participated, but would have been one; whereas only the itself can
be one.

  Very true.

  Both the whole and the part must participate in the one; for the
whole will be one whole, of which the parts will be parts; and each
part will be one part of the whole which is the whole of the part.

  True.

  And will not the things which participate in the one, be other
than it?

  Of course.

  And the things which are other than the one will be many; for if the
things which are other than the one were neither one nor more than
one, they would be nothing.

  True.

  But, seeing that the things which participate in the one as a
part, and in the one as a whole, are more than one, must not those
very things which participate in the one be infinite in number?

  How so?

  Let us look at the matter thus:-Is it not a fact that in partaking
of the one they are not one, and do not partake of the one at the very
time. when they are partaking of it?

  Clearly.

  They do so then as multitudes in which the one is not present?

  Very true.

  And if we were to abstract from them in idea the very smallest
fraction, must not that least fraction, if it does not partake of
the one, be a multitude and not one?

  It must.

  And if we continue to look at the other side of their nature,
regarded simply, and in itself, will not they, as far as we see
them, be unlimited in number?

  Certainly.

  And yet, when each several part becomes a part, then the parts
have a limit in relation to the whole and to each other, and the whole
in relation to the parts.

  Just so.

  The result to the others than the one is that of themselves and
the one appears to create a new element in them which gives to them
limitation in relation to one another; whereas in their own nature
they have no limit.

  That is clear.

  Then the others than the one, both as whole and parts, are infinite,
and also partake of limit.

  Certainly.

  Then they are both like and unlike one another and themselves.

  How is that?

  Inasmuch as they are unlimited in their own nature, they are all
affected in the same way.

  True.

  And inasmuch as they all partake of limit, they are all affected
in the same way.

  Of course.

  But inasmuch as their state is both limited and unlimited, they
are affected in opposite ways.

  Yes.

  And opposites are the most unlike of things.

  Certainly.

  Considered, then, in regard to either one of their affections,
they will be like themselves and one another; considered in
reference to both of them together, most opposed and most unlike.

  That appears to be true.

  Then the others are both like and unlike themselves and one another?

  True.

  And they are the same and also different from one another, and in
motion and at rest, and experience every sort of opposite affection,
as may be proved without difficulty of them, since they have been
shown to have experienced the affections aforesaid?

  True.

  Suppose, now, that we leave the further discussion of these
matters as evident, and consider again upon the hypothesis that the
one is, whether opposite of all this is or is not equally true of
the others.

  By all means.

  Then let us begin again, and ask, If one is, what must be the
affections of the others?

  Let us ask that question.

  Must not the one be distinct from the others, and the others from
the one?

  Why so?

  Why, because there is nothing else beside them which is distinct
from both of them; for the expression "one and the others" includes
all things.

  Yes, all things.

  Then we cannot suppose that there is anything different from them in
which both the one and the others might exist?

  There is nothing.

  Then the one and the others are never in the same?

  True.

  Then they are separated from each other?

  Yes.

  And we surely cannot say that what is truly one has parts?

  Impossible.

  Then the one will not be in the others as a whole, nor as part, if
it be separated from the others, and has no parts?

  Impossible.

  Then there is no way in which the others can partake of the one,
if they do not partake either in whole or in part?

  It would seem not.

  Then there is no way in which the others are one, or have in
themselves any unity?

  There is not.

  Nor are the others many; for if they were many, each part of them
would be a part of the whole; but now the others, not partaking in any
way of the one, are neither one nor many, nor whole, nor part.

  True.

  Then the others neither are nor contain two or three, if entirely
deprived of the one?

  True.

  Then the others are neither like nor unlike the one, nor is likeness
and unlikeness in them; for if they were like and unlike, or had in
them likeness and unlikeness, they would have two natures in them
opposite to one another.

  That is clear.

  But for that which partakes of nothing to partake of two things
was held by us to be impossible?

  Impossible.

  Then the others are neither like nor unlike nor both, for if they
were like or unlike they would partake of one of those two natures,
which would be one thing, and if they were both they would partake
of opposites which would be two things, and this has been shown to
be impossible.

  True.

  Therefore they are neither the same, nor other, nor in motion, nor
at rest, nor in a state of becoming, nor of being destroyed, nor
greater, nor less, nor equal, nor have they experienced anything
else of the sort; for, if they are capable of experiencing any such
affection, they will participate in one and two and three, and odd and
even, and in these, as has been proved, they do not participate,
seeing that they are altogether and in every way devoid of the one.

  Very true.

  Therefore if one is, the one is all things, and also nothing, both
in relation to itself and to other things.

  Certainly.

  Well, and ought we not to consider next what will be the consequence
if the one is not?

  Yes; we ought.

  What is the meaning of the hypothesis-If the one is not; is there
any difference between this and the hypothesis-If the not one is not?

  There is a difference, certainly.

  Is there a difference only, or rather are not the two expressions-if
the one is not, and if the not one is not, entirely opposed?

  They are entirely opposed.

  And suppose a person to say:-If greatness is not, if smallness is
not, or anything of that sort, does he not mean, whenever he uses such
an expression, that "what is not" is other than other things?

  To be sure.

  And so when he says "If one is not" he clearly means, that what
"is not" is other than all others; we know what he means-do we not?

  Yes, we do.

  When he says "one," he says something which is known; and secondly
something which is other than all other things; it makes no difference
whether he predicate of one being or not being, for that which is said
"not to be" is known to be something all the same, and is
distinguished from other things.

  Certainly.

  Then I will begin again, and ask: If one is not, what are the
consequences? In the first place, as would appear, there is a
knowledge of it, or the very meaning of the words, "if one is not,"
would not be known.

  True.

  Secondly, the others differ from it, or it could not be described as
different from the others?

  Certainly.

  Difference, then, belongs to it as well as knowledge; for in
speaking of the one as different from the others, we do not speak of a
difference in the others, but in the one.

  Clearly so.

  Moreover, the one that is not is something and partakes of
relation to "that," and "this," and "these," and the like, and is an
attribute of "this"; for the one, or the others than the one, could
not have been spoken of, nor could any attribute or relative of the
one that is not have been or been spoken of, nor could it have been
said to be anything, if it did not partake of "some," or of the
other relations just now mentioned.

  True.

  Being, then, cannot be ascribed to the one, since it is not; but the
one that is not may or rather must participate in many things, if it
and nothing else is not; if, however, neither the one nor the one that
is not is supposed not to be, and we are speaking of something of a
different nature, we can predicate nothing of it. But supposing that
the one that is not and nothing else is not, then it must
participate in the predicate "that," and in many others.

  Certainly.

  And it will have unlikeness in relation to the others, for the
others being different from the one will be of a different kind.

  Certainly.

  And are not things of a different kind also other in kind?

  Of course.

  And are not things other in kind unlike?

  They are unlike.

  And if they are unlike the one, that which they are unlike will
clearly be unlike them?

  Clearly so.

  Then the one will have unlikeness in respect of which the others are
unlike it?

  That would seem to be true.

  And if unlikeness to other things is attributed to it, it must
have likeness to itself.

  How so?

  If the one have unlikeness to one, something else must be meant; nor
will the hypothesis relate to one; but it will relate to something
other than one?

  Quite so.

  But that cannot be.

  No.

  Then the one must have likeness to itself?

  It must.

  Again, it is not equal to the others; for if it were equal, then
it would at once be and be like them in virtue of the equality; but if
one has no being, then it can neither be nor be like?

  It cannot.

  But since it is not equal to the others, neither can the others be
equal to it?

  Certainly not.

  And things that are not equal are unequal?

  True.

  And they are unequal to an unequal?

  Of course.

  Then the one partakes of inequality, and in respect of this the
others are unequal to it?

  Very true.

  And inequality implies greatness and smallness?

  Yes.

  Then the one, if of such a nature, has greatness and smallness?

  That appears to be true.

  And greatness and smallness always stand apart?

  True.

  Then there is always something between them?

  There is.

  And can you think of anything else which is between them other
than equality?

  No, it is equality which lies between them.

  Then that which has greatness and smallness also has equality, which
lies between them?

  That is clear.

  Then the one, which is not, partakes, as would appear, of
greatness and smallness and equality?

  Clearly.

  Further, it must surely in a sort partake of being?

  How so?

  It must be so, for if not, then we should not speak the truth in
saying that the one is not. But if we speak the truth, clearly we must
say what is. Am I not right?

  Yes.

  And since we affirm that we speak truly, we must also affirm that we
say what is?

  Certainly.

  Then, as would appear, the one, when it is not, is; for if it were
not to be when it is not, but were to relinquish something of being,
so as to become not-being, it would at once be.

  Quite true.

  Then the one which is not, if it is to maintain itself, must have
the being of not-being as the bond of not-being, just as being must
have as a bond the not-being of not-being in order to perfect its
own being; for the truest assertion of the being of being and of the
not-being of not being is when being partakes of the being of being,
and not of the being of not-being-that is, the perfection of being;
and when not-being does not partake of the not-being of not-being
but of the being of not-being-that is the perfection of not-being.

  Most true.

  Since then what is partakes of not-being, and what is not of
being, must not the one also partake of being in order not to be?

  Certainly.

  Then the one, if it is not, clearly has being?

  Clearly.

  And has not-being also, if it is not?

  Of course.

  But can anything which is in a certain state not be in that state
without changing?

  Impossible.

  Then everything which is and is not in a certain state, implies
change?

  Certainly.

  And change is motion-we may say that?

  Yes, motion.

  And the one has been proved both to be and not to be?

  Yes.

  And therefore is and is not in the same state?

  Yes.

  Thus the one that is not has been shown to have motion also, because
it changes from being to not-being?

  That appears to be true.

  But surely if it is nowhere among what is, as is the fact, since
it is not, it cannot change from one place to another?

  Impossible.

  Then it cannot move by changing place?

  No.

  Nor can it turn on the same spot, for it nowhere touches the same,
for the same is, and that which is not cannot be reckoned among things
that are?

  It cannot.

  Then the one, if it is not, cannot turn in that in which it is not?

  No.

  Neither can the one, whether it is or is not, be altered into
other than itself, for if it altered and became different from itself,
then we could not be still speaking of the one, but of something else?

  True.

  But if the one neither suffers alteration, nor turns round in the
same place, nor changes place, can it still be capable of motion?

  Impossible.

  Now that which is unmoved must surely be at rest, and that which
is at rest must stand still?

  Certainly.

  Then the one that is not, stands still, and is also in motion?

  That seems to be true.

  But if it be in motion it must necessarily undergo alteration, for
anything which is moved, in so far as it is moved, is no longer in the
same state, but in another?

  Yes.

  Then the one, being moved, is altered?

  Yes.

  And, further, if not moved in any way, it will not be altered in any
way?

  No.

  Then, in so far as the one that is not is moved, it is altered,
but in so far as it is not moved, it is not altered?

  Right.

  Then the one that is not is altered and is not altered?

  That is clear.

  And must not that which is altered become other than it previously
was, and lose its former state and be destroyed; but that which is not
altered can neither come into being nor be destroyed?

  Very true.

  And the one that is not, being altered, becomes and is destroyed;
and not being altered, neither becomes nor is destroyed; and so the
one that is not becomes and is destroyed, and neither becomes nor is
destroyed?

  True.

  And now, let us go back once more to the beginning, and see
whether these or some other consequences will follow.

  Let us do as you say.

  If one is not, we ask what will happen in respect of one? That is
the question.

  Yes.

  Do not the words "is not" signify absence of being in that to
which we apply them?

  Just so.

  And when we say that a thing is not, do we mean that it is not in
one way but is in another? or do we mean, absolutely, that what is not
has in no sort or way or kind participation of being?

  Quite absolutely.

  Then, that which is not cannot be, or in any way participate in
being?

  It cannot.

  And did we not mean by becoming, and being destroyed, the assumption
of being and the loss of being?

  Nothing else.

  And can that which has no participation in being, either assume or
lose being?

  Impossible.

  The one then, since it in no way is, cannot have or lose or assume
being in any way?

  True.

  Then the one that is not, since it in no way partakes of being,
neither nor becomes?

  No.

  Then it is not altered at all; for if it were it would become and be
destroyed?

  True.

  But if it be not altered it cannot be moved?

  Certainly not.

  Nor can we say that it stands, if it is nowhere; for that which
stands must always be in one and the same spot?

  Of course.

  Then we must say that the one which is not never stands still and
never moves?

  Neither.

  Nor is there any existing thing which can be attributed to it; for
if there had been, it would partake of being?

  That is clear.

  And therefore neither smallness, nor greatness, nor equality, can be
attributed to it?

  No.

  Nor yet likeness nor difference, either in relation to itself or
to others?

  Clearly not.

  Well, and if nothing should be attributed to it, can other things be
attributed to it?

  Certainly not.

  And therefore other things can neither be like or unlike, the
same, or different in relation to it?

  They cannot.

  Nor can what is not, be anything, or be this thing, or be related to
or the attribute of this or that or other, or be past, present, or
future. Nor can knowledge, or opinion, or perception, or expression,
or name, or any other thing that is, have any concern with it?

  No.

  Then the one that is not has no condition of any kind?

  Such appears to be the conclusion.

  Yet once more; if one is not, what becomes of the others? Let us
determine that.

  Yes; let us determine that.

  The others must surely be; for if they, like the one, were not, we
could not be now speaking of them.

  True.

  But to speak of the others implies difference-the terms "other"
and "different" are synonymous?

  True.

  Other means other than other, and different, different from the
different?

  Yes.

  Then, if there are to be others, there is something than which
they will be other?

  Certainly.

  And what can that be?-for if the one is not, they will not be
other than the one.

  They will not.

  Then they will be other than each other; for the only remaining
alternative is that they are other than nothing.

  True.

  And they are each other than one another, as being plural and not
singular; for if one is not, they cannot be singular but every
particle of them is infinite in number; and even if a person takes
that which appears to be the smallest fraction, this, which seemed
one, in a moment evanesces into many, as in a dream, and from being
the smallest becomes very great, in comparison with the fractions into
which it is split up?

  Very true.

  And in such particles the others will be other than one another,
if others are, and the one is not?

  Exactly.

  And will there not be many particles, each appearing to be one,
but not being one, if one is not?

  True.

  And it would seem that number can be predicated of them if each of
them appears to be one, though it is really many?

  It can.

  And there will seem to be odd and even among them, which will also
have no reality, if one is not?

  Yes.

  And there will appear to be a least among them; and even this will
seem large and manifold in comparison with the many small fractions
which are contained in it?

  Certainly.

  And each particle will be imagined to be equal to the many and
little; for it could not have appeared to pass from the greater to the
less without having appeared to arrive at the middle; and thus would
arise the appearance of equality.

  Yes.

  And having neither beginning, middle, nor end, each separate
particle yet appears to have a limit in relation to itself and other.

  How so?

  Because, when a person conceives of any one of these as such,
prior to the beginning another beginning appears, and there is another
end, remaining after the end, and in the middle truer middles within
but smaller, because no unity can be conceived of any of them, since
the one is not.

  Very true.

  And so all being, whatever we think of, must be broken up into
fractions, for a particle will have to be conceived of without unity?

  Certainly.

  And such being when seen indistinctly and at a distance, appears
to be one; but when seen near and with keen intellect, every single
thing appears to be infinite, since it is deprived of the one, which
is not?

  Nothing more certain.

  Then each of the others must appear to be infinite and finite, and
one and many, if others than the one exist and not the one.

  They must.

  Then will they not appear to be like and unlike?

  In what way?

  Just as in a picture things appear to be all one to a person
standing at a distance, and to be in the same state and alike?

  True.

  But when you approach them, they appear to be many and different;
and because of the appearance of the difference, different in kind
from, and unlike, themselves?

  True.

  And so must the particles appear to be like and unlike themselves
and each other.

  Certainly.

  And must they not be the same and yet different from one another,
and in contact with themselves, although they are separated, and
having every sort of motion, and every sort of rest, and becoming
and being destroyed, and in neither state, and the like, all which
things may be easily enumerated, if the one is not and the many are?

  Most true.

  Once more, let us go back to the beginning, and ask if the one is
not, and the others of the one are, what will follow.

  Let us ask that question.

  In the first place, the others will not be one?

  Impossible.

  Nor will they be many; for if they were many one would be
contained in them. But if no one of them is one, all of them are
nought, and therefore they will not be many.

  True.

  If there be no one in the others, the others are neither many nor
one.

  They are not.

  Nor do they appear either as one or many.

  Why not?

  Because the others have no sort or manner or way of communion with
any sort of not-being, nor can anything which is not, be connected
with any of the others; for that which is not has no parts.

  True.

  Nor is there an opinion or any appearance of not-being in connection
with the others, nor is not-being ever in any way attributed to the
others.

  No.

  Then if one is not, the others neither are, nor any of the others
either as one or many; for you cannot conceive the many without the
one.

  You cannot.

  Then if one is not, there is no conception of can be conceived to be
either one or many?

  It would seem not.

  Nor as like or unlike?

  No.

  Nor as the same or different, nor in contact or separation, nor in
any of those states which we enumerated as appearing to be;-the others
neither are nor appear to be any of these, if one is not?

  True.

  Then may we not sum up the argument in a word and say truly: If
one is not, then nothing is?

  Certainly.

  Let thus much be said; and further let us affirm what seems to be
the truth, that, whether one is or is not, one and the others in
relation to themselves and one another, all of them, in every way, are
and are not, and appear to be and appear not to be.

  Most true.

                          -THE END-


     PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE

  PHAEDO, who is the narrator of the dialogue to ECHECRATES of Phlius

  SOCRATES

  APOLLODORUS

  SIMMIAS

  CEBES

  CRITO

  ATTENDANT OF THE PRISON
PHAEDO

     SCENE: The Prison of Socrates

     PLACE OF THE NARRATION: Phlius

  Echecrates. Were you yourself, Phaedo, in the prison with Socrates
on the day when he drank the poison?

  Phaedo. Yes, Echecrates, I was.

  Ech. I wish that you would tell me about his death. What did he
say in his last hours? We were informed that he died by taking poison,
but no one knew anything more; for no Phliasian ever goes to Athens
now, and a long time has elapsed since any Athenian found his way to
Phlius, and therefore we had no clear account.

  Phaed. Did you not hear of the proceedings at the trial?

  Ech. Yes; someone told us about the trial, and we could not
understand why, having been condemned, he was put to death, as
appeared, not at the time, but long afterwards. What was the reason of
this?

  Phaed. An accident, Echecrates. The reason was that the stern of the
ship which the Athenians send to Delos happened to have been crowned
on the day before he was tried.

  Ech. What is this ship?

  Phaed. This is the ship in which, as the Athenians say, Theseus went
to Crete when he took with him the fourteen youths, and was the
saviour of them and of himself. And they were said to have vowed to
Apollo at the time, that if they were saved they would make an
annual pilgrimage to Delos. Now this custom still continues, and the
whole period of the voyage to and from Delos, beginning when the
priest of Apollo crowns the stern of the ship, is a holy season,
during which the city is not allowed to be polluted by public
executions; and often, when the vessel is detained by adverse winds,
there may be a very considerable delay. As I was saying, the ship
was crowned on the day before the trial, and this was the reason why
Socrates lay in prison and was not put to death until long after he
was condemned.

  Ech. What was the manner of his death, Phaedo? What was said or
done? And which of his friends had he with him? Or were they not
allowed by the authorities to be present? And did he die alone?

  Phaed. No; there were several of his friends with him.

  Ech. If you have nothing to do, I wish that you would tell me what
passed, as exactly as you can.

  Phaed. I have nothing to do, and will try to gratify your wish.
For to me, too, there is no greater pleasure than to have Socrates
brought to my recollection, whether I speak myself or hear another
speak of him.

  Ech. You will have listeners who are of the same mind with you,
and I hope that you will be as exact as you can.

  Phaed. I remember the strange feeling which came over me at being
with him. For I could hardly believe that I was present at the death
of a friend, and therefore I did not pity him, Echecrates; his mien
and his language were so noble and fearless in the hour of death
that to me he appeared blessed. I thought that in going to the other
world he could not be without a divine call, and that he would be
happy, if any man ever was, when he arrived there, and therefore I did
not pity him as might seem natural at such a time. But neither could I
feel the pleasure which I usually felt in philosophical discourse (for
philosophy was the theme of which we spoke). I was pleased, and I
was also pained, because I knew that he was soon to die, and this
strange mixture of feeling was shared by us all; we were laughing
and weeping by turns, especially the excitable Apollodorus-you know
the sort of man?

  Ech. Yes.

  Phaed. He was quite overcome; and I myself and all of us were
greatly moved.

  Ech. Who were present?

  Phaed. Of native Athenians there were, besides Apollodorus,
Critobulus and his father Crito, Hermogenes, Epigenes, Aeschines,
and Antisthenes; likewise Ctesippus of the deme of Paeania, Menexenus,
and some others; but Plato, if I am not mistaken, was ill.

  Ech. Were there any strangers?

  Phaed. Yes, there were; Simmias the Theban, and Cebes, and
Phaedondes; Euclid and Terpison, who came from Megara.

  Ech. And was Aristippus there, and Cleombrotus?

  Phaed. No, they were said to be in Aegina.

  Ech. Anyone else?

  Phaed. I think that these were about all.

  Ech. And what was the discourse of which you spoke?

  Phaed. I will begin at the beginning, and endeavor to repeat the
entire conversation. You must understand that we had been previously
in the habit of assembling early in the morning at the court in
which the trial was held, and which is not far from the prison.
There we remained talking with one another until the opening of the
prison doors (for they were not opened very early), and then went in
and generally passed the day with Socrates. On the last morning the
meeting was earlier than usual; this was owing to our having heard
on the previous evening that the sacred ship had arrived from Delos,
and therefore we agreed to meet very early at the accustomed place. On
our going to the prison, the jailer who answered the door, instead
of admitting us, came out and bade us wait and he would call us.
"For the Eleven," he said, "are now with Socrates; they are taking off
his chains, and giving orders that he is to die to-day." He soon
returned and said that we might come in. On entering we found Socrates
just released from chains, and Xanthippe, whom you know, sitting by
him, and holding his child in her arms. When she saw us she uttered
a cry and said, as women will: "O Socrates, this is the last time that
either you will converse with your friends, or they with you."
Socrates turned to Crito and said: "Crito, let someone take her home."
Some of Crito's people accordingly led her away, crying out and
beating herself. And when she was gone, Socrates, sitting up on the
couch, began to bend and rub his leg, saying, as he rubbed: "How
singular is the thing called pleasure, and how curiously related to
pain, which might be thought to be the opposite of it; for they
never come to a man together, and yet he who pursues either of them is
generally compelled to take the other. They are two, and yet they grow
together out of one head or stem; and I cannot help thinking that if
Aesop had noticed them, he would have made a fable about God trying to
reconcile their strife, and when he could not, he fastened their heads
together; and this is the reason why when one comes the other follows,
as I find in my own case pleasure comes following after the pain in my
leg, which was caused by the chain."

  Upon this Cebes said: I am very glad indeed, Socrates, that you
mentioned the name of Aesop. For that reminds me of a question which
has been asked by others, and was asked of me only the day before
yesterday by Evenus the poet, and as he will be sure to ask again, you
may as well tell me what I should say to him, if you would like him to
have an answer. He wanted to know why you who never before wrote a
line of poetry, now that you are in prison are putting Aesop into
verse, and also composing that hymn in honor of Apollo.

  Tell him, Cebes, he replied, that I had no idea of rivalling him
or his poems; which is the truth, for I knew that I could not do that.
But I wanted to see whether I could purge away a scruple which I
felt about certain dreams. In the course of my life I have often had
intimations in dreams "that I should make music." The same dream
came to me sometimes in one form, and sometimes in another, but always
saying the same or nearly the same words: Make and cultivate music,
said the dream. And hitherto I had imagined that this was only
intended to exhort and encourage me in the study of philosophy,
which has always been the pursuit of my life, and is the noblest and
best of music. The dream was bidding me to do what I was already
doing, in the same way that the competitor in a race is bidden by
the spectators to run when he is already running. But I was not
certain of this, as the dream might have meant music in the popular
sense of the word, and being under sentence of death, and the festival
giving me a respite, I thought that I should be safer if I satisfied
the scruple, and, in obedience to the dream, composed a few verses
before I departed. And first I made a hymn in honor of the god of
the festival, and then considering that a poet, if he is really to
be a poet or maker, should not only put words together but make
stories, and as I have no invention, I took some fables of esop, which
I had ready at hand and knew, and turned them into verse. Tell
Evenus this, and bid him be of good cheer; that I would have him
come after me if he be a wise man, and not tarry; and that to-day I am
likely to be going, for the Athenians say that I must.

  Simmias said: What a message for such a man! having been a
frequent companion of his, I should say that, as far as I know him, he
will never take your advice unless he is obliged.

  Why, said Socrates,-is not Evenus a philosopher?

  I think that he is, said Simmias.

  Then he, or any man who has the spirit of philosophy, will be
willing to die, though he will not take his own life, for that is held
not to be right.

  Here he changed his position, and put his legs off the couch on to
the ground, and during the rest of the conversation he remained
sitting.

  Why do you say, inquired Cebes, that a man ought not to take his own
life, but that the philosopher will be ready to follow the dying?

  Socrates replied: And have you, Cebes and Simmias, who are
acquainted with Philolaus, never heard him speak of this?

  I never understood him, Socrates.

  My words, too, are only an echo; but I am very willing to say what I
have heard: and indeed, as I am going to another place, I ought to
be thinking and talking of the nature of the pilgrimage which I am
about to make. What can I do better in the interval between this and
the setting of the sun?

  Then tell me, Socrates, why is suicide held not to be right? as I
have certainly heard Philolaus affirm when he was staying with us at
Thebes: and there are others who say the same, although none of them
has ever made me understand him.

  But do your best, replied Socrates, and the day may come when you
will understand. I suppose that you wonder why, as most things which
are evil may be accidentally good, this is to be the only exception
(for may not death, too, be better than life in some cases?), and why,
when a man is better dead, he is not permitted to be his own
benefactor, but must wait for the hand of another.

  By Jupiter! yes, indeed, said Cebes, laughing, and speaking in his
native Doric.

  I admit the appearance of inconsistency, replied Socrates, but there
may not be any real inconsistency after all in this. There is a
doctrine uttered in secret that man is a prisoner who has no right
to open the door of his prison and run away; this is a great mystery
which I do not quite understand. Yet I, too, believe that the gods are
our guardians, and that we are a possession of theirs. Do you not
agree?

  Yes, I agree to that, said Cebes.

  And if one of your own possessions, an ox or an ass, for example
took the liberty of putting himself out of the way when you had
given no intimation of your wish that he should die, would you not
be angry with him, and would you not punish him if you could?

  Certainly, replied Cebes.

  Then there may be reason in saying that a man should wait, and not
take his own life until God summons him, as he is now summoning me.

  Yes, Socrates, said Cebes, there is surely reason in that. And yet
how can you reconcile this seemingly true belief that God is our
guardian and we his possessions, with that willingness to die which we
were attributing to the philosopher? That the wisest of men should
be willing to leave this service in which they are ruled by the gods
who are the best of rulers is not reasonable, for surely no wise man
thinks that when set at liberty he can take better care of himself
than the gods take of him. A fool may perhaps think this-he may
argue that he had better run away from his master, not considering
that his duty is to remain to the end, and not to run away from the
good, and that there is no sense in his running away. But the wise man
will want to be ever with him who is better than himself. Now this,
Socrates, is the reverse of what was just now said; for upon this view
the wise man should sorrow and the fool rejoice at passing out of
life.

  The earnestness of Cebes seemed to please Socrates. Here, said he,
turning to us, is a man who is always inquiring, and is not to be
convinced all in a moment, nor by every argument.

  And in this case, added Simmias, his objection does appear to me
to have some force. For what can be the meaning of a truly wise man
wanting to fly away and lightly leave a master who is better than
himself? And I rather imagine that Cebes is referring to you; he
thinks that you are too ready to leave us, and too ready to leave
the gods who, as you acknowledge, are our good rulers.

  Yes, replied Socrates; there is reason in that. And this
indictment you think that I ought to answer as if I were in court?

  That is what we should like, said Simmias.

  Then I must try to make a better impression upon you than I did when
defending myself before the judges. For I am quite ready to
acknowledge, Simmias and Cebes, that I ought to be grieved at death,
if I were not persuaded that I am going to other gods who are wise and
good (of this I am as certain as I can be of anything of the sort) and
to men departed (though I am not so certain of this), who are better
than those whom I leave behind; and therefore I do not grieve as I
might have done, for I have good hope that there is yet something
remaining for the dead, and, as has been said of old, some far
better thing for the good than for the evil.

  But do you mean to take away your thoughts with you, Socrates?
said Simmias. Will you not communicate them to us?-the benefit is
one in which we too may hope to share. Moreover, if you succeed in
convincing us, that will be an answer to the charge against yourself.

  I will do my best, replied Socrates. But you must first let me
hear what Crito wants; he was going to say something to me.

  Only this, Socrates, replied Crito: the attendant who is to give you
the poison has been telling me that you are not to talk much, and he
wants me to let you know this; for that by talking heat is
increased, and this interferes with the action of the poison; those
who excite themselves are sometimes obliged to drink the poison two or
three times.

  Then, said Socrates, let him mind his business and be prepared to
give the poison two or three times, if necessary; that is all.

  I was almost certain that you would say that, replied Crito; but I
was obliged to satisfy him.

  Never mind him, he said.

  And now I will make answer to you, O my judges, and show that he who
has lived as a true philosopher has reason to be of good cheer when he
is about to die, and that after death he may hope to receive the
greatest good in the other world. And how this may be, Simmias and
Cebes, I will endeavor to explain. For I deem that the true disciple
of philosophy is likely to be misunderstood by other men; they do
not perceive that he is ever pursuing death and dying; and if this
is true, why, having had the desire of death all his life long, should
he repine at the arrival of that which he has been always pursuing and
desiring?

  Simmias laughed and said: Though not in a laughing humor, I swear
that I cannot help laughing when I think what the wicked world will
say when they hear this. They will say that this is very true, and our
people at home will agree with them in saying that the life which
philosophers desire is truly death, and that they have found them
out to be deserving of the death which they desire.

  And they are right, Simmias, in saying this, with the exception of
the words "They have found them out"; for they have not found out what
is the nature of this death which the true philosopher desires, or how
he deserves or desires death. But let us leave them and have a word
with ourselves: Do we believe that there is such a thing as death?

  To be sure, replied Simmias.

  And is this anything but the separation of soul and body? And
being dead is the attainment of this separation; when the soul
exists in herself, and is parted from the body and the body is
parted from the soul-that is death?

  Exactly: that and nothing else, he replied.

  And what do you say of another question, my friend, about which I
should like to have your opinion, and the answer to which will
probably throw light on our present inquiry: Do you think that the
philosopher ought to care about the pleasures-if they are to be called
pleasures-of eating and drinking?

  Certainly not, answered Simmias.

  And what do you say of the pleasures of love-should he care about
them?

  By no means.

  And will he think much of the other ways of indulging the body-for
example, the acquisition of costly raiment, or sandals, or other
adornments of the body? Instead of caring about them, does he not
rather despise anything more than nature needs? What do you say?

  I should say the true philosopher would despise them.

  Would you not say that he is entirely concerned with the soul and
not with the body? He would like, as far as he can, to be quit of
the body and turn to the soul.

  That is true.

  In matters of this sort philosophers, above all other men, may be
observed in every sort of way to dissever the soul from the body.

  That is true.

  Whereas, Simmias, the rest of the world are of opinion that a life
which has no bodily pleasures and no part in them is not worth having;
but that he who thinks nothing of bodily pleasures is almost as though
he were dead.

  That is quite true.

  What again shall we say of the actual acquirement of knowledge?-is
the body, if invited to share in the inquiry, a hinderer or a
helper? I mean to say, have sight and hearing any truth in them? Are
they not, as the poets are always telling us, inaccurate witnesses?
and yet, if even they are inaccurate and indistinct, what is to be
said of the other senses?-for you will allow that they are the best of
them?

  Certainly, he replied.

  Then when does the soul attain truth?-for in attempting to
consider anything in company with the body she is obviously deceived.

  Yes, that is true.

  Then must not existence be revealed to her in thought, if at all?

  Yes.

  And thought is best when the mind is gathered into herself and
none of these things trouble her-neither sounds nor sights nor pain
nor any pleasure-when she has as little as possible to do with the
body, and has no bodily sense or feeling, but is aspiring after being?

  That is true.

  And in this the philosopher dishonors the body; his soul runs away
from the body and desires to be alone and by herself?

  That is true.

  Well, but there is another thing, Simmias: Is there or is there
not an absolute justice?

  Assuredly there is.

  And an absolute beauty and absolute good?

  Of course.

  But did you ever behold any of them with your eyes?

  Certainly not.

  Or did you ever reach them with any other bodily sense? (and I speak
not of these alone, but of absolute greatness, and health, and
strength, and of the essence or true nature of everything). Has the
reality of them ever been perceived by you through the bodily
organs? or rather, is not the nearest approach to the knowledge of
their several natures made by him who so orders his intellectual
vision as to have the most exact conception of the essence of that
which he considers?

  Certainly.

  And he attains to the knowledge of them in their highest purity
who goes to each of them with the mind alone, not allowing when in the
act of thought the intrusion or introduction of sight or any other
sense in the company of reason, but with the very light of the mind in
her clearness penetrates into the very fight of truth in each; he
has got rid, as far as he can, of eyes and ears and of the whole body,
which he conceives of only as a disturbing element, hindering the soul
from the acquisition of knowledge when in company with her-is not this
the sort of man who, if ever man did, is likely to attain the
knowledge of existence?

  There is admirable truth in that, Socrates, replied Simmias.

  And when they consider all this, must not true philosophers make a
reflection, of which they will speak to one another in such words as
these: We have found, they will say, a path of speculation which seems
to bring us and the argument to the conclusion that while we are in
the body, and while the soul is mingled with this mass of evil, our
desire will not be satisfied, and our desire is of the truth. For
the body is a source of endless trouble to us by reason of the mere
requirement of food; and also is liable to diseases which overtake and
impede us in the search after truth: and by filling us so full of
loves, and lusts, and fears, and fancies, and idols, and every sort of
folly, prevents our ever having, as people say, so much as a
thought. For whence come wars, and fightings, and factions? whence but
from the body and the lusts of the body? For wars are occasioned by
the love of money, and money has to be acquired for the sake and in
the service of the body; and in consequence of all these things the
time which ought to be given to philosophy is lost. Moreover, if there
is time and an inclination toward philosophy, yet the body
introduces a turmoil and confusion and fear into the course of
speculation, and hinders us from seeing the truth: and all
experience shows that if we would have pure knowledge of anything we
must be quit of the body, and the soul in herself must behold all
things in themselves: then I suppose that we shall attain that which
we desire, and of which we say that we are lovers, and that is wisdom,
not while we live, but after death, as the argument shows; for if
while in company with the body the soul cannot have pure knowledge,
one of two things seems to follow-either knowledge is not to be
attained at all, or, if at all, after death. For then, and not till
then, the soul will be in herself alone and without the body. In
this present life, I reckon that we make the nearest approach to
knowledge when we have the least possible concern or interest in the
body, and are not saturated with the bodily nature, but remain pure
until the hour when God himself is pleased to release us. And then the
foolishness of the body will be cleared away and we shall be pure
and hold converse with other pure souls, and know of ourselves the
clear light everywhere; and this is surely the light of truth. For
no impure thing is allowed to approach the pure. These are the sort of
words, Simmias, which the true lovers of wisdom cannot help saying
to one another, and thinking. You will agree with me in that?

  Certainly, Socrates.

  But if this is true, O my friend, then there is great hope that,
going whither I go, I shall there be satisfied with that which has
been the chief concern of you and me in our past lives. And now that
the hour of departure is appointed to me, this is the hope with
which I depart, and not I only, but every man who believes that he has
his mind purified.

  Certainly, replied Simmias.

  And what is purification but the separation of the soul from the
body, as I was saying before; the habit of the soul gathering and
collecting herself into herself, out of all the courses of the body;
the dwelling in her own place alone, as in another life, so also in
this, as far as she can; the release of the soul from the chains of
the body?

  Very true, he said.

  And what is that which is termed death, but this very separation and
release of the soul from the body?

  To be sure, he said.

  And the true philosophers, and they only, study and are eager to
release the soul. Is not the separation and release of the soul from
the body their especial study?

  That is true.

  And as I was saying at first, there would be a ridiculous
contradiction in men studying to live as nearly as they can in a state
of death, and yet repining when death comes.

  Certainly.

  Then, Simmias, as the true philosophers are ever studying death,
to them, of all men, death is the least terrible. Look at the matter
in this way: how inconsistent of them to have been always enemies of
the body, and wanting to have the soul alone, and when this is granted
to them, to be trembling and repining; instead of rejoicing at their
departing to that place where, when they arrive, they hope to gain
that which in life they loved (and this was wisdom), and at the same
time to be rid of the company of their enemy. Many a man has been
willing to go to the world below in the hope of seeing there an
earthly love, or wife, or son, and conversing with them. And will he
who is a true lover of wisdom, and is persuaded in like manner that
only in the world below he can worthily enjoy her, still repine at
death? Will he not depart with joy? Surely he will, my friend, if he
be a true philosopher. For he will have a firm conviction that there
only, and nowhere else, he can find wisdom in her purity. And if
this be true, he would be very absurd, as I was saying, if he were
to fear death.

  He would, indeed, replied Simmias.

  And when you see a man who is repining at the approach of death,
is not his reluctance a sufficient proof that he is not a lover of
wisdom, but a lover of the body, and probably at the same time a lover
of either money or power, or both?

  That is very true, he replied.

  There is a virtue, Simmias, which is named courage. Is not that a
special attribute of the philosopher?

  Certainly.

  Again, there is temperance. Is not the calm, and control, and
disdain of the passions which even the many call temperance, a quality
belonging only to those who despise the body and live in philosophy?

  That is not to be denied.

  For the courage and temperance of other men, if you will consider
them, are really a contradiction.

  How is that, Socrates?

  Well, he said, you are aware that death is regarded by men in
general as a great evil.

  That is true, he said.

  And do not courageous men endure death because they are afraid of
yet greater evils?

  That is true.

  Then all but the philosophers are courageous only from fear, and
because they are afraid; and yet that a man should be courageous
from fear, and because he is a coward, is surely a strange thing.

  Very true.

  And are not the temperate exactly in the same case? They are
temperate because they are intemperate-which may seem to be a
contradiction, but is nevertheless the sort of thing which happens
with this foolish temperance. For there are pleasures which they
must have, and are afraid of losing; and therefore they abstain from
one class of pleasures because they are overcome by another: and
whereas intemperance is defined as "being under the dominion of
pleasure," they overcome only because they are overcome by pleasure.
And that is what I mean by saying that they are temperate through
intemperance.

  That appears to be true.

  Yet the exchange of one fear or pleasure or pain for another fear or
pleasure or pain, which are measured like coins, the greater with
the less, is not the exchange of virtue. O my dear Simmias, is there
not one true coin for which all things ought to exchange?-and that
is wisdom; and only in exchange for this, and in company with this, is
anything truly bought or sold, whether courage or temperance or
justice. And is not all true virtue the companion of wisdom, no matter
what fears or pleasures or other similar goods or evils may or may not
attend her? But the virtue which is made up of these goods, when
they are severed from wisdom and exchanged with one another, is a
shadow of virtue only, nor is there any freedom or health or truth
in her; but in the true exchange there is a purging away of all
these things, and temperance, and justice, and courage, and wisdom
herself are a purgation of them. And I conceive that the founders of
the mysteries had a real meaning and were not mere triflers when
they intimated in a figure long ago that he who passes unsanctified
and uninitiated into the world below will live in a slough, but that
he who arrives there after initiation and purification will dwell with
the gods. For "many," as they say in the mysteries, "are the thyrsus
bearers, but few are the mystics,"-meaning, as I interpret the
words, the true philosophers. In the number of whom I have been
seeking, according to my ability, to find a place during my whole
life; whether I have sought in a right way or not, and whether I
have succeeded or not, I shall truly know in a little while, if God
will, when I myself arrive in the other world: that is my belief.
And now, Simmias and Cebes, I have answered those who charge me with
not grieving or repining at parting from you and my masters in this
world; and I am right in not repining, for I believe that I shall find
other masters and friends who are as good in the world below. But
all men cannot believe this, and I shall be glad if my words have
any more success with you than with the judges of the Athenians.

  Cebes answered: I agree, Socrates, in the greater part of what you
say. But in what relates to the soul, men are apt to be incredulous;
they fear that when she leaves the body her place may be nowhere,
and that on the very day of death she may be destroyed and
perish-immediately on her release from the body, issuing forth like
smoke or air and vanishing away into nothingness. For if she could
only hold together and be herself after she was released from the
evils of the body, there would be good reason to hope, Socrates,
that what you say is true. But much persuasion and many arguments
are required in order to prove that when the man is dead the soul
yet exists, and has any force of intelligence.

  True, Cebes, said Socrates; and shall I suggest that we talk a
little of the probabilities of these things?

  I am sure, said Cebes, that I should gready like to know your
opinion about them.

  I reckon, said Socrates, that no one who heard me now, not even if
he were one of my old enemies, the comic poets, could accuse me of
idle talking about matters in which I have no concern. Let us, then,
if you please, proceed with the inquiry.

  Whether the souls of men after death are or are not in the world
below, is a question which may be argued in this manner: The ancient
doctrine of which I have been speaking affirms that they go from
this into the other world, and return hither, and are born from the
dead. Now if this be true, and the living come from the dead, then our
souls must be in the other world, for if not, how could they be born
again? And this would be conclusive, if there were any real evidence
that the living are only born from the dead; but if there is no
evidence of this, then other arguments will have to be adduced.

  That is very true, replied Cebes.

  Then let us consider this question, not in relation to man only, but
in relation to animals generally, and to plants, and to everything
of which there is generation, and the proof will be easier. Are not
all things which have opposites generated out of their opposites? I
mean such things as good and evil, just and unjust-and there are
innumerable other opposites which are generated out of opposites.
And I want to show that this holds universally of all opposites; I
mean to say, for example, that anything which becomes greater must
become greater after being less.

  True.

  And that which becomes less must have been once greater and then
become less.

  Yes.

  And the weaker is generated from the stronger, and the swifter
from the slower.

  Very true.

  And the worse is from the better, and the more just is from the more
unjust.

  Of course.

  And is this true of all opposites? and are we convinced that all
of them are generated out of opposites?

  Yes.

  And in this universal opposition of all things, are there not also
two intermediate processes which are ever going on, from one to the
other, and back again; where there is a greater and a less there is
also an intermediate process of increase and diminution, and that
which grows is said to wax, and that which decays to wane?

  Yes, he said.

  And there are many other processes, such as division and
composition, cooling and heating, which equally involve a passage into
and out of one another. And this holds of all opposites, even though
not always expressed in words-they are generated out of one another,
and there is a passing or process from one to the other of them?

  Very true, he replied.

  Well, and is there not an opposite of life, as sleep is the opposite
of waking?

  True, he said.

  And what is that?

  Death, he answered.

  And these, then, are generated, if they are opposites, the one
from the other, and have there their two intermediate processes also?

  Of course.

  Now, said Socrates, I will analyze one of the two pairs of opposites
which I have mentioned to you, and also its intermediate processes,
and you shall analyze the other to me. The state of sleep is opposed
to the state of waking, and out of sleeping waking is generated, and
out of waking, sleeping, and the process of generation is in the one
case falling asleep, and in the other waking up. Are you agreed
about that?

  Quite agreed.

  Then suppose that you analyze life and death to me in the same
manner. Is not death opposed to life?

  Yes.

  And they are generated one from the other?

  Yes.

  What is generated from life?

  Death.

  And what from death?

  I can only say in answer-life.

  Then the living, whether things or persons, Cebes, are generated
from the dead?

  That is clear, he replied.

  Then the inference is, that our souls are in the world below?

  That is true.

  And one of the two processes or generations is visible-for surely
the act of dying is visible?

  Surely, he said.

  And may not the other be inferred as the complement of nature, who
is not to be supposed to go on one leg only? And if not, a
corresponding process of generation in death must also be assigned
to her?

  Certainly, he replied.

  And what is that process?

  Revival.

  And revival, if there be such a thing, is the birth of the dead into
the world of the living?

  Quite true.

  Then there is a new way in which we arrive at the inference that the
living come from the dead, just as the dead come from the living;
and if this is true, then the souls of the dead must be in some
place out of which they come again. And this, as I think, has been
satisfactorily proved.

  Yes, Socrates, he said; all this seems to flow necessarily out of
our previous admissions.

  And that these admissions are not unfair, Cebes, he said, may be
shown, as I think, in this way: If generation were in a straight
line only, and there were no compensation or circle in nature, no turn
or return into one another, then you know that all things would at
last have the same form and pass into the same state, and there
would be no more generation of them.

  What do you mean? he said.

  A simple thing enough, which I will illustrate by the case of sleep,
he replied. You know that if there were no compensation of sleeping
and waking, the story of the sleeping Endymion would in the end have
no meaning, because all other things would be asleep, too, and he
would not be thought of. Or if there were composition only, and no
division of substances, then the chaos of Anaxagoras would come again.
And in like manner, my dear Cebes, if all things which partook of life
were to die, and after they were dead remained in the form of death,
and did not come to life again, all would at last die, and nothing
would be alive-how could this be otherwise? For if the living spring
from any others who are not the dead, and they die, must not all
things at last be swallowed up in death?

  There is no escape from that, Socrates, said Cebes; and I think that
what you say is entirely true.

  Yes, he said, Cebes, I entirely think so, too; and we are not
walking in a vain imagination; but I am confident in the belief that
there truly is such a thing as living again, and that the living
spring from the dead, and that the souls of the dead are in existence,
and that the good souls have a better portion than the evil.

  Cebes added: Your favorite doctrine, Socrates, that knowledge is
simply recollection, if true, also necessarily implies a previous time
in which we learned that which we now recollect. But this would be
impossible unless our soul was in some place before existing in the
human form; here, then, is another argument of the soul's immortality.

  But tell me, Cebes, said Simmias, interposing, what proofs are given
of this doctrine of recollection? I am not very sure at this moment
that I remember them.

  One excellent proof, said Cebes, is afforded by questions. If you
put a question to a person in a right way, he will give a true
answer of himself; but how could he do this unless there were
knowledge and right reason already in him? And this is most clearly
shown when he is taken to a diagram or to anything of that sort.

  But if, said Socrates, you are still incredulous, Simmias, I would
ask you whether you may not agree with me when you look at the
matter in another way; I mean, if you are still incredulous as to
whether knowledge is recollection.

  Incredulous, I am not, said Simmias; but I want to have this
doctrine of recollection brought to my own recollection, and, from
what Cebes has said, I am beginning to recollect and be convinced; but
I should still like to hear what more you have to say.

  This is what I would say, he replied: We should agree, if I am not
mistaken, that what a man recollects he must have known at some
previous time.

  Very true.

  And what is the nature of this recollection? And, in asking this,
I mean to ask whether, when a person has already seen or heard or in
any way perceived anything, and he knows not only that, but
something else of which he has not the same, but another knowledge, we
may not fairly say that he recollects that which comes into his
mind. Are we agreed about that?

  What do you mean?

  I mean what I may illustrate by the following instance: The
knowledge of a lyre is not the same as the knowledge of a man?

  True.

  And yet what is the feeling of lovers when they recognize a lyre, or
a garment, or anything else which the beloved has been in the habit of
using? Do not they, from knowing the lyre, form in the mind's eye an
image of the youth to whom the lyre belongs? And this is recollection:
and in the same way anyone who sees Simmias may remember Cebes; and
there are endless other things of the same nature.

  Yes, indeed, there are-endless, replied Simmias.

  And this sort of thing, he said, is recollection, and is most
commonly a process of recovering that which has been forgotten through
time and inattention.

  Very true, he said.

  Well; and may you not also from seeing the picture of a horse or a
lyre remember a man? and from the picture of Simmias, you may be led
to remember Cebes?

  True.

  Or you may also be led to the recollection of Simmias himself?

  True, he said.

  And in all these cases, the recollection may be derived from
things either like or unlike?

  That is true.

  And when the recollection is derived from like things, then there is
sure to be another question, which is, whether the likeness of that
which is recollected is in any way defective or not.

  Very true, he said.

  And shall we proceed a step further, and affirm that there is such a
thing as equality, not of wood with wood, or of stone with stone,
but that, over and above this, there is equality in the abstract?
Shall we affirm this?

  Affirm, yes, and swear to it, replied Simmias, with all the
confidence in life.

  And do we know the nature of this abstract essence?

  To be sure, he said.

  And whence did we obtain this knowledge? Did we not see equalities
of material things, such as pieces of wood and stones, and gather from
them the idea of an equality which is different from them?-you will
admit that? Or look at the matter again in this way: Do not the same
pieces of wood or stone appear at one time equal, and at another
time unequal?

  That is certain.

  But are real equals ever unequal? or is the idea of equality ever
inequality?

  That surely was never yet known, Socrates.

  Then these (so-called) equals are not the same with the idea of
equality?

  I should say, clearly not, Socrates.

  And yet from these equals, although differing from the idea of
equality, you conceived and attained that idea?

  Very true, he said.

  Which might be like, or might be unlike them?

  Yes.

  But that makes no difference; whenever from seeing one thing you
conceived another, whether like or unlike, there must surely have been
an act of recollection?

  Very true.

  But what would you say of equal portions of wood and stone, or other
material equals? and what is the impression produced by them? Are they
equals in the same sense as absolute equality? or do they fall short
of this in a measure?

  Yes, he said, in a very great measure, too.

  And must we not allow that when I or anyone look at any object,
and perceive that the object aims at being some other thing, but falls
short of, and cannot attain to it-he who makes this observation must
have had previous knowledge of that to which, as he says, the other,
although similar, was inferior?

  Certainly.

  And has not this been our case in the matter of equals and of
absolute equality?

  Precisely.

  Then we must have known absolute equality previously to the time
when we first saw the material equals, and reflected that all these
apparent equals aim at this absolute equality, but fall short of it?

  That is true.

  And we recognize also that this absolute equality has only been
known, and can only be known, through the medium of sight or touch, or
of some other sense. And this I would affirm of all such conceptions.

  Yes, Socrates, as far as the argument is concerned, one of them is
the same as the other.

  And from the senses, then, is derived the knowledge that all
sensible things aim at an idea of equality of which they fall short-is
not that true?

  Yes.

  Then before we began to see or hear or perceive in any way, we
must have had a knowledge of absolute equality, or we could not have
referred to that the equals which are derived from the senses-for to
that they all aspire, and of that they fall short?

  That, Socrates, is certainly to be inferred from the previous
statements.

  And did we not see and hear and acquire our other senses as soon
as we were born?

  Certainly.

  Then we must have acquired the knowledge of the ideal equal at
some time previous to this?

  Yes.

  That is to say, before we were born, I suppose?

  True.

  And if we acquired this knowledge before we were born, and were born
having it, then we also knew before we were born and at the instant of
birth not only equal or the greater or the less, but all other
ideas; for we are not speaking only of equality absolute, but of
beauty, goodness, justice, holiness, and all which we stamp with the
name of essence in the dialectical process, when we ask and answer
questions. Of all this we may certainly affirm that we acquired the
knowledge before birth?

  That is true.

  But if, after having acquired, we have not forgotten that which we
acquired, then we must always have been born with knowledge, and shall
always continue to know as long as life lasts-for knowing is the
acquiring and retaining knowledge and not forgetting. Is not
forgetting, Simmias, just the losing of knowledge?

  Quite true, Socrates.

  But if the knowledge which we acquired before birth was lost by us
at birth, and afterwards by the use of the senses we recovered that
which we previously knew, will not that which we call learning be a
process of recovering our knowledge, and may not this be rightly
termed recollection by us?

  Very true.

  For this is clear, that when we perceived something, either by the
help of sight or hearing, or some other sense, there was no difficulty
in receiving from this a conception of some other thing like or unlike
which had been forgotten and which was associated with this; and
therefore, as I was saying, one of two alternatives follows: either we
had this knowledge at birth, and continued to know through life; or,
after birth, those who are said to learn only remember, and learning
is recollection only.

  Yes, that is quite true, Socrates.

  And which alternative, Simmias, do you prefer? Had we the
knowledge at our birth, or did we remember afterwards the things which
we knew previously to our birth?

  I cannot decide at the moment.

  At any rate you can decide whether he who has knowledge ought or
ought not to be able to give a reason for what he knows.

  Certainly, he ought.

  But do you think that every man is able to give a reason about these
very matters of which we are speaking?

  I wish that they could, Socrates, but I greatly fear that
to-morrow at this time there will be no one able to give a reason
worth having.

  Then you are not of opinion, Simmias, that all men know these
things?

  Certainly not.

  Then they are in process of recollecting that which they learned
before.

  Certainly.

  But when did our souls acquire this knowledge?-not since we were
born as men?

  Certainly not.

  And therefore previously?

  Yes.

  Then, Simmias, our souls must have existed before they were in the
form of man-without bodies, and must have had intelligence.

  Unless indeed you suppose, Socrates, that these notions were given
us at the moment of birth; for this is the only time that remains.

  Yes, my friend, but when did we lose them? for they are not in us
when we are born-that is admitted. Did we lose them at the moment of
receiving them, or at some other time?

  No, Socrates, I perceive that I was unconsciously talking nonsense.

  Then may we not say, Simmias, that if, as we are always repeating,
there is an absolute beauty, and goodness, and essence in general, and
to this, which is now discovered to be a previous condition of our
being, we refer all our sensations, and with this compare
them-assuming this to have a prior existence, then our souls must have
had a prior existence, but if not, there would be no force in the
argument? There can be no doubt that if these absolute ideas existed
before we were born, then our souls must have existed before we were
born, and if not the ideas, then not the souls.

  Yes, Socrates; I am convinced that there is precisely the same
necessity for the existence of the soul before birth, and of the
essence of which you are speaking: and the argument arrives at a
result which happily agrees with my own notion. For there is nothing
which to my mind is so evident as that beauty, goodness, and other
notions of which you were just now speaking have a most real and
absolute existence; and I am satisfied with the proof.

  Well, but is Cebes equally satisfied? for I must convince him too.

  I think, said Simmias, that Cebes is satisfied: although he is the
most incredulous of mortals, yet I believe that he is convinced of the
existence of the soul before birth. But that after death the soul will
continue to exist is not yet proven even to my own satisfaction. I
cannot get rid of the feeling of the many to which Cebes was
referring-the feeling that when the man dies the soul may be
scattered, and that this may be the end of her. For admitting that she
may be generated and created in some other place, and may have existed
before entering the human body, why after having entered in and gone
out again may she not herself be destroyed and come to an end?

  Very true, Simmias, said Cebes; that our soul existed before we were
born was the first half of the argument, and this appears to have been
proven; that the soul will exist after death as well as before birth
is the other half of which the proof is still wanting, and has to be
supplied.

  But that proof, Simmias and Cebes, has been already given, said
Socrates, if you put the two arguments together-I mean this and the
former one, in which we admitted that everything living is born of the
dead. For if the soul existed before birth, and in coming to life
and being born can be born only from death and dying, must she not
after death continue to exist, since she has to be born again?
surely the proof which you desire has been already furnished. Still
I suspect that you and Simmias would be glad to probe the argument
further; like children, you are haunted with a fear that when the soul
leaves the body, the wind may really blow her away and scatter her;
especially if a man should happen to die in stormy weather and not
when the sky is calm.

  Cebes answered with a smile: Then, Socrates, you must argue us out
of our fears-and yet, strictly speaking, they are not our fears, but
there is a child within us to whom death is a sort of hobgoblin; him
too we must persuade not to be afraid when he is alone with him in the
dark.

  Socrates said: Let the voice of the charmer be applied daily until
you have charmed him away.

  And where shall we find a good charmer of our fears, Socrates,
when you are gone?

  Hellas, he replied, is a large place, Cebes, and has many good
men, and there are barbarous races not a few: seek for him among
them all, far and wide, sparing neither pains nor money; for there
is no better way of using your money. And you must not forget to
seek for him among yourselves too; for he is nowhere more likely to be
found.

  The search, replied Cebes, shall certainly be made. And now, if
you please, let us return to the point of the argument at which we
digressed.

  By all means, replied Socrates; what else should I please?

  Very good, he said.

  Must we not, said Socrates, ask ourselves some question of this
sort?-What is that which, as we imagine, is liable to be scattered
away, and about which we fear? and what again is that about which we
have no fear? And then we may proceed to inquire whether that which
suffers dispersion is or is not of the nature of soul-our hopes and
fears as to our own souls will turn upon that.

  That is true, he said.

  Now the compound or composite may be supposed to be naturally
capable of being dissolved in like manner as of being compounded;
but that which is uncompounded, and that only, must be, if anything
is, indissoluble.

  Yes; that is what I should imagine, said Cebes.

  And the uncompounded may be assumed to be the same and unchanging,
where the compound is always changing and never the same?

  That I also think, he said.

  Then now let us return to the previous discussion. Is that idea or
essence, which in the dialectical process we define as essence of true
existence-whether essence of equality, beauty, or anything else: are
these essences, I say, liable at times to some degree of change? or
are they each of them always what they are, having the same simple,
self-existent and unchanging forms, and not admitting of variation
at all, or in any way, or at any time?

  They must be always the same, Socrates, replied Cebes.

  And what would you say of the many beautiful-whether men or horses
or garments or any other things which may be called equal or
beautiful-are they all unchanging and the same always, or quite the
reverse? May they not rather be described as almost always changing
and hardly ever the same either with themselves or with one another?

  The latter, replied Cebes; they are always in a state of change.

  And these you can touch and see and perceive with the senses, but
the unchanging things you can only perceive with the mind-they are
invisible and are not seen?

  That is very true, he said.

  Well, then, he added, let us suppose that there are two sorts of
existences, one seen, the other unseen.

  Let us suppose them.

  The seen is the changing, and the unseen is the unchanging.

  That may be also supposed.

  And, further, is not one part of us body, and the rest of us soul?

  To be sure.

  And to which class may we say that the body is more alike and akin?

  Clearly to the seen: no one can doubt that.

  And is the soul seen or not seen?

  Not by man, Socrates.

  And by "seen" and "not seen" is meant by us that which is or is
not visible to the eye of man?

  Yes, to the eye of man.

  And what do we say of the soul? is that seen or not seen?

  Not seen.

  Unseen then?

  Yes.

  Then the soul is more like to the unseen, and the body to the seen?

  That is most certain, Socrates.

  And were we not saying long ago that the soul when using the body as
an instrument of perception, that is to say, when using the sense of
sight or hearing or some other sense (for the meaning of perceiving
through the body is perceiving through the senses)-were we not
saying that the soul too is then dragged by the body into the region
of the changeable, and wanders and is confused; the world spins
round her, and she is like a drunkard when under their influence?

  Very true.

  But when returning into herself she reflects; then she passes into
the realm of purity, and eternity, and immortality, and
unchangeableness, which are her kindred, and with them she ever lives,
when she is by herself and is not let or hindered; then she ceases
from her erring ways, and being in communion with the unchanging is
unchanging. And this state of the soul is called wisdom?

  That is well and truly said, Socrates, he replied.

  And to which class is the soul more nearly alike and akin, as far as
may be inferred from this argument, as well as from the preceding one?

  I think, Socrates, that, in the opinion of everyone who follows
the argument, the soul will be infinitely more like the unchangeable
even the most stupid person will not deny that.

  And the body is more like the changing?

  Yes.

  Yet once more consider the matter in this light: When the soul and
the body are united, then nature orders the soul to rule and govern,
and the body to obey and serve.

  Now which of these two functions is akin to the divine? and which to
the mortal? Does not the divine appear to you to be that which
naturally orders and rules, and the mortal that which is subject and
servant?

  True.

  And which does the soul resemble?

  The soul resembles the divine and the body the mortal-there can be
no doubt of that, Socrates.

  Then reflect, Cebes: is not the conclusion of the whole matter
this?-that the soul is in the very likeness of the divine, and
immortal, and intelligible, and uniform, and indissoluble, and
unchangeable; and the body is in the very likeness of the human, and
mortal, and unintelligible, and multiform, and dissoluble, and
changeable. Can this, my dear Cebes, be denied?

  No, indeed.

  But if this is true, then is not the body liable to speedy
dissolution?

  and is not the soul almost or altogether indissoluble?

  Certainly.

  And do you further observe, that after a man is dead, the body,
which is the visible part of man, and has a visible framework, which
is called a corpse, and which would naturally be dissolved and
decomposed and dissipated, is not dissolved or decomposed at once, but
may remain for a good while, if the constitution be sound at the
time of death, and the season of the year favorable? For the body when
shrunk and embalmed, as is the custom in Egypt, may remain almost
entire through infinite ages; and even in decay, still there are
some portions, such as the bones and ligaments, which are
practically indestructible. You allow that?

  Yes.

  And are we to suppose that the soul, which is invisible, in
passing to the true Hades, which like her is invisible, and pure,
and noble, and on her way to the good and wise God, whither, if God
will, my soul is also soon to go-that the soul, I repeat, if this be
her nature and origin, is blown away and perishes immediately on
quitting the body as the many say? That can never be, dear Simmias and
Cebes. The truth rather is that the soul which is pure at departing
draws after her no bodily taint, having never voluntarily had
connection with the body, which she is ever avoiding, herself gathered
into herself (for such abstraction has been the study of her life).
And what does this mean but that she has been a true disciple of
philosophy and has practised how to die easily? And is not
philosophy the practice of death?

  Certainly.

  That soul, I say, herself invisible, departs to the invisible
worldto the divine and immortal and rational: thither arriving, she
lives in bliss and is released from the error and folly of men,
their fears and wild passions and all other human ills, and forever
dwells, as they say of the initiated, in company with the gods. Is not
this true, Cebes?

  Yes, said Cebes, beyond a doubt.

  But the soul which has been polluted, and is impure at the time of
her departure, and is the companion and servant of the body always,
and is in love with and fascinated by the body and by the desires
and pleasures of the body, until she is led to believe that the
truth only exists in a bodily form, which a man may touch and see
and taste and use for the purposes of his lusts-the soul, I mean,
accustomed to hate and fear and avoid the intellectual principle,
which to the bodily eye is dark and invisible, and can be attained
only by philosophy-do you suppose that such a soul as this will depart
pure and unalloyed?

  That is impossible, he replied.

  She is engrossed by the corporeal, which the continual association
and constant care of the body have made natural to her.

  Very true.

  And this, my friend, may be conceived to be that heavy, weighty,
earthy element of sight by which such a soul is depressed and
dragged down again into the visible world, because she is afraid of
the invisible and of the world below-prowling about tombs and
sepulchres, in the neighborhood of which, as they tell us, are seen
certain ghostly apparitions of souls which have not departed pure, but
are cloyed with sight and therefore visible.

  That is very likely, Socrates.

  Yes, that is very likely, Cebes; and these must be the souls, not of
the good, but of the evil, who are compelled to wander about such
places in payment of the penalty of their former evil way of life; and
they continue to wander until the desire which haunts them is
satisfied and they are imprisoned in another body. And they may be
supposed to be fixed in the same natures which they had in their
former life.

  What natures do you mean, Socrates?

  I mean to say that men who have followed after gluttony, and
wantonness, and drunkenness, and have had no thought of avoiding them,
would pass into asses and animals of that sort. What do you think?

  I think that exceedingly probable.

  And those who have chosen the portion of injustice, and tyranny, and
violence, will pass into wolves, or into hawks and kites; whither else
can we suppose them to go?

  Yes, said Cebes; that is doubtless the place of natures such as
theirs. And there is no difficulty, he said, in assigning to all of
them places answering to their several natures and propensities?

  There is not, he said.

  Even among them some are happier than others; and the happiest
both in themselves and their place of abode are those who have
practised the civil and social virtues which are called temperance and
justice, and are acquired by habit and attention without philosophy
and mind.

  Why are they the happiest?

  Because they may be expected to pass into some gentle, social nature
which is like their own, such as that of bees or ants, or even back
again into the form of man, and just and moderate men spring from
them.

  That is not impossible.

  But he who is a philosopher or lover of learning, and is entirely
pure at departing, is alone permitted to reach the gods. And this is
the reason, Simmias and Cebes, why the true votaries of philosophy
abstain from all fleshly lusts, and endure and refuse to give
themselves up to them-not because they fear poverty or the ruin of
their families, like the lovers of money, and the world in general;
nor like the lovers of power and honor, because they dread the
dishonor or disgrace of evil deeds.

  No, Socrates, that would not become them, said Cebes.

  No, indeed, he replied; and therefore they who have a care of
their souls, and do not merely live in the fashions of the body, say
farewell to all this; they will not walk in the ways of the blind: and
when philosophy offers them purification and release from evil, they
feel that they ought not to resist her influence, and to her they
incline, and whither she leads they follow her.

  What do you mean, Socrates?

  I will tell you, he said. The lovers of knowledge are conscious that
their souls, when philosophy receives them, are simply fastened and
glued to their bodies: the soul is only able to view existence through
the bars of a prison, and not in her own nature; she is wallowing in
the mire of all ignorance; and philosophy, seeing the terrible
nature of her confinement, and that the captive through desire is
led to conspire in her own captivity (for the lovers of knowledge
are aware that this was the original state of the soul, and that
when she was in this state philosophy received and gently counseled
her, and wanted to release her, pointing out to her that the eye is
full of deceit, and also the ear and other senses, and persuading
her to retire from them in all but the necessary use of them and to be
gathered up and collected into herself, and to trust only to herself
and her own intuitions of absolute existence, and mistrust that
which comes to her through others and is subject to
vicissitude)-philosophy shows her that this is visible and tangible,
but that what she sees in her own nature is intellectual and
invisible. And the soul of the true philosopher thinks that she
ought not to resist this deliverance, and therefore abstains from
pleasures and desires and pains and fears, as far as she is able;
reflecting that when a man has great joys or sorrows or fears or
desires he suffers from them, not the sort of evil which might be
anticipated-as, for example, the loss of his health or property, which
he has sacrificed to his lusts-but he has suffered an evil greater
far, which is the greatest and worst of all evils, and one of which he
never thinks.

  And what is that, Socrates? said Cebes.

  Why, this: When the feeling of pleasure or pain in the soul is
most intense, all of us naturally suppose that the object of this
intense feeling is then plainest and truest: but this is not the case.

  Very true.

  And this is the state in which the soul is most enthralled by the
body.

  How is that?

  Why, because each pleasure and pain is a sort of nail which nails
and rivets the soul to the body, and engrosses her and makes her
believe that to be true which the body affirms to be true; and from
agreeing with the body and having the same delights she is obliged
to have the same habits and ways, and is not likely ever to be pure at
her departure to the world below, but is always saturated with the
body; so that she soon sinks into another body and there germinates
and grows, and has therefore no part in the communion of the divine
and pure and simple.

  That is most true, Socrates, answered Cebes.

  And this, Cebes, is the reason why the true lovers of knowledge
are temperate and brave; and not for the reason which the world gives.

  Certainly not.

  Certainly not! For not in that way does the soul of a philosopher
reason; she will not ask philosophy to release her in order that
when released she may deliver herself up again to the thraldom of
pleasures and pains, doing a work only to be undone again, weaving
instead of unweaving her Penelope's web. But she will make herself a
calm of passion and follow Reason, and dwell in her, beholding the
true and divine (which is not matter of opinion), and thence derive
nourishment. Thus she seeks to live while she lives, and after death
she hopes to go to her own kindred and to be freed from human ills.
Never fear, Simmias and Cebes, that a soul which has been thus
nurtured and has had these pursuits, will at her departure from the
body be scattered and blown away by the winds and be nowhere and
nothing.

  When Socrates had done speaking, for a considerable time there was
silence; he himself and most of us appeared to be meditating on what
had been said; only Cebes and Simmias spoke a few words to one
another. And Socrates observing this asked them what they thought of
the argument, and whether there was anything wanting? For, said he,
much is still open to suspicion and attack, if anyone were disposed to
sift the matter thoroughly. If you are talking of something else I
would rather not interrupt you, but if you are still doubtful about
the argument do not hesitate to say exactly what you think, and let us
have anything better which you can suggest; and if I am likely to be
of any use, allow me to help you.

  Simmias said: I must confess, Socrates, that doubts did arise in our
minds, and each of us was urging and inciting the other to put the
question which he wanted to have answered and which neither of us
liked to ask, fearing that our importunity might be troublesome
under present circumstances.

  Socrates smiled and said: O Simmias, how strange that is; I am not
very likely to persuade other men that I do not regard my present
situation as a misfortune, if I am unable to persuade you, and you
will keep fancying that I am at all more troubled now than at any
other time. Will you not allow that I have as much of the spirit of
prophecy in me as the swans? For they, when they perceive that they
must die, having sung all their life long, do then sing more than
ever, rejoicing in the thought that they are about to go away to the
god whose ministers they are. But men, because they are themselves
afraid of death, slanderously affirm of the swans that they sing a
lament at the last, not considering that no bird sings when cold, or
hungry, or in pain, not even the nightingale, nor the swallow, nor yet
the hoopoe; which are said indeed to tune a lay of sorrow, although
I do not believe this to be true of them any more than of the swans.
But because they are sacred to Apollo and have the gift of prophecy
and anticipate the good things of another world, therefore they sing
and rejoice in that day more than they ever did before. And I, too,
believing myself to be the consecrated servant of the same God, and
the fellow servant of the swans, and thinking that I have received
from my master gifts of prophecy which are not inferior to theirs,
would not go out of life less merrily than the swans. Cease to mind
then about this, but speak and ask anything which you like, while
the eleven magistrates of Athens allow.

  Well, Socrates, said Simmias, then I will tell you my difficulty,
and Cebes will tell you his. For I dare say that you, Socrates,
feel, as I do, how very hard or almost impossible is the attainment of
any certainty about questions such as these in the present life. And
yet I should deem him a coward who did not prove what is said about
them to the uttermost, or whose heart failed him before he had
examined them on every side. For he should persevere until he has
attained one of two things: either he should discover or learn the
truth about them; or, if this is impossible, I would have him take the
best and most irrefragable of human notions, and let this be the
raft upon which he sails through life-not without risk, as I admit, if
he cannot find some word of God which will more surely and safely
carry him. And now, as you bid me, I will venture to question you,
as I should not like to reproach myself hereafter with not having said
at the time what I think. For when I consider the matter either
alone or with Cebes, the argument does certainly appear to me,
Socrates, to be not sufficient.

  Socrates answered: I dare say, my friend, that you may be right, but
I should like to know in what respect the argument is not sufficient.

  In this respect, replied Simmias: Might not a person use the same
argument about harmony and the lyre-might he not say that harmony is a
thing invisible, incorporeal, fair, divine, abiding in the lyre
which is harmonized, but that the lyre and the strings are matter
and material, composite, earthy, and akin to mortality? And when
someone breaks the lyre, or cuts and rends the strings, then he who
takes this view would argue as you do, and on the same analogy, that
the harmony survives and has not perished; for you cannot imagine,
as we would say, that the lyre without the strings, and the broken
strings themselves, remain, and yet that the harmony, which is of
heavenly and immortal nature and kindred, has perished-and perished
too before the mortal. The harmony, he would say, certainly exists
somewhere, and the wood and strings will decay before that decays. For
I suspect, Socrates, that the notion of the soul which we are all of
us inclined to entertain, would also be yours, and that you too
would conceive the body to be strung up, and held together, by the
elements of hot and cold, wet and dry, and the like, and that the soul
is the harmony or due proportionate admixture of them. And, if this is
true, the inference clearly is that when the strings of the body are
unduly loosened or overstrained through disorder or other injury, then
the soul, though most divine, like other harmonies of music or of
the works of art, of course perishes at once, although the material
remains of the body may last for a considerable time, until they are
either decayed or burnt. Now if anyone maintained that the soul, being
the harmony of the elements of the body, first perishes in that
which is called death, how shall we answer him?

  Socrates looked round at us as his manner was, and said, with a
smile: Simmias has reason on his side; and why does not some one of
you who is abler than myself answer him? for there is force in his
attack upon me. But perhaps, before we answer him, we had better
also hear what Cebes has to say against the argument-this will give us
time for reflection, and when both of them have spoken, we may
either assent to them if their words appear to be in consonance with
the truth, or if not, we may take up the other side, and argue with
them. Please to tell me then, Cebes, he said, what was the
difficulty which troubled you?

  Cebes said: I will tell you. My feeling is that the argument is
still in the same position, and open to the same objections which were
urged before; for I am ready to admit that the existence of the soul
before entering into the bodily form has been very ingeniously, and,
as I may be allowed to say, quite sufficiently proven; but the
existence of the soul after death is still, in my judgment,
unproven. Now my objection is not the same as that of Simmias; for I
am not disposed to deny that the soul is stronger and more lasting
than the body, being of opinion that in all such respects the soul
very far excels the body. Well, then, says the argument to me, why
do you remain unconvinced? When you see that the weaker is still in
existence after the man is dead, will you not admit that the more
lasting must also survive during the same period of time? Now I,
like Simmias, must employ a figure; and I shall ask you to consider
whether the figure is to the point. The parallel which I will
suppose is that of an old weaver, who dies, and after his death
somebody says: He is not dead, he must be alive; and he appeals to the
coat which he himself wove and wore, and which is still whole and
undecayed. And then he proceeds to ask of someone who is
incredulous, whether a man lasts longer, or the coat which is in use
and wear; and when he is answered that a man lasts far longer,
thinks that he has thus certainly demonstrated the survival of the
man, who is the more lasting, because the less lasting remains. But
that, Simmias, as I would beg you to observe, is not the truth;
everyone sees that he who talks thus is talking nonsense. For the
truth is that this weaver, having worn and woven many such coats,
though he outlived several of them, was himself outlived by the
last; but this is surely very far from proving that a man is
slighter and weaker than a coat. Now the relation of the body to the
soul may be expressed in a similar figure; for you may say with reason
that the soul is lasting, and the body weak and short-lived in
comparison. And every soul may be said to wear out many bodies,
especially in the course of a long life. For if while the man is alive
the body deliquesces and decays, and yet the soul always weaves her
garment anew and repairs the waste, then of course, when the soul
perishes, she must have on her last garment, and this only will
survive her; but then again when the soul is dead the body will at
last show its native weakness, and soon pass into decay. And therefore
this is an argument on which I would rather not rely as proving that
the soul exists after death. For suppose that we grant even more
than you affirm as within the range of possibility, and besides
acknowledging that the soul existed before birth admit also that after
death the souls of some are existing still, and will exist, and will
be born and die again and again, and that there is a natural
strength in the soul which will hold out and be born many times-for
all this, we may be still inclined to think that she will weary in the
labors of successive births, and may at last succumb in one of her
deaths and utterly perish; and this death and dissolution of the
body which brings destruction to the soul may be unknown to any of us,
for no one of us can have had any experience of it: and if this be
true, then I say that he who is confident in death has but a foolish
confidence, unless he is able to prove that the soul is altogether
immortal and imperishable. But if he is not able to prove this, he who
is about to die will always have reason to fear that when the body
is disunited, the soul also may utterly perish.

  All of us, as we afterwards remarked to one another, had an
unpleasant feeling at hearing them say this. When we had been so
firmly convinced before, now to have our faith shaken seemed to
introduce a confusion and uncertainty, not only into the previous
argument, but into any future one; either we were not good judges,
or there were no real grounds of belief.

  Ech. There I feel with you-indeed I do, Phaedo, and when you were
speaking, I was beginning to ask myself the same question: What
argument can I ever trust again? For what could be more convincing
than the argument of Socrates, which has now fallen into discredit?
That the soul is a harmony is a doctrine which has always had a
wonderful attraction for me, and, when mentioned, came back to me at
once, as my own original conviction. And now I must begin again and
find another argument which will assure me that when the man is dead
the soul dies not with him. Tell me, I beg, how did Socrates
proceed? Did he appear to share the unpleasant feeling which you
mention? or did he receive the interruption calmly and give a
sufficient answer? Tell us, as exactly as you can, what passed.

  Phaed. Often, Echecrates, as I have admired Socrates, I never
admired him more than at that moment. That he should be able to answer
was nothing, but what astonished me was, first, the gentle and
pleasant and approving manner in which he regarded the words of the
young men, and then his quick sense of the wound which had been
inflicted by the argument, and his ready application of the healing
art. He might be compared to a general rallying his defeated and
broken army, urging them to follow him and return to the field of
argument.

  Ech. How was that?

  Phaed. You shall hear, for I was close to him on his right hand,
seated on a sort of stool, and he on a couch which was a good deal
higher. Now he had a way of playing with my hair, and then he smoothed
my head, and pressed the hair upon my neck, and said: To-morrow,
Phaedo, I suppose that these fair locks of yours will be severed.

  Yes, Socrates, I suppose that they will, I replied.

  Not so if you will take my advice.

  What shall I do with them? I said.

  To-day, he replied, and not to-morrow, if this argument dies and
cannot be brought to life again by us, you and I will both shave our
locks; and if I were you, and could not maintain my ground against
Simmias and Cebes, I would myself take an oath, like the Argives,
not to wear hair any more until I had renewed the conflict and
defeated them.

  Yes, I said, but Heracles himself is said not to be a match for two.

  Summon me then, he said, and I will be your Iolaus until the sun
goes down.

  I summon you rather, I said, not as Heracles summoning Iolaus, but
as Iolaus might summon Heracles.

  That will be all the same, he said. But first let us take care
that we avoid a danger.

  And what is that? I said.

  The danger of becoming misologists, he replied, which is one of
the very worst things that can happen to us. For as there are
misanthropists or haters of men, there are also misologists or
haters of ideas, and both spring from the same cause, which is
ignorance of the world. Misanthropy arises from the too great
confidence of inexperience; you trust a man and think him altogether
true and good and faithful, and then in a little while he turns out to
be false and knavish; and then another and another, and when this
has happened several times to a man, especially within the circle of
his most trusted friends, as he deems them, and he has often quarreled
with them, he at last hates all men, and believes that no one has
any good in him at all. I dare say that you must have observed this.

  Yes, I said.

  And is not this discreditable? The reason is that a man, having to
deal with other men, has no knowledge of them; for if he had knowledge
he would have known the true state of the case, that few are the
good and few the evil, and that the great majority are in the interval
between them.

  How do you mean? I said.

  I mean, he replied, as you might say of the very large and very
small, that nothing is more uncommon than a very large or a very small
man; and this applies generally to all extremes, whether of great
and small, or swift and slow, or fair and foul, or black and white:
and whether the instances you select be men or dogs or anything
else, few are the extremes, but many are in the mean between them. Did
you never observe this?

  Yes, I said, I have.

  And do you not imagine, he said, that if there were a competition of
evil, the first in evil would be found to be very few?

  Yes, that is very likely, I said.

  Yes, that is very likely, he replied; not that in this respect
arguments are like men-there I was led on by you to say more than I
had intended; but the point of comparison was that when a simple man
who has no skill in dialectics believes an argument to be true which
he afterwards imagines to be false, whether really false or not, and
then another and another, he has no longer any faith left, and great
disputers, as you know, come to think, at last that they have grown to
be the wisest of mankind; for they alone perceive the utter
unsoundness and instability of all arguments, or, indeed, of all
things, which, like the currents in the Euripus, are going up and down
in never-ceasing ebb and flow.

  That is quite true, I said.

  Yes, Phaedo, he replied, and very melancholy too, if there be such a
thing as truth or certainty or power of knowing at all, that a man
should have lighted upon some argument or other which at first
seemed true and then turned out to be false, and instead of blaming
himself and his own want of wit, because he is annoyed, should at last
be too glad to transfer the blame from himself to arguments in
general; and forever afterwards should hate and revile them, and
lose the truth and knowledge of existence.

  Yes, indeed, I said; that is very melancholy.

  Let us, then, in the first place, he said, be careful of admitting
into our souls the notion that there is no truth or health or
soundness in any arguments at all; but let us rather say that there is
as yet no health in us, and that we must quit ourselves like men and
do our best to gain health-you and all other men with a view to the
whole of your future life, and I myself with a view to death. For at
this moment I am sensible that I have not the temper of a philosopher;
like the vulgar, I am only a partisan. For the partisan, when he is
engaged in a dispute, cares nothing about the rights of the
question, but is anxious only to convince his hearers of his own
assertions. And the difference between him and me at the present
moment is only this-that whereas he seeks to convince his hearers that
what he says is true, I am rather seeking to convince myself; to
convince my hearers is a secondary matter with me. And do but see
how much I gain by this. For if what I say is true, then I do well
to be persuaded of the truth, but if there be nothing after death,
still, during the short time that remains, I shall save my friends
from lamentations, and my ignorance will not last, and therefore no
harm will be done. This is the state of mind, Simmias and Cebes, in
which I approach the argument. And I would ask you to be thinking of
the truth and not of Socrates: agree with me, if I seem to you to be
speaking the truth; or if not, withstand me might and main, that I may
not deceive you as well as myself in my enthusiasm, and, like the bee,
leave my sting in you before I die.

  And now let us proceed, he said. And first of all let me be sure
that I have in my mind what you were saying. Simmias, if I remember
rightly, has fears and misgivings whether the soul, being in the
form of harmony, although a fairer and diviner thing than the body,
may not perish first. On the other hand, Cebes appeared to grant
that the soul was more lasting than the body, but he said that no
one could know whether the soul, after having worn out many bodies,
might not perish herself and leave her last body behind her; and
that this is death, which is the destruction not of the body but of
the soul, for in the body the work of destruction is ever going on.
Are not these, Simmias and Cebes, the points which we have to
consider?

  They both agreed to this statement of them.

  He proceeded: And did you deny the force of the whole preceding
argument, or of a part only?

  Of a part only, they replied.

  And what did you think, he said, of that part of the argument in
which we said that knowledge was recollection only, and inferred
from this that the soul must have previously existed somewhere else
before she was enclosed in the body? Cebes said that he had been
wonderfully impressed by that part of the argument, and that his
conviction remained unshaken. Simmias agreed, and added that he
himself could hardly imagine the possibility of his ever thinking
differently about that.

  But, rejoined Socrates, you will have to think differently, my
Theban friend, if you still maintain that harmony is a compound, and
that the soul is a harmony which is made out of strings set in the
frame of the body; for you will surely never allow yourself to say
that a harmony is prior to the elements which compose the harmony.

  No, Socrates, that is impossible.

  But do you not see that you are saying this when you say that the
soul existed before she took the form and body of man, and was made up
of elements which as yet had no existence? For harmony is not a sort
of thing like the soul, as you suppose; but first the lyre, and the
strings, and the sounds exist in a state of discord, and then
harmony is made last of all, and perishes first. And how can such a
notion of the soul as this agree with the other?

  Not at all, replied Simmias.

  And yet, he said, there surely ought to be harmony when harmony is
the theme of discourse.

  There ought, replied Simmias.

  But there is no harmony, he said, in the two propositions that
knowledge is recollection, and that the soul is a harmony. Which of
them, then, will you retain?

  I think, he replied, that I have a much stronger faith, Socrates, in
the first of the two, which has been fully demonstrated to me, than in
the latter, which has not been demonstrated at all, but rests only
on probable and plausible grounds; and I know too well that these
arguments from probabilities are impostors, and unless great caution
is observed in the use of them they are apt to be deceptive-in
geometry, and in other things too. But the doctrine of knowledge and
recollection has been proven to me on trustworthy grounds; and the
proof was that the soul must have existed before she came into the
body, because to her belongs the essence of which the very name
implies existence. Having, as I am convinced, rightly accepted this
conclusion, and on sufficient grounds, I must, as I suppose, cease
to argue or allow others to argue that the soul is a harmony.

  Let me put the matter, Simmias, he said, in another point of view:
Do you imagine that a harmony or any other composition can be in a
state other than that of the elements out of which it is compounded?

  Certainly not.

  Or do or suffer anything other than they do or suffer?

  He agreed.

  Then a harmony does not lead the parts or elements which make up the
harmony, but only follows them.

  He assented.

  For harmony cannot possibly have any motion, or sound, or other
quality which is opposed to the parts.

  That would be impossible, he replied.

  And does not every harmony depend upon the manner in which the
elements are harmonized?

  I do not understand you, he said.

  I mean to say that a harmony admits of degrees, and is more of a
harmony, and more completely a harmony, when more completely
harmonized, if that be possible; and less of a harmony, and less
completely a harmony, when less harmonized.

  True.

  But does the soul admit of degrees? or is one soul in the very least
degree more or less, or more or less completely, a soul than another?

  Not in the least.

  Yet surely one soul is said to have intelligence and virtue, and
to be good, and another soul is said to have folly and vice, and to be
an evil soul: and this is said truly?

  Yes, truly.

  But what will those who maintain the soul to be a harmony say of
this presence of virtue and vice in the soul?-Will they say that there
is another harmony, and another discord, and that the virtuous soul is
harmonized, and herself being a harmony has another harmony within
her, and that the vicious soul is inharmonical and has no harmony
within her?

  I cannot say, replied Simmias; but I suppose that something of
that kind would be asserted by those who take this view.

  And the admission is already made that no soul is more a soul than
another; and this is equivalent to admitting that harmony is not
more or less harmony, or more or less completely a harmony?

  Quite true.

  And that which is not more or less a harmony is not more or less
harmonized?

  True.

  And that which is not more or less harmonized cannot have more or
less of harmony, but only an equal harmony?

  Yes, an equal harmony.

  Then one soul not being more or less absolutely a soul than another,
is not more or less harmonized?

  Exactly.

  And therefore has neither more nor less of harmony or of discord?

  She has not.

  And having neither more nor less of harmony or of discord, one
soul has no more vice or virtue than another, if vice be discord and
virtue harmony?

  Not at all more.

  Or speaking more correctly, Simmias, the soul, if she is a
harmony, will never have any vice; because a harmony, being absolutely
a harmony, has no part in the inharmonical?

  No.

  And therefore a soul which is absolutely a soul has no vice?

  How can she have, consistently with the preceding argument?

  Then, according to this, if the souls of all animals are equally and
absolutely souls, they will be equally good?

  I agree with you, Socrates, he said.

  And can all this be true, think you? he said; and are all these
consequences admissible-which nevertheless seem to follow from the
assumption that the soul is a harmony?

  Certainly not, he said.

  Once more, he said, what ruling principle is there of human things
other than the soul, and especially the wise soul? Do you know of any?

  Indeed, I do not.

  And is the soul in agreement with the affections of the body? or
is she at variance with them? For example, when the body is hot and
thirsty, does not the soul incline us against drinking? and when the
body is hungry, against eating? And this is only one instance out of
ten thousand of the opposition of the soul to the things of the body.

  Very true.

  But we have already acknowledged that the soul, being a harmony, can
never utter a note at variance with the tensions and relaxations and
vibrations and other affections of the strings out of which she is
composed; she can only follow, she cannot lead them?

  Yes, he said, we acknowledged that, certainly.

  And yet do we not now discover the soul to be doing the exact
opposite-leading the elements of which she is believed to be composed;
almost always opposing and coercing them in all sorts of ways
throughout life, sometimes more violently with the pains of medicine
and gymnastic; then again more gently; threatening and also
reprimanding the desires, passions, fears, as if talking to a thing
which is not herself, as Homer in the "Odyssey" represents Odysseus
doing in the words,

     "He beat his breast, and thus reproached his heart:

     Endure, my heart; far worse hast thou endured!"

Do you think that Homer could have written this under the idea that
the soul is a harmony capable of being led by the affections of the
body, and not rather of a nature which leads and masters them; and
herself a far diviner thing than any harmony?

  Yes, Socrates, I quite agree to that.

  Then, my friend, we can never be right in saying that the soul is
a harmony, for that would clearly contradict the divine Homer as
well as ourselves.

  True, he said.

  Thus much, said Socrates, of Harmonia, your Theban goddess, Cebes,
who has not been ungracious to us, I think; but what shall I say to
the Theban Cadmus, and how shall I propitiate him?

  I think that you will discover a way of propitiating him, said
Cebes; I am sure that you have answered the argument about harmony
in a manner that I could never have expected. For when Simmias
mentioned his objection, I quite imagined that no answer could be
given to him, and therefore I was surprised at finding that his
argument could not sustain the first onset of yours; and not
impossibly the other, whom you call Cadmus, may share a similar fate.

  Nay, my good friend, said Socrates, let us not boast, lest some evil
eye should put to flight the word which I am about to speak. That,
however, may be left in the hands of those above, while I draw near in
Homeric fashion, and try the mettle of your words. Briefly, the sum of
your objection is as follows: You want to have proven to you that
the soul is imperishable and immortal, and you think that the
philosopher who is confident in death has but a vain and foolish
confidence, if he thinks that he will fare better than one who has led
another sort of life, in the world below, unless he can prove this;
and you say that the demonstration of the strength and divinity of the
soul, and of her existence prior to our becoming men, does not
necessarily imply her immortality. Granting that the soul is
longlived, and has known and done much in a former state, still she is
not on that account immortal; and her entrance into the human form may
be a sort of disease which is the beginning of dissolution, and may at
last, after the toils of life are over, end in that which is called
death. And whether the soul enters into the body once only or many
times, that, as you would say, makes no difference in the fears of
individuals. For any man, who is not devoid of natural feeling, has
reason to fear, if he has no knowledge or proof of the soul's
immortality. That is what I suppose you to say, Cebes, which I
designedly repeat, in order that nothing may escape us, and that you
may, if you wish, add or subtract anything.

  But, said Cebes, as far as I can see at present, I have nothing to
add or subtract; you have expressed my meaning.

  Socrates paused awhile, and seemed to be absorbed in reflection.
At length he said: This is a very serious inquiry which you are
raising, Cebes, involving the whole question of generation and
corruption, about which I will, if you like, give you my own
experience; and you can apply this, if you think that anything which I
say will avail towards the solution of your difficulty.

  I should very much like, said Cebes, to hear what you have to say.

  Then I will tell you, said Socrates. When I was young, Cebes, I
had a prodigious desire to know that department of philosophy which is
called Natural Science; this appeared to me to have lofty aims, as
being the science which has to do with the causes of things, and which
teaches why a thing is, and is created and destroyed; and I was always
agitating myself with the consideration of such questions as these: Is
the growth of animals the result of some decay which the hot and
cold principle contracts, as some have said? Is the blood the
element with which we think, or the air, or the fire? or perhaps
nothing of this sort-but the brain may be the originating power of the
perceptions of hearing and sight and smell, and memory and opinion may
come from them, and science may be based on memory and opinion when no
longer in motion, but at rest. And then I went on to examine the decay
of them, and then to the things of heaven and earth, and at last I
concluded that I was wholly incapable of these inquiries, as I will
satisfactorily prove to you. For I was fascinated by them to such a
degree that my eyes grew blind to things that I had seemed to
myself, and also to others, to know quite well; and I forgot what I
had before thought to be self-evident, that the growth of man is the
result of eating and drinking; for when by the digestion of food flesh
is added to flesh and bone to bone, and whenever there is an
aggregation of congenial elements, the lesser bulk becomes larger
and the small man greater. Was not that a reasonable notion?

  Yes, said Cebes, I think so.

  Well; but let me tell you something more. There was a time when I
thought that I understood the meaning of greater and less pretty well;
and when I saw a great man standing by a little one I fancied that one
was taller than the other by a head; or one horse would appear to be
greater than another horse: and still more clearly did I seem to
perceive that ten is two more than eight, and that two cubits are more
than one, because two is twice one.

  And what is now your notion of such matters? said Cebes.

  I should be far enough from imagining, he replied, that I knew the
cause of any of them, indeed I should, for I cannot satisfy myself
that when one is added to one, the one to which the addition is made
becomes two, or that the two units added together make two by reason
of the addition. For I cannot understand how, when separated from
the other, each of them was one and not two, and now, when they are
brought together, the mere juxtaposition of them can be the cause of
their becoming two: nor can I understand how the division of one is
the way to make two; for then a different cause would produce the same
effect-as in the former instance the addition and juxtaposition of one
to one was the cause of two, in this the separation and subtraction of
one from the other would be the cause. Nor am I any longer satisfied
that I understand the reason why one or anything else either is
generated or destroyed or is at all, but I have in my mind some
confused notion of another method, and can never admit this.

  Then I heard someone who had a book of Anaxagoras, as he said, out
of which he read that mind was the disposer and cause of all, and I
was quite delighted at the notion of this, which appeared admirable,
and I said to myself: If mind is the disposer, mind will dispose all
for the best, and put each particular in the best place; and I
argued that if anyone desired to find out the cause of the
generation or destruction or existence of anything, he must find out
what state of being or suffering or doing was best for that thing, and
therefore a man had only to consider the best for himself and
others, and then he would also know the worse, for that the same
science comprised both. And I rejoiced to think that I had found in
Anaxagoras a teacher of the causes of existence such as I desired, and
I imagined that he would tell me first whether the earth is flat or
round; and then he would further explain the cause and the necessity
of this, and would teach me the nature of the best and show that
this was best; and if he said that the earth was in the centre, he
would explain that this position was the best, and I should be
satisfied if this were shown to me, and not want any other sort of
cause. And I thought that I would then go and ask him about the sun
and moon and stars, and that he would explain to me their
comparative swiftness, and their returnings and various states, and
how their several affections, active and passive, were all for the
best. For I could not imagine that when he spoke of mind as the
disposer of them, he would give any other account of their being as
they are, except that this was best; and I thought when he had
explained to me in detail the cause of each and the cause of all, he
would go on to explain to me what was best for each and what was
best for all. I had hopes which I would not have sold for much, and
I seized the books and read them as fast as I could in my eagerness to
know the better and the worse.

  What hopes I had formed, and how grievously was I disappointed! As I
proceeded, I found my philosopher altogether forsaking mind or any
other principle of order, but having recourse to air, and ether, and
water, and other eccentricities. I might compare him to a person who
began by maintaining generally that mind is the cause of the actions
of Socrates, but who, when he endeavored to explain the causes of my
several actions in detail, went on to show that I sit here because
my body is made up of bones and muscles; and the bones, as he would
say, are hard and have ligaments which divide them, and the muscles
are elastic, and they cover the bones, which have also a covering or
environment of flesh and skin which contains them; and as the bones
are lifted at their joints by the contraction or relaxation of the
muscles, I am able to bend my limbs, and this is why I am sitting here
in a curved posture: that is what he would say, and he would have a
similar explanation of my talking to you, which he would attribute
to sound, and air, and hearing, and he would assign ten thousand other
causes of the same sort, forgetting to mention the true cause, which
is that the Athenians have thought fit to condemn me, and
accordingly I have thought it better and more right to remain here and
undergo my sentence; for I am inclined to think that these muscles and
bones of mine would have gone off to Megara or Boeotia-by the dog of
Egypt they would, if they had been guided only by their own idea of
what was best, and if I had not chosen as the better and nobler
part, instead of playing truant and running away, to undergo any
punishment which the State inflicts. There is surely a strange
confusion of causes and conditions in all this. It may be said,
indeed, that without bones and muscles and the other parts of the body
I cannot execute my purposes. But to say that I do as I do because
of them, and that this is the way in which mind acts, and not from the
choice of the best, is a very careless and idle mode of speaking. I
wonder that they cannot distinguish the cause from the condition,
which the many, feeling about in the dark, are always mistaking and
misnaming. And thus one man makes a vortex all round and steadies
the earth by the heaven; another gives the air as a support to the
earth, which is a sort of broad trough. Any power which in disposing
them as they are disposes them for the best never enters into their
minds, nor do they imagine that there is any superhuman strength in
that; they rather expect to find another Atlas of the world who is
stronger and more everlasting and more containing than the good is,
and are clearly of opinion that the obligatory and containing power of
the good is as nothing; and yet this is the principle which I would
fain learn if anyone would teach me. But as I have failed either to
discover myself or to learn of anyone else, the nature of the best,
I will exhibit to you, if you like, what I have found to be the second
best mode of inquiring into the cause.

  I should very much like to hear that, he replied.

  Socrates proceeded: I thought that as I had failed in the
contemplation of true existence, I ought to be careful that I did
not lose the eye of my soul; as people may injure their bodily eye
by observing and gazing on the sun during an eclipse, unless they take
the precaution of only looking at the image reflected in the water, or
in some similar medium. That occurred to me, and I was afraid that
my soul might be blinded altogether if I looked at things with my eyes
or tried by the help of the senses to apprehend them. And I thought
that I had better have recourse to ideas, and seek in them the truth
of existence. I dare say that the simile is not perfect-for I am
very far from admitting that he who contemplates existence through the
medium of ideas, sees them only "through a glass darkly," any more
than he who sees them in their working and effects. However, this
was the method which I adopted: I first assumed some principle which I
judged to be the strongest, and then I affirmed as true whatever
seemed to agree with this, whether relating to the cause or to
anything else; and that which disagreed I regarded as untrue. But I
should like to explain my meaning clearly, as I do not think that
you understand me.

  No, indeed, replied Cebes, not very well.

  There is nothing new, he said, in what I am about to tell you; but
only what I have been always and everywhere repeating in the
previous discussion and on other occasions: I want to show you the
nature of that cause which has occupied my thoughts, and I shall
have to go back to those familiar words which are in the mouth of
everyone, and first of all assume that there is an absolute beauty and
goodness and greatness, and the like; grant me this, and I hope to
be able to show you the nature of the cause, and to prove the
immortality of the soul.

  Cebes said: You may proceed at once with the proof, as I readily
grant you this.

  Well, he said, then I should like to know whether you agree with
me in the next step; for I cannot help thinking that if there be
anything beautiful other than absolute beauty, that can only be
beautiful in as far as it partakes of absolute beauty-and this I
should say of everything. Do you agree in this notion of the cause?

  Yes, he said, I agree.

  He proceeded: I know nothing and can understand nothing of any other
of those wise causes which are alleged; and if a person says to me
that the bloom of color, or form, or anything else of that sort is a
source of beauty, I leave all that, which is only confusing to me, and
simply and singly, and perhaps foolishly, hold and am assured in my
own mind that nothing makes a thing beautiful but the presence and
participation of beauty in whatever way or manner obtained; for as
to the manner I am uncertain, but I stoutly contend that by beauty all
beautiful things become beautiful. That appears to me to be the only
safe answer that I can give, either to myself or to any other, and
to that I cling, in the persuasion that I shall never be overthrown,
and that I may safely answer to myself or any other that by beauty
beautiful things become beautiful. Do you not agree to that?

  Yes, I agree.

  And that by greatness only great things become great and greater
greater, and by smallness the less becomes less.

  True.

  Then if a person remarks that A is taller by a head than B, and B
less by a head than A, you would refuse to admit this, and would
stoutly contend that what you mean is only that the greater is greater
by, and by reason of, greatness, and the less is less only by, or by
reason of, smallness; and thus you would avoid the danger of saying
that the greater is greater and the less by the measure of the head,
which is the same in both, and would also avoid the monstrous
absurdity of supposing that the greater man is greater by reason of
the head, which is small. Would you not be afraid of that?

  Indeed, I should, said Cebes, laughing.

  In like manner you would be afraid to say that ten exceeded eight
by, and by reason of, two; but would say by, and by reason of, number;
or that two cubits exceed one cubit not by a half, but by
magnitude?-that is what you would say, for there is the same danger in
both cases.

  Very true, he said.

  Again, would you not be cautious of affirming that the addition of
one to one, or the division of one, is the cause of two? And you would
loudly asseverate that you know of no way in which anything comes into
existence except by participation in its own proper essence, and
consequently, as far as you know, the only cause of two is the
participation in duality; that is the way to make two, and the
participation in one is the way to make one. You would say: I will let
alone puzzles of division and addition-wiser heads than mine may
answer them; inexperienced as I am, and ready to start, as the proverb
says, at my own shadow, I cannot afford to give up the sure ground
of a principle. And if anyone assails you there, you would not mind
him, or answer him until you had seen whether the consequences which
follow agree with one another or not, and when you are further
required to give an explanation of this principle, you would go on
to assume a higher principle, and the best of the higher ones, until
you found a resting-place; but you would not refuse the principle
and the consequences in your reasoning like the Eristics-at least if
you wanted to discover real existence. Not that this confusion
signifies to them who never care or think about the matter at all, for
they have the wit to be well pleased with themselves, however great
may be the turmoil of their ideas. But you, if you are a
philosopher, will, I believe, do as I say.

  What you say is most true, said Simmias and Cebes, both speaking
at once.

  Ech. Yes, Phaedo; and I don't wonder at their assenting. Anyone
who has the least sense will acknowledge the wonderful clear. of
Socrates' reasoning.

  Phaed. Certainly, Echecrates; and that was the feeling of the
whole company at the time.

  Ech. Yes, and equally of ourselves, who were not of the company, and
are now listening to your recital. But what followed?

  Phaedo. After all this was admitted, and they had agreed about the
existence of ideas and the participation in them of the other things
which derive their names from them, Socrates, if I remember rightly,
said:-

  This is your way of speaking; and yet when you say that Simmias is
greater than Socrates and less than Phaedo, do you not predicate of
Simmias both greatness and smallness?

  Yes, I do.

  But still you allow that Simmias does not really exceed Socrates, as
the words may seem to imply, because he is Simmias, but by reason of
the size which he has; just as Simmias does not exceed Socrates
because he is Simmias, any more than because Socrates is Socrates, but
because he has smallness when compared with the greatness of Simmias?

  True.

  And if Phaedo exceeds him in size, that is not because Phaedo is
Phaedo, but because Phaedo has greatness relatively to Simmias, who is
comparatively smaller?

  That is true.

  And therefore Simmias is said to be great, and is also said to be
small, because he is in a mean between them, exceeding the smallness
of the one by his greatness, and allowing the greatness of the other
to exceed his smallness. He added, laughing, I am speaking like a
book, but I believe that what I am now saying is true.

  Simmias assented to this.

  The reason why I say this is that I want you to agree with me in
thinking, not only that absolute greatness will never be great and
also small, but that greatness in us or in the concrete will never
admit the small or admit of being exceeded: instead of this, one of
two things will happen-either the greater will fly or retire before
the opposite, which is the less, or at the advance of the less will
cease to exist; but will not, if allowing or admitting smallness, be
changed by that; even as I, having received and admitted smallness
when compared with Simmias, remain just as I was, and am the same
small person. And as the idea of greatness cannot condescend ever to
be or become small, in like manner the smallness in us cannot be or
become great; nor can any other opposite which remains the same ever
be or become its own opposite, but either passes away or perishes in
the change.

  That, replied Cebes, is quite my notion.

  One of the company, though I do not exactly remember which of
them, on hearing this, said: By Heaven, is not this the direct
contrary of what was admitted before-that out of the greater came
the less and out of the less the greater, and that opposites are
simply generated from opposites; whereas now this seems to be
utterly denied.

  Socrates inclined his head to the speaker and listened. I like
your courage, he said, in reminding us of this. But you do not observe
that there is a difference in the two cases. For then we were speaking
of opposites in the concrete, and now of the essential opposite which,
as is affirmed, neither in us nor in nature can ever be at variance
with itself: then, my friend, we were speaking of things in which
opposites are inherent and which are called after them, but now
about the opposites which are inherent in them and which give their
name to them; these essential opposites will never, as we maintain,
admit of generation into or out of one another. At the same time,
turning to Cebes, he said: Were you at all disconcerted, Cebes, at our
friend's objection?

  That was not my feeling, said Cebes; and yet I cannot deny that I am
apt to be disconcerted.

  Then we are agreed after all, said Socrates, that the opposite
will never in any case be opposed to itself?

  To that we are quite agreed, he replied.

  Yet once more let me ask you to consider the question from another
point of view, and see whether you agree with me: There is a thing
which you term heat, and another thing which you term cold?

  Certainly.

  But are they the same as fire and snow?

  Most assuredly not.

  Heat is not the same as fire, nor is cold the same as snow?

  No.

  And yet you will surely admit that when snow, as before said, is
under the influence of heat, they will not remain snow and heat; but
at the advance of the heat the snow will either retire or perish?

  Very true, he replied.

  And the fire too at the advance of the cold will either retire or
perish; and when the fire is under the influence of the cold, they
will not remain, as before, fire and cold.

  That is true, he said.

  And in some cases the name of the idea is not confined to the
idea; but anything else which, not being the idea, exists only in
the form of the idea, may also lay claim to it. I will try to make
this clearer by an example: The odd number is always called by the
name of odd?

  Very true.

  But is this the only thing which is called odd? Are there not
other things which have their own name, and yet are called odd,
because, although not the same as oddness, they are never without
oddness?-that is what I mean to ask-whether numbers such as the number
three are not of the class of odd. And there are many other
examples: would you not say, for example, that three may be called
by its proper name, and also be called odd, which is not the same with
three? and this may be said not only of three but also of five, and
every alternate number-each of them without being oddness is odd,
and in the same way two and four, and the whole series of alternate
numbers, has every number even, without being evenness. Do you admit
that?

  Yes, he said, how can I deny that?

  Then now mark the point at which I am aiming: not only do
essential opposites exclude one another, but also concrete things,
which, although not in themselves opposed, contain opposites; these, I
say, also reject the idea which is opposed to that which is
contained in them, and at the advance of that they either perish or
withdraw. There is the number three for example; will not that
endure annihilation or anything sooner than be converted into an
even number, remaining three?

  Very true, said Cebes.

  And yet, he said, the number two is certainly not opposed to the
number three?

  It is not.

  Then not only do opposite ideas repel the advance of one another,
but also there are other things which repel the approach of opposites.

  That is quite true, he said.

  Suppose, he said, that we endeavor, if possible, to determine what
these are.

  By all means.

  Are they not, Cebes, such as compel the things of which they have
possession, not only to take their own form, but also the form of some
opposite?

  What do you mean?

  I mean, as I was just now saying, and have no need to repeat to you,
that those things which are possessed by the number three must not
only be three in number, but must also be odd.

  Quite true.

  And on this oddness, of which the number three has the impress,
the opposite idea will never intrude?

  No.

  And this impress was given by the odd principle?

  Yes.

  And to the odd is opposed the even?

  True.

  Then the idea of the even number will never arrive at three?

  No.

  Then three has no part in the even?

  None.

  Then the triad or number three is uneven?

  Very true.

  To return then to my distinction of natures which are not opposites,
and yet do not admit opposites: as, in this instance, three,
although not opposed to the even, does not any the more admit of the
even, but always brings the opposite into play on the other side; or
as two does not receive the odd, or fire the cold-from these
examples (and there are many more of them) perhaps you may be able
to arrive at the general conclusion that not only opposites will not
receive opposites, but also that nothing which brings the opposite
will admit the opposite of that which it brings in that to which it is
brought. And here let me recapitulate-for there is no harm in
repetition. The number five will not admit the nature of the even, any
more than ten, which is the double of five, will admit the nature of
the odd-the double, though not strictly opposed to the odd, rejects
the odd altogether. Nor again will parts in the ratio of 3:2, nor
any fraction in which there is a half, nor again in which there is a
third, admit the notion of the whole, although they are not opposed to
the whole. You will agree to that?

  Yes, he said, I entirely agree and go along with you in that.

  And now, he said, I think that I may begin again; and to the
question which I am about to ask I will beg you to give not the old
safe answer, but another, of which I will offer you an example; and
I hope that you will find in what has been just said another
foundation which is as safe. I mean that if anyone asks you "what that
is, the inherence of which makes the body hot," you will reply not
heat (this is what I call the safe and stupid answer), but fire, a far
better answer, which we are now in a condition to give. Or if anyone
asks you "why a body is diseased," you will not say from disease,
but from fever; and instead of saying that oddness is the cause of odd
numbers, you will say that the monad is the cause of them: and so of
things in general, as I dare say that you will understand sufficiently
without my adducing any further examples.

  Yes, he said, I quite understand you.

  Tell me, then, what is that the inherence of which will render the
body alive?

  The soul, he replied.

  And is this always the case?

  Yes, he said, of course.

  Then whatever the soul possesses, to that she comes bearing life?

  Yes, certainly.

  And is there any opposite to life?

  There is, he said.

  And what is that?

  Death.

  Then the soul, as has been acknowledged, will never receive the
opposite of what she brings. And now, he said, what did we call that
principle which repels the even?

  The odd.

  And that principle which repels the musical, or the just?

  The unmusical, he said, and the unjust.

  And what do we call the principle which does not admit of death?

  The immortal, he said.

  And does the soul admit of death?

  No.

  Then the soul is immortal?

  Yes, he said.

  And may we say that this is proven?

  Yes, abundantly proven, Socrates, he replied.

  And supposing that the odd were imperishable, must not three be
imperishable?

  Of course.

  And if that which is cold were imperishable, when the warm principle
came attacking the snow, must not the snow have retired whole and
unmelted-for it could never have perished, nor could it have
remained and admitted the heat?

  True, he said.

  Again, if the uncooling or warm principle were imperishable, the
fire when assailed by cold would not have perished or have been
extinguished, but would have gone away unaffected?

  Certainly, he said.

  And the same may be said of the immortal: if the immortal is also
imperishable, the soul when attacked by death cannot perish; for the
preceding argument shows that the soul will not admit of death, or
ever be dead, any more than three or the odd number will admit of
the even, or fire or the heat in the fire, of the cold. Yet a person
may say: "But although the odd will not become even at the approach of
the even, why may not the odd perish and the even take the place of
the odd?" Now to him who makes this objection, we cannot answer that
the odd principle is imperishable; for this has not been acknowledged,
but if this had been acknowledged, there would have been no difficulty
in contending that at the approach of the even the odd principle and
the number three took up their departure; and the same argument
would have held good of fire and heat and any other thing.

  Very true.

  And the same may be said of the immortal: if the immortal is also
imperishable, then the soul will be imperishable as well as
immortal; but if not, some other proof of her imperishableness will
have to be given.

  No other proof is needed, he said; for if the immortal, being
eternal, is liable to perish, then nothing is imperishable.

  Yes, replied Socrates, all men will agree that God, and the
essential form of life, and the immortal in general, will never
perish.

  Yes, all men, he said-that is true; and what is more, gods, if I
am not mistaken, as well as men.

  Seeing then that the immortal is indestructible, must not the
soul, if she is immortal, be also imperishable?

  Most certainly.

  Then when death attacks a man, the mortal portion of him may be
supposed to die, but the immortal goes out of the way of death and
is preserved safe and sound?

  True.

  Then, Cebes, beyond question the soul is immortal and
imperishable, and our souls will truly exist in another world!

  I am convinced, Socrates, said Cebes, and have nothing more to
object; but if my friend Simmias, or anyone else, has any further
objection, he had better speak out, and not keep silence, since I do
not know how there can ever be a more fitting time to which he can
defer the discussion, if there is anything which he wants to say or
have said.

  But I have nothing more to say, replied Simmias; nor do I see any
room for uncertainty, except that which arises necessarily out of
the greatness of the subject and the feebleness of man, and which I
cannot help feeling.

  Yes, Simmias, replied Socrates, that is well said: and more than
that, first principles, even if they appear certain, should be
carefully considered; and when they are satisfactorily ascertained,
then, with a sort of hesitating confidence in human reason, you may, I
think, follow the course of the argument; and if this is clear,
there will be no need for any further inquiry.

  That, he said, is true.

  But then, O my friends, he said, if the soul is really immortal,
what care should be taken of her, not only in respect of the portion
of time which is called life, but of eternity! And the danger of
neglecting her from this point of view does indeed appear to be awful.
If death had only been the end of all, the wicked would have had a
good bargain in dying, for they would have been happily quit not
only of their body, but of their own evil together with their souls.
But now, as the soul plainly appears to be immortal, there is no
release or salvation from evil except the attainment of the highest
virtue and wisdom. For the soul when on her progress to the world
below takes nothing with her but nurture and education; which are
indeed said greatly to benefit or greatly to injure the departed, at
the very beginning of its pilgrimage in the other world.

  For after death, as they say, the genius of each individual, to whom
he belonged in life, leads him to a certain place in which the dead
are gathered together for judgment, whence they go into the world
below, following the guide who is appointed to conduct them from
this world to the other: and when they have there received their due
and remained their time, another guide brings them back again after
many revolutions of ages. Now this journey to the other world is
not, as Aeschylus says in the "Telephus," a single and straight
path-no guide would be wanted for that, and no one could miss a single
path; but there are many partings of the road, and windings, as I must
infer from the rites and sacrifices which are offered to the gods
below in places where three ways meet on earth. The wise and orderly
soul is conscious of her situation and follows in the path; but the
soul which desires the body, and which, as I was relating before,
has long been fluttering about the lifeless frame and the world of
sight, is after many struggles and many sufferings hardly and with
violence carried away by her attendant genius, and when she arrives at
the place where the other souls are gathered, if she be impure and
have done impure deeds, or been concerned in foul murders or other
crimes which are the brothers of these, and the works of brothers in
crime-from that soul everyone flees and turns away; no one will be her
companion, no one her guide, but alone she wanders in extremity of
evil until certain times are fulfilled, and when they are fulfilled,
she is borne irresistibly to her own fitting habitation; as every pure
and just soul which has passed through life in the company and under
the guidance of the gods has also her own proper home.

  Now the earth has divers wonderful regions, and is indeed in
nature and extent very unlike the notions of geographers, as I believe
on the authority of one who shall be nameless.

  What do you mean, Socrates? said Simmias. I have myself heard many
descriptions of the earth, but I do not know in what you are putting
your faith, and I should like to know.

  Well, Simmias, replied Socrates, the recital of a tale does not, I
think, require the art of Glaucus; and I know not that the art of
Glaucus could prove the truth of my tale, which I myself should
never be able to prove, and even if I could, I fear, Simmias, that
my life would come to an end before the argument was completed. I
may describe to you, however, the form and regions of the earth
according to my conception of them.

  That, said Simmias, will be enough.

  Well, then, he said, my conviction is that the earth is a round body
in the center of the heavens, and therefore has no need of air or
any similar force as a support, but is kept there and hindered from
falling or inclining any way by the equability of the surrounding
heaven and by her own equipoise. For that which, being in equipoise,
is in the center of that which is equably diffused, will not incline
any way in any degree, but will always remain in the same state and
not deviate. And this is my first notion.

  Which is surely a correct one, said Simmias.

  Also I believe that the earth is very vast, and that we who dwell in
the region extending from the river Phasis to the Pillars of Heracles,
along the borders of the sea, are just like ants or frogs about a
marsh, and inhabit a small portion only, and that many others dwell in
many like places. For I should say that in all parts of the earth
there are hollows of various forms and sizes, into which the water and
the mist and the air collect; and that the true earth is pure and in
the pure heaven, in which also are the stars-that is the heaven
which is commonly spoken of as the ether, of which this is but the
sediment collecting in the hollows of the earth. But we who live in
these hollows are deceived into the notion that we are dwelling
above on the surface of the earth; which is just as if a creature
who was at the bottom of the sea were to fancy that he was on the
surface of the water, and that the sea was the heaven through which he
saw the sun and the other stars-he having never come to the surface by
reason of his feebleness and sluggishness, and having never lifted
up his head and seen, nor ever heard from one who had seen, this
region which is so much purer and fairer than his own. Now this is
exactly our case: for we are dwelling in a hollow of the earth, and
fancy that we are on the surface; and the air we call the heaven,
and in this we imagine that the stars move. But this is also owing
to our feebleness and sluggishness, which prevent our reaching the
surface of the air: for if any man could arrive at the exterior limit,
or take the wings of a bird and fly upward, like a fish who puts his
head out and sees this world, he would see a world beyond; and, if the
nature of man could sustain the sight, he would acknowledge that
this was the place of the true heaven and the true light and the
true stars. For this earth, and the stones, and the entire region
which surrounds us, are spoilt and corroded, like the things in the
sea which are corroded by the brine; for in the sea too there is
hardly any noble or perfect growth, but clefts only, and sand, and
an endless slough of mud: and even the shore is not to be compared
to the fairer sights of this world. And greater far is the superiority
of the other. Now of that upper earth which is under the heaven, I can
tell you a charming tale, Simmias, which is well worth hearing.

  And we, Socrates, replied Simmias, shall be charmed to listen.

  The tale, my friend, he said, is as follows: In the first place, the
earth, when looked at from above, is like one of those balls which
have leather coverings in twelve pieces, and is of divers colors, of
which the colors which painters use on earth are only a sample. But
there the whole earth is made up of them, and they are brighter far
and clearer than ours; there is a purple of wonderful luster, also the
radiance of gold, and the white which is in the earth is whiter than
any chalk or snow. Of these and other colors the earth is made up, and
they are more in number and fairer than the eye of man has ever
seen; and the very hollows (of which I was speaking) filled with air
and water are seen like light flashing amid the other colors, and have
a color of their own, which gives a sort of unity to the variety of
earth. And in this fair region everything that grows-trees, and
flowers, and fruits-is in a like degree fairer than any here; and
there are hills, and stones in them in a like degree smoother, and
more transparent, and fairer in color than our highly valued
emeralds and sardonyxes and jaspers, and other gems, which are but
minute fragments of them: for there all the stones are like our
precious stones, and fairer still. The reason of this is that they are
pure, and not, like our precious stones, infected or corroded by the
corrupt briny elements which coagulate among us, and which breed
foulness and disease both in earth and stones, as well as in animals
and plants. They are the jewels of the upper earth, which also
shines with gold and silver and the like, and they are visible to
sight and large and abundant and found in every region of the earth,
and blessed is he who sees them. And upon the earth are animals and
men, some in a middle region, others dwelling about the air as we
dwell about the sea; others in islands which the air flows round, near
the continent: and in a word, the air is used by them as the water and
the sea are by us, and the ether is to them what the air is to us.
Moreover, the temperament of their seasons is such that they have no
disease, and live much longer than we do, and have sight and hearing
and smell, and all the other senses, in far greater perfection, in the
same degree that air is purer than water or the ether than air. Also
they have temples and sacred places in which the gods really dwell,
and they hear their voices and receive their answers, and are
conscious of them and hold converse with them, and they see the sun,
moon, and stars as they really are, and their other blessedness is
of a piece with this.

  Such is the nature of the whole earth, and of the things which are
around the earth; and there are divers regions in the hollows on the
face of the globe everywhere, some of them deeper and also wider
than that which we inhabit, others deeper and with a narrower
opening than ours, and some are shallower and wider; all have numerous
perforations, and passages broad and narrow in the interior of the
earth, connecting them with one another; and there flows into and
out of them, as into basins, a vast tide of water, and huge
subterranean streams of perennial rivers, and springs hot and cold,
and a great fire, and great rivers of fire, and streams of liquid mud,
thin or thick (like the rivers of mud in Sicily, and the
lava-streams which follow them), and the regions about which they
happen to flow are filled up with them. And there is a sort of swing
in the interior of the earth which moves all this up and down. Now the
swing is in this wise: There is a chasm which is the vastest of them
all, and pierces right through the whole earth; this is that which
Homer describes in the words,

   "Far off, where is the inmost depth beneath the earth";

and which he in other places, and many other poets, have called
Tartarus. And the swing is caused by the streams flowing into and
out of this chasm, and they each have the nature of the soil through
which they flow. And the reason why the streams are always flowing
in and out is that the watery element has no bed or bottom, and is
surging and swinging up and down, and the surrounding wind and air
do the same; they follow the water up and down, hither and thither,
over the earth-just as in respiring the air is always in process of
inhalation and exhalation; and the wind swinging with the water in and
out produces fearful and irresistible blasts: when the waters retire
with a rush into the lower parts of the earth, as they are called,
they flow through the earth into those regions, and fill them up as
with the alternate motion of a pump, and then when they leave those
regions and rush back hither, they again fill the hollows here, and
when these are filled, flow through subterranean channels and find
their way to their several places, forming seas, and lakes, and
rivers, and springs. Thence they again enter the earth, some of them
making a long circuit into many lands, others going to few places
and those not distant, and again fall into Tartarus, some at a point a
good deal lower than that at which they rose, and others not much
lower, but all in some degree lower than the point of issue. And
some burst forth again on the opposite side, and some on the same
side, and some wind round the earth with one or many folds, like the
coils of a serpent, and descend as far as they can, but always
return and fall into the lake. The rivers on either side can descend
only to the center and no further, for to the rivers on both sides the
opposite side is a precipice.

  Now these rivers are many, and mighty, and diverse, and there are
four principal ones, of which the greatest and outermost is that
called Oceanus, which flows round the earth in a circle; and in the
opposite direction flows Acheron, which passes under the earth through
desert places, into the Acherusian Lake: this is the lake to the
shores of which the souls of the many go when they are dead, and after
waiting an appointed time, which is to some a longer and to some a
shorter time, they are sent back again to be born as animals. The
third river rises between the two, and near the place of rising
pours into a vast region of fire, and forms a lake larger than the
Mediterranean Sea, boiling with water and mud; and proceeding muddy
and turbid, and winding about the earth, comes, among other places, to
the extremities of the Acherusian Lake, but mingles not with the
waters of the lake, and after making many coils about the earth
plunges into Tartarus at a deeper level. This is that
Pyriphlegethon, as the stream is called, which throws up jets of
fire in all sorts of places. The fourth river goes out on the opposite
side, and falls first of all into a wild and savage region, which is
all of a dark-blue color, like lapis lazuli; and this is that river
which is called the Stygian River, and falls into and forms the Lake
Styx, and after falling into the lake and receiving strange powers
in the waters, passes under the earth, winding round in the opposite
direction to Pyriphlegethon, and meeting in the Acherusian Lake from
the opposite side. And the water of this river too mingles with no
other, but flows round in a circle and falls into Tartarus over
against Pyriphlegethon, and the name of this river, as the poet
says, is Cocytus.

  Such is the name of the other world; and when the dead arrive at the
place to which the genius of each severally conveys them, first of all
they have sentence passed upon them, as they have lived well and
piously or not. And those who appear to have lived neither well nor
ill, go to the river Acheron, and mount such conveyances as they can
get, and are carried in them to the lake, and there they dwell  and
are purified of their evil deeds, and suffer the penalty of the wrongs
which they have done to others, and are absolved, and receive the
rewards of their good deeds according to their deserts. But those
who appear to be incurable by reason of the greatness of their
crimes-who have committed many and terrible deeds of sacrilege,
murders foul and violent, or the like-such are hurled into Tartarus,
which is their suitable destiny, and they never come out. Those
again who have committed crimes, which, although great, are not
unpardonable-who in a moment of anger, for example, have done violence
to a father or mother, and have repented for the remainder of their
lives, or who have taken the life of another under like extenuating
circumstances-these are plunged into Tartarus, the pains of which they
are compelled to undergo for a year, but at the end of the year the
wave casts them forth-mere homicides by way of Cocytus, parricides and
matricides by Pyriphlegethon-and they are borne to the Acherusian
Lake, and there they lift up their voices and call upon the victims
whom they have slain or wronged, to have pity on them, and to
receive them, and to let them come out of the river into the lake. And
if they prevail, then they come forth and cease from their troubles;
but if not, they are carried back again into Tartarus and from
thence into the rivers unceasingly, until they obtain mercy from those
whom they have wronged: for that is the sentence inflicted upon them
by their judges. Those also who are remarkable for having led holy
lives are released from this earthly prison, and go to their pure home
which is above, and dwell in the purer earth; and those who have
duly purified themselves with philosophy live henceforth altogether
without the body, in mansions fairer far than these, which may not
be described, and of which the time would fail me to tell.

  Wherefore, Simmias, seeing all these things, what ought not we to do
in order to obtain virtue and wisdom in this life? Fair is the
prize, and the hope great.

  I do not mean to affirm that the description which I have given of
the soul and her mansions is exactly true-a man of sense ought
hardly to say that. But I do say that, inasmuch as the soul is shown
to be immortal, he may venture to think, not improperly or unworthily,
that something of the kind is true. The venture is a glorious one, and
he ought to comfort himself with words like these, which is the reason
why lengthen out the tale. Wherefore, I say, let a man be of good
cheer about his soul, who has cast away the pleasures and ornaments of
the body as alien to him, and rather hurtful in their effects, and has
followed after the pleasures of knowledge in this life; who has
adorned the soul in her own proper jewels, which are temperance, and
justice, and courage, and nobility, and truth-in these arrayed she
is ready to go on her journey to the world below, when her time comes.
You, Simmias and Cebes, and all other men, will depart at some time or
other. Me already, as the tragic poet would say, the voice of fate
calls. Soon I must drink the poison; and I think that I had better
repair to the bath first, in order that the women may not have the
trouble of washing my body after I am dead.

  When he had done speaking, Crito said: And have you any commands for
us, Socrates-anything to say about your children, or any other
matter in which we can serve you?

  Nothing particular, he said: only, as I have always told you, I
would have you look to yourselves; that is a service which you may
always be doing to me and mine as well as to yourselves. And you
need not make professions; for if you take no thought for
yourselves, and walk not according to the precepts which I have
given you, not now for the first time, the warmth of your
professions will be of no avail.

  We will do our best, said Crito. But in what way would you have us
bury you?

  In any way that you like; only you must get hold of me, and take
care that I do not walk away from you. Then he turned to us, and added
with a smile: I cannot make Crito believe that I am the same
Socrates who have been talking and conducting the argument; he fancies
that I am the other Socrates whom he will soon see, a dead body-and he
asks, How shall he bury me? And though I have spoken many words in the
endeavor to show that when I have drunk the poison I shall leave you
and go to the joys of the blessed-these words of mine, with which I
comforted you and myself, have had, I perceive, no effect upon
Crito. And therefore I want you to be surety for me now, as he was
surety for me at the trial: but let the promise be of another sort;
for he was my surety to the judges that I would remain, but you must
be my surety to him that I shall not remain, but go away and depart;
and then he will suffer less at my death, and not be grieved when he
sees my body being burned or buried. I would not have him sorrow at my
hard lot, or say at the burial, Thus we lay out Socrates, or, Thus
we follow him to the grave or bury him; for false words are not only
evil in themselves, but they infect the soul with evil. Be of good
cheer, then, my dear Crito, and say that you are burying my body only,
and do with that as is usual, and as you think best.

  When he had spoken these words, he arose and went into the bath
chamber with Crito, who bade us wait; and we waited, talking and
thinking of the subject of discourse, and also of the greatness of our
sorrow; he was like a father of whom we were being bereaved, and we
were about to pass the rest of our lives as orphans. When he had taken
the bath his children were brought to him-(he had two young sons and
an elder one); and the women of his family also came, and he talked to
them and gave them a few directions in the presence of Crito; and he
then dismissed them and returned to us.

  Now the hour of sunset was near, for a good deal of time had
passed while he was within. When he came out, he sat down with us
again after his bath, but not much was said. Soon the jailer, who
was the servant of the Eleven, entered and stood by him, saying: To
you, Socrates, whom I know to be the noblest and gentlest and best
of all who ever came to this place, I will not impute the angry
feelings of other men, who rage and swear at me when, in obedience
to the authorities, I bid them drink the poison-indeed, I am sure that
you will not be angry with me; for others, as you are aware, and not
I, are the guilty cause. And so fare you well, and try to bear lightly
what must needs be; you know my errand. Then bursting into tears he
turned away and went out.

  Socrates looked at him and said: I return your good wishes, and will
do as you bid. Then, turning to us, he said, How charming the man
is: since I have been in prison he has always been coming to see me,
and at times he would talk to me, and was as good as could be to me,
and now see how generously he sorrows for me. But we must do as he
says, Crito; let the cup be brought, if the poison is prepared: if
not, let the attendant prepare some.

  Yet, said Crito, the sun is still upon the hilltops, and many a
one has taken the draught late, and after the announcement has been
made to him, he has eaten and drunk, and indulged in sensual delights;
do not hasten then, there is still time.

  Socrates said: Yes, Crito, and they of whom you speak are right in
doing thus, for they think that they will gain by the delay; but I
am right in not doing thus, for I do not think that I should gain
anything by drinking the poison a little later; I should be sparing
and saving a life which is already gone: I could only laugh at
myself for this. Please then to do as I say, and not to refuse me.

  Crito, when he heard this, made a sign to the servant, and the
servant went in, and remained for some time, and then returned with
the jailer carrying a cup of poison. Socrates said: You, my good
friend, who are experienced in these matters, shall give me directions
how I am to proceed. The man answered: You have only to walk about
until your legs are heavy, and then to lie down, and the poison will
act. At the same time he handed the cup to Socrates, who in the
easiest and gentlest manner, without the least fear or change of color
or feature, looking at the man with all his eyes, Echecrates, as his
manner was, took the cup and said: What do you say about making a
libation out of this cup to any god? May I, or not? The man
answered: We only prepare, Socrates, just so much as we deem enough. I
understand, he said: yet I may and must pray to the gods to prosper my
journey from this to that other world-may this, then, which is my
prayer, be granted to me. Then holding the cup to his lips, quite
readily and cheerfully he drank off the poison. And hitherto most of
us had been able to control our sorrow; but now when we saw him
drinking, and saw too that he had finished the draught, we could no
longer forbear, and in spite of myself my own tears were flowing fast;
so that I covered my face and wept over myself, for certainly I was
not weeping over him, but at the thought of my own calamity in
having lost such a companion. Nor was I the first, for Crito, when
he found himself unable to restrain his tears, had got up and moved
away, and I followed; and at that moment. Apollodorus, who had been
weeping all the time, broke out in a loud cry which made cowards of us
all. Socrates alone retained his calmness: What is this strange
outcry? he said. I sent away the women mainly in order that they might
not offend in this way, for I have heard that a man should die in
peace. Be quiet, then, and have patience.

  When we heard that, we were ashamed, and refrained our tears; and he
walked about until, as he said, his legs began to fail, and then he
lay on his back, according to the directions, and the man who gave him
the poison now and then looked at his feet and legs; and after a while
he pressed his foot hard and asked him if he could feel; and he
said, no; and then his leg, and so upwards and upwards, and showed
us that he was cold and stiff. And he felt them himself, and said:
When the poison reaches the heart, that will be the end. He was
beginning to grow cold about the groin, when he uncovered his face,
for he had covered himself up, and said (they were his last
words)-he said: Crito, I owe a cock to Asclepius; will you remember to
pay the debt? The debt shall be paid, said Crito; is there anything
else? There was no answer to this question; but in a minute or two a
movement was heard, and the attendants uncovered him; his eyes were
set, and Crito closed his eyes and mouth.

  Such was the end, Echecrates, of our friend, whom I may truly call
the wisest, and justest, and best of all the men whom I have ever
known.

                                   -THE END-


  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES; PHAEDRUS. Scene: Under a
plane-tree, by the banks of the Ilissus.

  Socrates. My dear Phaedrus, whence come you, and whither are you
going?

  Phaedrus. I come from Lysias the son of Cephalus, and I am going
to take a walk outside the wall, for I have been sitting with him
the whole morning; and our common friend Acumenus tells me that it
is much more refreshing to walk in the open air than to be shut up
in a cloister.

  Soc. There he is right. Lysias then, I suppose, was in the town?

  Phaedr. Yes, he was staying with Epicrates, here at the house of
Morychus; that house which is near the temple of Olympian Zeus.

  Soc. And how did he entertain you? Can I be wrong in supposing
that Lysias gave you a feast of discourse?

  Phaedr. You shall hear, if you can spare time to accompany me.

  Soc. And should I not deem the conversation of you and Lysias "a
thing of higher import," as I may say in the words of Pindar, "than
any business"?

  Phaedr. Will you go on?

  Soc. And will you go on with the narration?

  Phaedr. My tale, Socrates, is one of your sort, for love was the
theme which occupied us -love after a fashion: Lysias has been writing
about a fair youth who was being tempted, but not by a lover; and this
was the point: he ingeniously proved that the non-lover should be
accepted rather than the lover.

  Soc. O that is noble of him! I wish that he would say the poor man
rather than the rich, and the old man rather than the young one;
then he would meet the case of me and of many a man; his words would
be quite refreshing, and he would be a public benefactor. For my part,
I do so long to hear his speech, that if you walk all the way to
Megara, and when you have reached the wall come back, as Herodicus
recommends, without going in, I will keep you company.

  Phaedr. What do you mean, my good Socrates? How can you imagine that
my unpractised memory can do justice to an elaborate work, which the
greatest rhetorician of the age spent a long time in composing.
Indeed, I cannot; I would give a great deal if I could.

  Soc. I believe that I know Phaedrus about as well as I know
myself, and I am very sure that the speech of Lysias was repeated to
him, not once only, but again and again;-he insisted on hearing it
many times over and Lysias was very willing to gratify him; at last,
when nothing else would do, he got hold of the book, and looked at
what he most wanted to see,-this occupied him during the whole
morning; -and then when he was tired with sitting, he went out to take
a walk, not until, by the dog, as I believe, he had simply learned
by heart the entire discourse, unless it was unusually long, and he
went to a place outside the wall that he might practise his lesson.
There he saw a certain lover of discourse who had a similar
weakness;-he saw and rejoiced; now thought he, "I shall have a partner
in my revels." And he invited him to come and walk with him. But
when the lover of discourse begged that he would repeat the tale, he
gave himself airs and said, "No I cannot," as if he were indisposed;
although, if the hearer had refused, he would sooner or later have
been compelled by him to listen whether he would or no. Therefore,
Phaedrus, bid him do at once what he will soon do whether bidden or
not.

  Phaedr. I see that you will not let me off until I speak in some
fashion or other; verily therefore my best plan is to speak as I
best can.

  Soc. A very true remark, that of yours.

  Phaedr. I will do as I say; but believe me, Socrates, I did not
learn the very words-O no; nevertheless I have a general notion of
what he said, and will give you a summary of the points in which the
lover differed from the non-lover. Let me begin at the beginning.

  Soc. Yes, my sweet one; but you must first of all show what you have
in your left hand under your cloak, for that roll, as I suspect, is
the actual discourse. Now, much as I love you, I would not have you
suppose that I am going to have your memory exercised at my expense,
if you have Lysias himself here.

  Phaedr. Enough; I see that I have no hope of practising my art
upon you. But if I am to read, where would you please to sit?

  Soc. Let us turn aside and go by the Ilissus; we will sit down at
some quiet spot.

  Phaedr. I am fortunate in not having my sandals, and as you never
have any, I think that we may go along the brook and cool our feet
in the water; this will be the easiest way, and at midday and in the
summer is far from being unpleasant.

  Soc. Lead on, and look out for a place in which we can sit down.

  Phaedr. Do you see the tallest plane-tree in the distance?

  Soc. Yes.

  Phaedr. There are shade and gentle breezes, and grass on which we
may either sit or lie down.

  Soc. Move forward.

  Phaedr. I should like to know, Socrates, whether the place is not
somewhere here at which Boreas is said to have carried off Orithyia
from the banks of the Ilissus?

  Soc. Such is the tradition.

  Phaedr. And is this the exact spot? The little stream is
delightfully clear and bright; I can fancy that there might be maidens
playing near.

  Soc. I believe that the spot is not exactly here, but about a
quarter of a mile lower down, where you cross to the temple of
Artemis, and there is, I think, some sort of an altar of Boreas at the
place.

  Phaedr. I have never noticed it; but I beseech you to tell me,
Socrates, do you believe this tale?

  Soc. The wise are doubtful, and I should not be singular if, like
them, I too doubted. I might have a rational explanation that Orithyia
was playing with Pharmacia, when a northern gust carried her over
the neighbouring rocks; and this being the manner of her death, she
was said to have been carried away by Boreas. There is a
discrepancy, however, about the locality; according to another version
of the story she was taken from Areopagus, and not from this place.
Now I quite acknowledge that these allegories are very nice, but he is
not to be envied who has to invent them; much labour and ingenuity
will be required of him; and when he has once begun, he must go on and
rehabilitate Hippocentaurs and chimeras dire. Gorgons and winged
steeds flow in apace, and numberless other inconceivable and
portentous natures. And if he is sceptical about them, and would
fain reduce them one after another to the rules of probability, this
sort of crude philosophy will take up a great deal of time. Now I have
no leisure for such enquiries; shall I tell you why? I must first know
myself, as the Delphian inscription says; to be curious about that
which is not my concern, while I am still in ignorance of my own self,
would be ridiculous. And therefore I bid farewell to all this; the
common opinion is enough for me. For, as I was saying, I want to
know not about this, but about myself: am I a monster more complicated
and swollen with passion than the serpent Typho, or a creature of a
gentler and simpler sort, to whom Nature has given a diviner and
lowlier destiny? But let me ask you, friend: have we not reached the
plane-tree to which you were conducting us?

  Phaedr. Yes, this is the tree.

  Soc. By Here, a fair resting-place, full of summer sounds and
scents. Here is this lofty and spreading plane-tree, and the agnus
cast us high and clustering, in the fullest blossom and the greatest
fragrance; and the stream which flows beneath the plane-tree is
deliciously cold to the feet. Judging from the ornaments and images,
this must be a spot sacred to Achelous and the Nymphs. How
delightful is the breeze:-so very sweet; and there is a sound in the
air shrill and summerlike which makes answer to the chorus of the
cicadae. But the greatest charm of all is the grass, like a pillow
gently sloping to the head. My dear Phaedrus, you have been an
admirable guide.

  Phaedr. What an incomprehensible being you are, Socrates: when you
are in the country, as you say, you really are like some stranger
who is led about by a guide. Do you ever cross the border? I rather
think that you never venture even outside the gates.

  Soc. Very true, my good friend; and I hope that you will excuse me
when you hear the reason, which is, that I am a lover of knowledge,
and the men who dwell in the city are my teachers, and not the trees
or the country. Though I do indeed believe that you have found a spell
with which to draw me out of the city into the country, like a
hungry cow before whom a bough or a bunch of fruit is waved. For
only hold up before me in like manner a book, and you may lead me
all round Attica, and over the wide world. And now having arrived, I
intend to lie down, and do you choose any posture in which you can
read best. Begin.

  Phaedr. Listen. You know how matters stand with me; and how, as I
conceive, this affair may be arranged for the advantage of both of us.
And I maintain that I ought not to fail in my suit, because I am not
your lover: for lovers repent of the kindnesses which they have
shown when their passion ceases, but to the non-lovers who are free
and not under any compulsion, no time of repentance ever comes; for
they confer their benefits according to the measure of their
ability, in the way which is most conducive to their own interest.
Then again, lovers consider how by reason of their love they have
neglected their own concerns and rendered service to others: and
when to these benefits conferred they add on the troubles which they
have endured, they think that they have long ago made to the beloved a
very ample return. But the non-lover has no such tormenting
recollections; he has never neglected his affairs or quarrelled with
his relations; he has no troubles to add up or excuse to invent; and
being well rid of all these evils, why should he not freely do what
will gratify the beloved?

  If you say that the lover is more to be esteemed, because his love
is thought to be greater; for he is willing to say and do what is
hateful to other men, in order to please his beloved;-that, if true,
is only a proof that he will prefer any future love to his present,
and will injure his old love at the pleasure of the new. And how, in a
matter of such infinite importance, can a man be right in trusting
himself to one who is afflicted with a malady which no experienced
person would attempt to cure, for the patient himself admits that he
is not in his right mind, and acknowledges that he is wrong in his
mind, but says that he is unable to control himself? And if he came to
his right mind, would he ever imagine that the desires were good which
he conceived when in his wrong mind? Once more, there are many more
non-lovers than lovers; and if you choose the best of the lovers,
you will not have many to choose from; but if from the non-lovers, the
choice will be larger, and you will be far more likely to find among
them a person who is worthy of your friendship. If public opinion be
your dread, and you would avoid reproach, in all probability the
lover, who is always thinking that other men are as emulous of him
as he is of them, will boast to some one of his successes, and make
a show of them openly in the pride of his heart;-he wants others to
know that his labour has not been lost; but the non-lover is more
his own master, and is desirous of solid good, and not of the
opinion of mankind. Again, the lover may be generally noted or seen
following the beloved (this is his regular occupation), and whenever
they are observed to exchange two words they are supposed to meet
about some affair of love either past or in contemplation; but when
non-lovers meet, no one asks the reason why, because people know
that talking to another is natural, whether friendship or mere
pleasure be the motive.

  Once more, if you fear the fickleness of friendship, consider that
in any other case a quarrel might be a mutual calamity; but now,
when you have given up what is most precious to you, you will be the
greater loser, and therefore, you will have more reason in being
afraid of the lover, for his vexations are many, and he is always
fancying that every one is leagued against him. Wherefore also he
debars his beloved from society; he will not have you intimate with
the wealthy, lest they should exceed him in wealth, or with men of
education, lest they should be his superiors in understanding; and
he is equally afraid of anybody's influence who has any other
advantage over himself. If he can persuade you to break with them, you
are left without friend in the world; or if, out of a regard to your
own interest, you have more sense than to comply with his desire,
you will have to quarrel with him. But those who are non-lovers, and
whose success in love is the reward of their merit, will not be
jealous of the companions of their beloved, and will rather hate those
who refuse to be his associates, thinking that their favourite is
slighted by the latter and benefited by the former; for more love than
hatred may be expected to come to him out of his friendship with
others. Many lovers too have loved the person of a youth before they
knew his character or his belongings; so that when their passion has
passed away, there is no knowing whether they will continue to be
his friends; whereas, in the case of non-lovers who were always
friends, the friendship is not lessened by the favours granted; but
the recollection of these remains with them, and is an earnest of good
things to come.

  Further, I say that you are likely to be improved by me, whereas the
lover will spoil you. For they praise your words and actions in a
wrong way; partly, because they are afraid of offending you, and also,
their judgment is weakened by passion. Such are the feats which love
exhibits; he makes things painful to the disappointed which give no
pain to others; he compels the successful lover to praise what ought
not to give him pleasure, and therefore the beloved is to be pitied
rather than envied. But if you listen to me, in the first place, I, in
my intercourse with you, shall not merely regard present enjoyment,
but also future advantage, being not mastered by love, but my own
master; nor for small causes taking violent dislikes, but even when
the cause is great, slowly laying up little wrath-unintentional
offences I shall forgive, and intentional ones I shall try to prevent;
and these are the marks of a friendship which will last.

  Do you think that a lover only can be a firm friend? reflect:-if
this were true, we should set small value on sons, or fathers, or
mothers; nor should we ever have loyal friends, for our love of them
arises not from passion, but from other associations. Further, if we
ought to shower favours on those who are the most eager suitors,-on
that principle, we ought always to do good, not to the most
virtuous, but to the most needy; for they are the persons who will
be most relieved, and will therefore be the most grateful; and when
you make a feast you should invite not your friend, but the beggar and
the empty soul; for they will love you, and attend you, and come about
your doors, and will be the best pleased, and the most grateful, and
will invoke many a blessing on your head. Yet surely you ought not
to be granting favours to those who besiege you with prayer, but to
those who are best able to reward you; nor to the lover only, but to
those who are worthy of love; nor to those who will enjoy the bloom of
your youth, but to those who will share their possessions with you
in age; nor to those who, having succeeded, will glory in their
success to others, but to those who will be modest and tell no
tales; nor to those who care about you for a moment only, but to those
who will continue your friends through life; nor to those who, when
their passion is over, will pick a quarrel with you, but rather to
those who, when the charm of youth has left you, will show their own
virtue. Remember what I have said; and consider yet this further
point: friends admonish the lover under the idea that his way of
life is bad, but no one of his kindred ever yet censured the
non-lover, or thought that he was ill-advised about his own interests.

  "Perhaps you will ask me whether I propose that you should indulge
every non-lover. To which I reply that not even the lover would advise
you to indulge all lovers, for the indiscriminate favour is less
esteemed by the rational recipient, and less easily hidden by him
who would escape the censure of the world. Now love ought to be for
the advantage of both parties, and for the injury of neither.

  "I believe that I have said enough; but if there is anything more
which you desire or which in your opinion needs to be supplied, ask
and I will answer."

  Now, Socrates, what do you think? Is not the discourse excellent,
more especially in the matter of the language?

  Soc. Yes, quite admirable; the effect on me was ravishing. And
this I owe to you, Phaedrus, for I observed you while reading to be in
an ecstasy, and thinking that you are more experienced in these
matters than I am, I followed your example, and, like you, my divine
darling, I became inspired with a phrenzy.

  Phaedr. Indeed, you are pleased to be merry.

  Soc. Do you mean that I am not in earnest?

  Phaedr. Now don't talk in that way, Socrates, but let me have your
real opinion; I adjure you, by Zeus, the god of friendship, to tell me
whether you think that any Hellene could have said more or spoken
better on the same subject.

  Soc. Well, but are you and I expected to praise the sentiments of
the author, or only the clearness, and roundness, and finish, and
tournure of the language? As to the first I willingly submit to your
better judgment, for I am not worthy to form an opinion, having only
attended to the rhetorical manner; and I was doubting whether this
could have been defended even by Lysias himself; I thought, though I
speak under correction, that he repeated himself two or three times,
either from want of words or from want of pains; and also, he appeared
to me ostentatiously to exult in showing how well he could say the
same thing in two or three ways.

  Phaedr. Nonsense, Socrates; what you call repetition was the
especial merit of the speech; for he omitted no topic of which the
subject rightly allowed, and I do not think that any one could have
spoken better or more exhaustively.

  Soc. There I cannot go along with you. Ancient sages, men and women,
who have spoken and written of these things, would rise up in judgment
against me, if out of complaisance I assented to you.

  Phaedr. Who are they, and where did you hear anything better than
this?

  Soc. I am sure that I must have heard; but at this moment I do not
remember from whom; perhaps from Sappho the fair, or Anacreon the
wise; or, possibly, from a prose writer. Why do I say so? Why, because
I perceive that my bosom is full, and that I could make another speech
as good as that of Lysias, and different. Now I am certain that this
is not an invention of my own, who am well aware that I know
nothing, and therefore I can only infer that I have been filled
through the cars, like a pitcher, from the waters of another, though I
have actually forgotten in my stupidity who was my informant.

  Phaedr. That is grand:-but never mind where you beard the
discourse or from whom; let that be a mystery not to be divulged
even at my earnest desire. Only, as you say, promise to make another
and better oration, equal in length and entirely new, on the same
subject; and I, like the nine Archons, will promise to set up a golden
image at Delphi, not only of myself, but of you, and as large as life.

  Soc. You are a dear golden ass if you suppose me to mean that Lysias
has altogether missed the mark, and that I can make a speech from
which all his arguments are to be excluded. The worst of authors
will say something which is to the point. Who, for example, could
speak on this thesis of yours without praising the discretion of the
non-lover and blaming the indiscretion of the lover? These are the
commonplaces of the subject which must come in (for what else is there
to be said?) and must be allowed and excused; the only merit is in the
arrangement of them, for there can be none in the invention; but
when you leave the commonplaces, then there may be some originality.

  Phaedr. I admit that there is reason in what you say, and I too will
be reasonable, and will allow you to start with the premiss that the
lover is more disordered in his wits than the non-lover; if in what
remains you make a longer and better speech than Lysias, and use other
arguments, then I say again, that a statue you shall have of beaten
gold, and take your place by the colossal offerings of the Cypselids
at Olympia.

  Soc. How profoundly in earnest is the lover, because to tease him
I lay a finger upon his love! And so, Phaedrus, you really imagine
that I am going to improve upon the ingenuity of Lysias?

  Phaedr. There I have you as you had me, and you must just speak
"as you best can." Do not let us exchange "tu quoque" as in a farce,
or compel me to say to you as you said to me, "I know Socrates as well
as I know myself, and he was wanting to, speak, but he gave himself
airs." Rather I would have you consider that from this place we stir
not until you have unbosomed yourself of the speech; for here are we
all alone, and I am stronger, remember, and younger than you-Wherefore
perpend, and do not compel me to use violence.

  Soc. But, my sweet Phaedrus, how ridiculous it would be of me to
compete with Lysias in an extempore speech! He is a master in his
art and I am an untaught man.

  Phaedr. You see how matters stand; and therefore let there be no
more pretences; for, indeed, I know the word that is irresistible.

  Soc. Then don't say it.

  Phaedr. Yes, but I will; and my word shall be an oath. "I say, or
rather swear"-but what god will be witness of my oath?-"By this
plane-tree I swear, that unless you repeat the discourse here in the
face of this very plane-tree, I will never tell you another; never let
you have word of another!"

  Soc. Villain I am conquered; the poor lover of discourse has no more
to say.

  Phaedr. Then why are you still at your tricks?

  Soc. I am not going to play tricks now that you have taken the oath,
for I cannot allow myself to be starved.

  Phaedr. Proceed.

  Soc. Shall I tell you what I will do?

  Phaedr. What?

  Soc. I will veil my face and gallop through the discourse as fast as
I can, for if I see you I shall feel ashamed and not know what to say.

  Phaedr. Only go on and you may do anything else which you please.

  Soc. Come, O ye Muses, melodious, as ye are called, whether you have
received this name from the character of your strains, or because
the Melians are a musical race, help, O help me in the tale which my
good friend here desires me to rehearse, in order that his friend whom
he always deemed wise may seem to him to be wiser than ever.

  Once upon a time there was a fair boy, or, more properly speaking, a
youth; he was very fair and had a great many lovers; and there was one
special cunning one, who had persuaded the youth that he did not
love him, but he really loved him all the same; and one day when he
was paying his addresses to him, he used this very argument-that he
ought to accept the non-lover rather than the lover; his words were as
follows:-

  "All good counsel begins in the same way; a man should know what
he is advising about, or his counsel will all come to nought. But
people imagine that they know about the nature of things, when they
don't know about them, and, not having come to an understanding at
first because they think that they know, they end, as might be
expected, in contradicting one another and themselves. Now you and I
must not be guilty of this fundamental error which we condemn in
others; but as our question is whether the lover or non-lover is to be
preferred, let us first of all agree in defining the nature and
power of love, and then, keeping our eyes upon the definition and to
this appealing, let us further enquire whether love brings advantage
or disadvantage.

  "Every one sees that love is a desire, and we know also that
non-lovers desire the beautiful and good. Now in what way is the lover
to be distinguished from the non-lover? Let us note that in every
one of us there are two guiding and ruling principles which lead us
whither they will; one is the natural desire of pleasure, the other is
an acquired opinion which aspires after the best; and these two are
sometimes in harmony and then again at war, and sometimes the one,
sometimes the other conquers. When opinion by the help of reason leads
us to the best, the conquering principle is called temperance; but
when desire, which is devoid of reason, rules in us and drags us to
pleasure, that power of misrule is called excess. Now excess has
many names, and many members, and many forms, and any of these forms
when very marked gives a name, neither honourable nor creditable, to
the bearer of the name. The desire of eating, for example, which
gets the better of the higher reason and the other desires, is
called gluttony, and he who is possessed by it is called a glutton-I
the tyrannical desire of drink, which inclines the possessor of the
desire to drink, has a name which is only too obvious, and there can
be as little doubt by what name any other appetite of the same
family would be called;-it will be the name of that which happens to
be eluminant. And now I think that you will perceive the drift of my
discourse; but as every spoken word is in a manner plainer than the
unspoken, I had better say further that the irrational desire which
overcomes the tendency of opinion towards right, and is led away to
the enjoyment of beauty, and especially of personal beauty, by the
desires which are her own kindred-that supreme desire, I say, which by
leading conquers and by the force of passion is reinforced, from
this very force, receiving a name, is called love."

  And now, dear Phaedrus, I shall pause for an instant to ask
whether you do not think me, as I appear to myself, inspired?

  Phaedr. Yes, Socrates, you seem to have a very unusual flow of
words.

  Soc. Listen to me, then, in silence; for surely the place is holy;
so that you must not wonder, if, as I proceed, I appear to be in a
divine fury, for already I am getting into dithyrambics.

  Phaedr. Nothing can be truer.

  Soc. The responsibility rests with you. But hear what follows, and
Perhaps the fit may be averted; all is in their hands above. I will go
on talking to my youth. Listen:

  Thus, my friend, we have declared and defined the nature of the
subject. Keeping the definition in view, let us now enquire what
advantage or disadvantage is likely to ensue from the lover or the
non-lover to him who accepts their advances.

  He who is the victim of his passions and the slave of pleasure
will of course desire to make his beloved as agreeable to himself as
possible. Now to him who has a mind discased anything is agreeable
which is not opposed to him, but that which is equal or superior is
hateful to him, and therefore the lover Will not brook any superiority
or equality on the part of his beloved; he is always employed in
reducing him to inferiority. And the ignorant is the inferior of the
wise, the coward of the brave, the slow of speech of the speaker,
the dull of the clever. These, and not these only, are the mental
defects of the beloved;-defects which, when implanted by nature, are
necessarily a delight to the lover, and when not implanted, he must
contrive to implant them in him, if he would not be deprived of his
fleeting joy. And therefore he cannot help being jealous, and will
debar his beloved from the advantages of society which would make a
man of him, and especially from that society which would have given
him wisdom, and thereby he cannot fail to do him great harm. That is
to say, in his excessive fear lest he should come to be despised in
his eyes he will be compelled to banish from him divine philosophy;
and there is no greater injury which he can inflict upon him than
this. He will contrive that his beloved shall be wholly ignorant,
and in everything shall look to him; he is to be the delight of the
lover's heart, and a curse to himself. Verily, a lover is a profitable
guardian and associate for him in all that relates to his mind.

  Let us next see how his master, whose law of life is pleasure and
not good, will keep and train the body of his servant. Will he not
choose a beloved who is delicate rather than sturdy and strong? One
brought up in shady bowers and not in the bright sun, a stranger to
manly exercises and the sweat of toil, accustomed only to a soft and
luxurious diet, instead of the hues of health having the colours of
paint and ornament, and the rest of a piece?-such a life as any one
can imagine and which I need not detail at length. But I may sum up
all that I have to say in a word, and pass on. Such a person in war,
or in any of the great crises of life, will be the anxiety of his
friends and also of his lover, and certainly not the terror of his
enemies; which nobody can deny.

  And now let us tell what advantage or disadvantage the beloved
will receive from the guardianship and society of his lover in the
matter of his property; this is the next point to be considered. The
lover will be the first to see what, indeed, will be sufficiently
evident to all men, that he desires above all things to deprive his
beloved of his dearest and best and holiest possessions, father,
mother, kindred, friends, of all whom he thinks may be hinderers or
reprovers of their most sweet converse; he will even cast a jealous
eye upon his gold and silver or other property, because these make him
a less easy prey, and when caught less manageable; hence he is of
necessity displeased at his possession of them and rejoices at their
loss; and he would like him to be wifeless, childless, homeless, as
well; and the longer the better, for the longer he is all this, the
longer he will enjoy him.

  There are some soft of animals, such as flatterers, who are
dangerous and, mischievous enough, and yet nature has mingled a
temporary pleasure and grace in their composition. You may say that
a courtesan is hurtful, and disapprove of such creatures and their
practices, and yet for the time they are very pleasant. But the
lover is not only hurtful to his love; he is also an extremely
disagreeable companion. The old proverb says that "birds of a
feather flock together"; I suppose that equality of years inclines
them to the same pleasures, and similarity begets friendship; yet
you may have more than enough even of this; and verily constraint is
always said to be grievous. Now the lover is not only unlike his
beloved, but he forces himself upon him. For he is old and his love is
young, and neither day nor night will he leave him if he can help;
necessity and the sting of desire drive him on, and allure him with
the pleasure which he receives from seeing, hearing, touching,
perceiving him in every way. And therefore he is delighted to fasten
upon him and to minister to him. But what pleasure or consolation
can the beloved be receiving all this time? Must he not feel the
extremity of disgust when he looks at an old shrivelled face and the
remainder to match, which even in a description is disagreeable, and
quite detestable when he is forced into daily contact with his
lover; moreover he is jealously watched and guarded against everything
and everybody, and has to hear misplaced and exaggerated praises of
himself, and censures equally inappropriate, which are intolerable
when the man is sober, and, besides being intolerable, are published
all over the world in all their indelicacy and wearisomeness when he
is drunk.

  And not only while his love continues is he mischievous and
unpleasant, but when his love ceases he becomes a perfidious enemy
of him on whom he showered his oaths and prayers and promises, and yet
could hardly prevail upon him to tolerate the tedium of his company
even from motives of interest. The hour of payment arrives, and now he
is the servant of another master; instead of love and infatuation,
wisdom and temperance are his bosom's lords; but the beloved has not
discovered the change which has taken place in him, when he asks for a
return and recalls to his recollection former sayings and doings; he
believes himself to be speaking to the same person, and the other, not
having the courage to confess the truth, and not knowing how to fulfil
the oaths and promises which he made when under the dominion of folly,
and having now grown wise and temperate, does not want to do as he did
or to be as he was before. And so he runs away and is constrained to
be a defaulter; the oyster-shell has fallen with the other side
uppermost-he changes pursuit into flight, while the other is compelled
to follow him with passion and imprecation not knowing that he ought
never from the first to have accepted a demented lover instead of a
sensible non-lover; and that in making such a choice he was giving
himself up to a faithless, morose, envious, disagreeable being,
hurtful to his estate, hurtful to his bodily health, and still more
hurtful to the cultivation of his mind, than which there neither is
nor ever will be anything more honoured in the eyes both of gods and
men. Consider this, fair youth, and know that in the friendship of the
lover there is no real kindness; he has an appetite and wants to
feed upon you:

    As wolves love lambs so lovers love their loves.

  But I told you so, I am speaking in verse, and therefore I had
better make an end; enough.

  Phaedr. I thought that you were only halfway and were going to
make a similar speech about all the advantages of accepting the
non-lover. Why do you not proceed?

  Soc. Does not your simplicity observe that I have got out of
dithyrambics into heroics, when only uttering a censure on the
lover? And if I am to add the praises of the non-lover, what will
become of me? Do you not perceive that I am already overtaken by the
Nymphs to whom you have mischievously exposed me? And therefore will
only add that the non-lover has all the advantages in which the
lover is accused of being deficient. And now I will say no more; there
has been enough of both of them. Leaving the tale to its fate, I
will cross the river and make the best of my way home, lest a worse
thing be inflicted upon me by you.

  Phaedr. Not yet, Socrates; not until the heat of the day has passed;
do you not see that the hour is almost noon? there is the midday sun
standing still, as people say, in the meridian. Let us rather stay and
talk over what has been said, and then return in the cool.

  Soc. Your love of discourse, Phaedrus, is superhuman, simply
marvellous, and I do not believe that there is any one of your
contemporaries who has either made or in one way or another has
compelled others to make an equal number of speeches. I would except
Simmias the Theban, but all the rest are far behind you. And now, I do
verily believe that you have been the cause of another.

  Phaedr. That is good news. But what do you mean?

  Soc. I mean to say that as I was about to cross the stream the usual
sign was given to me,-that sign which always forbids, but never
bids, me to do anything which I am going to do; and I thought that I
heard a voice saying in my car that I had been guilty of impiety, and.
that I must not go away until I had made an atonement. Now I am a
diviner, though not a very good one, but I have enough religion for my
own use, as you might say of a bad writer-his writing is good enough
for him; and I am beginning to see that I was in error. O my friend,
how prophetic is the human soul! At the time I had a sort of
misgiving, and, like Ibycus, "I was troubled; I feared that I might be
buying honour from men at the price of sinning against the gods."
Now I recognize my error.

  Phaedr. What error?

  Soc. That was a dreadful speech which you brought with you, and
you made me utter one as bad.

  Phaedr. How so?

  Soc. It was foolish, I say,-to a certain extent, impious; can
anything be more dreadful?

  Phaedr. Nothing, if the speech was really such as you describe.

  Soc. Well, and is not Eros the son of Aphrodite, and a god?

  Phaedr. So men say.

  Soc. But that was not acknowledged by Lysias in his speech, nor by
you in that other speech which you by a charm drew from my lips. For
if love be, as he surely is, a divinity, he cannot be evil. Yet this
was the error of both the speeches. There was also a simplicity
about them which was refreshing; having no truth or honesty in them,
nevertheless they pretended to be something, hoping to succeed in
deceiving the manikins of earth and gain celebrity among them.
Wherefore I must have a purgation. And I bethink me of an ancient
purgation of mythological error which was devised, not by Homer, for
he never had the wit to discover why he was blind, but by Stesichorus,
who was a philosopher and knew the reason why; and therefore, when
he lost his eyes, for that was the penalty which was inflicted upon
him for reviling the lovely Helen, he at once purged himself. And
the purgation was a recantation, which began thus,-

  False is that word of mine-the truth is that thou didst not embark
in ships, nor ever go to the walls of Troy;

and when he had completed his poem, which is called "the recantation,"
immediately his sight returned to him. Now I will be wiser than either
Stesichorus or Homer, in that I am going to make my recantation for
reviling love before I suffer; and this I will attempt, not as before,
veiled and ashamed, but with forehead bold and bare.

  Phaedr. Nothing could be more agreeable to me than to hear you say
so.

  Soc. Only think, my good Phaedrus, what an utter want of delicacy
was shown in the two discourses; I mean, in my own and in that which
you recited out of the book. Would not any one who was himself of a
noble and gentle nature, and who loved or ever had loved a nature like
his own, when we tell of the petty causes of lovers' jealousies, and
of their exceeding animosities, and of the injuries which they do to
their beloved, have imagined that our ideas of love were taken from
some haunt of sailors to which good manners were unknown-he would
certainly never have admitted the justice of our censure?

  Phaedr. I dare say not, Socrates.

  Soc. Therefore, because I blush at the thought of this person, and
also because I am afraid of Love himself, I desire to wash the brine
out of my ears with water from the spring; and I would counsel
Lysias not to delay, but to write another discourse, which shall prove
that ceteris paribus the lover ought to be accepted rather than the
non-lover.

  Phaedr. Be assured that he shall. You shall speak the praises of the
lover, and Lysias shall be compelled by me to write another
discourse on the same theme.

  Soc. You will be true to your nature in that, and therefore I
believe you.

  Phaedr. Speak, and fear not.

  Soc. But where is the fair youth whom I was addressing before, and
who ought to listen now; lest, if he hear me not, he should accept a
non-lover before he knows what he is doing?

  Phaedr. He is close at hand, and always at your service.

  Soc. Know then, fair youth, that the former discourse was the word
of Phaedrus, the son of Vain Man, who dwells in the city of Myrrhina
(Myrrhinusius). And this which I am about to utter is the
recantation of Stesichorus the son of Godly Man (Euphemus), who
comes from the town of Desire (Himera), and is to the following
effect: "I told a lie when I said" that the beloved ought to accept
the non-lover when he might have the lover, because the one is sane,
and the other mad. It might be so if madness were simply an evil;
but there is also a madness which is a divine gift, and the source
of the chiefest blessings granted to men. For prophecy is a madness,
and the prophetess at Delphi and the priestesses at Dodona when out of
their senses have conferred great benefits on Hellas, both in public
and private life, but when in their senses few or none. And I might
also tell you how the Sibyl and other inspired persons have given to
many an one many an intimation of the future which has saved them from
falling. But it would be tedious to speak of what every one knows.

  There will be more reason in appealing to the ancient inventors of
names, who would never have connected prophecy (mantike) which
foretells the future and is the noblest of arts, with madness
(manike), or called them both by the same name, if they had deemed
madness to be a disgrace or dishonour;-they must have thought that
there was an inspired madness which was a noble thing; for the two
words, mantike and manike, are really the same, and the letter t is
only a modern and tasteless insertion. And this is confirmed by the
name which was given by them to the rational investigation of
futurity, whether made by the help of birds or of other signs-this,
for as much as it is an art which supplies from the reasoning
faculty mind (nous) and information (istoria) to human thought
(oiesis) they originally termed oionoistike, but the word has been
lately altered and made sonorous by the modern introduction of the
letter Omega (oionoistike and oionistike), and in proportion
prophecy (mantike) is more perfect and august than augury, both in
name and fact, in the same proportion, as the ancients testify, is
madness superior to a sane mind (sophrosune) for the one is only of
human, but the other of divine origin. Again, where plagues and
mightiest woes have bred in certain families, owing to some ancient
blood-guiltiness, there madness has entered with holy prayers and
rites, and by inspired utterances found a way of deliverance for those
who are in need; and he who has part in this gift, and is truly
possessed and duly out of his mind, is by the use of purifications and
mysteries made whole and except from evil, future as well as
present, and has a release from the calamity which was afflicting him.
The third kind is the madness of those who are possessed by the Muses;
which taking hold of a delicate and virgin soul, and there inspiring
frenzy, awakens lyrical and all other numbers; with these adorning the
myriad actions of ancient heroes for the instruction of posterity. But
he who, having no touch of the Muses' madness in his soul, comes to
the door and thinks that he will get into the temple by the help of
art-he, I say, and his poetry are not admitted; the sane man
disappears and is nowhere when he enters into rivalry with the madman.

  I might tell of many other noble deeds which have sprung from
inspired madness. And therefore, let no one frighten or flutter us
by saying that the temperate friend is to be chosen rather than the
inspired, but let him further show that love is not sent by the gods
for any good to lover or beloved; if he can do so we will allow him to
carry off the palm. And we, on our part, will prove in answer to him
that the madness of love is the greatest of heaven's blessings, and
the proof shall be one which the wise will receive, and the witling
disbelieve. But first of all, let us view the affections and actions
of the soul divine and human, and try to ascertain the truth about
them. The beginning of our proof is as follows:-

  The soul through all her being is immortal, for that which is ever
in motion is immortal; but that which moves another and is moved by
another, in ceasing to move ceases also to live. Only the self-moving,
never leaving self, never ceases to move, and is the fountain and
beginning of motion to all that moves besides. Now, the beginning is
unbegotten, for that which is begotten has a beginning; but the
beginning is begotten of nothing, for if it were begotten of
something, then the begotten would not come from a beginning. But if
unbegotten, it must also be indestructible; for if beginning were
destroyed, there could be no beginning out of anything, nor anything
out of a beginning; and all things must have a beginning. And
therefore the self-moving is the beginning of motion; and this can
neither be destroyed nor begotten, else the whole heavens and all
creation would collapse and stand still, and never again have motion
or birth. But if the self-moving is proved to be immortal, he who
affirms that self-motion is the very idea and essence of the soul will
not be put to confusion. For the body which is moved from without is
soulless; but that which is moved from within has a soul, for such
is the nature of the soul. But if this be true, must not the soul be
the self-moving, and therefore of necessity unbegotten and immortal?
Enough of the soul's immortality.

  Of the nature of the soul, though her true form be ever a theme of
large and more than mortal discourse, let me speak briefly, and in a
figure. And let the figure be composite-a pair of winged horses and
a charioteer. Now the winged horses and the charioteers of the gods
are all of them noble and of noble descent, but those of other races
are mixed; the human charioteer drives his in a pair; and one of
them is noble and of noble breed, and the other is ignoble and of
ignoble breed; and the driving of them of necessity gives a great deal
of trouble to him. I will endeavour to explain to you in what way
the mortal differs from the immortal creature. The soul in her
totality has the care of inanimate being everywhere, and traverses the
whole heaven in divers forms appearing--when perfect and fully
winged she soars upward, and orders the whole world; whereas the
imperfect soul, losing her wings and drooping in her flight at last
settles on the solid ground-there, finding a home, she receives an
earthly frame which appears to be self-moved, but is really moved by
her power; and this composition of soul and body is called a living
and mortal creature. For immortal no such union can be reasonably
believed to be; although fancy, not having seen nor surely known the
nature of God, may imagine an immortal creature having both a body and
also a soul which are united throughout all time. Let that, however,
be as God wills, and be spoken of acceptably to him. And now let us
ask the reason why the soul loses her wings!

  The wing is the corporeal element which is most akin to the
divine, and which by nature tends to soar aloft and carry that which
gravitates downwards into the upper region, which is the habitation of
the gods. The divine is beauty, wisdom, goodness, and the like; and by
these the wing of the soul is nourished, and grows apace; but when fed
upon evil and foulness and the opposite of good, wastes and falls
away. Zeus, the mighty lord, holding the reins of a winged chariot,
leads the way in heaven, ordering all and taking care of all; and
there follows him the array of gods and demigods, marshalled in eleven
bands; Hestia alone abides at home in the house of heaven; of the rest
they who are reckoned among the princely twelve march in their
appointed order. They see many blessed sights in the inner heaven, and
there are many ways to and fro, along which the blessed gods are
passing, every one doing his own work; he may follow who will and can,
for jealousy has no place in the celestial choir. But when they go
to banquet and festival, then they move up the steep to the top of the
vault of heaven. The chariots of the gods in even poise, obeying the
rein, glide rapidly; but the others labour, for the vicious steed goes
heavily, weighing down the charioteer to the earth when his steed
has not been thoroughly trained:-and this is the hour of agony and
extremest conflict for the soul. For the immortals, when they are at
the end of their course, go forth and stand upon the outside of
heaven, and the revolution of the spheres carries them round, and they
behold the things beyond. But of the heaven which is above the
heavens, what earthly poet ever did or ever will sing worthily? It
is such as I will describe; for I must dare to speak the truth, when
truth is my theme. There abides the very being with which true
knowledge is concerned; the colourless, formless, intangible
essence, visible only to mind, the pilot of the soul. The divine
intelligence, being nurtured upon mind and pure knowledge, and the
intelligence of every soul which is capable of receiving the food
proper to it, rejoices at beholding reality, and once more gazing upon
truth, is replenished and made glad, until the revolution of the
worlds brings her round again to the same place. In the revolution she
beholds justice, and temperance, and knowledge absolute, not in the
form of generation or of relation, which men call existence, but
knowledge absolute in existence absolute; and beholding the other true
existences in like manner, and feasting upon them, she passes down
into the interior of the heavens and returns home; and there the
charioteer putting up his horses at the stall, gives them ambrosia
to eat and nectar to drink.

  Such is the life of the gods; but of other souls, that which follows
God best and is likest to him lifts the head of the charioteer into
the outer world, and is carried round in the revolution, troubled
indeed by the steeds, and with difficulty beholding true being;
while another only rises and falls, and sees, and again fails to see
by reason of the unruliness of the steeds. The rest of the souls are
also longing after the upper world and they all follow, but not
being strong enough they are carried round below the surface,
plunging, treading on one another, each striving to be first; and
there is confusion and perspiration and the extremity of effort; and
many of them are lamed or have their wings broken through the
ill-driving of the charioteers; and all of them after a fruitless
toil, not having attained to the mysteries of true being, go away, and
feed upon opinion. The reason why the souls exhibit this exceeding
eagerness to behold the plain of truth is that pasturage is found
there, which is suited to the highest part of the soul; and the wing
on which the soul soars is nourished with this. And there is a law
of Destiny, that the soul which attains any vision of truth in company
with a god is preserved from harm until the next period, and if
attaining always is always unharmed. But when she is unable to follow,
and fails to behold the truth, and through some ill-hap sinks
beneath the double load of forgetfulness and vice, and her wings
fall from her and she drops to the ground, then the law ordains that
this soul shall at her first birth pass, not into any other animal,
but only into man; and the soul which has seen most of truth shall
come to the birth as a philosopher, or artist, or some musical and
loving nature; that which has seen truth in the second degree shall be
some righteous king or warrior chief; the soul which is of the third
class shall be a politician, or economist, or trader; the fourth shall
be lover of gymnastic toils, or a physician; the fifth shall lead
the life of a prophet or hierophant; to the sixth the character of
poet or some other imitative artist will be assigned; to the seventh
the life of an artisan or husbandman; to the eighth that of a
sophist or demagogue; to the ninth that of a tyrant-all these are
states of probation, in which he who does righteously improves, and he
who does unrighteously, improves, and he who does unrighteously,
deteriorates his lot.

  Ten thousand years must elapse before the soul of each one can
return to the place from whence she came, for she cannot grow her
wings in less; only the soul of a philosopher, guileless and true,
or the soul of a lover, who is not devoid of philosophy, may acquire
wings in the third of the recurring periods of a thousand years; he is
distinguished from the ordinary good man who gains wings in three
thousand years:-and they who choose this life three times in
succession have wings given them, and go away at the end of three
thousand years. But the others receive judgment when they have
completed their first life, and after the judgment they go, some of
them to the houses of correction which are under the earth, and are
punished; others to some place in heaven whither they are lightly
borne by justice, and there they live in a manner worthy of the life
which they led here when in the form of men. And at the end of the
first thousand years the good souls and also the evil souls both
come to draw lots and choose their second life, and they may take
any which they please. The soul of a man may pass into the life of a
beast, or from the beast return again into the man. But the soul which
has never seen the truth will not pass into the human form. For a
man must have intelligence of universals, and be able to proceed
from the many particulars of sense to one conception of reason;-this
is the recollection of those things which our soul once saw while
following God-when regardless of that which we now call being she
raised her head up towards the true being. And therefore the mind of
the philosopher alone has wings; and this is just, for he is always,
according to the measure of his abilities, clinging in recollection to
those things in which God abides, and in beholding which He is what He
is. And he who employs aright these memories is ever being initiated
into perfect mysteries and alone becomes truly perfect. But, as he
forgets earthly interests and is rapt in the divine, the vulgar deem
him mad, and rebuke him; they do not see that he is inspired.

  Thus far I have been speaking of the fourth and last kind of
madness, which is imputed to him who, when he sees the beauty of
earth, is transported with the recollection of the true beauty; he
would like to fly away, but he cannot; he is like a bird fluttering
and looking upward and careless of the world below; and he is
therefore thought to be mad. And I have shown this of all inspirations
to be the noblest and highest and the offspring of the highest to
him who has or shares in it, and that he who loves the beautiful is
called a lover because he partakes of it. For, as has been already
said, every soul of man has in the way of nature beheld true being;
this was the condition of her passing into the form of man. But all
souls do not easily recall the things of the other world; they may
have seen them for a short time only, or they may have been
unfortunate in their earthly lot, and, having had their hearts
turned to unrighteousness through some corrupting influence, they
may have lost the memory of the holy things which once they saw. Few
only retain an adequate remembrance of them; and they, when they
behold here any image of that other world, are rapt in amazement;
but they are ignorant of what this rapture means, because they do
not clearly perceive. For there is no light of justice or temperance
or any of the higher ideas which are precious to souls in the
earthly copies of them: they are seen through a glass dimly; and there
are few who, going to the images, behold in them the realities, and
these only with difficulty. There was a time when with the rest of the
happy band they saw beauty shining in brightness-we philosophers
following in the train of Zeus, others in company with other gods; and
then we beheld the beatific vision and were initiated into a mystery
which may be truly called most blessed, celebrated by us in our
state of innocence, before we had any experience of evils to come,
when we were admitted to the sight of apparitions innocent and
simple and calm and happy, which we beheld shining impure light,
pure ourselves and not yet enshrined in that living tomb which we
carry about, now that we are imprisoned in the body, like an oyster in
his shell. Let me linger over the memory of scenes which have passed
away.

  But of beauty, I repeat again that we saw her there shining in
company with the celestial forms; and coming to earth we find her here
too, shining in clearness through the clearest aperture of sense.
For sight is the most piercing of our bodily senses; though not by
that is wisdom seen; her loveliness would have been transporting if
there had been a visible image of her, and the other ideas, if they
had visible counterparts, would be equally lovely. But this is the
privilege of beauty, that being the loveliest she is also the most
palpable to sight. Now he who is not newly initiated or who has become
corrupted, does not easily rise out of this world to the sight of true
beauty in the other; he looks only at her earthly namesake, and
instead of being awed at the sight of her, he is given over to
pleasure, and like a brutish beast he rushes on to enjoy and beget; he
consorts with wantonness, and is not afraid or ashamed of pursuing
pleasure in violation of nature. But he whose initiation is recent,
and who has been the spectator of many glories in the other world,
is amazed when he sees any one having a godlike face or form, which is
the expression of divine beauty; and at first a shudder runs through
him, and again the old awe steals over him; then looking upon the face
of his beloved as of a god he reverences him, and if he were not
afraid of being thought a downright madman, he would sacrifice to
his beloved as to the image of a god; then while he gazes on him there
is a sort of reaction, and the shudder passes into an unusual heat and
perspiration; for, as he receives the effluence of beauty through
the eyes, the wing moistens and he warms. And as he warms, the parts
out of which the wing grew, and which had been hitherto closed and
rigid, and had prevented the wing from shooting forth, are melted, and
as nourishment streams upon him, the lower end of the wings begins
to swell and grow from the root upwards; and the growth extends
under the whole soul-for once the whole was winged.

  During this process the whole soul is all in a state of ebullition
and effervescence,-which may be compared to the irritation and
uneasiness in the gums at the time of cutting teeth,-bubbles up, and
has a feeling of uneasiness and tickling; but when in like manner
the soul is beginning to grow wings, the beauty of the beloved meets
her eye and she receives the sensible warm motion of particles which
flow towards her, therefore called emotion (imeros), and is
refreshed and warmed by them, and then she ceases from her pain with
joy. But when she is parted from her beloved and her moisture fails,
then the orifices of the passage out of which the wing shoots dry up
and close, and intercept the germ of the wing; which, being shut up
with the emotion, throbbing as with the pulsations of an artery,
pricks the aperture which is nearest, until at length the entire
soul is pierced and maddened and pained, and at the recollection of
beauty is again delighted. And from both of them together the soul
is oppressed at the strangeness of her condition, and is in a great
strait and excitement, and in her madness can neither sleep by night
nor abide in her place by day. And wherever she thinks that she will
behold the beautiful one, thither in her desire she runs. And when she
has seen him, and bathed herself in the waters of beauty, her
constraint is loosened, and she is refreshed, and has no more pangs
and pains; and this is the sweetest of all pleasures at the time,
and is the reason why the soul of the lover will never forsake his
beautiful one, whom he esteems above all; he has forgotten mother
and brethren and companions, and he thinks nothing of the neglect
and loss of his property; the rules and proprieties of life, on
which he formerly prided himself, he now despises, and is ready to
sleep like a servant, wherever he is allowed, as near as he can to his
desired one, who is the object of his worship, and the physician who
can alone assuage the greatness of his pain. And this state, my dear
imaginary youth to whom I am talking, is by men called love, and among
the gods has a name at which you, in your simplicity, may be
inclined to mock; there are two lines in the apocryphal writings of
Homer in which the name occurs. One of them is rather outrageous,
and not altogether metrical. They are as follows:

   Mortals call him fluttering love,

   But the immortals call him winged one,

   Because the growing of wings is a necessity to him.

You may believe this, but not unless you like. At any rate the loves
of lovers and their causes are such as I have described.

  Now the lover who is taken to be the attendant of Zeus is better
able to bear the winged god, and can endure a heavier burden; but
the attendants and companions of Ares, when under the influence of
love, if they fancy that they have been at all wronged, are ready to
kill and put an end to themselves and their beloved. And he who
follows in the train of any other god, while he is unspoiled and the
impression lasts, honours and imitates him, as far as he is able;
and after the manner of his god he behaves in his intercourse with his
beloved and with the rest of the world during the first period of
his earthly existence. Every one chooses his love from the ranks of
beauty according to his character, and this he makes his god, and
fashions and adorns as a sort of image which he is to fall down and
worship. The followers of Zeus desire that their beloved should have a
soul like him; and therefore they seek out some one of a philosophical
and imperial nature, and when they have found him and loved him,
they do all they can to confirm such a nature in him, and if they have
no experience of such a disposition hitherto, they learn of any one
who can teach them, and themselves follow in the same way. And they
have the less difficulty in finding the nature of their own god in
themselves, because they have been compelled to gaze intensely on him;
their recollection clings to him, and they become possessed of him,
and receive from him their character and disposition, so far as man
can participate in God. The qualities of their god they attribute to
the beloved, wherefore they love him all the more, and if, like the
Bacchic Nymphs, they draw inspiration from Zeus, they pour out their
own fountain upon him, wanting to make him as like as possible to
their own god. But those who are the followers of Here seek a royal
love, and when they have found him they do just the same with him; and
in like manner the followers of Apollo, and of every other god walking
in the ways of their god, seek a love who is to be made like him
whom they serve, and when they have found him, they themselves imitate
their god, and persuade their love to do the same, and educate him
into the manner and nature of the god as far as they each can; for
no feelings of envy or jealousy are entertained by them towards
their beloved, but they do their utmost to create in him the
greatest likeness of themselves and of the god whom they honour.
Thus fair and blissful to the beloved is the desire of the inspired
lover, and the initiation of which I speak into the mysteries of
true love, if he be captured by the lover and their purpose is
effected. Now the beloved is taken captive in the following manner:-

  As I said at the beginning of this tale, I divided each soul into
three-two horses and a charioteer; and one of the horses was good
and the other bad: the division may remain, but I have not yet
explained in what the goodness or badness of either consists, and to
that I will proceed. The right-hand horse is upright and cleanly made;
he has a lofty neck and an aquiline nose; his colour is white, and his
eyes dark; he is a lover of honour and modesty and temperance, and the
follower of true glory; he needs no touch of the whip, but is guided
by word and admonition only. The other is a crooked lumbering
animal, put together anyhow; he has a short thick neck; he is
flat-faced and of a dark colour, with grey eyes and blood-red
complexion; the mate of insolence and pride, shag-eared and deaf,
hardly yielding to whip and spur. Now when the charioteer beholds
the vision of love, and has his whole soul warmed through sense, and
is full of the prickings and ticklings of desire, the obedient
steed, then as always under the government of shame, refrains from
leaping on the beloved; but the other, heedless of the pricks and of
the blows of the whip, plunges and runs away, giving all manner of
trouble to his companion and the charioteer, whom he forces to
approach the beloved and to remember the joys of love. They at first
indignantly oppose him and will not be urged on to do terrible and
unlawful deeds; but at last, when he persists in plaguing them, they
yield and agree to do as he bids them.

  And now they are at the spot and behold the flashing beauty of the
beloved; which when the charioteer sees, his memory is carried to
the true beauty, whom he beholds in company with Modesty like an image
placed upon a holy pedestal. He sees her, but he is afraid and falls
backwards in adoration, and by his fall is compelled to pull back
the reins with such violence as to bring both the steeds on their
haunches, the one willing and unresisting, the unruly one very
unwilling; and when they have gone back a little, the one is
overcome with shame and wonder, and his whole soul is bathed in
perspiration; the other, when the pain is over which the bridle and
the fall had given him, having with difficulty taken breath, is full
of wrath and reproaches, which he heaps upon the charioteer and his
fellow-steed, for want of courage and manhood, declaring that they
have been false to their agreement and guilty of desertion. Again they
refuse, and again he urges them on, and will scarce yield to their
prayer that he would wait until another time. When the appointed
hour comes, they make as if they had forgotten, and he reminds them,
fighting and neighing and dragging them on, until at length he, on the
same thoughts intent, forces them to draw near again. And when they
are near he stoops his head and puts up his tail, and takes the bit in
his teeth. and pulls shamelessly. Then the charioteer is. worse off
than ever; he falls back like a racer at the barrier, and with a still
more violent wrench drags the bit out of the teeth of the wild steed
and covers his abusive tongue and-jaws with blood, and forces his legs
and haunches to the ground and punishes him sorely. And when this
has happened several times and the villain has ceased from his
wanton way, he is tamed and humbled, and follows the will of the
charioteer, and when he sees the beautiful one he is ready to die of
fear. And from that time forward the soul of the lover follows the
beloved in modesty and holy fear.

  And so the beloved who, like a god, has received every true and
loyal service from his lover, not in pretence but in reality, being
also himself of a nature friendly to his admirer, if in former days he
has blushed to own his passion and turned away his lover, because
his youthful companions or others slanderously told him that he
would be disgraced, now as years advance, at the appointed age and
time, is led to receive him into communion. For fate which has
ordained that there shall be no friendship among the evil has also
ordained that there shall ever be friendship among the good. And the
beloved when he has received him into communion and intimacy, is quite
amazed at the good-will of the lover; he recognises that the
inspired friend is worth all other friends or kinsmen; they have
nothing of friendship in them worthy to be compared with his. And when
his feeling continues and he is nearer to him and embraces him, in
gymnastic exercises and at other times of meeting, then the fountain
of that stream, which Zeus when he was in love with Ganymede named
Desire, overflows upon the lover, and some enters into his soul, and
some when he is filled flows out again; and as a breeze or an echo
rebounds from the smooth rocks and returns whence it came, so does the
stream of beauty, passing through the eyes which are the windows of
the soul, come back to the beautiful one; there arriving and
quickening the passages of the wings, watering. them and inclining
them to grow, and filling the soul of the beloved also with love.
And thus he loves, but he knows not what; he does not understand and
cannot explain his own state; he appears to have caught the
infection of blindness from another; the lover is his mirror in whom
he is beholding himself, but he is not aware of this. When he is
with the lover, both cease from their pain, but when he is away then
he longs as he is longed for, and has love's image, love for love
(Anteros) lodging in his breast, which he calls and believes to be not
love but friendship only, and his desire is as the desire of the
other, but weaker; he wants to see him, touch him, kiss him, embrace
him, and probably not long afterwards his desire is accomplished. When
they meet, the wanton steed of the lover has a word to say to the
charioteer; he would like to have a little pleasure in return for many
pains, but the wanton steed of the beloved says not a word, for he
is bursting with passion which he understands not;-he throws his
arms round the lover and embraces him as his dearest friend; and, when
they are side by side, he is not in it state in which he can refuse
the lover anything, if he ask him; although his fellow-steed and the
charioteer oppose him with the arguments of shame and reason.

  After this their happiness depends upon their self-control; if the
better elements of the mind which lead to order and philosophy
prevail, then they pass their life here in happiness and
harmony-masters of themselves and orderly-enslaving the vicious and
emancipating the virtuous elements of the soul; and when the end
comes, they are light and winged for flight, having conquered in one
of the three heavenly or truly Olympian victories; nor can human
discipline or divine inspiration confer any greater blessing on man
than this. If, on the other hand, they leave philosophy and lead the
lower life of ambition, then probably, after wine or in some other
careless hour, the two wanton animals take the two souls when off
their guard and bring them together, and they accomplish that desire
of their hearts which to the many is bliss; and this having once
enjoyed they continue to enjoy, yet rarely because they have not the
approval of the whole soul. They too are dear, but not so dear to
one another as the others, either at the time of their love or
afterwards. They consider that they have given and taken from each
other the most sacred pledges, and they may not break them and fall
into enmity. At last they pass out of the body, unwinged, but eager to
soar, and thus obtain no mean reward of love and madness. For those
who have once begun the heavenward pilgrimage may not go down again to
darkness and the journey beneath the earth, but they live in light
always; happy companions in their pilgrimage, and when the time
comes at which they receive their wings they have the same plumage
because of their love.

  Thus great are the heavenly blessings which the friendship of a
lover will confer upon you, my youth. Whereas the attachment of the
non-lover, which is alloyed with a worldly prudence and has worldly
and niggardly ways of doling out benefits, will breed in your soul
those vulgar qualities which the populace applaud, will send you
bowling round the earth during a period of nine thousand years, and
leave, you a fool in the world below.

  And thus, dear Eros, I have made and paid my recantation, as well
and as fairly as I could; more especially in the matter of the
poetical figures which I was compelled to use, because Phaedrus
would have them. And now forgive the past and accept the present,
and be gracious and merciful to me, and do not in thine anger
deprive me of sight, or take from me the art of love which thou hast
given me, but grant that I may be yet more esteemed in the eyes of the
fair. And if Phaedrus or I myself said anything rude in our first
speeches, blame Lysias, who is the father of the brat, and let us have
no more of his progeny; bid him study philosophy, like his brother
Polemarchus; and then his lover Phaedrus will no longer halt between
two opinions, but will dedicate himself wholly to love and to
philosophical discourses.

  Phaedr. I join in the prayer, Socrates, and say with you, if this be
for my good, may your words come to pass. But why did you make your
second oration so much finer than the first? I wonder why. And I begin
to be afraid that I shall lose conceit of Lysias, and that he will
appear tame in comparison, even if he be willing to put another as
fine and as long as yours into the field, which I doubt. For quite
lately one of your politicians was abusing him on this very account;
and called him a "speech writer" again and again. So that a feeling of
pride may probably induce him to give up writing speeches.

  Soc. What a very amusing notion! But I think, my young man, that you
are much mistaken in your friend if you imagine that he is
frightened at a little noise; and possibly, you think that his
assailant was in earnest?

  Phaedr. I thought, Socrates, that he was. And you are aware that the
greatest and most influential statesmen are ashamed of writing
speeches and leaving them in a written form, lest they should be
called Sophists by posterity.

  Soc. You seem to be unconscious, Phaedrus, that the "sweet elbow" of
the proverb is really the long arm of the Nile. And you appear to be
equally unaware of the fact that this sweet elbow of theirs is also
a long arm. For there is nothing of which our great politicians are so
fond as of writing speeches and bequeathing them to posterity. And
they add their admirers' names at the top of the writing, out of
gratitude to them.

  Phaedr. What do you mean? I do not understand.

  Soc. Why, do you not know that when a politician writes, he begins
with the names of his approvers?

  Phaedr. How so?

  Soc. Why, he begins in this manner: "Be it enacted by the senate,
the people, or both, on the motion of a certain person," who is our
author; and so putting on a serious face, he proceeds to display his
own wisdom to his admirers in what is often a long and tedious
composition. Now what is that sort of thing but a regular piece of
authorship?

  Phaedr. True.

  Soc. And if the law is finally approved, then the author leaves
the theatre in high delight; but if the law is rejected and he is done
out of his speech-making, and not thought good enough to write, then
he and his party are in mourning.

  Phaedr. Very true.

  Soc. So far are they from despising, or rather so highly do they
value the practice of writing.

  Phaedr. No doubt.

  Soc. And when the king or orator has the power, as Lycurgus or Solon
or Darius had, of attaining an immortality or authorship in a state,
is he not thought by posterity, when they see his compositions, and
does he not think himself, while he is yet alive, to be a god?

  Phaedr. Very true.

  Soc. Then do you think that any one of this class, however
ill-disposed, would reproach Lysias with being an author?

  Phaedr. Not upon your view; for according to you he would be casting
a slur upon his own favourite pursuit.

  Soc. Any one may see that there is no disgrace in the mere fact of
writing.

  Phaedr. Certainly not.

  Soc. The disgrace begins when a man writes not well, but badly.

  Phaedr. Clearly.

  Soc. And what is well and what is badly-need we ask Lysias, or any
other poet or orator, who ever wrote or will write either a
political or any other work, in metre or out of metre, poet or prose
writer, to teach us this?

  Phaedr. Need we? For what should a man live if not for the pleasures
of discourse? Surely not for the sake of bodily pleasures, which
almost always have previous pain as a condition of them, and therefore
are rightly called slavish.

  Soc. There is time enough. And I believe that the grasshoppers
chirruping after their manner in the heat of the sun over our heads
are talking to one another and looking down at us. What would they say
if they saw that we, like the many, are not conversing, but slumbering
at mid-day, lulled by their voices, too indolent to think? Would
they not have a right to laugh at us? They might imagine that we
were slaves, who, coming to rest at a place of resort of theirs,
like sheep lie asleep at noon around the well. But if they see us
discoursing, and like Odysseus sailing past them, deaf to their
siren voices, they may perhaps, out of respect, give us of the gifts
which they receive from the gods that they may impart them to men.

  Phaedr. What gifts do you mean? I never heard of any.

  Soc. A lover of music like yourself ought surely to have heard the
story of the grasshoppers, who are said to have been human beings in
an age before the Muses. And when the Muses came and song appeared
they were ravished with delight; and singing always, never thought
of eating and drinking, until at last in their forgetfulness they
died. And now they live again in the grasshoppers; and this is the
return which the Muses make to them-they neither hunger, nor thirst,
but from the hour of their birth are always singing, and never
eating or drinking; and when they die they go and inform the Muses
in heaven who honours them on earth. They win the love of
Terpsichore for the dancers by their report of them; of Erato for
the lovers, and of the other Muses for those who do them honour,
according to the several ways of honouring them of Calliope the eldest
Muse and of Urania who is next to her, for the philosophers, of
whose music the grasshoppers make report to them; for these are the
Muses who are chiefly concerned with heaven and thought, divine as
well as human, and they have the sweetest utterance. For many reasons,
then, we ought always to talk and not to sleep at mid-day.

  Phaedr. Let us talk.

  Soc. Shall we discuss the rules of writing and speech as we were
proposing?

  Phaedr. Very good.

  Soc. In good speaking should not the mind of the speaker know the
truth of the matter about which he is going to speak?

  Phaedr. And yet, Socrates, I have heard that he who would be an
orator has nothing to do with true justice, but only with that which
is likely to be approved by the many who sit in judgment; nor with the
truly good or honourable, but only with opinion about them, and that
from opinion comes persuasion, and not from the truth.

  Soc. The words of the wise are not to be set aside; for there is
probably something in them; and therefore the meaning of this saying
is not hastily to be dismissed.

  Phaedr. Very true.

  Soc. Let us put the matter thus:-Suppose that I persuaded you to buy
a horse and go to the wars. Neither of us knew what a horse was
like, but I knew that you believed a horse to be of tame animals the
one which has the longest ears.

  Phaedr. That would be ridiculous.

  Soc. There is something more ridiculous coming:-Suppose, further,
that in sober earnest I, having persuaded you of this, went and
composed a speech in honour of an ass, whom I entitled a horse
beginning: "A noble animal and a most useful possession, especially in
war, and you may get on his back and fight, and he will carry
baggage or anything."

  Phaedr. How ridiculous!

  Soc. Ridiculous! Yes; but is not even a ridiculous friend better
than a cunning enemy?

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. And when the orator instead of putting an ass in the place of a
horse puts good for evil being himself as ignorant of their true
nature as the city on which he imposes is ignorant; and having studied
the notions of the multitude, falsely persuades them not about "the
shadow of an ass," which he confounds with a horse, but about good
which he confounds with evily-what will be the harvest which
rhetoric will be likely to gather after the sowing of that seed?

  Phaedr. The reverse of good.

  Soc. But perhaps rhetoric has been getting too roughly handled by
us, and she might answer: What amazing nonsense you are talking! As if
I forced any man to learn to speak in ignorance of the truth! Whatever
my advice may be worth, I should have told him to arrive at the
truth first, and then come to me. At the same time I boldly assert
that mere knowledge of the truth will not give you the art of
persuasion.

  Phaedr. There is reason in the lady's defence of herself.

  Soc. Quite true; if only the other arguments which remain to be
brought up bear her witness that she is an art at all. But I seem to
hear them arraying themselves on the opposite side, declaring that she
speaks falsely, and that rhetoric is a mere routine and trick, not
an art. Lo! a Spartan appears, and says that there never is nor ever
will be a real art of speaking which is divorced from the truth.

  Phaedr. And what are these arguments, Socrates? Bring them out
that we may examine them.

  Soc. Come out, fair children, and convince Phaedrus, who is the
father of similar beauties, that he will never be able to speak
about anything as he ought to speak unless he have a knowledge of
philosophy. And let Phaedrus answer you.

  Phaedr. Put the question.

  Soc. Is not rhetoric, taken generally, a universal art of enchanting
the mind by arguments; which is practised not only in courts and
public assemblies, but in private houses also, having to do with all
matters, great as well as small, good and bad alike, and is in all
equally right, and equally to be esteemed-that is what you have heard?

  Phaedr. Nay, not exactly that; I should say rather that I have heard
the art confined to speaking and writing in lawsuits, and to
speaking in public assemblies-not extended farther.

  Soc. Then I suppose that you have only heard of the rhetoric of
Nestor and Odysseus, which they composed in their leisure hours when
at Troy, and never of the rhetoric of Palamedes?

  Phaedr. No more than of Nestor and Odysseus, unless Gorgias is
your Nestor, and Thrasymachus or Theodorus your Odysseus.

  Soc. Perhaps that is my meaning. But let us leave them. And do you
tell me, instead, what are plaintiff and defendant doing in a law
court-are they not contending?

  Phaedr. Exactly so.

  Soc. About the just and unjust-that is the matter in dispute?

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. And a professor of the art will make the same thing appear to
the same persons to be at one time just, at another time, if he is
so inclined, to be unjust?

  Phaedr. Exactly.

  Soc. And when he speaks in the assembly, he will make the same
things seem good to the city at one time, and at another time the
reverse of good?

  Phaedr. That is true.

  Soc. Have we not heard of the Eleatic Palamedes (Zeno), who has an
art of speaking by which he makes the same things appear to his
hearers like and unlike, one and many, at rest and in motion?

  Phaedr. Very true.

  Soc. The art of disputation, then, is not confined to the courts and
the assembly, but is one and the same in every use of language; this
is the art, if there be such an art, which is able to find a
likeness of everything to which a likeness can be found, and draws
into the light of day the likenesses and disguises which are used by
others?

  Phaedr. How do you mean?

  Soc. Let me put the matter thus: When will there be more chance of
deception-when the difference is large or small?

  Phaedr. When the difference is small.

  Soc. And you will be less likely to be discovered in passing by
degrees into the other extreme than when you go all at once?

  Phaedr. Of course.

  Soc. He, then, who would. deceive others, and not be deceived,
must exactly know the real likenesses and differences of things?

  Phaedr. He must.

  Soc. And if he is ignorant of the true nature of any subject, how
can he detect the greater or less degree of likeness in other things
to that of which by the hypothesis he is ignorant?

  Phaedr. He cannot.

  Soc. And when men are deceived and their notions are at variance
with realities, it is clear that the error slips in through
resemblances?

  Phaedr. Yes, that is the way.

  Soc. Then he who would be a master of the art must understand the
real nature of everything; or he will never know either how to make
the gradual departure from truth into the opposite of truth which is
effected by the help of resemblances, or how to avoid it?

  Phaedr. He will not.

  Soc. He then, who being ignorant of the truth aims at appearances,
will only attain an art of rhetoric which is ridiculous and is not
an art at all?

  Phaedr. That may be expected.

  Soc. Shall I propose that we look for examples of art and want of
art, according to our notion of them, in the speech of Lysias which
you have in your hand, and in my own speech?

  Phaedr. Nothing could be better; and indeed I think that our
previous argument has been too abstract and-wanting in illustrations.

  Soc. Yes; and the two speeches happen to afford a very good
example of the way in which the speaker who knows the truth may,
without any serious purpose, steal away the hearts of his hearers.
This piece of good-fortune I attribute to the local deities; and
perhaps, the prophets of the Muses who are singing over our heads
may have imparted their inspiration to me. For I do not imagine that I
have any rhetorical art of my own.

  Phaedr. Granted; if you will only please to get on.

  Soc. Suppose that you read me the first words of Lysias' speech.

  Phaedr. "You know how matters stand with me, and how, as I conceive,
they might be arranged for our common interest; and I maintain that
I ought not to fail in my suit, because I am not your lover. For
lovers repent-"

  Soc. Enough:-Now, shall I point out the rhetorical error of those
words?

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. Every one is aware that about some things we are agreed,
whereas about other things we differ.

  Phaedr. I think that I understand you; but will you explain
yourself?

  Soc. When any one speaks of iron and silver, is not the same thing
present in the minds of all?

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. But when any one speaks of justice and goodness we part company
and are at odds with one another and with ourselves?

  Phaedr. Precisely.

  Soc. Then in some things we agree, but not in others?

  Phaedr. That is true.

  Soc. In which are we more likely to be deceived, and in which has
rhetoric the greater power?

  Phaedr. Clearly, in the uncertain class.

  Soc. Then the rhetorician ought to make a regular division, and
acquire a distinct notion of both classes, as well of that in which
the many err, as of that in which they do not err?

  Phaedr. He who made such a distinction would have an excellent
principle.

  Soc. Yes; and in the next place he must have a keen eye for the
observation of particulars in speaking, and not make a mistake about
the class to which they are to be referred.

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. Now to which class does love belong-to the debatable or to
the undisputed class?

  Phaedr. To the debatable, clearly; for if not, do you think that
love would have allowed you to say as you did, that he is an evil both
to the lover and the beloved, and also the greatest possible good?

  Soc. Capital. But will you tell me whether I defined love at the
beginning of my speech? for, having been in an ecstasy, I cannot
well remember.

  Phaedr. Yes, indeed; that you did, and no mistake.

  Soc. Then I perceive that the Nymphs of Achelous and Pan the son
of Hermes, who inspired me, were far better rhetoricians than Lysias
the son of Cephalus. Alas! how inferior to them he is! But perhaps I
am mistaken; and Lysias at the commencement of his lover's speech
did insist on our supposing love to be something or other which he
fancied him to be, and according to this model he fashioned and framed
the remainder of his discourse. Suppose we read his beginning over
again:

  Phaedr. If you please; but you will not find what you want.

  Soc, Read, that I may have his exact words.

  Phaedr. "You know how matters stand with and how, as I conceive,
they might be arranged for our common interest; and I maintain I ought
not to fail in my suit because I am not your lover, for lovers
repent of the kindnesses which they have shown, when their love is
over."

  Soc. Here he appears to have done just the reverse of what he ought;
for he has begun at the end, and is swimming on his back through the
flood to the place of starting. His address to the fair youth begins
where the lover would have ended. Am I not right, sweet Phaedrus?

  Phaedr. Yes, indeed, Socrates; he does begin at the end.

  Soc. Then as to the other topics-are they not thrown down anyhow? Is
there any principle in them? Why should the next topic follow next
in order, or any other topic? I cannot help fancying in my ignorance
that he wrote off boldly just what came into his head, but I dare
say that you would recognize a rhetorical necessity in the
succession of the several parts of the composition?

  Phaedr. You have too good an opinion of me if you think that I
have any such insight into his principles of composition.

  Soc. At any rate, you will allow that every discourse ought to be
a living creature, having a body of its own and a head and feet; there
should be a middle, beginning, and end, adapted to one another and
to the whole?

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. Can this be said of the discourse of Lysias? See whether you
can find any more connexion in his words than in the epitaph which
is said by some to have been inscribed on the grave of Midas the
Phrygian.

  Phaedr. What is there remarkable in the epitaph?

  Soc. It is as follows:-

   I am a maiden of bronze and lie on the tomb of Midas;

   So long as water flows and tall trees grow,

   So long here on this spot by his sad tomb abiding,

   I shall declare to passers-by that Midas sleeps below.

Now in this rhyme whether a line comes first or comes last, as you
will perceive, makes no difference.

  Phaedr. You are making fun of that oration of ours.

  Soc. Well, I will say no more about your friend's speech lest I
should give offence to you; although I think that it might furnish
many other examples of what a man ought rather to avoid. But I will
proceed to the other speech, which, as I think, is also suggestive
to students of rhetoric.

  Phaedr. In what way?

  Soc. The two speeches, as you may remember, were unlike-I the one
argued that the lover and the other that the non-lover ought to be
accepted.

  Phaedr. And right manfully.

  Soc. You should rather say "madly"; and madness was the argument
of them, for, as I said, "love is a madness."

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. And of madness there were two kinds; one produced by human
infirmity, the other was a divine release of the soul from the yoke of
custom and convention.

  Phaedr. True.

  Soc. The divine madness was subdivided into four kinds, prophetic,
initiatory, poetic, erotic, having four gods presiding over them;
the first was the inspiration of Apollo, the second that of
Dionysus, the third that of the Muses, the fourth that of Aphrodite
and Eros. In the description of the last kind of madness, which was
also said to be the best, we spoke of the affection of love in a
figure, into which we introduced a tolerably credible and possibly
true though partly erring myth, which was also a hymn in honour of
Love, who is your lord and also mine, Phaedrus, and the guardian of
fair children, and to him we sung the hymn in measured and solemn
strain.

  Phaedr. I know that I had great pleasure in listening to you.

  Soc. Let us take this instance and note how the transition was
made from blame to praise.

  Phaedr. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean to say that the composition was mostly playful. Yet in
these chance fancies of the hour were involved two principles of which
we should be too glad to have a clearer description if art could
give us one.

  Phaedr. What are they?

  Soc. First, the comprehension of scattered particulars in one
idea; as in our definition of love, which whether true or false
certainly gave clearness and consistency to the discourse, the speaker
should define his several notions and so make his meaning clear.

  Phaedr. What is the other principle, Socrates?

  Soc. The second principle is that of division into species according
to the natural formation, where the joint is, not breaking any part as
a bad carver might. Just as our two discourses, alike assumed, first
of all, a single form of unreason; and then, as the body which from
being one becomes double and may be divided into a left side and right
side, each having parts right and left of the same name-after this
manner the speaker proceeded to divide the parts of the left side
and did not desist until he found in them an evil or left-handed
love which he justly reviled; and the other discourse leading us to
the madness which lay on the right side, found another love, also
having the same name, but divine, which the speaker held up before
us and applauded and affirmed to be the author of the greatest
benefits.

  Phaedr. Most true.

  Soc. I am myself a great lover of these processes of division and
generalization; they help me to speak and to think. And if I find
any man who is able to see "a One and Many" in nature, him I follow,
and "walk in his footsteps as if he were a god." And those who have
this art, I have hitherto been in the habit of calling
dialecticians; but God knows whether the name is right or not. And I
should like to know what name you would give to your or to Lysias'
disciples, and whether this may not be that famous art of rhetoric
which Thrasymachus and others teach and practise? Skilful speakers
they are, and impart their skill to any who is willing to make kings
of them and to bring gifts to them.

  Phaedr. Yes, they are royal men; but their art is not the same
with the art of those whom you call, and rightly, in my opinion,
dialecticians:-Still we are in the dark about rhetoric.

  Soc. What do you mean? The remains of it, if there be anything
remaining which can be brought under rules of art, must be a fine
thing; and, at any rate, is not to be despised by you and me. But
how much is left?

  Phaedr. There is a great deal surely to be found in books of
rhetoric?

  Soc. Yes; thank you for reminding me:-There is the exordium, showing
how the speech should begin, if I remember rightly; that is what you
mean-the niceties of the art?

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. Then follows the statement of facts, and upon that witnesses;
thirdly, proofs; fourthly, probabilities are to come; the great
Byzantian word-maker also speaks, if I am not mistaken, of
confirmation and further confirmation.

  Phaedr. You mean the excellent Theodorus.

  Soc. Yes; and he tells how refutation or further refutation is to be
managed, whether in accusation or defence. I ought also to mention the
illustrious Parian, Evenus, who first invented insinuations and
indirect praises; and also indirect censures, which according to
some he put into verse to help the memory. But shall I "to dumb
forgetfulness consign" Tisias and Gorgias, who are not ignorant that
probability is superior to truth, and who by: force of argument make
the little appear great and the great little, disguise the new in
old fashions and the old in new fashions, and have discovered forms
for everything, either short or going on to infinity. I remember
Prodicus laughing when I told him of this; he said that he had himself
discovered the true rule of art, which was to be neither long nor
short, but of a convenient length.

  Phaedr. Well done, Prodicus!

  Soc. Then there is Hippias the Elean stranger, who probably agrees
with him.

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. And there is also Polus, who has treasuries of diplasiology,
and gnomology, and eikonology, and who teaches in them the names of
which Licymnius made him a present; they were to give a polish.

  Phaedr. Had not Protagoras something of the same sort?

  Soc. Yes, rules of correct diction and many other fine precepts; for
the "sorrows of a poor old man," or any other pathetic case, no one is
better than the Chalcedonian giant; he can put a whole company of
people into a passion and out of one again by his mighty magic, and is
first-rate at inventing or disposing of any sort of calumny on any
grounds or none. All of them agree in asserting that a speech should
end in a recapitulation, though they do not all agree to use the
same word.

  Phaedr. You mean that there should be a summing up of the
arguments in order to remind the hearers of them.

  Soc. I have now said all that I have to say of the art of
rhetoric: have you anything to add?

  Phaedr. Not much; nothing very important.

  Soc. Leave the unimportant and let us bring the really important
question into the light of day, which is: What power has this art of
rhetoric, and when?

  Phaedr. A very great power in public meetings.

  Soc. It has. But I should like to know whether you have the same
feeling as I have about the rhetoricians? To me there seem to be a
great many holes in their web.

  Phaedr. Give an example.

  Soc. I will. Suppose a person to come to your friend Eryximachus, or
to his father Acumenus, and to say to him: "I know how to apply
drugs which shall have either a heating or a cooling effect, and I can
give a vomit and also a purge, and all that sort of thing; and knowing
all this, as I do, I claim to be a physician and to make physicians by
imparting this knowledge to others,"-what do you suppose that they
would say?

  Phaedr. They would be sure to ask him whether he knew "to whom" he
would give his medicines, and "when," and "how much."

  Soc. And suppose that he were to reply: "No; I know nothing of all
that; I expect the patient who consults me to be able to do these
things for himself"?

  Phaedr. They would say in reply that he is a madman or pedant who
fancies that he is a physician because he has read something in a
book, or has stumbled on a prescription or two, although he has no
real understanding of the art of medicine.

  Soc. And suppose a person were to come to Sophocles or Euripides and
say that he knows how to make a very long speech about a small matter,
and a short speech about a great matter, and also a sorrowful
speech, or a terrible, or threatening speech, or any other kind of
speech, and in teaching this fancies that he is teaching the art of
tragedy-?

  Phaedr. They too would surely laugh at him if he fancies that
tragedy is anything but the arranging of these elements in a manner
which will be suitable to one another and to the whole.

  Soc. But I do not suppose that they would be rude or abusive to him:
Would they not treat him as a musician would a man who thinks that
he is a harmonist because he knows how to pitch the highest and lowest
notes; happening to meet such an one he would not say to him savagely,
"Fool, you are mad!" But like a musician, in a gentle and harmonious
tone of voice, he would answer: "My good friend, he who would be a
harmonist must certainly know this, and yet he may understand
nothing of harmony if he has not got beyond your stage of knowledge,
for you only know the preliminaries of harmony and not harmony
itself."

  Phaedr. Very true.

  Soc. And will not Sophocles say to the display of the would-be
tragedian, that this is not tragedy but the preliminaries of
tragedy? and will not Acumenus say the same of medicine to the
would-be physician?

  Phaedr. Quite true.

  Soc. And if Adrastus the mellifluous or Pericles heard of these
wonderful arts, brachylogies and eikonologies and all the hard names
which we have been endeavouring to draw into the light of day, what
would they say? Instead of losing temper and applying
uncomplimentary epithets, as you and I have been doing, to the authors
of such an imaginary art, their superior wisdom would rather censure
us, as well as them. "Have a little patience, Phaedrus and Socrates,
they would say; you should not be in such a passion with those who
from some want of dialectical skill are unable to define the nature of
rhetoric, and consequently suppose that they have found the art in the
preliminary conditions of it, and when these have been taught by
them to others, fancy that the whole art of rhetoric has been taught
by them; but as to using the several instruments of the art
effectively, or making the composition a whole,-an application of it
such as this is they regard as an easy thing which their disciples may
make for themselves."

  Phaedr. I quite admit, Socrates, that the art of rhetoric which
these men teach and of which they write is such as you
describe-there I agree with you. But I still want to know where and
how the true art of rhetoric and persuasion is to be acquired.

  Soc. The perfection which is required of the finished orator is,
or rather must be, like the perfection of anything else; partly
given by nature, but may also be assisted by art. If you have the
natural power and add to it knowledge and practice, you will be a
distinguished speaker; if you fall short in either of these, you
will be to that extent defective. But the art, as far as there is an
art, of rhetoric does not lie in the direction of Lysias or
Thrasymachus.

  Phaedr. In what direction then?

  Soc. I conceive Pericles to have been the most accomplished of
rhetoricians.

  Phaedr. What of that?

  Soc. All the great arts require discussion and high speculation
about the truths of nature; hence come loftiness of thought and
completeness of execution. And this, as I conceive, was the quality
which, in addition to his natural gifts, Pericles acquired from his
intercourse with Anaxagoras whom he happened to know. He was thus
imbued with the higher philosophy, and attained the knowledge of
Mind and the negative of Mind, which were favourite themes of
Anaxagoras, and applied what suited his purpose to the art of
speaking.

  Phaedr. Explain.

  Soc. Rhetoric is like medicine.

  Phaedr. How so?

  Soc. Why, because medicine has to define the nature of the body
and rhetoric of the soul-if we would proceed, not empirically but
scientifically, in the one case to impart health and strength by
giving medicine and food in the other to implant the conviction or
virtue which you desire, by the right application of words and
training.

  Phaedr. There, Socrates, I suspect that you are right.

  Soc. And do you think that you can know the nature of the soul
intelligently without knowing the nature of the whole?

  Phaedr. Hippocrates the Asclepiad says that the nature even of the
body can only be understood as a whole.

  Soc. Yes, friend, and he was right:-still, we ought not to be
content with the name of Hippocrates, but to examine and see whether
his argument agrees with his conception of nature.

  Phaedr. I agree.

  Soc. Then consider what truth as well as Hippocrates says about this
or about any other nature. Ought we not to consider first whether that
which we wish to learn and to teach is a simple or multiform thing,
and if simple, then to enquire what power it has of acting or being
acted upon in relation to other things, and if multiform, then to
number the forms; and see first in the case of one of them, and then
in. case of all of them, what is that power of acting or being acted
upon which makes each and all of them to be what they are?

  Phaedr. You may very likely be right, Socrates.

  Soc. The method which proceeds without analysis is like the
groping of a blind man. Yet, surely, he who is an artist ought not
to admit of a comparison with the blind, or deaf. The rhetorician, who
teaches his pupil to speak scientifically, will particularly set forth
the nature of that being to which he addresses his speeches; and this,
I conceive, to be the soul.

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. His whole effort is directed to the soul; for in that he
seeks to produce conviction.

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. Then clearly, Thrasymachus or any one else who teaches rhetoric
in earnest will give an exact description of the nature of the soul;
which will enable us to see whether she be single and same, or, like
the body, multiform. That is what we should call showing the nature of
the soul.

  Phaedr. Exactly.

  Soc. He will explain, secondly, the mode in which she acts or is
acted upon.

  Phaedr. True.

  Soc. Thirdly, having classified men and speeches, and their kinds
and affections, and adapted them to one another, he will tell the
reasons of his arrangement, and show why one soul is persuaded by a
particular form of argument, and another not.

  Phaedr. You have hit upon a very good way.

  Soc. Yes, that is the true and only way in which any subject can
be set forth or treated by rules of art, whether in speaking or
writing. But the writers of the present day, at whose feet you have
sat, craftily, conceal the nature of the soul which they know quite
well. Nor, until they adopt our method of reading and writing, can
we admit that they write by rules of art?

  Phaedr. What is our method?

  Soc. I cannot give you the exact details; but I should like to
tell you generally, as far as is in my power, how a man ought to
proceed according to rules of art.

  Phaedr. Let me hear.

  Soc. Oratory is the art of enchanting the soul, and therefore he who
would be an orator has to learn the differences of human souls-they
are so many and of such a nature, and from them come the differences
between man and man. Having proceeded thus far in his analysis, he
will next divide speeches into their different classes:-"Such and such
persons," he will say, are affected by this or that kind of speech
in this or that way," and he will tell you why. The pupil must have
a good theoretical notion of them first, and then he must have
experience of them in actual life, and be able to follow them with all
his senses about him, or he will never get beyond the precepts of
his masters. But when he understands what persons are persuaded by
what arguments, and sees the person about whom he was speaking in
the abstract actually before him, and knows that it is he, and can say
to himself, "This is the man or this is the character who ought to
have a certain argument applied to him in order to convince him of a
certain opinion"; -he who knows all this, and knows also when he
should speak and when he should refrain, and when he should use
pithy sayings, pathetic appeals, sensational effects, and all the
other modes of speech which he has learned;-when, I say, he knows
the times and seasons of all these things, then, and not till then, he
is a perfect master of his art; but if he fail in any of these points,
whether in speaking or teaching or writing them, and yet declares that
he speaks by rules of art, he who says "I don't believe you" has the
better of him. Well, the teacher will say, is this, and Socrates, your
account of the so-called art of rhetoric, or am I to look for another?

  Phaedr. He must take this, Socrates for there is no possibility of
another, and yet the creation of such an art is not easy.

  Soc. Very true; and therefore let us consider this matter in every
light, and see whether we cannot find a shorter and easier road; there
is no use in taking a long rough round-about way if there be a shorter
and easier one. And I wish that you would try and remember whether you
have heard from Lysias or any one else anything which might be of
service to us.

  Phaedr. If trying would avail, then I might; but at the moment I can
think of nothing.

  Soc. Suppose I tell you something which somebody who knows told me.

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. May not "the wolf," as the proverb says, claim a hearing"?

  Phaedr. Do you say what can be said for him.

  Soc. He will argue that is no use in putting a solemn face on
these matters, or in going round and round, until you arrive at
first principles; for, as I said at first, when the question is of
justice and good, or is a question in which men are concerned who
are just and good, either by nature or habit, he who would be a
skilful rhetorician has; no need of truth-for that in courts of law
men literally care nothing about truth, but only about conviction: and
this is based on probability, to which who would be a skilful orator
should therefore give his whole attention. And they say also that
there are cases in which the actual facts, if they are improbable,
ought to be withheld, and only the probabilities should be told either
in accusation or defence, and that always in speaking, the orator
should keep probability in view, and say good-bye to the truth. And
the observance, of this principle throughout a speech furnishes the
whole art.

  Phaedr. That is what the professors of rhetoric do actually say,
Socrates. I have not forgotten that we have quite briefly touched upon
this matter already; with them the point is all-important.

  Soc. I dare say that you are familiar with Tisias. Does he not
define probability to be that which the many think?

  Phaedr. Certainly, he does.

  Soc. I believe that he has a clever and ingenious case of this
sort:-He supposes a feeble and valiant man to have assaulted a
strong and cowardly one, and to have robbed him of his coat or of
something or other; he is brought into court, and then Tisias says
that both parties should tell lies: the coward should say that he
was assaulted by more men than one; the other should prove that they
were alone, and should argue thus: "How could a weak man like me
have assaulted a strong man like him?" The complainant will not like
to confess his own cowardice, and will therefore invent some other lie
which his adversary will thus gain an opportunity of refuting. And
there are other devices of the same kind which have a place in the
system. Am I not right, Phaedrus?

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. Bless me, what a wonderfully mysterious art is this which
Tisias or some other gentleman, in whatever name or country he
rejoices, has discovered. Shall we say a word to him or not?

  Phaedr. What shall we say to him?

  Soc. Let us tell him that, before he appeared, you and I were saying
that the probability of which he speaks was engendered in the minds of
the many by the likeness of the truth, and we had just been
affirming that he who knew the truth would always know best how to
discover the resemblances of the truth. If he has anything else to say
about the art of speaking we should like to hear him; but if not, we
are satisfied with our own view, that unless a man estimates the
various characters of his heaters and is able to divide all things
into classes and to comprehend them under single ideas he will never
be a skilful rhetorician even within the limits of human power. And
this skill he will not attain without a great deal of trouble, which a
good man ought to undergo, not for the sake of speaking and acting
before men, but in order that he may be able to say what is acceptable
to God and always to act acceptably to Him as far as in him lies;
for there is a saying of wiser men than ourselves, that a man of sense
should not try to please his fellow-servants (at least this should not
be his first object) but his good and noble masters; and therefore
if the way is long and circuitous, marvel not at this, for, where
the end is great, there we may take the longer road, but not for
lesser ends such as yours. Truly, the argument may say, Tisias, that
if you do not mind going so far, rhetoric has a fair beginning here.

  Phaedr. I think, Socrates, that this is admirable, if only
practicable.

  Soc. But even to fail in an honourable object is honourable.

  Phaedr. True.

  Soc. Enough appears to have been said by us of a true and false
art of speaking.

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. But there is something yet to be said of propriety and
impropriety of writing.

  Phaedr. Yes.

  Soc. Do you know how you can speak or act about rhetoric in a manner
which will be acceptable to God?

  Phaedr. No, indeed. Do you?

  Soc. I have heard a tradition of the ancients, whether true or not
they only know; although if we had found the truth ourselves, do you
think that we should care much about the opinions of men?

  Phaedr. Your question needs no answer; but I wish that you would
tell me what you say that you have heard.

  Soc. At the Egyptian city of Naucratis, there was a famous old
god, whose name was Theuth; the bird which is called the Ibis is
sacred to him, and he was the inventor of many arts, such as
arithmetic and calculation and geometry and astronomy and draughts and
dice, but his great discovery was the use of letters. Now in those
days the god Thamus was the king of the whole country of Egypt; and he
dwelt in that great city of Upper Egypt which the Hellenes call
Egyptian Thebes, and the god himself is called by them Ammon. To him
came Theuth and showed his inventions, desiring that the other
Egyptians might be allowed to have the benefit of them; he enumerated
them, and Thamus enquired about their several uses, and praised some
of them and censured others, as he approved or disapproved of them. It
would take a long time to repeat all that Thamus said to Theuth in
praise or blame of the various arts. But when they came to letters,
This, said Theuth, will make the Egyptians wiser and give them
better memories; it is a specific both for the memory and for the wit.
Thamus replied: O most ingenious Theuth, the parent or inventor of
an art is not always the best judge of the utility or inutility of his
own inventions to the users of them. And in this instance, you who are
the father of letters, from a paternal love of your own children
have been led to attribute to them a quality which they cannot have;
for this discovery of yours will create forgetfulness in the learners'
souls, because they will not use their memories; they will trust to
the external written characters and not remember of themselves. The
specific which you have discovered is an aid not to memory, but to
reminiscence, and you give your disciples not truth, but only the
semblance of truth; they will be hearers of many things and will
have learned nothing; they will appear to be omniscient and will
generally know nothing; they will be tiresome company, having the show
of wisdom without the reality.

  Phaedr. Yes, Socrates, you can easily invent tales of Egypt, or of
any other country.

  Soc. There was a tradition in the temple of Dodona that oaks first
gave prophetic utterances. The men of old, unlike in their
simplicity to young philosophy, deemed that if they heard the truth
even from "oak or rock," it was enough for them; whereas you seem to
consider not whether a thing is or is not true, but who the speaker is
and from what country the tale comes.

  Phaedr. I acknowledge the justice of your rebuke; and I think that
the Theban is right in his view about letters.

  Soc. He would be a very simple person, and quite a stranger to the
oracles of Thamus or Ammon, who should leave in writing or receive
in writing any art under the idea that the written word would be
intelligible or certain; or who deemed that writing was at all
better than knowledge and recollection of the same matters?

  Phaedr. That is most true.

  Soc. I cannot help feeling, Phaedrus, that writing is
unfortunately like painting; for the creations of the painter have the
attitude of life, and yet if you ask them a question they preserve a
solemn silence. And the same may be said of speeches. You would
imagine that they had intelligence, but if you want to know anything
and put a question to one of them, the speaker always gives one
unvarying answer. And when they have been once written down they are
tumbled about anywhere among those who may or may not understand them,
and know not to whom they should reply, to whom not: and, if they
are maltreated or abused, they have no parent to protect them; and
they cannot protect or defend themselves.

  Phaedr. That again is most true.

  Soc. Is there not another kind of word or speech far better than
this, and having far greater power-a son of the same family, but
lawfully begotten?

  Phaedr. Whom do you mean, and what is his origin?

  Soc. I mean an intelligent word graven in the soul of the learner,
which can defend itself, and knows when to speak and when to be
silent.

  Phaedr. You mean the living word of knowledge which has a soul,
and of which written word is properly no more than an image?

  Soc. Yes, of course that is what I mean. And now may I be allowed to
ask you a question: Would a husbandman, who is a man of sense, take
the seeds, which he values and which he wishes to bear fruit, and in
sober seriousness plant them during the heat of summer, in some garden
of Adonis, that he may rejoice when he sees them in eight days
appearing in beauty? at least he would do so, if at all, only for
the sake of amusement and pastime. But when he is in earnest he sows
in fitting soil, and practises husbandry, and is satisfied if in eight
months the seeds which he has sown arrive at perfection?

  Phaedr. Yes, Socrates, that will be his way when he is in earnest;
he will do the other, as you say, only in play.

  Soc. And can we suppose that he who knows the just and good and
honourable has less understanding, than the husbandman, about his
own seeds?

  Phaedr. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then he will not seriously incline to "write" his thoughts
"in water" with pen and ink, sowing words which can neither speak
for themselves nor teach the truth adequately to others?

  Phaedr. No, that is not likely.

  Soc. No, that is not likely-in the garden of letters he will sow and
plant, but only for the sake of recreation and amusement; he will
write them down as memorials to be treasured against the forgetfulness
of old age, by himself, or by any other old man who is treading the
same path. He will rejoice in beholding their tender growth; and while
others are refreshing their souls with banqueting and the like, this
will be the pastime in which his days are spent.

  Phaedr. A pastime, Socrates, as noble as the other is ignoble, the
pastime of a man who can be amused by serious talk, and can
discourse merrily about justice and the like.

  Soc. True, Phaedrus. But nobler far is the serious pursuit of the
dialectician, who, finding a congenial soul, by the help of science
sows and plants therein words which are able to help themselves and
him who planted them, and are not unfruitful, but have in them a
seed which others brought up in different soils render immortal,
making the possessors of it happy to the utmost extent of human
happiness.

  Phaedr. Far nobler, certainly.

  Soc. And now, Phaedrus, having agreed upon the premises we decide
about the conclusion.

  Phaedr. About what conclusion?

  Soc. About Lysias, whom we censured, and his art of writing, and his
discourses, and the rhetorical skill or want of skill which was
shown in them-these are the questions which we sought to determine,
and they brought us to this point. And I think that we are now
pretty well informed about the nature of art and its opposite.

  Phaedr. Yes, I think with you; but I wish that you would repeat what
was said.

  Soc. Until a man knows the truth of the several particulars of which
he is writing or speaking, and is able to define them as they are, and
having defined them again to divide them until they can be no longer
divided, and until in like manner he is able to discern the nature
of the soul, and discover the different modes of discourse which are
adapted to different natures, and to arrange and dispose them in
such a way that the simple form of speech may be addressed to the
simpler nature, and the complex and composite to the more complex
nature-until he has accomplished all this, he will be unable to handle
arguments according to rules of art, as far as their nature allows
them to be subjected to art, either for the purpose of teaching or
persuading;-such is the view which is implied in the whole preceding
argument.

  Phaedr. Yes, that was our view, certainly.

  Soc. Secondly, as to the censure which was passed on the speaking or
writing of discourses, and how they might be rightly or wrongly
censured-did not our previous argument show?-

  Phaedr. Show what?

  Soc. That whether Lysias or any other writer that ever was or will
be, whether private man or statesman, proposes laws and so becomes the
author of a political treatise, fancying that there is any great
certainty and clearness in his performance, the fact of his so writing
is only a disgrace to him, whatever men may say. For not to know the
nature of justice and injustice, and good and evil, and not to be able
to distinguish the dream from the reality, cannot in truth be
otherwise than disgraceful to him, even though he have the applause of
the whole world.

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. But he who thinks that in the written word there is necessarily
much which is not serious, and that neither poetry nor prose, spoken
or written, is of any great value, if, like the compositions of the
rhapsodes, they are only recited in order to be believed, and not with
any view to criticism or instruction; and who thinks that even the
best of writings are but a reminiscence of what we know, and that only
in principles of justice and goodness and nobility taught and
communicated orally for the sake of instruction and graven in the
soul, which is the true way of writing, is there clearness and
perfection and seriousness, and that such principles are a man's own
and his legitimate offspring;-being, in the first place, the word
which he finds in his own bosom; secondly, the brethren and
descendants and relations of his others;-and who cares for them and no
others-this is the right sort of man; and you and I, Phaedrus, would
pray that we may become like him.

  Phaedr. That is most assuredly my desire and prayer.

  Soc. And now the play is played out; and of rhetoric enough. Go
and tell Lysias that to the fountain and school of the Nymphs we
went down, and were bidden by them to convey a message to him and to
other composers of speeches-to Homer and other writers of poems,
whether set to music or not; and to Solon and others who have composed
writings in the form of political discourses which they would term
laws-to all of them we are to say that if their compositions are based
on knowledge of the truth, and they can defend or prove them, when
they are put to the test, by spoken arguments, which leave their
writings poor in comparison of them, then they are to be called, not
only poets, orators, legislators, but are worthy of a higher name,
befitting the serious pursuit of their life.

  Phaedr. What name would you assign to them?

  Soc. Wise, I may not call them; for that is a great name which
belongs to God alone,-lovers of wisdom or philosophers is their modest
and befitting title.

  Phaedr. Very suitable.

  Soc. And he who cannot rise above his own compilations and
compositions, which he has been long patching, and piecing, adding
some and taking away some, may be justly called poet or speech-maker
or law-maker.

  Phaedr. Certainly.

  Soc. Now go and tell this to your companion.

  Phaedr. But there is also a friend of yours who ought not to be
forgotten.

  Soc. Who is he?

  Phaedr. Isocrates the fair:-What message will you send to him, and
how shall we describe him?

  Soc. Isocrates is still young, Phaedrus; but I am willing to
hazard a prophecy concerning him.

  Phaedr. What would you prophesy?

  Soc. I think that he has a genius which soars above the orations
of Lysias, and that his character is cast in a finer mould. My
impression of him is that he will marvelously improve as he grows
older, and that all former rhetoricians will be as children in
comparison of him. And I believe that he will not be satisfied with
rhetoric, but that there is in him a divine inspiration which will
lead him to things higher still. For he has an element of philosophy
in his nature. This is the message of the gods dwelling in this place,
and which I will myself deliver to Isocrates, who is my delight; and
do you give the other to Lysias, who is yours.

  Phaedr. I will; and now as the heat is abated let us depart.

  Soc. Should we not offer up a prayer first of all to the local
deities?

  Phaedr. By all means.

  Soc. Beloved Pan, and all ye other gods who haunt this place, give
me beauty in the inward soul; and may the outward and inward man be at
one. May I reckon the wise to be the wealthy, and may I have such a
quantity of gold as a temperate man and he only can bear and
carry.-Anything more? The prayer, I think, is enough for me.

  Phaedr. Ask the same for me, for friends should have all things in
common.

  Soc. Let us go.

                            -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES; PROTARCHUS; PHILEBUS.

  Socrates. Observe, Protarchus, the nature of the position which
you are now going to take from Philebus, and what the other position
is which I maintain, and which, if you do not approve of it, is to
be controverted by you. Shall you and I sum up the two sides?

  Protarchus. By all means.

  Soc. Philebus was saying that enjoyment and pleasure and delight,
and the class of feelings akin to them, are a good to every living
being, whereas I contend, that not these, but wisdom and
intelligence and memory, and their kindred, right opinion and true
reasoning, are better and more desirable than pleasure for all who are
able to partake of them, and that to all such who are or ever will
be they are the most advantageous of all things. Have I not given,
Philebus, a fair statement of the two sides of the argument?

  Philebus Nothing could be fairer, Socrates.

  Soc. And do you, the position which is assigned to you?

  Pro. I cannot do otherwise, since our excellent Philebus has left
the field.

  Soc. Surely the truth about these matters ought, by all means, to be
ascertained.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Shall we further agree-

  Pro. To what?

  Soc. That you and I must now try to indicate some state and
disposition of the soul, which has the property of making all men
happy.

  Pro. Yes, by all means.

  Soc. And you say that pleasure and I say that wisdom, is such a
state?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And what if there be a third state, which is better than
either? Then both of us are vanquished-are we not? But if this life,
which really has the power of making men happy, turn out to be more
akin to pleasure than to wisdom, the life of pleasure may still have
the advantage over the life of wisdom.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Or suppose that the better life is more nearly allied to
wisdom, then wisdom conquers, and pleasure is defeated;-do you agree?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And what do you say, Philebus?

  Phi. I say; and shall always say, that pleasure is easily the
conqueror; but you must decide for yourself, Protarchus.

  Pro. You, Philebus, have handed over the argument to me, and have no
longer a voice in the matter?

  Phi. True enough. Nevertheless I would dear myself and deliver my
soul of you; and I call the goddess herself to witness that I now do
so.

  Pro. You may appeal to us; we too be the witnesses of your words.
And now, Socrates, whether Philebus is pleased or displeased, we
will proceed with the argument.

  Soc. Then let us begin with the goddess herself, of whom Philebus
says that she is called Aphrodite, but that her real name is Pleasure.

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. The awe which I always feel, Protarchus, about the names of the
gods is more than human-it exceeds all other fears. And now I would
not sin against Aphrodite by naming her amiss; let her be called
what she pleases. But Pleasure I know to be manifold, and with her, as
I was just now saying, we must begin, and consider what her nature is.
She has one name, and therefore you would imagine that she is one; and
yet surely she takes the most varied and even unlike forms. For do
we not say that the intemperate has pleasure, and that the temperate
has pleasure in his very temperance-that the fool is pleased when he
is full of foolish fancies and hopes, and that the wise man has
pleasure in his wisdom? and how foolish would any one be who
affirmed that all these opposite pleasures are severally alike!

  Pro. Why, Socrates, they are opposed in so far as they spring from
opposite sources, but they are not in themselves opposite. For must
not pleasure be of all things most absolutely like pleasure-that is,
like himself?

  Soc. Yes, my good friend, just as colour is like colour;-in so far
as colours are colours, there is no difference between them; and yet
we all know that black is not only unlike, but even absolutely opposed
to white: or again, as figure is like figure, for all figures are
comprehended under one class; and yet particular figures may be
absolutely opposed to one another, and there is an infinite
diversity of them. And we might find similar examples in many other
things; therefore do not rely upon this argument, which would go to
prove the unity of the most extreme opposites. And I suspect that we
shall find a similar opposition among pleasures.

  Pro. Very likely; but how will this invalidate the argument?

  Soc. Why, I shall reply, that dissimilar as they are, you apply to
them a now predicate, for you say that all pleasant things are good;
now although no one can argue that pleasure is not pleasure, he may
argue, as we are doing, that pleasures are oftener bad than good;
but you call them all good, and at the same time are compelled, if you
are pressed, to acknowledge that they are unlike. And so you must tell
us what is the identical quality existing alike in good and bad
pleasures, which makes. you designate all of them as good.

  Pro. What do you mean, Socrates? Do you think that any one who
asserts pleasure to be the good, will tolerate the notion that some
Pleasures are good and others bad?

  Soc. And yet you will acknowledge that they are different from one
another, and sometimes opposed?

  Pro. Not in so far as they are pleasures.

  Soc. That is a return to the old position, Protarchus, and so we are
to say (are we?) that there is no difference in pleasures, but that
they are all alike; and the examples which have just been cited do not
pierce our dull minds, but we go on arguing all the same, like the
weakest and most inexperienced reasoners?

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. Why, I mean to say, that in self-defence I may, if I like,
follow your example, and assert boldly that the two things most unlike
are most absolutely alike; and the result will be that you and I
will prove ourselves to be very tyros in the art of disputing; and the
argument will be blown away and lost. Suppose that we put back, and
return to the old position; then perhaps we may come to an
understanding with one another.

  Pro. How do you mean?

  Soc. Shall I, Protarchus, have my own question asked of me by you?

  Pro. What question?

  Soc. Ask me whether wisdom and science and mind, and those other
qualities which I, when asked by you at first what is the nature of
the good, affirmed to be good, are not in the same case with the
pleasures of which you spoke.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. The sciences are a numerous class, and will be found to present
great differences. But even admitting that, like the pleasures, they
are opposite as well as different, should I be worthy of the name of
dialectician if, in order to avoid this difficulty, I were to say
(as you are saying of pleasure) that there is no difference between
one science and another;-would not the argument founder and
disappear like an idle tale, although we might ourselves escape
drowning by clinging to a fallacy?

  Pro. May none of this befall us, except the deliverance! Yet I
like the even-handed justice which is applied to both our arguments.
Let us assume, then, that there are many and diverse pleasures, and
many and different sciences.

  Soc. And let us have no concealment, Protarchus, of the
differences between my good and yours; but let us bring them to the
light in the hope that, in the process of testing them, they may
show whether pleasure is to be called the good, or wisdom, or some
third quality; for surely we are not now simply contending in order
that my view or that yours may prevail, but I presume that we ought
both of us to be fighting for the truth.

  Pro. Certainly we ought.

  Soc. Then let us have a more definite understanding and establish
the principle on which the argument rests.

  Pro. What principle?

  Soc. A principle about which all men are always in a difficulty, and
some men sometimes against their will.

  Pro. Speak plainer.

  Soc. The principle which has just turned up, which is a marvel of
nature; for that one should be many or many one, are wonderful
propositions; and he who affirms either is very open to attack.

  Pro. Do you mean, when a person says that I, Protarchus, am by
nature one and also many, dividing the single "me" into many "mens,"
and even opposing them as great and small, light and heavy, and in ten
thousand other ways?

  Soc. Those, Protarchus, are the common and acknowledged paradoxes
about the one and many, which I may say that everybody has by this
time agreed to dismiss as childish and obvious and detrimental to
the true course of thought; and no more favour is shown to that
other puzzle, in which a person proves the members and parts of
anything to be divided, and then confessing that they are all one,
says laughingly in disproof of his own words: Why, here is a
miracle, the one is many and infinite, and the many are only one.

  Pro. But what, Socrates, are those other marvels connected with this
subject which, as you imply, have not yet become common and
acknowledged?

  Soc. When, my boy, the one does not belong to the class of things
that are born and perish, as in the instances which we were giving,
for in those cases, and when unity is of this concrete nature, there
is, as I was saying, a universal consent that no refutation is needed;
but when the assertion is made that man is one, or ox is one, or
beauty one, or the good one, then the interest which attaches to these
and similar unities and the attempt which is made to divide them gives
birth to a controversy.

  Pro. Of what nature?

  Soc. In the first place, as to whether these unities have a real
existence; and then how each individual unity, being always the
same, and incapable either of generation of destruction, but retaining
a permanent individuality, can be conceived either as dispersed and
multiplied in the infinity of the world of generation, or as still
entire and yet divided from itself, which latter would seem to be
the greatest impossibility of all, for how can one and the same
thing be at the same time in one and in many things? These,
Protarchus, are the real difficulties, and this is the one and many to
which they relate; they are the source of great perplexity if ill
decided, and the right determination of them is very helpful.

  Pro. Then, Socrates, let us begin by clearing up these questions.

  Soc. That is what I should wish.

  Pro. And I am sure that all my other friends will be glad to hear
them discussed; Philebus, fortunately for us, is not disposed to move,
and we had better not stir him up with questions.

  Soc. Good; and where shall we begin this great and multifarious
battle, in which such various points are at issue? Shall begin thus?

  Pro. How?

  Soc. We say that the one and many become identified by thought,
and that now, as in time past, they run about together, in and out
of every word which is uttered, and that this union of them will never
cease, and is not now beginning, but is, as I believe, an
everlasting quality of thought itself, which never grows old. Any
young man, when he first tastes these subtleties, is delighted, and
fancies that he has found a treasure of wisdom; in the first
enthusiasm of his joy he leaves no stone, or rather no thought
unturned, now rolling up the many into the one, and kneading them
together, now unfolding and dividing them; he puzzles himself first
and above all, and then he proceeds to puzzle his neighbours,
whether they are older or younger, or of his own age-that makes no
difference; neither father nor mother does he spare; no human being
who has ears is safe from him, hardly even his dog, and a barbarian
would have no chance of escaping him, if an interpreter could only
be found.

  Pro. Considering, Socrates, how many we are, and that all of us
are young men, is there not a danger that we and Philebus may all
set upon you, if you abuse us? We understand what you mean; but is
there no charm by which we may dispel all this confusion, no more
excellent way of arriving at the truth? If there is, we hope that
you will guide us into that way, and we will do our best to follow,
for the enquiry in which we are engaged, Socrates, is not unimportant.

  Soc. The reverse of unimportant, my boys, as Philebus calls you, and
there neither is nor ever will be a better than my own favourite
way, which has nevertheless already often deserted me and left me
helpless in the hour of need.

  Pro. Tell us what that is.

  Soc. One which may be easily pointed out, but is by no means easy of
application; it is the parent of all the discoveries in the arts.

  Pro. Tell us what it is.

  Soc. A gift of heaven, which, as I conceive, the gods tossed among
men by the hands of a new Prometheus, and therewith a blaze of
light; and the ancients, who were our betters and nearer the gods than
we are, handed down the tradition, that whatever things are said to be
are composed of one and many, and have the finite, and infinite
implanted in them: seeing, then, that such is the order of the
world, we too ought in every enquiry to begin by laying down one
idea of that which is the subject of enquiry; this unity we shall find
in everything. Having found it, we may next proceed to look for two,
if there be two, or, if not, then for three or some other number,
subdividing each of these units, until at last the unity with which we
began is seen not only to be one and many and infinite, but also a
definite number; the infinite must not be suffered to approach the
many until the entire number of the species intermediate between unity
and infinity has been discovered-then, and not till then, we may, rest
from division, and without further troubling ourselves about the
endless individuals may allow them to drop into infinity. This, as I
was saying, is the way of considering and learning and teaching one
another, which the gods have handed down to us. But the wise men of
our time are either too quick or too slow, in conceiving plurality
in unity. Having no method, they make their one and many anyhow, and
from unity pass at once to infinity; the intermediate steps never
occur to them. And this, I repeat, is what makes the difference
between the mere art of disputation and true dialectic.

  Pro. I think that I partly understand you Socrates, but I should
like to have a clearer notion of what you are saying.

  Soc. I may illustrate my meaning by the letters of the alphabet,
Protarchus, which you were made to learn as a child.

  Pro. How do they afford an illustration?

  Soc. The sound which passes through the lips whether of an
individual or of all men is one and yet infinite.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And yet not by knowing either that sound is one or that sound
is infinite are we perfect in the art of speech, but the knowledge
of the number and nature of sounds is what makes a man a grammarian.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And the knowledge which makes a man a musician is of the same
kind.

  Pro. How so?

  Soc. Sound is one in music as well as in grammar?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And there is a higher note and a lower note, and a note of
equal pitch:-may we affirm so much?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. But you would not be a real musician if this was all that you
knew; though if you did not know this you would know almost nothing of
music.

  Pro. Nothing.

  Soc. But when you have learned what sounds are high and what low,
and the number and nature of the intervals and their limits or
proportions, and the systems compounded out of them, which our fathers
discovered, and have handed down to us who are their descendants under
the name of harmonies; and the affections corresponding to them in the
movements of the human body, which when measured by numbers ought,
as they say, to be called rhythms and measures; and they tell us
that the same principle should be applied to every one and many;-when,
I say, you have learned all this, then, my dear friend, you are
perfect; and you may be said to understand any other subject, when you
have a similar grasp of it. But the, infinity of kinds and the
infinity of individuals which there is in each of them, when not
classified, creates in every one of us a state of infinite
ignorance; and he who never looks for number in anything, will not
himself be looked for in the number of famous men.

  Pro. I think that what Socrates is now saying is excellent,
Philebus.

  Phi. I think so too, but how do his words bear upon us and upon
the argument?

  Soc. Philebus is right in asking that question of us, Protarchus.

  Pro. Indeed he is, and you must answer him.

  Soc. I will; but you must let me make one little remark first
about these matters; I was saying, that he who begins with any
individual unity, should proceed from that, not to infinity, but to
a definite number, and now I say conversely, that he who has to
begin with infinity should not jump to unity, but he should look about
for some number, representing a certain quantity, and thus out of
all end in one. And now let us return for an illustration of our
principle to the case of letters.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. Some god or divine man, who in the Egyptian legend is said to
have been Theuth, observing that the human voice was infinite, first
distinguished in this infinity a certain number of vowels, and then
other letters which had sound, but were not pure vowels (i.e., the
semivowels); these too exist in a definite number; and lastly, he
distinguished a third class of letters which we now call mutes,
without voice and without sound, and divided these, and likewise the
two other classes of vowels and semivowels, into the individual
sounds, told the number of them, and gave to each and all of them
the name of letters; and observing that none of us could learn any one
of them and not learn them all, and in consideration of this common
bond which in a manner united them, he assigned to them all a single
art, and this he called the art of grammar or letters.

  Phi. The illustration, Protarchus, has assisted me in
understanding the original statement, but I still feel the defect of
which I just now complained.

  Soc. Are you going to ask, Philebus, what this has to do with the
argument?

  Phi. Yes, that is a question which Protarchus and I have been long
asking.

  Soc. Assuredly you have already arrived at the answer to the
question which, as you say, you have been so long asking?

  Phi. How so?

  Soc. Did we not begin by enquiring into the comparative
eligibility of pleasure and wisdom?

  Phi. Certainly.

  Soc. And we maintain that they are each of them one?

  Phi. True.

  Soc. And the precise question to which the previous discussion
desires an answer is, how they are one and also many [i.e., how they
have one genus and many species], and are not at once infinite, and
what number of species is to be assigned to either of them before they
pass into infinity.

  Pro. That is a very serious question, Philebus, to which Socrates
has ingeniously brought us round, and please to consider which of us
shall answer him; there may be something ridiculous in my being unable
to answer, and therefore imposing the task upon you, when I have
undertaken the whole charge of the argument, but if neither of us were
able to answer, the result methinks would be still more ridiculous.
Let us consider, then, what we are to do:-Socrates, if I understood
him rightly, is asking whether there are not kinds of pleasure, and
what is the number and nature of them, and the same of wisdom.

  Soc. Most true, O son of Callias; and the previous argument showed
that if we are not able to tell the kinds of everything that has
unity, likeness, sameness, or their opposites, none of us will be of
the smallest use in any enquiry.

  Pro. That seems to be very near the truth, Socrates. Happy would the
wise man be if he knew all things, and the next best thing for him
is that he should know himself. Why do I say so at this moment? I will
tell you. You, Socrates, have granted us this opportunity of
conversing with you, and are ready to assist us in determining what is
the best of human goods. For when Philebus said that pleasure and
delight and enjoyment and the like were the chief good, you
answered-No, not those, but another class of goods; and we are
constantly reminding ourselves of what you said, and very properly, in
order that we may not forget to examine and compare the two. And these
goods, which in your opinion are to be designated as superior to
pleasure, and are the true objects of pursuit, are mind and
knowledge and understanding and art and the like. There was a
dispute about which were the best, and we playfully threatened that
you should not be allowed to go home until the question was settled;
and you agreed, and placed yourself at our disposal. And now, as
children say, what has been fairly given cannot be taken back; cease
then to fight against us in this way.

  Soc. In what way?

  Phi. Do not perplex us, and keep asking questions of us to which
we have not as yet any sufficient answer to give; let us not imagine
that a general puzzling of us all is to be the end of our
discussion, but if we are unable to answer, do you answer, as you have
promised. Consider, then, whether you will divide pleasure and
knowledge according to their kinds; or you may let the matter drop, if
you are able and willing to find some other mode of clearing up our
controversy.

  Soc. If you say that, I have nothing to apprehend, for the words "if
you are willing" dispel all my fear; and, moreover, a god seems to
have recalled something to my mind.

  Phi. What is that?

  Soc. I remember to have heard long ago certain discussions about
pleasure and wisdom, whether awake or in a dream I cannot tell; they
were to the effect that neither the one nor the other of them was
the good, but some third thing, which was different from them, and
better than either. If this be clearly established, then pleasure will
lose the victory, for the good will cease to be identified with
her:-Am I not right?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And there will cease to be any need of distinguishing the kinds
of pleasures, as I am inclined to think, but this will appear more
clearly as we proceed.

  Pro. Capital, Socrates; pray go on as you propose.

  Soc. But, let us first agree on some little points.

  Pro. What are they?

  Soc. Is the good perfect or imperfect?

  Pro. The most perfect, Socrates, of all things.

  Soc. And is the good sufficient?

  Pro. Yes, certainly, and in a degree surpassing all other things.

  Soc. And no one can deny that all percipient beings desire and
hunt after good, and are eager to catch and have the good about
them, and care not for the attainment of anything which its not
accompanied by good.

  Pro. That is undeniable.

  Soc. Now let us part off the life of pleasure from the life of
wisdom, and pass them in review.

  Pro. How do you mean?

  Soc. Let there be no wisdom in the life of pleasure, nor any
pleasure in the life of wisdom, for if either of them is the chief
good, it cannot be supposed to want anything, but if either is shown
to want anything, then it cannot really be the chief good.

  Pro. Impossible.

  Soc. And will you help us to test these two lives?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Then answer.

  Pro. Ask.

  Soc. Would you choose, Protarchus, to live all your life long in the
enjoyment of the greatest pleasures?

  Pro. Certainly I should.

  Soc. Would you consider that there was still anything wanting to you
if you had perfect pleasure?

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. Reflect; would you not want wisdom and intelligence and
forethought, and similar qualities? would you not at any rate want
sight?

  Pro. Why should I? Having pleasure I should have all things.

  Soc. Living thus, you would always throughout your life enjoy the
greatest pleasures?

  Pro. I should.

  Soc. But if you had neither mind, nor memory, nor knowledge, nor
true opinion, you would in the first place be utterly ignorant of
whether you were pleased or not, because you would be entirely
devoid of intelligence.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And similarly, if you had no memory you would not recollect
that you had ever been pleased, nor would the slightest recollection
of the pleasure which you feel at any moment remain with you; and if
you had no true opinion you would not think that you were pleased when
you were; and if you had no power of calculation you would not be able
to calculate on future pleasure, and your life would be the life,
not of a man, but of an oyster or pulmo marinus. Could this be
otherwise?

  Pro. No.

  Soc. But is such a life eligible?

  Pro. I cannot answer you, Socrates; the argument has taken away from
me the power of speech.

  Soc. We must keep up our spirits;-let us now take the life of mind
and examine it in turn.

  Pro. And what is this life of mind?

  Soc. I want to know whether any one of us would consent to live,
having wisdom and mind and knowledge and memory of all things, but
having no sense of pleasure or pain, and wholly unaffected by these
and the like feelings?

  Pro. Neither life, Socrates, appears eligible to me, or is likely,
as I should imagine, to be chosen by any one else.

  Soc. What would you say, Protarchus, to both of these in one, or
to one that was made out of the union of the two?

  Pro. Out of the union, that is, of pleasure with mind and wisdom?

  Soc. Yes, that is the life which I mean.

  Pro. There can be no difference of opinion; not some but all would
surely choose this third rather than either of the other two, and in
addition to them.

  Soc. But do you see the consequence?

  Pro. To be sure I do. The consequence is, that two out of the
three lives which have been proposed are neither sufficient nor
eligible for man or for animal.

  Soc. Then now there can be no doubt that neither of them has the
good, for the one which had would certainly have been sufficient and
perfect and eligible for every living creature or thing that was
able to live such a life; and if any of us had chosen any other, he
would have chosen contrary to the nature of the truly eligible, and
not of his own free will, but either through ignorance or from some
unhappy necessity.

  Pro. Certainly that seems to be true.

  Soc. And now have I not sufficiently shown that Philebus, goddess is
not to be regarded as identical with the good?

  Phi. Neither is your "mind" the good, Socrates, for that will be
open to the same objections.

  Soc. Perhaps, Philebus, you may be right in saying so of my
"mind"; but of the true, which is also the divine mind, far otherwise.
However, I will not at present claim the first place for mind as
against the mixed life; but we must come to some understanding about
the second place. For you might affirm pleasure and I mind to be the
cause of the mixed life; and in that case although neither of them
would be the good, one of them might be imagined to be the cause of
the good. And I might proceed further to argue in opposition to
Phoebus, that the element which makes this mixed life eligible and
good, is more akin and more similar to mind than to pleasure. And if
this is true, pleasure cannot be truly said to share either in the
first or second place, and does not, if I may trust my own mind,
attain even to the third.

  Pro. Truly, Socrates, pleasure appears to me to have had a fall;
in fighting for the palm, she has been smitten by the argument, and is
laid low. I must say that mind would have fallen too, and may
therefore be thought to show discretion in not putting forward a
similar claim. And if pleasure were deprived not only of the first but
of the second place, she would be terribly damaged in the eyes of
her admirers, for not even to them would she still appear as fair as
before.

  Soc. Well, but had we not better leave her now, and not pain her
by applying the crucial test, and finally detecting her?

  Pro. Nonsense, Socrates.

  Soc. Why? because I said that we had better not pain pleasure, which
is an impossibility?

  Pro. Yes, and more than that, because you do not seem to be aware
that none of us will let you go home until you have finished the
argument.

  Soc. Heavens! Protarchus, that will be a tedious business, and
just at present not at all an easy one. For in going to war in the
cause of mind, who is aspiring to the second prize, I ought to have
weapons of another make from those which I used before; some, however,
of the old ones may do again. And must I then finish the argument?

  Pro. Of course you must.

  Soc. Let us be very careful in laying the foundation.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. Let us divide all existing things into two, or rather, if you
do not object, into three classes.

  Pro. Upon what principle would you make the division?

  Soc. Let us take some of our newly-found notions.

  Pro. Which of them?

  Soc. Were we not saying that God revealed a finite element of
existence, and also an infinite?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Let us assume these two principles, and also a third, which
is compounded out of them; but I fear that am ridiculously clumsy at
these processes of division and enumeration.

  Pro. What do you mean, my good friend?

  Soc. I say that a fourth class is still wanted.

  Pro. What will that be?

  Soc. Find the cause of the third or compound, and add this as a
fourth class to the three others.

  Pro. And would you like to have a fifth dass or cause of
resolution as well as a cause of composition?

  Soc. Not, I think, at present; but if I want a fifth at some
future time you shall allow me to have it.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Let us begin with the first three; and as we find two out of
the three greatly divided and dispersed, let us endeavour to reunite
them, and see how in each of them there is a one and many.

  Pro. If you would explain to me a little more about them, perhaps
I might be able to follow you.

  Soc. Well, the two classes are the same which I mentioned before,
one the finite, and the other the infinite; I will first show that the
infinite is in a certain sense many, and the finite may be hereafter
discussed.

  Pro. I agree.

  Soc. And now consider well; for the question to which I invite
your attention is difficult and controverted. When you speak of hotter
and colder, can you conceive any limit in those qualities? Does not
the more and less, which dwells in their very nature, prevent their
having any end? for if they had an end, the more and less would
themselves have an end.

  Pro. That is most true.

  Soc. Ever, as we say, into the hotter and the colder there enters
a more and a less.

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. Then, says the argument, there is never any end of them, and
being endless they must also be infinite.

  Pro. Yes, Socrates, that is exceedingly true.

  Soc. Yes, my dear Protarchus, and your answer reminds me that such
an expression as "exceedingly," which you have just uttered, and
also the term "gently," have the same significance as more or less;
for whenever they occur they do not allow of the existence of
quantity-they are always introducing degrees into actions, instituting
a comparison of a more or a less excessive or a more or a less gentle,
and at each creation of more or less, quantity disappears. For, as I
was just now saying, if quantity and measure did not disappear, but
were allowed to intrude in the sphere of more and less and the other
comparatives, these last would be driven out of their own domain. When
definite quantity is once admitted, there can be no longer a
"hotter" or a "colder" (for these are always progressing, and are
never in one stay); but definite quantity is at rest, and has ceased
to progress. Which proves that comparatives, such as the hotter, and
the colder, are to be ranked in the class of the infinite.

  Pro. Your remark certainly, has the look of truth, Socrates; but
these subjects, as you were saying, are difficult to follow at
first. I think however, that if I could hear the argument repeated
by you once or twice, there would be a substantial agreement between
us.

  Soc. Yes, and I will try to meet your wish; but, as I would rather
not waste time in the enumeration of endless particulars, let me
know whether I may not assume as a note of the infinite-

  Pro. What?

  Soc. I want to know whether such things as appear to us to admit
of more or less, or are denoted by the words "exceedingly,"
"gently," "extremely," and the like, may not be referred to the
class of the infinite, which is their unity, for, as was asserted in
the previous argument, all things that were divided and dispersed
should be brought together, and have the mark or seal of some one
nature, if possible, set upon them-do you remember?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And all things which do not admit of more or less, but admit
their opposites, that is to say, first of all, equality, and the
equal, or again, the double, or any other ratio of number and
measure-all these may, I think, be rightly reckoned by us in the class
of the limited or finite; what do you say?

  Pro. Excellent, Socrates.

  Soc. And now what nature shall we ascribe to the third or compound
kind?

  Pro. You, I think, will have to tell me that.

  Soc. Rather God will tell you, if there be any God who will listen
to my prayers.

  Pro. Offer up a prayer, then, and think.

  Soc. I am thinking, Protarchus, and I believe that some God has
befriended us.

  Pro. What do you mean, and what proof have you to offer of what
you are saying?

  Soc. I will tell you, and do you listen to my words.

  Pro. Proceed.

  Soc. Were we not speaking just now of hotter and colder?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Add to them drier, wetter, more, less, swifter, slower,
greater, smaller, and all that in the preceding argument we placed
under the unity of more and less.

  Pro. In the class of the infinite, you mean?

  Soc. Yes; and now mingle this with the other.

  Pro. What is the other.

  Soc. The class of the finite which we ought to have brought together
as we did the infinite; but, perhaps, it will come to the same thing
if we do so now;-when the two are combined, a third will appear.

  Pro. What do you mean by the class of the finite?

  Soc. The class of the equal and the double, and any class which puts
an end to difference and opposition, and by introducing number creates
harmony and proportion among the different elements.

  Pro. I understand; you seem to me to mean that the various
opposites, when you mingle with them the class of the finite, takes
certain forms.

  Soc. Yes, that is my meaning.

  Pro. Proceed.

  Soc. Does not the right participation in the finite give health-in
disease, for instance?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And whereas the high and low, the swift and the slow are
infinite or unlimited, does not the addition of the principles
aforesaid introduce a limit, and perfect the whole frame of music?

  Pro. Yes, certainly.

  Soc. Or, again, when cold and heat prevail, does not the
introduction of them take away excess and indefiniteness, and infuse
moderation and harmony?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And from a like admixture of the finite and infinite come the
seasons, and all the delights of life?

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. I omit ten thousand other things, such as beauty and health and
strength, and the many beauties and high perfections of the soul: O my
beautiful Philebus, the goddess, methinks, seeing the universal
wantonness and wickedness of all things, and that there was in them no
limit to pleasures and self-indulgence, devised the limit of law and
order, whereby, as you say, Philebus, she torments, or as I
maintain, delivers the soul-What think you, Protarchus?

  Pro. Her ways are much to my mind, Socrates.

  Soc. You will observe that I have spoken of three classes?

  Pro. Yes, I think that I understand you: you mean to say that the
infinite is one class, and that the finite is a second class of
existences; but what you would make the third I am not so certain.

  Soc. That is because the amazing variety of the third class is too
much for you, my dear friend; but there was not this difficulty with
the infinite, which also comprehended many classes, for all of them
were sealed with the note of more and less, and therefore appeared
one.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And the finite or limit had not many divisions, and we ready
acknowledged it to be by nature one?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. Yes, indeed; and when I speak of the third class, understand me
to mean any offspring of these, being a birth into true being,
effected by the measure which the limit introduces.

  Pro. I understand.

  Soc. Still there was, as we said, a fourth class to be investigated,
and you must assist in the investigation; for does not everything
which comes into being, of necessity come into being through a cause?

  Pro. Yes, certainly; for how can there be anything which has no
cause?

  Soc. And is not the agent the same as the cause in all except
name; the agent and the cause may be rightly called one?

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And the same may be said of the patient, or effect; we shall
find that they too differ, as I was saying, only in name-shall we not?

  Pro. We shall.

  Soc. The agent or cause always naturally leads, and the patient or
effect naturally follows it?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Then the cause and what is subordinate to it in generation
are not the same, but different?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Did not the things which were generated, and the things out
of which they were generated, furnish all the three classes?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And the creator or cause of them has been satisfactorily proven
to be distinct from them-and may therefore be called a fourth
principle?

  Pro. So let us call it.

  Soc. Quite right; but now, having distinguished the four, I think
that we had better refresh our memories by recapitulating each of them
in order.

  Pro. By all means.

  Soc. Then the first I will call the infinite or unlimited, and the
second the finite or limited; then follows the third, an essence
compound and generated; and I do not think that I shall be far wrong
in speaking of the cause of mixture and generation as the fourth.

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. And now what is the next question, and how came we hither? Were
we not enquiring whether the second place belonged to pleasure or
wisdom?

  Pro. We were.

  Soc. And now, having determined these points, shall we not be better
able to decide about the first and second place, which was the
original subject of dispute?

  Pro. I dare say.

  Soc. We said, if you remember, that the mixed life of pleasure and
wisdom was the conqueror-did we not?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And we see what is the place and nature of this life and to
what class it is to be assigned?

  Pro. Beyond a doubt.

  Soc. This is evidently comprehended in the third or mixed class;
which is not composed of any two particular ingredients, but of all
the elements of infinity, bound down by the finite, and may
therefore be truly said to comprehend the conqueror life.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. And what shall we say, Philebus, of your life which is all
sweetness; and in which of the aforesaid classes is that to be placed?
Perhaps you will allow me to ask you a question before you answer?

  Phi. Let me hear.

  Soc. Have pleasure and pain a limit, or do they belong to the
class which admits of more and less?

  Phi. They belong to the class which admits of more, Socrates; for
pleasure would not be perfectly good if she were not infinite in
quantity and degree.

  Soc. Nor would pain, Philebus, be perfectly evil. And therefore
the infinite cannot be that element which imparts to pleasure some
degree of good. But now-admitting, if you like, that pleasure is of
the nature of the infinite-in which of the aforesaid classes, O
Protarchus and Philebus, can we without irreverence place wisdom and
knowledge and mind? And let us be careful, for I think that the danger
will be very serious if we err on this point.

  Phi. You magnify, Socrates, the importance of your favourite god.

  Soc. And you, my friend, are also magnifying your favourite goddess;
but still I must beg you to answer the question.

  Pro. Socrates is quite right, Philebus, and we must submit to him.

  Phi. And did not you, Protarchus, propose to answer in my place?

  Pro. Certainly I did; but I am now in a great strait, and I must
entreat you, Socrates, to be our spokesman, and then we shall not
say anything wrong or disrespectful of your favourite.

  Soc. I must obey you, Protarchus; nor is the task which you impose a
difficult one; but did I really, as Philebus implies, disconcert you
with my playful solemnity, when I asked the question to what class
mind and knowledge belong?

  Pro. You did, indeed, Socrates.

  Soc. Yet the answer is easy, since all philosophers assert with
one voice that mind is the king of heaven and earth-in reality they
are magnifying themselves. And perhaps they are right. But still I
should like to consider the class of mind, if you do not object, a
little more fully.

  Phi. Take your own course, Socrates, and never mind length; we shall
not tire of you.

  Soc. Very good; let us begin then, Protarchus, by asking a question.

  Pro. What question?

  Soc. Whether all this which they call the universe is left to the
guidance of unreason and chance medley, or, on the contrary, as our
fathers have declared, ordered and governed by a marvellous
intelligence and wisdom.

  Pro. Wide asunder are the two assertions, illustrious Socrates,
for that which you were just now saying to me appears to be blasphemy;
but the other assertion, that mind orders all things, is worthy of the
aspect of the world, and of the sun, and of the moon, and of the stars
and of the whole circle of the heavens; and never will I say or
think otherwise.

  Soc. Shall we then agree with them of old time in maintaining this
doctrine-not merely reasserting the notions of others, without risk to
ourselves,-but shall we share in the danger, and take our part of
the reproach which will await us, when an ingenious individual
declares that all is disorder?

  Pro. That would certainly be my wish.

  Soc. Then now please to consider the next stage of the argument.

  Pro. Let me hear.

  Soc. We see that the elements which enter into the nature of the
bodies of all animals, fire, water, air, and, as the storm-tossed
sailor cries, "land" [i.e., earth], reappear in the constitution of
the world.

  Pro. The proverb may be applied to us; for truly the storm gathers
over us, and we are at our wit's end.

  Soc. There is something to be remarked about each of these elements.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. Only a small fraction of any one of them exists in us, and that
of a mean sort, and not in any way pure, or having any power worthy of
its nature. One instance will prove this of all of them; there is fire
within us, and in the universe.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And is not our fire small and weak and mean? But the fire in
the universe is wonderful in quantity and beauty, and in every power
that fire has.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. And is the fire in the universe nourished and generated and
ruled by the fire in us, or is the fire in you and me, and in other
animals, dependent on the universal fire?

  Pro. That is a question which does not deserve an answer.

  Soc. Right; and you would say the same, if I am not mistaken, of the
earth which is in animals and the earth which is in the universe,
and you would give a similar reply about all the other elements?

  Pro. Why, how could any man who gave any other be deemed in his
senses?

  Soc. I do not think that he could-but now go on to the next step.
When we saw those elements of which we have been speaking gathered
up in one, did we not call them a body?

  Pro. We did.

  Soc. And the same may be said of the cosmos, which for the same
reason may be considered to be a body, because made up of the same
elements.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. But is our body nourished wholly by this body, or is this
body nourished by our body, thence deriving and having the qualities
of which we were just now speaking?

  Pro. That again, Socrates, is a question which does not deserve to
be asked.

  Soc. Well, tell me, is this question worth asking?

  Pro. What question?

  Soc. May our body be said to have a soul?

  Pro. Clearly.

  Soc. And whence comes that soul, my dear Protarchus, unless the body
of the universe, which contains elements like those in our bodies
but in every way fairer, had also a soul? Can there be another source?

  Pro. Clearly, Socrates, that is the only source.

  Soc. Why, yes, Protarchus; for surely we cannot imagine that of
the four classes, the finite, the infinite, the composition of the
two, and the cause, the fourth, which enters into all things, giving
to our bodies souls, and the art of self-management, and of healing
disease, and operating in other ways to heal and organize, having
too all the attributes of wisdom;-we cannot, I say, imagine that
whereas the self-same elements exist, both in the entire heaven and in
great provinces of the heaven, only fairer and purer, this last should
not also in that higher sphere have designed the noblest and fairest
things?

  Pro. Such a supposition is quite unreasonable.

  Soc. Then if this be denied, should we not be wise in adopting the
other view and maintaining that there is in the universe a mighty
infinite and an adequate limit, of which we have often spoken, as well
as a presiding cause of no mean power, which orders and arranges years
and seasons and months, and may be justly called wisdom and mind?

  Pro. Most justly.

  Soc. And wisdom and mind cannot exist without soul?

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. And in the divine nature of Zeus would you not say that there
is the soul and mind of a king, because there is in him the power of
the cause? And other gods have other attributes, by which they are
pleased to be called.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. Do not then suppose that these words are rashly spoken by us, O
Protarchus, for they are in harmony with the testimony of those who
said of old time that mind rules the universe.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And they furnish an answer to my enquiry; for they imply that
mind is the parent of that class of the four which we called the cause
of all; and I think that you now have my answer.

  Pro. I have indeed, and yet I did not observe that you had answered.

  Soc. A jest is sometimes refreshing, Protarchus, when it
interrupts earnest.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. I think, friend, that we have now pretty clearly set forth
the class to which mind belongs and what is the power of mind.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And the class to which pleasure belongs has also been long
ago discovered?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And let us remember, too, of both of them, (1) that mind was
akin to the cause and of this family; and (2) that pleasure is
infinite and belongs to the class which neither has, nor ever will
have in itself, a beginning, middle, or end of its own.

  Pro. I shall be sure to remember.

  Soc. We must next examine what is their place and under what
conditions they are generated. And we will begin with pleasure,
since her class was first examined; and yet pleasure cannot be rightly
tested apart from pain ever

  Pro. If this is the road, let us take it.

  Soc. I wonder whether you would agree with me about the origin of
pleasure and pain.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean to say that their natural seat is in the mixed class.

  Pro. And would you tell me again, sweet Socrates, which of the
aforesaid classes is the mixed one?

  Soc. I will my fine fellow, to the best of my ability.

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. Let us then understand the mixed class to be that which we
placed third in the list of four.

  Pro. That which followed the infinite and the finite; and in which
you ranked health, and, if I am not mistaken, harmony.

  Soc. Capital; and now will you please to give me your best
attention?

  Pro. Proceed; I am attending.

  Soc. I say that when the harmony in animals is dissolved, there is
also a dissolution of nature and a generation of pain.

  Pro. That is very probable.

  Soc. And the restoration of harmony and return to nature is the
source of pleasure, if I may be allowed to speak in the fewest and
shortest words about matters of the greatest moment.

  Pro. I believe that you are right, Socrates; but will you try to
be a little plainer?

  Soc. Do not obvious and every-day phenomena furnish the simplest
illustration?

  Pro. What phenomena do you mean?

  Soc. Hunger, for example, is a dissolution and a pain.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Whereas eating is a replenishment and a pleasure?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. Thirst again is a destruction and a pain, but the effect of
moisture replenishing the dry Place is a pleasure: once more, the
unnatural separation and dissolution caused by heat is painful, and
the natural restoration and refrigeration is pleasant.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And the unnatural freezing of the moisture in an animal is
pain, and the natural process of resolution and return of the elements
to their original state is pleasure. And would not the general
proposition seem to you to hold, that the destroying of the natural
union of the finite and infinite, which, as I was observing before,
make up the class of living beings, is pain, and that the process of
return of all things to their own nature is pleasure?

  Pro. Granted; what you say has a general truth.

  Soc. Here then is one kind of pleasures and pains originating
severally in the two processes which we have described?

  Pro. Good.

  Soc. Let us next assume that in the soul herself there is an
antecedent hope of pleasure which is sweet and refreshing, and an
expectation of pain, fearful and anxious.

  Pro. Yes; this is another class of pleasures and pains, which is
of the soul only, apart from the body, and is produced by expectation.

  Soc. Right; for in the analysis of these, pure, as I suppose them to
be, the pleasures being unalloyed with pain and the pains with
pleasure, methinks that we shall see clearly whether the whole class
of pleasure is to be desired, or whether this quality of entire
desirableness is not rather to be attributed to another of the classes
which have been mentioned; and whether pleasure and pain, like heat
and cold, and other things of the same kind, are not sometimes to be
desired and sometimes not to be desired, as being not in themselves
good, but only sometimes and in some instances admitting of the nature
of good.

  Pro. You say most truly that this is the track which the
investigation should pursue.

  Soc. Well, then, assuming that pain ensues on the dissolution, and
pleasure on the restoration of the harmony, let us now ask what will
be the condition of animated beings who are neither in process of
restoration nor of dissolution. And mind what you say: I ask whether
any animal who is in that condition can possibly have any feeling of
pleasure or pain, great or small?

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then here we have a third state, over and above that of
pleasure and of pain?

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And do not forget that there is such a state; it will make a
great difference in our judgment of pleasure, whether we remember this
or not. And I should like to say a few words about it.

  Pro. What have you to say?

  Soc. Why, you know that if a man chooses the life of wisdom, there
is no reason why he should not live in this neutral state.

  Pro. You mean that he may live neither rejoicing nor sorrowing?

  Soc. Yes; and if I remember rightly, when the lives were compared,
no degree of pleasure, whether great or small, was thought to be
necessary to him who chose the life of thought and wisdom.

  Pro. Yes, certainly, we said so.

  Soc. Then he will live without pleasure; and who knows whether
this may not be the most divine of all lives?

  Pro. If so, the gods, at any rate, cannot be supposed to have either
joy or sorrow.

  Soc. Certainly not-there would be a great impropriety in the
assumption of either alternative. But whether the gods are or are
not indifferent to pleasure is a point which may be considered
hereafter if in any way relevant to the argument, and whatever is
the conclusion we will place it to the account of mind in her
contest for the second place, should she have to resign the first.

  Pro. Just so.

  Soc. The other class of pleasures, which as we were saying is purely
mental, is entirely derived from memory.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. I must first of all analyse memory, or rather perception
which is prior to, memory, if the subject of our discussion is ever to
be properly cleared up.

  Pro. How will you proceed?

  Soc. Let us imagine affections of the body which are extinguished
before they reach the soul, and leave her unaffected; and again, other
affections which vibrate through both soul and body, and impart a
shock to both and to each of them.

  Pro. Granted.

  Soc. And the soul may be truly said to be oblivious of the first but
not of the second?

  Pro. Quite true.

  Soc. When I say oblivious, do not suppose that I mean
forgetfulness in a literal sense; for forgetfulness is the exit of
memory, which in this case has not yet entered; and to speak of the
loss of that which is not yet in existence, and never has been, is a
contradiction; do you see?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. Then just be so good as to change the terms.

  Pro. How shall I change them?

  Soc. Instead of the oblivion of the soul, when you are describing
the state in which she is unaffected by the shocks of the body, say
unconsciousness.

  Pro. I see.

  Soc. And the union or communion of soul and body in one feeling
and motion would be properly called consciousness?

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. Then now we know the meaning of the word?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And memory may, I think, be rightly described as the
preservation of consciousness?

  Pro. Right.

  Soc. But do we not distinguish memory from recollection?

  Pro. I think so.

  Soc. And do we not mean by recollection the power which the soul has
of recovering, when by herself, some feeling which she experienced
when in company with the body?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And when she recovers of herself the lost recollection of
some consciousness or knowledge, the recovery is termed recollection
and reminiscence?

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. There is a reason why I say all this.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. I want to attain the plainest possible notion of pleasure and
desire, as they exist in the mind only, apart from the body; and the
previous analysis helps to show the nature of both.

  Pro. Then now, Socrates, let us proceed to the next point.

  Soc. There are certainly many things to be considered in
discussing the generation and whole complexion of pleasure. At the
outset we must determine the nature and seat of desire.

  Pro. Ay; let us enquire into that, for we shall lose nothing.

  Soc. Nay, Protarchus, we shall surely lose the puzzle if we find the
answer.

  Pro. A fair retort; but let us proceed.

  Soc. Did we not place hunger, thirst, and the like, in the class
of desires?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And yet they are very different; what common nature have we
in view when we call them by a single name?

  Pro. By heavens, Socrates, that is a question which is, not easily
answered; but it must be answered.

  Soc. Then let us go back to our examples.

  Pro. Where shall we begin?

  Soc. Do we mean anything when we say "a man thirsts"?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. We mean to say that he "is empty"?

  Pro. Of course.

  Soc. And is not thirst desire?

  Pro. Yes, of drink.

  Soc. Would you say of drink, or of replenishment with drink?

  Pro. I should say, of replenishment with drink.

  Soc. Then he who is empty desires, as would appear, the opposite
of what he experiences; for he is empty and desires to be full?

  Pro. Clearly so.

  Soc. But how can a man who is empty for the first time, attain
either by perception or memory to any apprehension of replenishment,
of which he has no present or past experience?

  Pro. Impossible.

  Soc. And yet he who desires, surely desires something?

  Pro. Of course.

  Soc. He does not desire that which he experiences, for he
experiences thirst, and thirst is emptiness; but he desires
replenishment?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Then there must be something in the thirsty man which in some
way apprehends replenishment?

  Pro. There must.

  Soc. And that cannot be the body, for the body is supposed to be
emptied?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. The only remaining alternative is that the soul apprehends
the replenishment by the help of memory; as is obvious, for what other
way can there be?

  Pro. I cannot imagine any other.

  Soc. But do you see the consequence?

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. That there is no such thing as desire of the body.

  Pro. Why so?

  Soc. Why, because the argument shows that the endeavour of every
animal is to the reverse of his bodily state.

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And the impulse which leads him to the opposite of what he is
experiencing proves that he has a memory of the opposite state.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And the argument, having proved that memory attracts us towards
the objects of desire, proves also that the impulses and the desires
and the moving principle in every living being have their origin in
the soul.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. The argument will not allow that our body either hungers or
thirsts or has any similar experience.

  Pro. Quite right.

  Soc. Let me make a further observation; the argument appears to me
to imply that there is a kind of life which consists in these
affections.

  Pro. Of what affections, and of what kind of life, are you speaking?

  Soc. I am speaking of being emptied and replenished, and of all that
relates to the preservation and destruction of living beings, as
well as of the pain which is felt in one of these states and of the
pleasure which succeeds to it.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And what would you say of the intermediate state?

  Pro. What do you mean by "intermediate"?

  Soc. I mean when a person is in actual suffering and yet remembers
past pleasures which, if they would only return, would relieve him;
but as yet he has them not. May we not say of him, that he is in an
intermediate state?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Would you say that he was wholly pained or wholly pleased?

  Pro. Nay, I should say that he has two pains; in his body there is
the actual experience of pain, and in his soul longing and
expectation.

  Soc. What do you mean, Protarchus, by the two pains? May not a man
who is empty have at one time a sure hope of being filled, and at
other times be quite in despair?

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And has he not the pleasure of memory when he is hoping to be
filled, and yet in that he is empty is he not at the same time in
pain?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Then man and the other animals have at the same time both
pleasure and pain?

  Pro. I suppose so.

  Soc. But when a man is empty and has no hope of being filled,
there will be the double experience of pain. You observed this and
inferred that the double experience was the single case possible.

  Pro. Quite true, Socrates.

  Soc. Shall the enquiry into these states of feeling be made the
occasion of raising a question?

  Pro. What question?

  Soc. Whether we ought to say that the pleasures and pains of which
we are speaking are true or false? or some true and some false?

  Pro. But how, Socrates, can there be false pleasures and pains?

  Soc. And how, Protarchus, can there be true and false fears, or true
and false expectations, or true and false opinions?

  Pro. I grant that opinions may be true or false, but not pleasures.

  Soc. What do you mean? I am afraid that we are raising a very
serious enquiry.

  Pro. There I agree.

  Soc. And yet, my boy, for you are one of Philebus' boys, the point
to be considered, is, whether the enquiry is relevant to the argument.

  Pro. Surely.

  Soc. No tedious and irrelevant discussion can be allowed; what is
said should be pertinent.

  Pro. Right.

  Soc. I am always wondering at the question which has now been
raised.

  Pro. How so?

  Soc. Do you deny that some pleasures are false, and others true?

  Pro. To be sure I do.

  Soc. Would you say that no one ever seemed to rejoice and yet did
not rejoice, or seemed to feel pain and yet did not feel pain,
sleeping or waking, mad or lunatic?

  Pro. So we have always held, Socrates.

  Soc. But were you right? Shall we enquire into the truth of your
opinion?

  Pro. I think that we should.

  Soc. Let us then put into more precise terms the question which
has arisen about pleasure and opinion. Is there such a thing as
opinion?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And such a thing as pleasure?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And an opinion must of something?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And a man must be pleased by something?

  Pro. Quite correct.

  Soc. And whether the opinion be right or wrong, makes no difference;
it will still be an opinion?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And he who is pleased, whether he is rightly pleased or not
will always have a real feeling of pleasure?

  Pro. Yes; that is also quite true.

  Soc. Then, how can opinion be both true and false, and pleasure true
only, although pleasure and opinion are both equally real?

  Pro. Yes; that is the question.

  Soc. You mean that opinion admits of truth and falsehood, and
hence becomes not merely opinion, but opinion of a certain quality;
and this is what you think should be examined?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And further, even if we admit the existence of qualities in
other objects, may not pleasure and pain be simple and devoid of
quality?

  Pro. Clearly.

  Soc. But there is no difficulty in seeing that Pleasure and pain
as well as opinion have qualities, for they are great or small, and
have various degrees of intensity; as was indeed said long ago by us.

  Pro. Quite true.

  Soc. And if badness attaches to any of them, Protarchus, then we
should speak of a bad opinion or of a bad pleasure?

  Pro. Quite true, Socrates.

  Soc. And if rightness attaches to any of them, should we not speak
of a right opinion or right pleasure; and in like manner of the
reverse of rightness?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And if the thing opined be erroneous, might we not say that
opinion, being erroneous, is not right or rightly opined?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And if we see a pleasure or pain which errs in respect of its
object, shall we call that right or good, or by any honourable name?

  Pro. Not if the pleasure is mistaken; how could we?

  Soc. And surely pleasure often appears to accompany an opinion which
is not true, but false?

  Pro. Certainly it does; and in that case, Socrates, as we were
saying, the opinion is false, but no one could call the actual
pleasure false.

  Soc. How eagerly, Protarchus, do you rush to the defence of
pleasure!

  Pro. Nay, Socrates, I only repeat what I hear.

  Soc. And is there no difference, my friend, between that pleasure
which is associated with right opinion and knowledge, and that which
is often found in all of us associated with falsehood and ignorance?

  Pro. There must be a very great difference, between them.

  Soc. Then, now let us proceed to contemplate this difference.

  Pro. Lead, and I will follow.

  Soc. Well, then, my view is-

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. We agree-do we not?-that there is such a thing as false, and
also such a thing as true opinion?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And pleasure and pain, as I was just now saying, are often
consequent upon these upon true and false opinion, I mean.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And do not opinion and the endeavour to form an opinion
always spring from memory and perception?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Might we imagine the process to be something of this nature?

  Pro. Of what nature?

  Soc. An object may be often seen at a distance not very clearly, and
the seer may want to determine what it is which he sees.

  Pro. Very likely.

  Soc. Soon he begins to interrogate himself.

  Pro. In what manner?

  Soc. He asks himself-"What is that which appears to be standing by
the rock under the tree?" This is the question which he may be
supposed to put to himself when he sees such an appearance.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. To which he may guess the right answer, saying as if in a
whisper to himself-"It is a man."

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. Or again, he may be misled, and then he will say-"No, it is a
figure made by the shepherds."

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And if he has a companion, he repeats his thought to him in
articulate sounds, and what was before an opinion, has now become a
proposition.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. But if he be walking alone when these thoughts occur to him, he
may not unfrequently keep them in his mind for a considerable time.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. Well, now, I wonder whether, you would agree in my
explanation of this phenomenon.

  Pro. What is your explanation?

  Soc. I think that the soul at such times is like a book.

  Pro. How so?

  Soc. Memory and perception meet, and they and their attendant
feelings seem to almost to write down words in the soul, and when
the inscribing feeling writes truly, then true opinion and true
propositions which are the expressions of opinion come into our
souls-but when the scribe within us writes falsely, the result is
false.

  Pro. I quite assent and agree to your statement their

  Soc. I must bespeak your favour also for another artist, who is busy
at the same time in the chambers of the soul.

  Pro. Who is he?

  Soc. The painter, who, after the scribe has done his work, draws
images in the soul of the things which he has described.

  Pro. But when and how does he do this?

  Soc. When a man, besides receiving from sight or some other sense
certain opinions or statements, sees in his mind the images of the
subjects of them;-is not this a very common mental phenomenom?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And the images answering to true opinions and words are true,
and to false opinions and words false; are they not?

  Pro. They are.

  Soc. If we are right so far, there arises a further question.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. Whether we experience the feeling of which I am speaking only
in relation to the present and the past, or in relation to the
future also?

  Pro. I should say in relation to all times alike.

  Soc. Have not purely mental pleasures and pains been described
already as in some cases anticipations of the bodily ones; from
which we may infer that anticipatory pleasures and pains have to do
with the future?

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. And do all those writings and paintings which, as we were
saying a little while ago, are produced in us, relate to the past
and present only, and not to the future?

  Pro. To the future, very much.

  Soc. When you say, "Very much," you mean to imply that all these
representations are hopes about the future, and that mankind are
filled with, hopes in every stage of existence?

  Pro. Exactly.

  Soc. Answer me another question.

  Pro. What question?

  Soc. A just and pious and good man is the friend of the gods; is
he not?

  Pro. Certainly he is.

  Soc. And the unjust and utterly bad man is the reverse?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And all men, as we were saying just now, are always filled with
hopes?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And these hopes, as they are termed, are propositions which
exist in the minds of each of us?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And the fancies of hope are also pictured in us; a man may
often have a vision of a heap of gold, and pleasures ensuing, and in
the picture there may be a likeness of himself mightily rejoicing over
his good fortune.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And may we not say that the good, being friends of the gods,
have generally true pictures presented to them, and the bad false
pictures?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. The bad, too, have pleasures painted in their fancy as well
as the good; but I presume that they are false pleasures.

  Pro. They are.

  Soc. The bad then commonly delight in false pleasures, and the
good in true pleasures?

  Pro. Doubtless.

  Soc. Then upon this view there are false pleasures in the souls of
men which are a ludicrous imitation of the true, and there are pains
of a similar character?

  Pro. There are.

  Soc. And did we not allow that a man who had an opinion at all had a
real opinion, but often about things which had no existence either
in the past, present, or future?

  Pro. Quite true.

  Soc. And this was the source of false opinion and opining; am I
not right?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And must we not attribute to pleasure and pain a similar real
but illusory character?

  Pro. How do you mean?

  Soc. I mean to say that a man must be admitted to have real
pleasure; who is pleased with anything or anyhow; and he may be
pleased about things which neither have nor have ever had any real
existence, and, more often than not, are never likely to exist.

  Pro. Yes, Socrates, that again is undeniable.

  Soc. And may not the same be said about fear and anger and the like;
are they not often false?

  Pro. Quite so.

  Soc. And can opinions be good or bad except in as far as they are
true or false?

  Pro. In no other way.

  Soc. Nor can pleasures be conceived to be bad except in so far as
they are false.

  Pro. Nay, Socrates, that is the very opposite of truth; for no one
would call pleasures and pains bad because they are false, but by
reason of some other great corruption to which they are liable.

  Soc. Well, of pleasures which are and caused by corruption we will
hereafter speak, if we care to continue the enquiry; for the present I
would rather show by another argument that there are many false
pleasures existing or coming into existence in us, because this may
assist our final decision.

  Pro. Very true; that is to say, if there are such pleasures.

  Soc. I think that there are, Protarchus; but this is an opinion
which should be well assured, and not rest upon a mere assertion.

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. Then now, like wrestlers, let us approach and grasp this new
argument.

  Pro. Proceed.

  Soc. We were maintaining a little while since, that when desires, as
they are termed, exist in us, then the body has separate feelings
apart from the soul-do you remember?

  Pro. Yes, I remember that you said so.

  Soc. And the soul was supposed to desire the opposite of the
bodily state, while the body was the source of any pleasure or pain
which was experienced.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Then now you may infer what happens in such cases.

  Pro. What am I to infer?

  Soc. That in such cases pleasure and pains come simultaneously;
and there is a juxtaposition of the opposite sensations which
correspond to them, as has been already shown.

  Pro. Clearly.

  Soc. And there is another point to which we have agreed.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. That pleasure and pain both admit of more and less, and that
they are of the class of infinites.

  Pro. Certainly, we said so.

  Soc. But how can we rightly judge of them?

  Pro. How can we?

  Soc. It is our intention to judge of their comparative importance
and intensity, measuring pleasure against pain, and pain against pain,
and pleasure against pleasure?

  Pro. Yes, such is our intention, and we shall judge of them
accordingly.

  Soc. Well, take the case of sight. Does not the nearness or distance
of magnitudes obscure their true proportions, and make us opine
falsely; and do we not find the same illusion happening in the case of
pleasures and pains?

  Pro. Yes, Socrates, and in a degree far greater.

  Soc. Then what we are now saying is the opposite of what we were
saying before.

  Pro. What was that?

  Soc. Then the opinions were true and false, and infected the
pleasures and pains with their own falsity.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. But now it is the pleasures which are said to be true and false
because they are seen at various distances, and subjected to
comparison; the pleasures appear to be greater and more vehement
when placed side by side with the pains, and the pains when placed
side by side with the pleasures.

  Pro. Certainly, and for the reason which you mention.

  Soc. And suppose you part off from pleasures and pains the element
which makes them appear to be greater or less than they really are:
you will acknowledge that this element is illusory, and you will never
say that the corresponding excess or defect of pleasure or pain is
real or true.

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. Next let us see whether in another direction we may not find
pleasures and pains existing and appearing in living beings, which are
still more false than these.

  Pro. What are they, and how shall we find them?

  Soc. If I am not mistaken, I have often repeated that pains and
aches and suffering and uneasiness of all sorts arise out of a
corruption of nature caused by concretions, and dissolutions, and
repletions, and evacuations, and also by growth and decay?

  Pro. Yes, that has been often said.

  Soc. And we have also agreed that the restoration of the natural
state is pleasure?

  Pro. Right.

  Soc. But now let us suppose an interval of time at which the body
experiences none of these changes.

  Pro. When can that be, Socrates?

  Soc. Your question, Protarchus, does not help the argument.

  Pro. Why not, Socrates?

  Soc. Because it does not prevent me from repeating mine.

  Pro. And what was that?

  Soc. Why, Protarchus, admitting that there is no such interval, I
may ask what would be the necessary consequence if there were?

  Pro. You mean, what would happen if the body were not changed either
for good or bad?

  Soc. Yes.

  Pro. Why then, Socrates, I should suppose that there would be
neither pleasure nor pain.

  Soc. Very good; but still, if I am not mistaken, you do assert
that we must always be experiencing one of them; that is what the wise
tell us; for, say they, all things are ever flowing up and down.

  Pro. Yes, and their words are of no mean authority.

  Soc. Of course, for they are no mean authorities themselves; and I
should like to avoid the brunt of their argument. Shall I tell you how
I mean to escape from them? And you shall be the partner of my flight.

  Pro. How?

  Soc. To them we will say: "Good; but are we, or living things in
general, always conscious of what happens to us-for example, of our
growth, or the like? Are we not, on the contrary, almost wholly
unconscious of this and similar phenomena?" You must answer for them.

  Pro. The latter alternative is the true one.

  Soc. Then we were not right in saying, just now, that motions
going up and down cause pleasures and pains?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. A better and more unexceptionable way of speaking will be-

  Pro. What?

  Soc. If we say that the great changes produce pleasures and pains,
but that the moderate and lesser ones do neither.

  Pro. That, Socrates, is the more correct mode of speaking.

  Soc. But if this be true, the life to which I was just now referring
again appears.

  Pro. What life?

  Soc. The life which we affirmed to be devoid either of pain or of
joy.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. We may assume then that there are three lives, one pleasant,
one painful, and the third which is neither; what say you?

  Pro. I should say as you do that there are three of them.

  Soc. But if so, the negation of pain will not be the same with
pleasure.

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then when you hear a person saying, that always to live without
pain is the pleasantest of all things, what would you understand him
to mean by that statement?

  Pro. I think that by pleasure he must mean the negative of pain.

  Soc. Let us take any three things; or suppose that we embellish a
little and call the first gold, the second silver, and there shall
be a third which is neither.

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. Now, can that which is neither be either gold or silver?

  Pro. Impossible.

  Soc. No more can that neutral or middle life be rightly or
reasonably spoken or thought of as pleasant or painful.

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. And yet, my friend, there are, as we know, persons who say
and think so.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And do they think that they have pleasure when they are free
from pain?

  Pro. They say so.

  Soc. And they must think or they would not say that they have
pleasure.

  Pro. I suppose not.

  Soc. And yet if pleasure and the negation of pain are of distinct
natures, they are wrong.

  Pro. But they are undoubtedly of distinct natures.

  Soc. Then shall we take the view that they are three, as we were
just now saying, or that they are two only-the one being a state of
pain, which is an evil, and the other a cessation of pain, which is of
itself a good, and is called pleasant?

  Pro. But why, Socrates, do we ask the question at all? I do not
see the reason.

  Soc. You, Protarchus, have clearly never heard of certain enemies of
our friend Philebus.

  Pro. And who may they be?

  Soc. Certain persons who are reputed to be masters in natural
philosophy, who deny the very existence of pleasure.

  Pro. Indeed.

  Soc. They say that what the school of Philebus calls pleasures are
all of them only avoidances of pain.

  Pro. And would you, Socrates, have us agree with them?

  Soc. Why, no, I would rather use them as a sort of diviners, who
divine the truth, not by rules of art, but by an instinctive
repugnance and extreme detestation which a noble nature has of the
power of pleasure, in which they think that there is nothing sound,
and her seductive influence is declared by them to be witchcraft,
and not pleasure. This is the use which you may make of them. And when
you have considered the various grounds of their dislike, you shall
hear from me what I deem to be true pleasures. Having thus examined
the nature of pleasure from both points of view, we will bring her
up for judgment.

  Pro. Well said.

  Soc. Then let us enter into an alliance with these philosophers
and follow in the track of their dislike. I imagine that they would
say something of this sort; they would begin at the beginning, and ask
whether, if we wanted to know the nature of any quality, such as
hardness, we should be more likely to discover it by looking at the
hardest things, rather than at the least hard? You, Protarchus,
shall answer these severe gentlemen as you answer me.

  Pro. By all means, and I reply to them, that you should look at
the greatest instances.

  Soc. Then if we want to see the true nature of pleasures as a class,
we should not look at the most diluted pleasures, but at the most
extreme and most vehement?

  Pro. In that every one will agree.

  Soc. And the obvious instances of the greatest pleasures, as we have
often said, are the pleasures of the body?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And are they felt by us to be or become greater, when we are
sick or when we are in health? And here we must be careful in our
answer, or we shall come to grief.

  Pro. How will that be?

  Soc. Why, because we might be tempted to answer, "When we are in
health."

  Pro. Yes, that is the natural answer.

  Soc. Well, but are not those pleasures the greatest of which mankind
have the greatest desires?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And do not people who are in a fever, or any similar illness,
feel cold or thirst or other bodily affections more intensely? Am I
not right in saying that they have a deeper want and greater
pleasure in the satisfaction of their want?

  Pro. That is obvious as soon as it is said.

  Soc. Well, then, shall we not be right in saying, that if a person
would wish to see the greatest pleasures he ought to go and look,
not at health, but at discase? And here you must distinguish:-do not
imagine that I mean to ask whether those who are very ill have more
pleasures than those who are well, but understand that I am speaking
of the magnitude of pleasure; I want to know where pleasures are found
to be most intense. For, as I say, we have to discover what is
pleasure, and what they mean by pleasure who deny her very existence.

  Pro. I think I follow you.

  Soc. You will soon have a better opportunity of showing whether
you do or not, Protarchus. Answer now, and tell me whether you see,
I will not say more, but more intense and excessive pleasures in
wantonness than in temperance? Reflect before you speak.

  Pro. I understand you, and see that there is a great difference
between them; the temperate are restrained by the wise man's
aphorism of "Never too much," which is their rule, but excess of
pleasure possessing the minds of fools and wantons becomes madness and
makes them shout with delight.

  Soc. Very good, and if this be true, then the greatest pleasures and
pains will clearly be found in some vicious state of soul and body,
and not in a virtuous state.

  Pro. Certainly.

 Soc. And ought we not to select some of these for examination, and
see what makes them the greatest?

  Pro. To be sure we ought.

  Soc. Take the case of the pleasures which arise out of certain
disorders.

  Pro. What disorders?

  Soc. The pleasures of unseemly disorders, which our severe friends
utterly detest.

  Pro. What pleasures?

  Soc. Such, for example, as the relief of itching and other
ailments by scratching, which is the only remedy required. For what in
Heaven's name is the feeling to be called which is thus produced in
us?-Pleasure or pain?

  Pro. A villainous mixture of some kind, Socrates, I should say.

  Soc. I did not introduce the argument, O Protarchus, with any
personal reference to Philebus, but because, without the consideration
of these and similar pleasures, we shall not be able to determine
the point at issue.

  Pro. Then we had better proceed to analyze this family of pleasures.

  Soe. You mean the pleasures which are mingled with pain?

  Pro. Exactly.

  Soc. There are some mixtures which are of the body, and only in
the body, and others which are of the soul, and only in the soul;
while there are other mixtures of pleasures with pains, common both to
soul and body, which in their composite state are called sometimes
pleasures and sometimes pains.

  Pro. How is that?

  Soc. Whenever, in the restoration or in the derangement of nature, a
man experiences two opposite feelings; for example, when he is cold
and is growing warm, or again; when he is hot and is becoming cool,
and he wants to have the one and be rid of the other;-the sweet has
a bitter, as the common saying is, and both together fasten upon him
and create irritation and in time drive him to distraction.

  Pro. That description is very true to nature.

  Soc. And in these sorts of mixtures the pleasures and pains are
sometimes equal, and sometimes one or other of them predominates?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Of cases in which the pain exceeds the pleasure, an example
is afforded by itching, of which we were just now speaking, and by the
tingling which we feel when the boiling and fiery element is within,
and the rubbing and motion only relieves the surface, and does not
reach the parts affected; then if you put them to the fire, and as a
last resort apply cold to them, you may often produce the most intense
pleasure or pain in the inner parts, which contrasts and mingles
with the pain or pleasure, as the case may be, of the outer parts; and
this is due to the forcible separation of what is united, or to the
union of what is separated, and to the juxtaposition of pleasure and
pain.

  Pro. Quite so.

  Soc. Sometimes the element of pleasure prevails in a man, and the
slight undercurrent of pain makes him tingle, and causes a gentle
irritation; or again, the excessive infusion of pleasure creates an
excitement in him,-he even leaps for joy, he assumes all sorts of
attitudes, he changes all manner of colours, he gasps for breath,
and is quite amazed, and utters the most irrational exclamations.

  Pro. Yes, indeed.

  Soc. He will say of himself, and others will of him, that he is
dying with these delights; and the more dissipated and
good-for-nothing he is, the more vehemently he pursues them in every
way; of all pleasures he declares them to be the greatest; and he
reckons him who lives in the most constant enjoyment of them to be the
happiest of mankind.

  Pro. That, Socrates, is a very true description of the opinions of
the majority about pleasures.

  Soc. Yes, Protarchus, quite true of the mixed pleasures, which arise
out of the communion of external and internal sensations in the
body; there are also cases in which the mind contributes an,
opposite element to the body, whether of pleasure or pain, and the two
unite and form one mixture. Concerning these I have already
remarked, that when a man is empty he desires to be full, and has
pleasure in hope and pain in vacuity. But now I must further add
what I omitted before, that in all these and similar emotions in which
body and mind are opposed (and they are innumerable), pleasure and
pain coalesce in one.

  Pro. I believe that to be quite true.

  Soc. There still remains one other sort of admixture of pleasures
and pains.

  Pro. What is that?

  Soc. The union which, as we were saying, the mind often
experiences of purely mental feelings.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. Why, do we not speak of anger, fear, desire, sorrow, love,
emulation, envy, and the like, as pains which belong to the soul only?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And shall we not find them also full of the most wonderful
pleasures? need I remind you of the anger

     Which stirs even a wise man to violence,

     And is sweeter than honey and the honeycomb?

And you remember how pleasures mingle with pains in lamentation and
bereavement?

  Pro. Yes, there is a natural connection between them.

  Soc. And you remember also how at the sight of tragedies the
spectators smile through their tear?

  Pro. Certainly I do.

  Soc. And are you aware that even at a comedy the soul experiences
a mixed feeling of pain and pleasure?

  Pro. I do not quite understand you.

  Soc. I admit, Protarchus, that there is some difficulty in
recognizing this mixture of feelings at a comedy.

  Pro. There is, I think.

  Soc. And the greater the obscurity of the case the more desirable
the examination of it because the difficulty in detecting other
cases of mixed pleasures and pains will be less.

  Pro. Proceed.

  Soc. I have just mentioned envy; would you not call that a pain of
the soul?

  Pro. Yes

  Soc. And yet the envious man finds something in the misfortunes of
his neighbours at which he is pleased?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And ignorance, and what is termed clownishness, are surely an
evil?

  Pro. To be sure.

  Soc. From these considerations learn to know the nature of the
ridiculous.

  Pro. Explain.

  Soc. The ridiculous is in short the specific name which is used to
describe the vicious form of a certain habit; and of vice in general
it is that kind which is most at variance with the inscription at
Delphi.

  Pro. You mean, Socrates, "Know thyself."

  Soc. I do; and the opposite would be, "Know not thyself."

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And now, O Protarchus, try to divide this into three.

  Pro. Indeed I am afraid that I cannot.

  Soc. Do you mean to say that I must make the division for you?

  Pro. Yes, and what is more, I beg that you will.

  Soc. Are there not three ways in which ignorance of self may be
shown?

  Pro. What are they?

  Soc. In the first place, about money; the ignorant may fancy himself
richer than he is.

  Pro. Yes, that is a very common error.

  Soc. And still more often he will fancy that he is taller or
fairer than he is, or that he has some other advantage of person which
he really has not.

  Pro. Of course.

  Soc. And yet surely by far the greatest number err about the goods
of the mind; they imagine themselves to be much better men than they
are.

  Pro. Yes, that is by far the commonest delusion.

  Soc. And of all the virtues, is not wisdom the one which the mass of
mankind are always claiming, and which most arouses in them a spirit
of contention and lying conceit of wisdom?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And may not all this be truly called an evil condition?

  Pro. Very evil.

  Soc But we must pursue the division a step further, Protarchus, if
we would see in envy of the childish sort a singular mixture of
pleasure and pain.

  Pro. How can we make the further division which you suggest?

  Soc. All who are silly enough to entertain this lying conceit of
themselves may of course be divided, like the rest of mankind, into
two classes-one having power and might; and the other the reverse.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Let this, then, be the principle of division; those of them who
are weak and unable to revenge themselves, when they are laughed at,
may be truly called ridiculous, but those who can defend themselves
may be more truly described as strong and formidable; for ignorance in
the powerul is hateful and horrible, because hurtful to others both in
reality and in fiction, but powerless ignorance may be reckoned, and
in truth is, ridiculous.

  Pro. That is very true, but I do not as yet see where is the
admixture of pleasures and pains.

  Soc. Well, then, let us examine the nature of envy.

  Pro. Proceed.

  Soc. Is not envy an unrighteous pleasure, and also an unrighteous
pain?

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. There is nothing envious or wrong in rejoicing at the
misfortunes of enemies?

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. But to feel joy instead of sorrow at the sight of our
friends' misfortunes-is not that wrong?

  Pro. Undoubtedly.

  Soc. Did we not say that ignorance was always an evil?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And the three kinds of vain conceit in our friends which we
enumerated-the vain conceit of beauty, of wisdom, and of wealth, are
ridiculous if they are weak, and detestable when they are powerful:
May we not say, as I was saying before, that our friends who are in
this state of mind, when harmless to others, are simply ridiculous?

  Pro. They are ridiculous.

  Soc. And do we not acknowledge this ignorance of theirs to be a
misfortune?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And do we feel pain or pleasure in laughing at it?

  Pro. Clearly we feel pleasure.

  Soc. And was not envy the source of this pleasure which we feel at
the misfortunes of friends?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Then the argument shows that when we laugh at the folly of
our friends, pleasure, in mingling with envy, mingles with pain, for
envy has been acknowledged by us to be mental pain, and laughter is
pleasant; and so we envy and laugh at the same instant.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And the argument implies that there are combinations of
pleasure and pain in lamentations, and in tragedy and comedy, not only
on the stage, but on the greater stage of human life; and so in
endless other cases.

  Pro. I do not see how any one can deny what you say, Socrates,
however eager he may be to assert the opposite opinion.

  Soc. I mentioned anger, desire, sorrow, fear, love, emulation, envy,
and similar emotions, as examples in which we should find a mixture of
the two elements so often named; did I not?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. We may observe that our conclusions hitherto have had reference
only to sorrow and envy and anger.

  Pro. I see.

  Soc. Then many other cases still remain?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And why do you suppose me to have pointed out to you the
admixture which takes place in comedy? Why but to convince you that
there was no difficulty in showing the mixed nature of fear and love
and similar affections; and I thought that when I had given you the
illustration, you would have let me off, and have acknowledged as a
general truth that the body without the soul, and the soul without the
body, as well as the two united, are susceptible of all sorts of
admixtures of pleasures and pains; and so further discussion would
have been unnecessary. And now I want to know whether I may depart; or
will you keep me here until midnight? I fancy that I may obtain my
release without many words;-if I promise that to-morrow I will give
you an account of all these cases. But at present I would rather
sail in another direction, and go to other matters which remain to
be settled, before the judgment can be given which Philebus demands.

  Pro. Very good, Socrates; in what remains take your own course.

  Soc. Then after the mixed pleasures the unmixed should have their
turn; this is the natural and necessary order.

  Pro. Excellent.

  Soc. These, in turn, then, I will now endeavour to indicate; for
with the maintainers of the opinion that all pleasures are a cessation
of pain, I do not agree, but, as I was saying, I use them as
witnesses, that there are pleasures which seem only and are not, and
there are others again which have great power and appear in many
forms, yet are intermingled with pains, and are partly alleviations of
agony and distress, both of body and mind.

  Pro. Then what pleasures, Socrates, should we be right in conceiving
to be true?

  Soc. True pleasures are those which are given by beauty of colour
and form, and most of of those which arise from smells; those of
sound, again, and in general those of which the want is painless and
unconscious, and of which the fruition is palpable to sense and
pleasant and unalloyed with pain.

  Pro. Once more, Socrates, I must ask what you mean.

  Soc. My meaning is certainly not obvious, and I will endeavour to be
plainer. I do not mean by beauty of form such beauty as that of
animals or pictures, which the many would suppose to be my meaning;
but, says the argument, understand me to mean straight lines and
circles, and the plane solid figures which are formed out of them by
turning-lathes and rulers and measurers of angles; for these I
affirm to be not only relatively beautiful, like other things, but
they are eternally and absolutely beautiful, and they have peculiar
pleasures, quite unlike the pleasures of scratching. And there are
colours which are of the same character, and have similar pleasures;
now do you understand my meaning?

  Pro. I am trying to understand, Socrates, and I hope that you will
try to make your meaning dearer.

  Soc. When sounds are smooth and clear, and have a single pure
tone, then I mean to say that they are not relatively but absolutely
beautiful, and have natural pleasures associated with them.

  Pro. Yes, there are such pleasures.

  Soc. The pleasures of smell are of a less ethereal sort, but they
have no necessary admixture of pain; and all pleasures, however and
wherever experienced, which are unattended by pains, I assign to an
analogous class. Here then are two kinds of pleasures.

  Pro. I understand.

  Soc. To these may be added the pleasures of knowledge, if no
hunger of knowledge and no pain caused by such hunger precede them.

  Pro. And this is the case.

  Soc. Well, but if a man who is full of knowledge loses his
knowledge, are there not pains of forgetting?

  Pro. Not necessarily, but there may be times of reflection, when
he feels grief at the loss of his knowledge.

  Soc. Yes, my friend, but at present we are enumerating only the
natural perceptions, and have nothing to do with reflection.

  Pro. In that case you are right in saying that the loss of knowledge
is not attended with pain.

  Soc. These pleasures of knowledge, then, are unmixed with pain;
and they are not the pleasures of the many but of a very few.

  Pro. Quite true.

  Soc. And now, having fairly separated the pure pleasures and those
which may be rightly termed impure, let us further add to our
description of them, that the pleasures which are in excess have no
measure, but that those which are not in excess have measure; the
great, the excessive, whether more or less frequent, we shall be right
in referring to the class of the infinite, and of the more and less,
which pours through body and soul alike; and the others we shall refer
to the class which has measure.

  Pro. Quite right, Socrates.

  Soc. Still there is something more to be considered about pleasures.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. When you speak of purity and clearness, or of excess,
abundance, greatness and sufficiency, in what relation do these
terms stand to truth?

  Pro. Why do you ask, Socrates?

  Soc. Because, Protarchus, I should wish to test pleasure and
knowledge in every possible way, in order that if there be a pure
and impure element in either of them, I may present the pure element
for judgment, and then they will be more easily judged of by you and
by me and by all of us.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. Let us investigate all the pure kinds; first selecting for
consideration a single instance.

  Pro. What instance shall we select?

  Soc. Suppose that we first of all take whiteness.

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. How can there be purity in whiteness, and what purity? Is
that purest which is greatest or most in quantity, or that which is
most unadulterated and freest from any admixture of other colours?

  Pro. Clearly that which is most unadulterated.

  Soc. True, Protarchus; and so the purest white, and not the greatest
or largest in quantity, is to be deemed truest and most beautiful?

  Pro. Right.

  Soc. And we shall be quite right in saying that a little pure
white is whiter and fairer and truer than a great deal that is mixed.

  Pro. Perfectly right.

  Soc. There is no need of adducing many similar examples in
illustration of the argument about pleasures; one such is sufficient
to prove to us that a small pleasure or a small amount of pleasure, if
pure or unalloyed with pain. is always pleasanter and truer and fairer
than a great pleasure or a great amount of pleasure of another kind.

  Pro. Assuredly; and the instance you have given is quite sufficient.

  Soc. But what do you say of another question:-have we not heard that
pleasure is always a generation, and has no true being? Do not certain
ingenious philosophers teach this doctrine, and ought not we to be
grateful to them?

  Pro. What do they mean?

  Soc. I will explain to you, my dear Protarchus, what they mean, by
putting a question.

  Pro. Ask, and I will answer.

  Soc. I assume that there are two natures, one self-existent, and the
other ever in want of something.

  Pro. What manner of natures are they?

  Soc. The one majestic ever, the other inferior.

  Pro. You speak riddles.

  Soc. You have seen loves good and fair, and also brave lovers of
them.

  Pro. I should think so.

  Soc. Search the universe for two terms which are like these two
and are present everywhere.

  Pro. Yet a third time I must say, Be a little plainer, Socrates.

  Soc. There is no difficulty, Protarchus; the argument is only in
play, and insinuates that some things are for the sake of something
else (relatives), and that other things are the ends to which the
former class subserve (absolutes).

  Pro. Your many repetitions make me slow to understand.

  Soc. As the argument proceeds, my boy, I dare say that the meaning
will become clearer.

  Pro. Very likely.

  Soc. Here are two new principles.

  Pro. What are they?

  Soc. One is the generation of all things, and the other is essence.

  Pro. I readily accept from you both generation and essence.

  Soc. Very right; and would you say that generation is for the sake
of essence, or essence for the sake of generation?

  Pro. You want to know whether that which is called essence is,
properly speaking, for the sake of generation?

  Soc. Yes.

  Pro. By the gods, I wish that you would repeat your question.

  Soc. I mean, O my Protarchus, to ask whether you would tell me
that ship-building is for the sake of ships, or ships for the sake
of ship-building? and in all similar cases I should ask the same
question.

  Pro. Why do you not answer yourself, Socrates?

  Soc. I have no objection, but you must take your part.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. My answer is, that all things instrumental, remedial, material,
are given to us with a view to generation, and that each generation is
relative to, or for the sake of, some being or essence, and that the
whole of generation is relative to the whole of essence.

  Pro. Assuredly.

  Soc. Then pleasure, being a generation, must surely be for the
sake of some essence?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And that for the sake of which something else is done must be
placed in the class of good, and that which is done for the sake of
something else, in some other class, my good friend.

  Pro. Most certainly.

  Soc. Then pleasure, being a generation, will be rightly placed in
some other class than that of good?

  Pro. Quite right.

  Soc. Then, as I said at first, we ought to be very grateful to him
who first pointed out that pleasure was a generation only, and had
no true being at all; for he is clearly one who laughs at the notion
of pleasure being a good.

  Pro. Assuredly.

  Soc. And he would surely laugh also at those who make generation
their highest end.

  Pro. Of whom are you speaking, and what do they mean?

  Soc. I am speaking of those who when they are cured of hunger or
thirst or any other defect by some process of generation are delighted
at the process as if it were pleasure; and they say that they would
not wish to live without these and other feelings of a like kind which
might be mentioned.

  Pro. That is certainly what they appear to think.

  Soc. And is not destruction universally admitted to be the
opposite of generation?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Then he who chooses thus, would choose generation and
destruction rather than that third sort of life, in which, as we
were saying, was neither pleasure nor pain, but only the purest
possible thought.

  Pro. He who would make us believe pleasure to be a good is
involved in great absurdities, Socrates.

  Soc. Great, indeed; and there is yet another of them.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. Is there not an absurdity in arguing that there is nothing good
or noble in the body, or in anything else, but that good is in the
soul only, and that the only good of the soul is pleasure; and that
courage or temperance or understanding, or any other good of the soul,
is not really a good?-and is there not yet a further absurdity in
our being compelled to say that he who has a feeling of pain and not
of pleasure is bad at the time when he is suffering pain, even
though he be the best of men; and again, that he who has a feeling
of pleasure, in so far as he is pleased at the time when he is
pleased, in that degree excels in virtue?

  Pro. Nothing, Socrates, can be more irrational than all this.

  Soc. And now, having subjected pleasure to every sort of test, let
us not appear to be too sparing of mind and knowledge: let us ring
their metal bravely, and see if there be unsoundness in any part,
until we have found out what in them is of the purest nature; and then
the truest elements both of pleasure and knowledge may be brought up
for judgment.

  Pro. Right.

  Soc. Knowledge has two parts-the one productive, and the other
educational?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And in the productive or handicraft arts, is not one part
more akin to knowledge, and the other less; and may not the one part
be regarded as the pure, and the other as the impure?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Let us separate the superior or dominant elements in each of
them.

  Pro. What are they, and how do you separate them?

  Soc. I mean to say, that if arithmetic, mensuration, and weighing be
taken away from any art, that which remains will not be much.

  Pro. Not much, certainly.

  Soc. The rest will be only conjecture, and the better use of the
senses which is given by experience and practice, in addition to a
certain power of guessing, which is commonly called art, and is
perfected by attention and pains.

  Pro. Nothing more, assuredly.

  Soc. Music, for instance, is full of this empiricism; for sounds are
harmonized, not by measure, but by skilful conjecture; the music of
the flute is always trying to guess the pitch of each vibrating
note, and is therefore mixed up with much that is doubtful and has
little which is certain.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. And the same will be found to hold good of medicine and
husbandry and piloting and generalship.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. The art of the builder, on the other hand, which uses a
number of measures and instruments, attains by their help to a greater
degree of accuracy than the other arts.

  Pro. How is that?

  Soc. In ship-building and house-building, and in other branches of
the art of carpentering, the builder has his rule, lathe, compass,
line, and a most ingenious machine for straightening wood.

  Pro. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. Then now let us divide the arts of which we were speaking
into two kinds-the arts which, like music, are less exact in their
results, and those which, like carpentering, are more exact.

  Pro. Let us make that division.

  Soc. Of the latter class, the most exact of all are those which we
just now spoke of as primary.

  Pro. I see that you mean arithmetic, and the kindred arts of
weighing and measuring.

  Soc. Certainly, Protarchus; but are not these also distinguishable
into two kinds?

  Pro. What are the two kinds?

  Soc. In the first place, arithmetic is of two kinds, one of which is
popular, and the other philosophical.

  Pro. How would you distinguish them?

  Soc. There is a wide difference between them, Protarchus; some
arithmeticians reckon unequal units; as for example, two armies, two
oxen, two very large things or two very small things. The party who
are opposed to them insist that every unit in ten thousand must be the
same as every other unit.

  Pro. Undoubtedly there is, as you say, a great difference among
the votaries of the science; and there may be reasonably supposed to
be two sorts of arithmetic.

  Soc. And when we compare the art of mensuration which is used in
building with philosophical geometry, or the art of computation
which is used in trading with exact calculation, shall we say of
either of the pairs that it is one or two?

  Pro. On the analogy of what has preceded, I should be of opinion
that they were severally two.

  Soc. Right; but do you understand why I have discussed the subject?

  Pro. I think so, but I should like to be told by you.

  Soc. The argument has all along been seeking a parallel to pleasure,
and true to that original design, has gone on to ask whether one
sort of knowledge is purer than another, as one pleasure is purer than
another.

  Pro. Clearly; that was the intention.

  Soc. And has not the argument in what has preceded, already shown
that the arts have different provinces, and vary in their degrees of
certainty?

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And just now did not the argument first designate a
particular art by a common term, thus making us believe in the unity
of that art; and then again, as if speaking of two different things,
proceed to enquire whether the art as pursed by philosophers, or as
pursued by non philosophers, has more of certainty and purity?

  Pro. That is the very question which the argument is asking.

  Soc. And how, Protarchus, shall we answer the enquiry?

  Pro. O Socrates, we have reached a point at which the difference
of clearness in different kinds of knowledge is enormous.

  Soc. Then the answer will be the easier.

  Pro. Certainly; and let us say in reply, that those arts into
which arithmetic and mensuration enter, far surpass all others; and
that of these the arts or sciences which are animated by the pure
philosophic impulse are infinitely superior in accuracy and truth.

  Soc. Then this is your judgment; and this is the answer which,
upon your authority, we will give to all masters of the art of
misinterpretation?

  Pro. What answer?

  Soc. That there are two arts of arithmetic, and two of
mensuration; and also several other arts which in like manner have
this double nature, and yet only one name.

  Pro. Let us boldly return this answer to the masters of whom you
speak, Socrates, and hope for good luck.

  Soc. We have explained what we term the most exact arts or sciences.

  Pro. Very good.

  Soc. And yet, Protarchus, dialectic will refuse to acknowledge us,
if we do not award to her the first place.

  Pro. And pray, what is dialectic?

  Soc. Clearly the science which has to do with all that knowledge
of which we are now speaking; for I am sure that all men who have a
grain of intelligence will admit that the knowledge which has to do
with being and reality, and sameness and unchangeableness, is by far
the truest of all. But how would you decide this question, Protarchus?

  Pro. I have often heard Gorgias maintain, Socrates, that the art
of persuasion far surpassed every other; this, as he says, is by far
the best of them all, for to it all things submit, not by
compulsion, but of their own free will. Now, I should not like to
quarrel either with you or with him.

  Soc. You mean to say that you would like to desert, if you were
not ashamed?

  Pro. As you please.

  Soc. May I not have led you into a misapprehension?

  Pro. How?

  Soc. Dear Protarchus, I never asked which was the greatest or best
or usefullest of arts or sciences, but which had clearness and
accuracy, and the greatest amount of truth, however humble and
little useful an art. And as for Gorgias, if you do not deny that
his art has the advantage in usefulness to mankind, he will not
quarrel with you for saying that the study of which I am speaking is
superior in this particular of essential truth; as in the comparison
of white colours, a little whiteness, if that little be only pure, was
said to be superior in truth to a great mass which is impure. And
now let us give our best attention and consider well, not the
comparative use or reputation of the sciences, but the power or
faculty, if there be such, which the soul has of loving the truth, and
of doing all things for the sake of it; let us search into the pure
element of mind and intelligence, and then we shall be able to say
whether the science of which I have been speaking is most likely to
possess the faculty, or whether there be some other which has higher
claims.

  Pro. Well, I have been considering, and I can hardly think that
any other science or art has a firmer grasp of the truth than this.

  Soc. Do you say so because you observe that the arts in general
and those engaged in them make use of opinion, and are resolutely
engaged in the investigation of matters of opinion? Even he who
supposes himself to be occupied with nature is really occupied with
the things of this world, how created, how acting or acted upon. Is
not this the sort of enquiry in which his life is spent?

  Pro. True.

  Soc. He is labouring, not after eternal being, but about things
which are becoming, or which will or have become.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And can we say that any of these things which neither are nor
have been nor will be unchangeable, when judged by the strict rule
of truth, ever become certain?

  Pro. Impossible.

  Soc. How can anything fixed be concerned with that which has no
fixedness?

  Pro. How indeed?

  Soc. Then mind and science when employed about such changing
things do not attain the highest truth?

  Pro. I should imagine not.

  Soc. And now let us bid farewell, a long farewell, to you or me or
Philebus or Gorgias, and urge on behalf of the argument a single
point.

  Pro. What point?

  Soc. Let us say that the stable and pure and true and unalloyed
has to do with the things which are eternal and unchangeable and
unmixed, or if not, at any rate what is most akin to them has; and
that all other things are to be placed in a second or inferior class.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. And of the names expressing cognition, ought not the fairest to
be given to the fairest things?

  Pro. That is natural.

  Soc. And are not mind and wisdom the names which are to be
honoured most?

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And these names may be said to have their truest, and most
exact application when the mind is engaged in the contemplation of
true being?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And these were the names which I adduced of the rivals of
pleasure?

  Pro. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. In the next place, as to the mixture, here are the ingredients,
pleasure and wisdom, and we may be compared to artists who have
their materials ready to their hands.

  Pro. Yes.

  Soc. And now we must begin to mix them?

  Pro. By all means.

  Soc. But had we not better have a preliminary word and refresh our
memories?

  Pro. Of what?

  Soc. Of that which I have already mentioned. Well says the
proverb, that we ought to repeat twice and even thrice that which is
good.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Well then, by Zeus, let us proceed, and I will make what I
believe to be a fair summary of the argument.

  Pro. Let me hear.

  Soc. Philebus says that pleasure is the true end of all living
beings, at which all ought to aim, and moreover that it is the chief
good of all, and that the two names "good" and "pleasant" are
correctly given to one thing and one nature; Socrates, on the other
hand, begins by denying this, and further says, that in nature as in
name they are two, and that wisdom partakes more than pleasure of
the good. Is not and was not this what we were saying, Protarchus?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And is there not and was there not a further point which was
conceded between us?

  Pro. What was it?

  Soc. That the good differs from all other things.

  Pro. In what respect?

  Soc. In that the being who possesses good always everywhere and in
all things has the most perfect sufficiency, and is never in need of
anything else.

  Pro. Exactly.

  Soc. And did we not endeavour to make an imaginary separation of
wisdom and pleasure, assigning to each a distinct life, so that
pleasure was wholly excluded from wisdom, and wisdom in like manner
had no part whatever in pleasure?

  Pro. We did.

  Soc. And did we think that either of them alone would be sufficient?

  Pro. Certainly not.

  Soc. And if we erred in any point, then let any one who will, take
up the enquiry again and set us right; and assuming memory and
wisdom and knowledge and true opinion to belong to the same class, let
him consider whether he would desire to possess or acquire-I will
not say pleasure, however abundant or intense, if he has no real
perception that he is pleased, nor any consciousness of what he feels,
nor any recollection, however momentary, of the feeling,-but would
he desire to have anything at all, if these faculties were wanting
to him? And about wisdom I ask the same question; can you conceive
that any one would choose to have all wisdom absolutely devoid of
pleasure, rather than with a certain degree of pleasure, or all
pleasure devoid of wisdom, rather than with a certain degree of
wisdom?

  Pro. Certainly not, Socrates; but why repeat such questions any
more?

  Soc. Then the perfect and universally eligible and entirely good
cannot possibly be either of them?

  Pro. Impossible.

  Soc. Then now we must ascertain the nature of the good more or
less accurately, in order, as we were saying, that the second place
may be duly assigned.

  Pro. Right.

  Soc. Have we not found a road which leads towards the good?

  Pro. What road?

  Soc. Supposing that a man had to be found, and you could discover in
what house he lived, would not that be a great step towards the
discovery of the man himself?

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And now reason intimates to us, as at our first beginning, that
we should seek the good, not in the unmixed life but in the mixed.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. There is greater hope of finding that which we are seeking in
the life which is well mixed than in that which is not?

  Pro. Far greater.

  Soc. Then now let us mingle, Protarchus, at the same time offering
up a prayer to Dionysus or Hephaestus, or whoever is the god who
presides over the ceremony of mingling.

  Pro. By all means.

  Soc. Are not we the cup-bearers? and here are two fountains which
are flowing at our side: one, which is pleasure, may be likened to a
fountain of honey; the other, wisdom, a sober draught in which no wine
mingles, is of water unpleasant but healthful; out of these we must
seek to make the fairest of all possible mixtures.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Tell me first;-should we be most likely to succeed if we
mingled every sort of pleasure with every sort of wisdom?

  Pro. Perhaps we might.

  Soc. But I should be afraid of the risk, and I think that I can show
a safer plan.

  Pro. What is it?

  Soc. One pleasure was supposed by us to be truer than another, and
one art to be more exact than another.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. There was also supposed to be a difference in sciences; some of
them regarding only the transient and perishing, and others the
permanent and imperishable and everlasting and immutable; and when
judged by the standard of truth, the latter, as we thought, were truer
than the former.

  Pro. Very good and right.

  Soc. If, then, we were to begin by mingling the sections of each
class which have the most of truth, will not the union suffice to give
us the loveliest of lives, or shall we still want some elements of
another kind?

  Pro. I think that we ought to do what you suggest.

  Soc. Let us suppose a man who understands justice, and has reason as
well as understanding about the true nature of this and of all other
things.

  Pro. We will suppose such a man.

  Soc. Will he have enough of knowledge if he is acquainted only
with the divine circle and sphere, and knows nothing of our human
spheres and circles, but uses only divine circles and measures in
the building of a house?

  Pro. The knowledge which is only superhuman, Socrates, is ridiculous
in man.

  Soc. What do you mean? Do you mean that you are to throw into the
cup and mingle the impure and uncertain art which uses the false
measure and the false circle?

  Pro. Yes, we must, if any of us is ever to find his way home.

  Soc. And am I to include music, which, as, I was saying just now, is
full of guesswork and imitation, and is wanting in purity?

  Pro. Yes, I think that you must, if human life is to be a life at
all.

  Soc. Well, then, suppose that I give way, and, like a doorkeeper who
is pushed and overborne by the mob, I open the door wide, and let
knowledge of every sort stream in, and the pure mingle with the
impure?

  Pro. I do not know, Socrates, that any great harm would come of
having them all, if only you have the first sort.

  Soc. Well, then, shall I let them all flow into what Homer
poetically terms "a meeting of the waters"?

  Pro. By all means.

  Soc. There-I have let him in, and now I must return to the
fountain of pleasure. For we were not permitted to begin by mingling
in a single stream the true portions of both according to our original
intention; but the love of all knowledge constrained us to let all the
sciences flow in together before the pleasures.

  Pro. Quite true.

  Soc. And now the time has come for us to consider about the
pleasures also, whether we shall in like manner let them go all at
once, or at first only the true ones.

  Pro. It will be by far the safer course to let flow the true ones
first.

  Soc. Let them flow, then; and now, if there are any necessary
pleasures, as there were arts and sciences necessary, must we not
mingle them?

  Pro. Yes, the necessary pleasures should certainly be allowed to
mingle.

  Soc. The knowledge of the arts has been admitted to be innocent
and useful always; and if we say of pleasures in like manner that
all of them are good and innocent for all of us at all times, we
must let them all mingle?

  Pro. What shall we say about them, and what course shall we take?

  Soc. Do not ask me, Protarchus; but ask the daughters of pleasure
and wisdom to answer for themselves.

  Pro. How?

  Soc. Tell us, O beloved-shall we call you pleasures or by some other
name?-would you rather live with or without wisdom? I am of opinion
that they would certainly answer as follows:

  Pro. How?

  Soc. They would answer, as we said before, that for any single class
to be left by itself pure and isolated is not good, nor altogether
possible; and that if we are to make comparisons of one class with
another and choose, there is no better companion than knowledge of
things in general, and likewise the perfect knowledge, if that may be,
of ourselves in every respect.

  Pro. And our answer will be:-In that ye have spoken well.

  Soc. Very true. And now let us go back and interrogate wisdom and
mind: Would you like to have any pleasures in the mixture? And they
will reply:-"What pleasures do you mean?"

  Pro. Likely enough.

  Soc. And we shall take up our parable and say: Do you wish to have
the greatest and most vehement pleasures for your companions in
addition to the true ones? "Why, Socrates," they will say, "how can
we? seeing that they are the source of ten thousand hindrances to
us; they trouble the souls of men, which are our habitation, with
their madness; they prevent us from coming to the birth, and are
commonly the ruin of the children which are born to us, causing them
to be forgotten and unheeded; but the true and pure pleasures, of
which you spoke, know to be of our family, and also those pleasures
which accompany health and temperance, and which every Virtue, like
a goddess has in her train to follow her about wherever she
goes,-mingle these and not the others; there would be great want of
sense in any one who desires to see a fair and perfect mixture, and to
find in it what is the highest good in man and in the universe, and to
divine what is the true form of good-there would be great want of
sense in his allowing the pleasures, which are always in the company
of folly and vice, to mingle with mind in the cup."-Is not this a very
rational and suitable reply, which mind has made, both on her own
behalf, as well as on the behalf of memory and true opinion?

  Pro. Most certainly.

  Soc. And still there must be something more added, which is a
necessary ingredient in every mixture.

  Pro. What is that?

  Soc. Unless truth enter into the composition, nothing can truly be
created or subsist.

  Pro. Impossible.

  Soc. Quite impossible; and now you and Philebus must tell me whether
anything is still wanting in the mixture, for to my way of thinking
the argument is now completed, and may be compared to an incorporeal
law, which is going to hold fair rule over a living body.

  Pro. I agree with you, Socrates.

  Soc. And may we not say with reason that we are now at the vestibule
of the habitation of the good?

  Pro. I think that we are.

  Soc. What, then, is there in the mixture which is most precious, and
which is the principal cause why such a state is universally beloved
by all? When we have discovered it, we will proceed to ask whether
this omnipresent nature is more akin to pleasure or to mind.

  Pro. Quite right; in that way we shall be better able to judge.

  Soc. And there is no difficulty in seeing the cause which renders
any mixture either of the highest value or of none at all.

  Pro. What do you mean?

  Soc. Every man knows it.

  Pro. What?

  Soc. He knows that any want of measure and symmetry in any mixture
whatever must always of necessity be fatal, both to the elements and
to the mixture, which is then not a mixture, but only a confused
medley which brings confusion on the possessor of it.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. And now the power of the good has retired into the region of
the beautiful; for measure and symmetry are beauty and virtue all
the world over.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Also we said that truth was to form an element in the mixture.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. Then, if we are not able to hunt the good with one idea only,
with three we may catch our prey; Beauty, Symmetry, Truth are the
three, and these taken together we may regard as the single cause of
the mixture, and the mixture as being good by reason of the infusion
of them.

  Pro. Quite right.

  Soc. And now, Protarchus, any man could decide well enough whether
pleasure or wisdom is more akin to the highest good, and more
honourable among gods and men.

  Pro. Clearly, and yet perhaps the argument had better be pursued
to the end.

  Soc. We must take each of them separately in their relation to
pleasure and mind, and pronounce upon them; for we ought to see to
which of the two they are severally most akin.

  Pro. You are speaking of beauty, truth, and measure?

  Soc. Yes, Protarchus, take truth first, and, after passing in review
mind, truth, pleasure, pause awhile and make answer to yourself-as
to whether pleasure or mind is more akin to truth.

  Pro. There is no need to pause, for the difference between them is
palpable; pleasure is the veriest impostor in the world; and it is
said that in the pleasures of love, which appear to be the greatest,
perjury is excused by the gods; for pleasures, like children, have not
the least particle of reason in them; whereas mind is either the
same as truth, or the most like truth, and the truest.

  Soc. Shall we next consider measure, in like manner, and ask whether
pleasure has more of this than wisdom, or wisdom than pleasure?

  Pro. Here is another question which may be easily answered; for I
imagine that nothing can ever be more immoderate than the transports
of pleasure, or more in conformity with measure than mind and
knowledge.

  Soc. Very good; but there still remains the third test: Has mind a
greater share of beauty than pleasure, and is mind or pleasure the
fairer of the two?

  Pro. No one, Socrates, either awake or dreaming, ever saw or
imagined mind or wisdom to be in aught unseemly, at any time, past,
present, or future.

  Soc. Right.

  Pro. But when we see some one indulging in pleasures, perhaps in the
greatest of pleasures, the ridiculous or disgraceful nature of the
action makes us ashamed; and so we put them out of sight, and
consign them to darkness, under the idea that they ought not to meet
the eye of day.

  Soc. Then, Protarchus, you will proclaim everywhere, by word of
mouth to this company, and by messengers bearing the tidings far and
wide, that pleasure is not the first of possessions, nor yet the
second, but that in measure, and the mean, and the suitable, and the
like, the eternal nature has been found.

  Pro. Yes, that seems to be the result of what has been now said.

  Soc. In the second class is contained the symmetrical and
beautiful and perfect or sufficient, and all which are of that family.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. And if you reckon in the third dass mind and wisdom, you will
not be far wrong, if I divine aright.

  Pro. I dare say.

  Soc. And would you not put in the fourth class the goods which we
were affirming to appertain specially to the soul-sciences and arts
and true opinions as we called them? These come after the third class,
and form the fourth, as they are certainly more akin to good than
pleasure is.

  Pro. Surely.

  Soc. The fifth class are the pleasures which were defined by us as
painless, being the pure pleasures of the soul herself, as we termed
them, which accompany, some the sciences, and some the senses.

  Pro. Perhaps.

  Soc. And now, as Orpheus says,

      With the sixth generation cease the glory of my song.

Here, at the sixth award, let us make an end; all that remains is to
set the crown on our discourse.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. Then let us sum up and reassert what has been said, thus
offering the third libation to the saviour Zeus.

  Pro. How?

  Soc. Philebus affirmed that pleasure was always and absolutely the
good.

  Pro. I understand; this third libation, Socrates, of which you
spoke, meant a recapitulation.

  Soc. Yes, but listen to the sequel; convinced of what I have just
been saying, and feeling indignant at the doctrine, which is
maintained, not by Philebus only, but by thousands of others, I
affirmed that mind was far better and far more excellent, as an
element of human life, than pleasure.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. But, suspecting that there were other things which were also
better, I went on to say that if there was anything better than
either, then I would claim the second place for mind over pleasure,
and pleasure would lose the second place as well as the first.

  Pro. You did.

  Soc. Nothing could be more satisfactorily shown than the
unsatisfactory nature of both of them.

  Pro. Very true.

  Soc. The claims both of pleasure and mind to be the absolute good
have been entirely disproven in this argument, because they are both
wanting in self-sufficiency and also in adequacy and perfection.

  Pro. Most true.

  Soc. But, though they must both resign in favour of another, mind is
ten thousand times nearer and more akin to the nature of the conqueror
than pleasure.

  Pro. Certainly.

  Soc. And, according to the judgment which has now been given,
pleasure will rank fifth.

  Pro. True.

  Soc. But not first; no, not even if all the oxen and horses and
animals in the world by their pursuit of enjoyment proclaim her to
be so;-although the many trusting in them, as diviners trust in birds,
determine that pleasures make up the good of life, and deem the
lusts of animals to be better witnesses than the inspirations of
divine philosophy.

  Pro. And now, Socrates, we tell you that the truth of what you
have been saying is approved by the judgment of all of us.

  Soc. And will you let me go?

  Pro. There is a little which yet remains, and I will remind you of
it, for I am sure that you will not be the first to go away from an
argument.

                          -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES, who is the narrator of the
Dialogue to his Companion; HIPPOCRATES; ALCIBIADES; CRINAS;
PROTAGORAS, HIPPIAS, PRODICUS, Sophists; CALLIAS, a wealthy
Athenian. Scene: The House of Callias

  Com. Where do you come from, Socrates? And yet I need hardly ask the
question, for I know that you have been in chase of the fair
Alcibiades. I saw the day before yesterday; and he had got a beard
like a man-and he is a man, as I may tell you in your ear. But I
thought that he was still very charming.

  Soc. What of his beard? Are you not of Homer's opinion, who says

     Youth is most charming when the beard first appears?

And that is now the charm of Alcibiades.

  Com. Well, and how do matters proceed? Have you been visiting him,
and was he gracious to you?

  Soc. Yes, I thought that he was very gracious; and especially
to-day, for I have just come from him, and he has been helping me in
an argument. But shall I tell you a strange thing? I paid no attention
to him, and several times I quite forgot that he was present.

  Com. What is the meaning of this? Has anything happened between
you and him? For surely you cannot have discovered a fairer love
than he is; certainly not in this city of Athens.

  Soc. Yes, much fairer.

  Com. What do you mean-a citizen or a foreigner?

  Soc. A foreigner.

  Com. Of what country?

  Soc. Of Abdera.

  Com. And is this stranger really in your opinion a fairer love
than the son of Cleinias?

  Soc. And is not the wiser always the fairer, sweet friend?

  Com. But have you really met, Socrates, with some wise one?

  Soc. Say rather, with the wisest of all living men, if you are
willing to accord that title to Protagoras.

  Com. What! Is Protagoras in Athens?

  Soc. Yes; he has been here two days.

  Com. And do you just come from an interview with him?

  Soc. Yes; and I have heard and said many things.

  Com. Then, if you have no engagement, suppose that you sit down tell
me what passed, and my attendant here shall give up his place to you.

  Soc. To be sure; and I shall be grateful to you for listening.

  Com. Thank you, too, for telling us.

  Soc. That is thank you twice over. Listen then:-

  Last night, or rather very early this morning, Hippocrates, the
son of Apollodorus and the brother of Phason, gave a tremendous
thump with his staff at my door; some one opened to him, and he came
rushing in and bawled out: Socrates, are you awake or asleep?

  I knew his voice, and said: Hippocrates, is that you? and do you
bring any news?

  Good news, he said; nothing but good.

  Delightful, I said; but what is the news? and why have you come
hither at this unearthly hour?

  He drew nearer to me and said: Protagoras is come.

  Yes, I replied; he came two days ago: have you only just heard of
his arrival?

  Yes, by the gods, he said; but not until yesterday evening.

  At the same time he felt for the truckle-bed, and sat down at my
feet, and then he said: Yesterday quite late in the evening, on my
return from Oenoe whither I had gone in pursuit of my runaway slave
Satyrus, as I meant to have told you, if some other matter had not
come in the way;-on my return, when we had done supper and were
about to retire to rest, my brother said to me: Protagoras is come.
I was going to you at once, and then I thought that the night was
far spent. But the moment sleep left me after my fatigue, I got up and
came hither direct.

  I, who knew the very courageous madness of the man, said: What is
the matter? Has Protagoras robbed you of anything?

  He replied, laughing: Yes, indeed he has, Socrates, of the wisdom
which he keeps from me.

  But, surely, I said, if you give him money, and make friends with
him, he will make you as wise as he is himself.

  Would to heaven, he replied, that this were the case! He might
take all that I have, and all that my friends have, if he pleased. But
that is why I have come to you now, in order that you may speak to him
on my behalf; for I am young, and also I have never seen nor heard
him; (when he visited Athens before I was but a child) and all men
praise him, Socrates; he is reputed to be the most accomplished of
speakers. There is no reason why we should not go to him at once,
and then we shall find him at home. He lodges, as I hear, with Callias
the son of Hipponicus: let us start.

  I replied: Not yet, my good friend; the hour is too early. But let
us rise and take a turn in the court and wait about there until
daybreak; when the day breaks, then we will go. For Protagoras is
generally at home, and we shall be sure to find him; never fear.

  Upon this we got up and walked about in the court, and I thought
that I would make trial of the strength of his resolution. So I
examined him and put questions to him. Tell me, Hippocrates, I said,
as you are going to Protagoras, and will be paying your money to
him, what is he to whom you are going? and what will he make of you?
If, for example, you had thought of going to Hippocrates of Cos, the
Asclepiad, and were about to give him your money, and some one had
said to you: You are paying money to your namesake Hippocrates, O
Hippocrates; tell me, what is he that you give him money? how would
you have answered?

  I should say, he replied, that I gave money to him as a physician.

  And what will he make of you?

  A physician, he said.

  And if you were resolved to go to Polycleitus the Argive, or
Pheidias the Athenian, and were intending to give them money, and some
one had asked you: What are Polycleitus and Pheidias? and why do you
give them this money?-how would you have answered?

  I should have answered, that they were statuaries.

  And what will they make of you?

  A statuary, of course.

  Well now, I said, you and I are going to Protagoras, and we are
ready to pay him money on your behalf. If our own means are
sufficient, and we can gain him with these, we shall be only too glad;
but if not, then we are to spend the money of your friends as well.
Now suppose, that while we are thus enthusiastically pursuing our
object some one were to say to us: Tell me, Socrates, and you
Hippocrates, what is Protagoras, and why are you going to pay him
money,-how should we answer? I know that Pheidias is a sculptor, and
that Homer is a poet; but what appellation is given to Protagoras? how
is he designated?

  They call him a Sophist, Socrates, he replied.

  Then we are going to pay our money to him in the character of a
Sophist?

  Certainly.

  But suppose a person were to ask this further question: And how
about yourself? What will Protagoras make of you, if you go to see
him?

  He answered, with a blush upon his face (for the day was just
beginning to dawn, so that I could see him): Unless this differs in
some way from the former instances, I suppose that he will make a
Sophist of me.

  By the gods, I said, and are you not ashamed at having to appear
before the Hellenes in the character of a Sophist?

  Indeed, Socrates, to confess the truth, I am.

  But you should not assume, Hippocrates, that the instruction of
Protagoras is of this nature: may you not learn of him in the same way
that you learned the arts of the grammarian, musician, or trainer, not
with the view of making any of them a profession, but only as a part
of education, and because a private gentleman and freeman ought to
know them?

  Just so, he said; and that, in my opinion, is a far truer account of
the teaching of Protagoras.

  I said: I wonder whether you know what you are doing?

  And what am I doing?

  You are going to commit your soul to the care of a man whom you call
a Sophist. And yet I hardly think that you know what a Sophist is; and
if not, then you do not even know to whom you are committing your soul
and whether the thing to which you commit yourself be good or evil.

  I certainly think that I do know, he replied.

  Then tell me, what do you imagine that he is?

  I take him to be one who knows wise things, he replied, as his
name implies.

  And might you not, I said, affirm this of the painter and of the
carpenter also: Do not they, too, know wise things? But suppose a
person were to ask us: In what are the painters wise? We should
answer: In what relates to the making of likenesses, and similarly
of other things. And if he were further to ask: What is the wisdom
of the Sophist, and what is the manufacture over which he
presides?-how should we answer him?

  How should we answer him, Socrates? What other answer could there be
but that he presides over the art which makes men eloquent?

  Yes, I replied, that is very likely true, but not enough; for in the
answer a further question is involved: Of what does the Sophist make a
man talk eloquently? The player on the lyre may be supposed to make
a man talk eloquently about that which he makes him understand, that
is about playing the lyre. Is not that true?

  Yes.

  Then about what does the Sophist make him eloquent? Must not he make
him eloquent in that which he understands?

  Yes, that may be assumed.

  And what is that which the Sophist knows and makes his disciple
know?

  Indeed, he said, I cannot tell.

  Then I proceeded to say: Well, but are you aware of the danger which
you are incurring? If you were going to commit your body to some
one, who might do good or harm to it, would you not carefully consider
and ask the opinion of your friends and kindred, and deliberate many
days as to whether you should give him the care of your body? But when
the soul is in question, which you hold to be of far more value than
the body, and upon the good or evil of which depends the well-being of
your all,-about this never consulted either with your father or with
your brother or with any one of us who are your companions. But no
sooner does this foreigner appear, than you instantly commit your soul
to his keeping. In the evening, as you say, you hear of him, and in
the morning you go to him, never deliberating or taking the opinion of
any one as to whether you ought to intrust yourself to him or not;-you
have quite made up your mind that you will at all hazards be a pupil
of Protagoras, and are prepared to expend all the property of yourself
and of your friends in carrying out at any price this determination,
although, as you admit, you do not know him, and have never spoken
with him: and you call him a Sophist, but are manifestly ignorant of
what a Sophist is; and yet you are going to commit yourself to his
keeping.

  When he heard me say this, he replied: No other inference, Socrates,
can be drawn from your words.

  I proceeded: Is not a Sophist, Hippocrates, one who deals
wholesale or retail in the food of the soul? To me that appears to
be his nature.

  And what, Socrates, is the food of the soul?

  Surely, I said, knowledge is the food of the soul; and we must
take care, my friend, that the Sophist does not deceive us when he
praises what he sells, like the dealers wholesale or retail who sell
the food of the body; for they praise indiscriminately all their
goods, without knowing what are really beneficial or hurtful:
neither do their customers know, with the exception of any trainer
or physician who may happen to buy of them. In like manner those who
carry about the wares of knowledge, and make the round of the
cities, and sell or retail them to any customer who is in want of
them, praise them all alike; though I should not wonder, O my
friend, if many of them were really ignorant of their effect upon
the soul; and their customers equally ignorant, unless he who buys
of them happens to be a physician of the soul. If, therefore, you have
understanding of what is good and evil, you may safely buy knowledge
of Protagoras or of any one; but if not, then, O my friend, pause, and
do not hazard your dearest interests at a game of chance. For there is
far greater peril in buying knowledge than in buying meat and drink:
the one you purchase of the wholesale or retail dealer, and carry them
away in other vessels, and before you receive them into the body as
food, you may deposit them at home and call in any experienced
friend who knows what is good to be eaten or drunken, and what not,
and how much, and when; and then the danger of purchasing them is
not so great. But you cannot buy the wares of knowledge and carry them
away in another vessel; when you have paid for them you must receive
them into the soul and go your way, either greatly harmed or greatly
benefited; and therefore we should deliberate and take counsel with
our elders; for we are still young-too young to determine such a
matter. And now let us go, as we were intending, and hear
Protagoras; and when we have heard what he has to say, we may take
counsel of others; for not only is Protagoras at the house of Callias,
but there is Hippias of Elis, and, if I am not mistaken, Prodicus of
Ceos, and several other wise men.

  To this we agreed, and proceeded on our way until we reached the
vestibule of the house; and there we stopped in order to conclude a
discussion which had arisen between us as we were going along; and
we stood talking in the vestibule until we had finished and come to an
understanding. And I think that the doorkeeper, who was a eunuch,
and who was probably annoyed at the great inroad of the Sophists, must
have heard us talking. At any rate, when we knocked at the door, and
he opened and saw us, he grumbled: They are Sophists -he is not at
home; and instantly gave the door a hearty bang with both his hands.
Again we knocked, and he answered without opening: Did you not hear me
say that he is not at home, fellows? But, my friend, I said, you
need not be alarmed; for we are not Sophists, and we are not come to
see Callias, but we want to see Protagoras; and I must request you
to announce us. At last, after a good deal of difficulty, the man
was persuaded to open the door.

  When we entered, we found Protagoras taking a walk in the
cloister; and next to him, on one side, were walking Callias, the
son of Hipponicus, and Paralus, the son of Pericles, who, by the
mother's side, is his half-brother, and Charmides, the son of Glaucon.
On the other side of him were Xanthippus, the other son of Pericles,
Philippides, the son of Philomelus; also Antimoerus of Mende, who of
all the disciples of Protagoras is the most famous, and intends to
make sophistry his profession. A train of listeners followed him;
the greater part of them appeared to be foreigners, whom Protagoras
had brought with him out of the various cities visited by him in his
journeys, he, like Orpheus, attracting them his voice, and they
following. I should mention also that there were some Athenians in the
company. Nothing delighted me more than the precision of their
movements: they never got into his way at all; but when he and those
who were with him turned back, then the band of listeners parted
regularly on either side; he was always in front, and they wheeled
round and took their places behind him in perfect order.

  After him, as Homer says, "I lifted up my eyes and saw" Hippias
the Elean sitting in the opposite cloister on a chair of state, and
around him were seated on benches Eryximachus, the son of Acumenus,
and Phaedrus the Myrrhinusian, and Andron the son of Androtion, and
there were strangers whom he had brought with him from his native city
of Elis, and some others: they were putting to Hippias certain
physical and astronomical questions, and he, ex cathedra, was
determining their several questions to them, and discoursing of them.

  Also, "my eyes beheld Tantalus"; for Prodicus the Cean was at
Athens: he had been lodged in a room which, in the days of Hipponicus,
was a storehouse; but, as the house was full, Callias had cleared this
out and made the room into a guest-chamber. Now Prodicus was still
in bed, wrapped up in sheepskins and bed-clothes, of which there
seemed to be a great heap; and there was sitting by him on the couches
near, Pausanias of the deme of Cerameis, and with Pausanias was a
youth quite young, who is certainly remarkable for his good looks,
and, if I am not mistaken, is also of a fair and gentle nature. I
thought that I heard him called Agathon, and my suspicion is that he
is the beloved of Pausanias. There was this youth, and also there were
the two Adeimantuses, one the son of Cepis, and the other of
Leucolophides, and some others. I was very anxious to hear what
Prodicus was saying, for he seems to me to be an all-wise and inspired
man; but I was not able to get into the inner circle, and his fine
deep voice made an echo in the room which rendered his words
inaudible.

  No sooner had we entered than there followed us Alcibiades the
beautiful, as you say, and I believe you; and also Critias the son
of Callaeschrus.

  On entering we stopped a little, in order to look about us, and then
walked up to Protagoras, and I said: Protagoras, my friend Hippocrates
and I have come to see you.

  Do you wish, he said, to speak with me alone, or in the presence
of the company?

  Whichever you please, I said; you shall determine when you have
heard the purpose of our visit.

  And what is your purpose? he said.

  I must explain, I said, that my friend Hippocrates is a native
Athenian; he is the son of Apollodorus, and of a great and
prosperous house, and he is himself in natural ability quite a match
for anybody of his own age. I believe that he aspires to political
eminence; and this he thinks that conversation with you is most likely
to procure for him. And now you can determine whether you would wish
to speak to him of your teaching alone or in the presence of the
company.

  Thank you, Socrates, for your consideration of me. For certainly a
stranger finding his way into great cities, and persuading the
flower of the youth in them to leave company of their kinsmen or any
other acquaintances, old or young, and live with him, under the idea
that they will be improved by his conversation, ought to be very
cautious; great jealousies are aroused by his proceedings, and he is
the subject of many enmities and conspiracies. Now the art of the
Sophist is, as I believe, of great antiquity; but in ancient times
those who practised it, fearing this odium, veiled and disguised
themselves under various names, some under that of poets, as Homer,
Hesiod, and Simonides, some, of hierophants and prophets, as Orpheus
and Musaeus, and some, as I observe, even under the name of
gymnastic-masters, like Iccus of Tarentum, or the more recently
celebrated Herodicus, now of Selymbria and formerly of Megara, who
is a first-rate Sophist. Your own Agathocles pretended to be a
musician, but was really an eminent Sophist; also Pythocleides the
Cean; and there were many others; and all of them, as I was saying,
adopted these arts as veils or disguises because they were afraid of
the odium which they would incur. But that is not my way, for I do not
believe that they effected their purpose, which was to deceive the
government, who were not blinded by them; and as to the people, they
have no understanding, and only repeat what their rulers are pleased
to tell them. Now to run away, and to be caught in running away, is
the very height of folly, and also greatly increases the
exasperation of mankind; for they regard him who runs away as a rogue,
in addition to any other objections which they have to him; and
therefore I take an entirely opposite course, and acknowledge myself
to be a Sophist and instructor of mankind; such an open
acknowledgement appears to me to be a better sort of caution than
concealment. Nor do I neglect other precautions, and therefore I hope,
as I may say, by the favour of heaven that no harm will come of the
acknowledgment that I am a Sophist. And I have been now many years
in the profession-for all my years when added up are many: there is no
one here present of whom I might not be the father. Wherefore I should
much prefer conversing with you, if you want to speak with me, in
the presence of the company.

  As I suspected that he would like to have a little display and
glorification in the presence of Prodicus and Hippias, and would
gladly show us to them in the light of his admirers, I said: But why
should we not summon Prodicus and Hippias and their friends to hear
us?

  Very good, he said.

  Suppose, said Callias, that we hold a council in which you may sit
and discuss.-This was agreed upon, and great delight was felt at the
prospect of hearing wise men talk; we ourselves took the chairs and
benches, and arranged them by Hippias, where the other benches had
been already placed. Meanwhile Callias and Alcibiades got Prodicus out
of bed and brought in him and his companions.

  When we were all seated, Protagoras said: Now that the company are
assembled, Socrates, tell me about the youngman of whom you were
just now speaking.

  I replied: I will begin again at the same point, Protagoras, and
tell you once more the purport of my visit: this is my friend
Hippocrates, who is desirous of making your acquaintance; he would
like to know what will happen to him if he associates with you. I have
no more to say.

  Protagoras answered: Young man, if you associate with me, on the
very first day you will return home a better man than you came, and
better on the second day than on the first, and better every day
than you were on the day before.

  When I heard this, I said: Protagoras, I do not at all wonder at
hearing you say this; even at your age, and with all your wisdom, if
any one were to teach you what you did not know before, you would
become better no doubt: but please to answer in a different way-I will
explain how by an example. Let me suppose that Hippocrates, instead of
desiring your acquaintance, wished to become acquainted with the young
man Zeuxippus of Heraclea, who has lately been in Athens, and he had
come to him as he has come to you, and had heard him say, as he has
heard you say, that every day he would grow and become better if he
associated with him: and then suppose that he were to ask him, "In
what shall I become better, and in what shall I grow?"-Zeuxippus would
answer, "In painting." And suppose that he went to Orthagoras the
Theban, and heard him say the same thing, and asked him, "In what
shall I become better day by day?" he would reply, "In flute-playing."
Now I want you to make the same sort of answer to this young man and
to me, who am asking questions on his account. When you say that on
the first day on which he associates with you he will return home a
better man, and on every day will grow in like manner,-In what,
Protagoras, will he be better? and about what?

  When Protagoras heard me say this, he replied: You ask questions
fairly, and I like to answer a question which is fairly put. If
Hippocrates comes to me he will not experience the sort of drudgery
with which other Sophists are in the habit of insulting their
pupils; who, when they have just escaped from the arts, are taken
and driven back into them by these teachers, and made to learn
calculation, and astronomy, and geometry, and music (he gave a look at
Hippias as he said this); but if he comes to me, he will learn that
which he comes to learn. And this is prudence in affairs private as
well as public; he will learn to order his own house in the best
manner, and he will be able to speak and act for the best in the
affairs of the state.

  Do I understand you, I said; and is your meaning that you teach
the art of politics, and that you promise to make men good citizens?

  That, Socrates, is exactly the profession which I make.

  Then, I said, you do indeed possess a noble art, if there is no
mistake about this; for I will freely confess to you, Protagoras, that
I have a doubt whether this art is capable of being taught, and yet
I know not how to disbelieve your assertion. And I ought to tell you
why I am of opinion that this art cannot be taught or communicated
by man to man. I say that the Athenians are an understanding people,
and indeed they are esteemed to be such by the other Hellenes. Now I
observe that when we are met together in the assembly, and the
matter in hand relates to building, the builders are summoned as
advisers; when the question is one of shipbuilding, then the
ship-wrights; and the like of other arts which they think capable of
being taught and learned. And if some person offers to give them
advice who is not supposed by them to have any skill in the art,
even though he be good-looking, and rich, and noble, they will not
listen to him, but laugh and hoot at him, until either he is clamoured
down and retires of himself; or if he persist, he is dragged away or
put out by the constables at the command of the prytanes. This is
their way of behaving about professors of the arts. But when the
question is an affair of state, then everybody is free to have a
say-carpenter, tinker, cobbler, sailor, passenger; rich and poor, high
and low-any one who likes gets up, and no one reproaches him, as in
the former case, with not having learned, and having no teacher, and
yet giving advice; evidently because they are under the impression
that this sort of knowledge cannot be taught. And not only is this
true of the state, but of individuals; the best and wisest of our
citizens are unable to impart their political wisdom to others: as for
example, Pericles, the father of these young men, who gave them
excellent instruction in all that could be learned from masters, in
his own department of politics neither taught them, nor gave them
teachers; but they were allowed to wander at their own free will in
a sort of hope that they would light upon virtue of their own
accord. Or take another example: there was Cleinias the younger
brother of our friend Alcibiades, of whom this very same Pericles
was the guardian; and he being in fact under the apprehension that
Cleinias would be corrupted by Alcibiades, took him away, and placed
him in the house of Ariphron to be educated; but before six months had
elapsed, Ariphron sent him back, not knowing what to do with him.
And I could mention numberless other instances of persons who were
good themselves, and never yet made any one else good, whether
friend or stranger. Now I, Protagoras, having these examples before
me, am inclined to think that virtue cannot be taught. But then again,
when I listen to your words, I waver; and am disposed to think that
there must be something in what you say, because I know that you
have great experience, and learning, and invention. And I wish that
you would, if possible, show me a little more clearly that virtue
can be taught. Will you be so good?

  That I will, Socrates, and gladly. But what would you like? Shall I,
as an elder, speak to you as younger men in an apologue or myth, or
shall I argue out the question?

  To this several of the company answered that he should choose for
himself.

  Well, then, he said, I think that the myth will be more interesting.

  Once upon a time there were gods only, and no mortal creatures.
But when the time came that these also should be created, the gods
fashioned them out of earth and fire and various mixtures of both
elements in the interior of the earth; and when they were about to
bring them into the light of day, they ordered Prometheus and
Epimetheus to equip them, and to distribute to them severally their
proper qualities. Epimetheus said to Prometheus: "Let me distribute,
and do you inspect." This was agreed, and Epimetheus made the
distribution. There were some to whom he gave strength without
swiftness, while he equipped the weaker with swiftness; some he armed,
and others he left unarmed; and devised for the latter some other
means of preservation, making some large, and having their size as a
protection, and others small, whose nature was to fly in the air or
burrow in the ground; this was to be their way of escape. Thus did
he compensate them with the view of preventing any race from
becoming extinct. And when he had provided against their destruction
by one another, he contrived also a means of protecting them against
the seasons of heaven; clothing them with close hair and thick skins
sufficient to defend them against the winter cold and able to resist
the summer heat, so that they might have a natural bed of their own
when they wanted to rest; also he furnished them with hoofs and hair
and hard and callous skins under their feet. Then he gave them
varieties of food-herb of the soil to some, to others fruits of trees,
and to others roots, and to some again he gave other animals as
food. And some he made to have few young ones, while those who were
their prey were very prolific; and in this manner the race was
preserved. Thus did Epimetheus, who, not being very wise, forgot
that he had distributed among the brute animals all the qualities
which he had to give-and when he came to man, who was still
unprovided, he was terribly perplexed. Now while he was in this
perplexity, Prometheus came to inspect the distribution, and he
found that the other animals were suitably furnished, but that man
alone was naked and shoeless, and had neither bed nor arms of defence.
The appointed hour was approaching when man in his turn was to go
forth into the light of day; and Prometheus, not knowing how he
could devise his salvation, stole the mechanical arts of Hephaestus
and Athene, and fire with them (they could neither have been
acquired nor used without fire), and gave them to man. Thus man had
the wisdom necessary to the support of life, but political wisdom he
had not; for that was in the keeping of Zeus, and the power of
Prometheus did not extend to entering into the citadel of heaven,
where Zeus dwelt, who moreover had terrible sentinels; but he did
enter by stealth into the common workshop of Athene and Hephaestus, in
which they used to practise their favourite arts, and carried off
Hephaestus' art of working by fire, and also the art of Athene, and
gave them to man. And in this way man was supplied with the means of
life. But Prometheus is said to have been afterwards prosecuted for
theft, owing to the blunder of Epimetheus.

  Now man, having a share of the divine attributes, was at first the
only one of the animals who had any gods, because he alone was of
their kindred; and he would raise altars and images of them. He was
not long in inventing articulate speech and names; and he also
constructed houses and clothes and shoes and beds, and drew sustenance
from the earth. Thus provided, mankind at first lived dispersed, and
there were no cities. But the consequence was that they were destroyed
by the wild beasts, for they were utterly weak in comparison of
them, and their art was only sufficient to provide them with the means
of life, and did not enable them to carry on war against the
animals: food they had, but not as yet the art of government, of which
the art of war is a part. After a while the desire of
self-preservation gathered them into cities; but when they were
gathered together, having no art of government, they evil intreated
one another, and were again in process of dispersion and
destruction. Zeus feared that the entire race would be exterminated,
and so he sent Hermes to them, bearing reverence and justice to be the
ordering principles of cities and the bonds of friendship and
conciliation. Hermes asked Zeus how he should impart justice and
reverence among men:-Should he distribute them as the arts are
distributed; that is to say, to a favoured few only, one skilled
individual having enough of medicine or of any other art for many
unskilled ones? "Shall this be the manner in which I am to
distribute justice and reverence among men, or shall I give them to
all?" "To all," said Zeus; "I should like them all to have a share;
for cities cannot exist, if a few only share in the virtues, as in the
arts. And further, make a law by my order, that he who has no part
in reverence and justice shall be put to death, for he is a plague
of the state."

  And this is the reason, Socrates, why the Athenians and mankind in
general, when the question relates to carpentering or any other
mechanical art, allow but a few to share in their deliberations; and
when any one else interferes, then, as you say, they object, if he
be not of the favoured few; which, as I reply, is very natural. But
when they meet to deliberate about political virtue, which proceeds
only by way of justice and wisdom, they are patient enough of any
man who speaks of them, as is also natural, because they think that
every man ought to share in this sort of virtue, and that states could
not exist if this were otherwise. I have explained to you, Socrates,
the reason of this phenomenon.

  And that you may not suppose yourself to be deceived in thinking
that all men regard every man as having a share of justice or
honesty and of every other political virtue, let me give you a further
proof, which is this. In other cases, as you are aware, if a man
says that he is a good flute-player, or skilful in any other art in
which he has no skill, people either laugh at him or are angry with
him, and his relations think that he is mad and go and admonish him;
but when honesty is in question, or some other political virtue,
even if they know that he is dishonest, yet, if the man comes publicly
forward and tells the truth about his dishonesty, then, what in the
other case was held by them to be good sense, they now deem to be
madness. They say that all men ought to profess honesty whether they
are honest or not, and that a man is out of his mind who says anything
else. Their notion is, that a man must have some degree of honesty;
and that if he has none at all he ought not to be in the world.

  I have been showing that they are right in admitting every man as
a counsellor about this sort of virtue, as they are of opinion that
every man is a partaker of it. And I will now endeavour to show
further that they do not conceive this virtue to be given by nature,
or to grow spontaneously, but to be a thing which may be taught; and
which comes to a man by taking pains. No one would instruct, no one
would rebuke, or be angry with those whose calamities they suppose
to be due to nature or chance; they do not try to punish or to prevent
them from being what they are; they do but pity them. Who is so
foolish as to chastise or instruct the ugly, or the diminutive, or the
feeble? And for this reason. Because he knows that good and evil of
this kind is the work of nature and of chance; whereas if a man is
wanting in those good qualities which are attained by study and
exercise and teaching, and has only the contrary evil qualities, other
men are angry with him, and punish and reprove him-of these evil
qualities one is impiety, another injustice, and they may be described
generally as the very opposite of political virtue. In such cases
any man will be angry with another, and reprimand him,-clearly because
he thinks that by study and learning, the virtue in which the other is
deficient may be acquired. If you will think, Socrates, of the
nature of punishment, you will see at once that in the opinion of
mankind virtue may be acquired; no one punishes the evil-doer under
the notion, or for the reason, that he has done wrong, only the
unreasonable fury of a beast acts in that manner. But he who desires
to inflict rational punishment does not retaliate for a past wrong
which cannot be undone; he has regard to the future, and is desirous
that the man who is punished, and he who sees him punished, may be
deterred from doing wrong again. He punishes for the sake of
prevention, thereby clearly implying that virtue is capable of being
taught. This is the notion of all who retaliate upon others either
privately or publicly. And the Athenians, too, your own citizens, like
other men, punish and take vengeance on all whom they regard as evil
doers; and hence, we may infer them to be of the number of those who
think that virtue may be acquired and taught. Thus far, Socrates, I
have shown you clearly enough, if I am not mistaken, that your
countrymen are right in admitting the tinker and the cobbler to advise
about politics, and also that they deem virtue to be capable of
being taught and acquired.

  There yet remains one difficulty which has been raised by you
about the sons of good men. What is the reason why good men teach
their sons the knowledge which is gained from teachers, and make
them wise in that, but do nothing towards improving them in the
virtues which distinguish themselves? And here, Socrates, I will leave
the apologue and resume the argument. Please to consider: Is there
or is there not some one quality of which all the citizens must be
partakers, if there is to be a city at all? In the answer to this
question is contained the only solution of your difficulty; there is
no other. For if there be any such quality, and this quality or
unity is not the art of the carpenter, or the smith, or the potter,
but justice and temperance and holiness and, in a word, manly
virtue-if this is the quality of which all men must be partakers,
and which is the very condition of their learning or doing anything
else, and if he who is wanting in this, whether he be a child only
or a grown-up man or woman, must be taught and punished, until by
punishment he becomes better, and he who rebels against instruction
and punishment is either exiled or condemned to death under the idea
that he is incurable-if what I am saying be true, good men have
their sons taught other things and not this, do consider how
extraordinary their conduct would appear to be. For we have shown that
they think virtue capable of being taught and cultivated both in
private and public; and, notwithstanding, they have their sons
taught lesser matters, ignorance of which does not involve the
punishment of death: but greater things, of which the ignorance may
cause death and exile to those who have no training or knowledge of
them-aye, and confiscation as well as death, and, in a word, may be
the ruin of families-those things, I say, they are supposed not to
teach them-not to take the utmost care that they should learn. How
improbable is this, Socrates!

  Education and admonition commence in the first years of childhood,
and last to the very end of life. Mother and nurse and father and
tutor are vying with one another about the improvement of the child as
soon as ever he is able to understand what is being said to him: he
cannot say or do anything without their setting forth to him that this
is just and that is unjust; this is honourable, that is dishonourable;
this is holy, that is unholy; do this and abstain from that. And if he
obeys, well and good; if not, he is straightened by threats and blows,
like a piece of bent or warped wood. At a later stage they send him to
teachers, and enjoin them to see to his manners even more than to
his reading and music; and the teachers do as they are desired. And
when the boy has learned his letters and is beginning to understand
what is written, as before he understood only what was spoken, they
put into his hands the works of great poets, which he reads sitting on
a bench at school; in these are contained many admonitions, and many
tales, and praises, and encomia of ancient famous men, which he is
required to learn by heart, in order that he may imitate or emulate
them and desire to become like them. Then, again, the teachers of
the lyre take similar care that their young disciple is temperate
and gets into no mischief; and when they have taught him the use of
the lyre, they introduce him to the poems of other excellent poets,
who are the lyric poets; and these they set to music, and make their
harmonies ana rhythms quite familiar to the children's souls, in order
that they may learn to be more gentle, and harmonious, and rhythmical,
and so more fitted for speech and action; for the life of man in every
part has need of harmony and rhythm. Then they send them to the master
of gymnastic, in order that their bodies may better minister to the
virtuous mind, and that they may not be compelled through bodily
weakness to play the coward in war or on any other occasion. This is
what is done by those who have the means, and those who have the means
are the rich; their children begin to go to school soonest and leave
off latest. When they have done with masters, the state again
compels them to learn the laws, and live after the pattern which
they furnish, and not after their own fancies; and just as in learning
to write, the writing-master first draws lines with a style for the
use of the young beginner, and gives him the tablet and makes him
follow the lines, so the city draws the laws, which were the invention
of good lawgivers living in the olden time; these are given to the
young man, in order to guide him in his conduct whether he is
commanding or obeying; and he who transgresses them is to be
corrected, or, in other words, called to account, which is a term used
not only in your country, but also in many others, seeing that justice
calls men to account. Now when there is all this care about virtue
private and public, why, Socrates, do you still wonder and doubt
whether virtue can be taught? Cease to wonder, for the opposite
would be far more surprising.

  But why then do the sons of good fathers often turn out ill? There
is nothing very wonderful in this; for, as I have been saying, the
existence of a state implies that virtue is not any man's private
possession. If so-and nothing can be truer-then I will further ask you
to imagine, as an illustration, some other pursuit or branch of
knowledge which may be assumed equally to be the condition of the
existence of a state. Suppose that there could be no state unless we
were all flute-players, as far as each had the capacity, and everybody
was freely teaching everybody the art, both in private and public, and
reproving the bad player as freely and openly as every man now teaches
justice and the laws, not concealing them as he would conceal the
other arts, but imparting them-for all of us have a mutual interest in
the justice and virtue of one another, and this is the reason why
every one is so ready to teach justice and the laws;-suppose, I say,
that there were the same readiness and liberality among us in teaching
one another flute-playing, do you imagine, Socrates, that the sons
of good flute players would be more likely to be good than the sons of
bad ones? I think not. Would not their sons grow up to be
distinguished or undistinguished according to their own natural
capacities as flute-players, and the son of a good player would
often turn out to be a bad one, and the son of a bad player to be a
good one, all flute-players would be good enough in comparison of
those who were ignorant and unacquainted with the art of
flute-playing? In like manner I would have you consider that he who
appears to you to be the worst of those who have been brought up in
laws and humanities, would appear to be a just man and a master of
justice if he were to be compared with men who had no education, or
courts of justice, or laws, or any restraints upon them which
compelled them to practise virtue-with the savages, for example,
whom the poet Pherecrates exhibited on the stage at the last year's
Lenaean festival. If you were living among men such as the
man-haters in his Chorus, you would be only too glad to meet with
Eurybates and Phrynondas, and you would sorrowfully long to revisit
the rascality of this part of the world. you, Socrates, are
discontented, and why? Because all men are teachers of virtue, each
one according to his ability; and you say, Where are the teachers? You
might as well ask, Who teaches Greek? For of that too there will not
be any teachers found. Or you might ask, Who is to teach the sons of
our artisans this same art which they have learned of their fathers?
He and his fellow-workmen have taught them to the best of their
ability,-but who will carry them further in their arts? And you
would certainly have a difficulty, Socrates, in finding a teacher of
them; but there would be no difficulty in finding a teacher of those
who are wholly ignorant. And this is true of virtue or of anything
else; if a man is better able than we are to promote virtue ever so
little, we must be content with the result. A teacher of this sort I
believe myself to be, and above all other men to have the knowledge
which makes a man noble and good; and I give my pupils their
money's-worth, and even more, as they themselves confess. And
therefore I have introduced the following mode of payment:-When a
man has been my pupil, if he likes he pays my price, but there is no
compulsion; and if he does not like, he has only to go into a temple
and take an oath of the value of the instructions, and he pays no more
than he declares to be their value.

  Such is my Apologue, Socrates, and such is the argument by which I
endeavour to show that virtue may be taught, and that this is the
opinion of the Athenians. And I have also attempted to show that you
are not to wonder at good fathers having bad sons, or at good sons
having bad fathers, of which the sons of Polycleitus afford an
example, who are the companions of our friends here, Paralus and
Xanthippus, but are nothing in comparison with their father; and
this is true of the sons of many other artists. As yet I ought not
to say the same of Paralus and Xanthippus themselves, for they are
young and there is still hope of them.

  Protagoras ended, and in my ear

    So charming left his voice, that I the while

    Thought him still speaking; still stood fixed to hear.

At length, when the truth dawned upon me, that he had really finished,
not without difficulty I began to collect myself, and looking at
Hippocrates, I said to him: O son of Apollodorus, how deeply
grateful I am to you for having brought me hither; I would not have
missed the speech of Protagoras for a great deal. For I used to
imagine that no human care could make men good; but I know better now.
Yet I have still one very small difficulty which I am sure that
Protagoras will easily explain, as he has already explained so much.
If a man were to go and consult Pericles or any of our great
speakers about these matters, he might perhaps hear as fine a
discourse; but then when one has a question to ask of any of them,
like books, they can neither answer nor ask; and if any one challenges
the least particular of their speech, they go ringing on in a long
harangue, like brazen pots, which when they are struck continue to
sound unless some one puts his hand upon them; whereas our friend
Protagoras can not only make a good speech, as he has already shown,
but when he is asked a question he can answer briefly; and when he
asks he will wait and hear the answer; and this is a very rare gift.
Now I, Protagoras, want to ask of you a little question, which if
you will only answer, I shall be quite satisfied. You were saying that
virtue can be taught;-that I will take upon your authority, and
there is no one to whom I am more ready to trust. But I marvel at
one thing about which I should like to have my mind set at rest. You
were speaking of Zeus sending justice and reverence to men; and
several times while you were speaking, justice, and temperance, and
holiness, and all these qualities, were described by you as if
together they made up virtue. Now I want you to tell me truly
whether virtue is one whole, of which justice and temperance and
holiness are parts; or whether all these are only the names of one and
the same thing: that is the doubt which still lingers in my mind.

  There is no difficulty, Socrates, in answering that the qualities of
which you are speaking are the parts of virtue which is one.

  And are they parts, I said, in the same sense in which mouth,
nose, and eyes, and ears, are the parts of a face; or are they like
the parts of gold, which differ from the whole and from one another
only in being larger or smaller?

  I should say that they differed, Socrates, in the first way; they
are related to one another as the parts of a face are related to the
whole face.

  And do men have some one part and some another part of virtue? Of if
a man has one part, must he also have all the others?

  By no means, he said; for many a man is brave and not just, or
just and not wise.

  You would not deny, then, that courage and wisdom are also parts
of virtue?

  Most undoubtedly they are, he answered; and wisdom is the noblest of
the parts.

  And they are all different from one another? I said.

  Yes.

  And has each of them a distinct function like the parts of the
face;-the eye, for example, is not like the ear, and has not the
same functions; and the other parts are none of them like one another,
either in their functions, or in any other way? I want to know whether
the comparison holds concerning the parts of virtue. Do they also
differ from one another in themselves and in their functions? For that
is clearly what the simile would imply.

  Yes, Socrates, you are right in supposing that they differ.

  Then, I said, no other part of virtue is like knowledge, or like
justice, or like courage, or like temperance, or like holiness?

  No, he answered.

  Well then, I said, suppose that you and I enquire into their
natures. And first, you would agree with me that justice is of the
nature of a thing, would you not? That is my opinion: would it not
be yours also?

  Mine also, he said.

  And suppose that some one were to ask us, saying, "O Protagoras, and
you, Socrates, what about this thing which you were calling justice,
is it just or unjust?"-and I were to answer, just: would you vote with
me or against me?

  With you, he said.

  Thereupon I should answer to him who asked me, that justice is of
the nature of the just: would not you?

  Yes, he said.

  And suppose that he went on to say: "Well now, is there also such
a thing as holiness? "we should answer, "Yes," if I am not mistaken?

  Yes, he said.

  Which you would also acknowledge to be a thing-should we not say so?

  He assented.

  "And is this a sort of thing which is of the nature of the holy,
or of the nature of the unholy?" I should be angry at his putting such
a question, and should say, "Peace, man; nothing can be holy if
holiness is not holy." What would you say? Would you not answer in the
same way?

  Certainly, he said.

  And then after this suppose that he came and asked us, "What were
you saying just now? Perhaps I may not have heard you rightly, but you
seemed to me to be saying that the parts of virtue were not the same
as one another." I should reply, "You certainly heard that said, but
not, as you imagine, by me; for I only asked the question;
Protagoras gave the answer." And suppose that he turned to you and
said, "Is this true, Protagoras? and do you maintain that one part
of virtue is unlike another, and is this your position?"-how would you
answer him?

  I could not help acknowledging the truth of what he said, Socrates.

  Well then, Protagoras, we will assume this; and now supposing that
he proceeded to say further, "Then holiness is not of the nature of
justice, nor justice of the nature of holiness, but of the nature of
unholiness; and holiness is of the nature of the not just, and
therefore of the unjust, and the unjust is the unholy": how shall we
answer him? I should certainly answer him on my own behalf that
justice is holy, and that holiness is just; and I would say in like
manner on your behalf also, if you would allow me, that justice is
either the same with holiness, or very nearly the same; and above
all I would assert that justice is like holiness and holiness is
like justice; and I wish that you would tell me whether I may be
permitted to give this answer on your behalf, and whether you would
agree with me.

  He replied, I cannot simply agree, Socrates, to the proposition that
justice is holy and that holiness is just, for there appears to me
to be a difference between them. But what matter? if you please I
please; and let us assume, if you will I, that justice is holy, and
that holiness is just.

  Pardon me, I replied; I do not want this "if you wish" or "if you
will" sort of conclusion to be proven, but I want you and me to be
proven: I mean to say that the conclusion will be best proven if there
be no "if."

  Well, he said, I admit that justice bears a resemblance to holiness,
for there is always some point of view in which everything is like
every other thing; white is in a certain way like black, and hard is
like soft, and the most extreme opposites have some qualities in
common; even the parts of the face which, as we were saying before,
are distinct and have different functions, are still in a certain
point of view similar, and one of them is like another of them. And
you may prove that they are like one another on the same principle
that all things are like one another; and yet things which are like in
some particular ought not to be called alike, nor things which are
unlike in some particular, however slight, unlike.

  And do you think, I said in a tone of surprise, that justice and
holiness have but a small degree of likeness?

  Certainly not; any more than I agree with what I understand to be
your view.

  Well, I said, as you appear to have a difficulty about this, let
us take another of the examples which you mentioned instead. Do you
admit the existence of folly?

  I do.

  And is not wisdom the. very opposite of folly?

  That is true, he said.

  And when men act rightly and advantageously they seem to you to be
temperate?

  Yes, he said.

  And temperance makes them temperate?

  Certainly.

  And they who do not act rightly act foolishly, and in acting thus
are not temperate?

  I agree, he said.

  Then to act foolishly is the opposite of acting temperately?

  He assented.

  And foolish actions are done by folly, and temperate actions by
temperance?

  He agreed.

  And that is done strongly which is done by strength, and that
which is weakly done, by weakness?

  He assented.

  And that which is done with swiftness is done swiftly, and that
which is done with slowness, slowly?

  He assented again.

  And that which is done in the same manner, is done by the same;
and that which is done in an opposite manner by the opposite?

  He agreed.

  Once more, I said, is there anything beautiful?

  Yes.

  To which the only opposite is the ugly?

  There is no other.

  And is there anything good?

  There is.

  To which the only opposite is the evil?

  There is no other.

  And there is the acute in sound?

  True.

  To which the only opposite is the grave?

  There is no other, he said, but that.

  Then every opposite has one opposite only and no more?

  He assented.

  Then now, I said, let us recapitulate our admissions. First of all
we admitted that everything has one opposite and not more than one?

  We did so.

  And we admitted also that what was done in opposite ways was done by
opposites?

  Yes.

  And that which was done foolishly, as we further admitted, was
done in the opposite way to that which was done temperately?

  Yes.

  And that which was done temperately was done by temperance, and that
which was done foolishly by folly?

  He agreed.

  And that which is done in opposite ways is done by opposites?

  Yes.

  And one thing is done by temperance, and quite another thing by
folly?

  Yes.

  And in opposite ways?

  Certainly.

  And therefore by opposites:-then folly is the opposite of
temperance?

  Clearly.

  And do you remember that folly has already been acknowledged by us
to be the opposite of wisdom?

  He assented.

  And we said that everything has only one opposite?

  Yes.

  Then, Protagoras, which of the two assertions shall we renounce? One
says that everything has but one opposite; the other that wisdom is
distinct from temperance, and that both of them are parts of virtue;
and that they are not only distinct, but dissimilar, both in
themselves and in their functions, like the parts of a face. Which
of these two assertions shall we renounce? For both of them together
are certainly not in harmony; they do not accord or agree: for how can
they be said to agree if everything is assumed to have only one
opposite and not more than one, and yet folly, which is one, has
clearly the two opposites wisdom and temperance? Is not that true,
Protagoras? What else would you say?

  He assented, but with great reluctance.

  Then temperance and wisdom are the same, as before justice and
holiness appeared to us to be nearly the same. And now, Protagoras,
I said, we must finish the enquiry, and not faint. Do you think that
an unjust man can be temperate in his injustice?

  I should be ashamed, Socrates, he said, to acknowledge this which
nevertheless many may be found to assert.

  And shall I argue with them or with you? I replied.

  I would rather, he said, that you should argue with the many
first, if you will.

  Whichever you please, if you will only answer me and say whether you
are of their opinion or not. My object is to test the validity of
the argument; and yet the result may be that I who ask and you who
answer may both be put on our trial.

  Protagoras at first made a show of refusing, as he said that the
argument was not encouraging; at length, he consented to answer.

  Now then, I said, begin at the beginning and answer me. You think
that some men are temperate, and yet unjust?

  Yes, he said; let that be admitted.

  And temperance is good sense?

  Yes.

  And good sense is good counsel in doing injustice?

  Granted.

  If they succeed, I said, or if they do not succeed?

  If they succeed.

  And you would admit the existence of goods?

  Yes.

  And is the good that which is expedient for man?

  Yes, indeed, he said: and there are some things which may be
inexpedient, and yet I call them good.

  I thought that Protagoras was getting ruffled and excited; he seemed
to be setting himself in an attitude of war. Seeing this, I minded
my business, and gently said:-

  When you say, Protagoras, that things inexpedient are good, do you
mean inexpedient for man only, or inexpedient altogether? and do you
call the latter good?

  Certainly not the last, he replied; for I know of many things-meats,
drinks, medicines, and ten thousand other things, which are
inexpedient for man, and some which are expedient; and some which
are neither expedient nor inexpedient for man, but only for horses;
and some for oxen only, and some for dogs; and some for no animals,
but only for trees; and some for the roots of trees and not for
their branches, as for example, manure, which is a good thing when
laid about the roots of a tree, but utterly destructive if thrown upon
the shoots and young branches; or I may instance olive oil, which is
mischievous to all plants, and generally most injurious to the hair of
every animal with the exception of man, but beneficial to human hair
and to the human body generally; and even in this application (so
various and changeable is the nature of the benefit), that which is
the greatest good to the outward parts of a man, is a very great
evil to his inward parts: and for this reason physicians always forbid
their patients the use of oil in their food, except in very small
quantities, just enough to extinguish the disagreeable sensation of
smell in meats and sauces.

  When he had given this answer, the company cheered him. And I
said: Protagoras, I have a wretched memory, and when any one makes a
long speech to me I never remember what he is talking about. As
then, if I had been deaf, and you were going to converse with me,
you would have had to raise your voice; so now, having such a bad
memory, I will ask you to cut your answers shorter, if you would
take me with you.

  What do you mean? he said: how am I to shorten my answers? shall I
make them too short?

  Certainly not, I said.

  But short enough?

  Yes, I said.

  Shall I answer what appears to me to be short enough, or what
appears to you to be short enough?

  I have heard, I said, that you can speak and teach others to speak
about the same things at such length that words never seemed to
fail, or with such brevity that no one could use fewer of them. Please
therefore, if you talk with me, to adopt the latter or more
compendious method.

  Socrates, he replied, many a battle of words have I fought, and if I
had followed the method of disputation which my adversaries desired,
as you want me to do, I should have been no better than another, and
the name of Protagoras would have been nowhere.

  I saw that he was not satisfied with his previous answers, and
that he would not play the part of answerer any more if he could help;
and I considered that there was no call upon me to continue the
conversation; so I said: Protagoras, I do not wish to force the
conversation upon you if you had rather not, but when you are
willing to argue with me in such a way that I can follow you, then I
will argue with you. Now you, as is said of you by others and as you
say of yourself, are able to have discussions in shorter forms of
speech as well as in longer, for you are a master of wisdom; but I
cannot manage these long speeches: I only wish that I could. You, on
the other hand, who are capable of either, ought to speak shorter as I
beg you, and then we might converse. But I see that you are
disinclined, and as I have an engagement which will prevent my staying
to hear you at greater length (for I have to be in another place), I
will depart; although I should have liked to have heard you.

  Thus I spoke, and was rising from my seat, when Callias seized me by
the right hand, and in his left hand caught hold of this old cloak
of mine. He said: We cannot let you go, Socrates, for if you leave
us there will be an end of our discussions: I must therefore beg you
to remain, as there is nothing in the world that I should like
better than to hear you and Protagoras discourse. Do not deny the
company this pleasure.

  Now I had got up, and was in the act of departure. Son of
Hipponicus, I replied, I have always admired, and do now heartily
applaud and love your philosophical spirit, and I would gladly
comply with your request, if I could. But the truth is that I
cannot. And what you ask is as great an impossibility to me, as if you
bade me run a race with Crison of Himera, when in his prime, or with
some one of the long or day course runners. To such a request I should
reply that I would fain ask the same of my own legs; but they refuse
to comply. And therefore if you want to see Crison and me in the
same stadium, you must bid him slacken his speed to mine, for I cannot
run quickly, and he can run slowly. And in like manner if you want
to hear me and Protagoras discoursing, you must ask him to shorten his
answers, and keep to the point, as he did at first; if not, how can
there be any discussion? For discussion is one thing, and making an
oration is quite another, in my humble opinion.

  But you see, Socrates, said Callias, that Protagoras may fairly
claim to speak in his own way, just as you claim to speak in yours.

  Here Alcibiades interposed, and said: That, Callias, is not a true
statement of the case. For our friend Socrates admits that he cannot
make a speech-in this he yields the palm to Protagoras: but I should
be greatly surprised if he yielded to any living man in the power of
holding and apprehending an argument. Now if Protagoras will make a
similar admission, and confess that he is inferior to Socrates in
argumentative skill, that is enough for Socrates; but if he claims a
superiority in argument as well, let him ask and answer-not, when a
question is asked, slipping away from the point, and instead of
answering, making a speech at such length that most of his hearers
forget the question at issue (not that Socrates is likely to
forget-I will be bound for that, although he may pretend in fun that
he has a bad memory). And Socrates appears to me to be more in the
right than Protagoras; that is my view, and every man ought to say
what he thinks.

  When Alcibiades had done speaking, some one-Critias, I
believe-went on to say: O Prodicus and Hippias, Callias appears to
me to be a partisan of Protagoras: and this led Alcibiades, who
loves opposition, to take the other side. But we should not be
partisans either of Socrates or of Protagoras; let us rather unite
in entreating both of them not to break up the discussion.

  Prodicus added: That, Critias, seems to me to be well said, for
those who are present at such discussions ought to be impartial
hearers of both the speakers; remembering, however, that
impartiality is not the same as equality, for both sides should be
impartially heard, and yet an equal meed should not be assigned to
both of them; but to the wiser a higher meed should be given, and a
lower to the less wise. And I as well as Critias would beg you,
Protagoras and Socrates, to grant our request, which is, that you will
argue with one another and not wrangle; for friends argue with friends
out of goodwill, but only adversaries and enemies wrangle. And then
our meeting will be delightful; for in this way you, who are the
speakers, will be most likely to win esteem, and not praise only,
among us who are your audience; for esteem is a sincere conviction
of the hearers' souls, but praise is often an insincere expression
of men uttering falsehoods contrary to their conviction. And thus we
who are the hearers will be gratified and not pleased; for
gratification is of the mind when receiving wisdom and knowledge,
but pleasure is of the body when eating or experiencing some other
bodily delight. Thus spoke Prodicus, and many of the company applauded
his words.

  Hippias the sage spoke next. He said: All of you who are here
present I reckon to be kinsmen and friends and fellow-citizens, by
nature and not by law; for by nature like is akin to like, whereas law
is the tyrant of mankind, and often compels us to do many things which
are against nature. How great would be the disgrace then, if we, who
know the nature of things, and are the wisest of the Hellenes, and
as such are met together in this city, which is the metropolis of
wisdom, and in the greatest and most glorious house of this city,
should have nothing to show worthy of this height of dignity, but
should only quarrel with one another like the meanest of mankind I
pray and advise you, Protagoras, and you, Socrates, to agree upon a
compromise. Let us be your peacemakers. And do not you, Socrates,
aim at this precise and extreme brevity in discourse, if Protagoras
objects, but loosen and let go the reins of speech, that your words
may be grander and more becoming to you. Neither do you, Protagoras,
go forth on the gale with every sail set out of sight of land into
an ocean of words, but let there be a mean observed by both of you. Do
as I say. And let me also persuade you to choose an arbiter or
overseer or president; he will keep watch over your words and will
prescribe their proper length.

  This proposal was received by the company with universal approval;
Callias said that he would not let me off, and they begged me to
choose an arbiter. But I said that to choose an umpire of discourse
would be unseemly; for if the person chosen was inferior, then the
inferior or worse ought not to preside over the better; or if he was
equal, neither would that be well; for he who is our equal will do
as we do, and what will be the use of choosing him? And if you say,
"Let us have a better then,"-to that I answer that you cannot have any
one who is wiser than Protagoras. And if you choose another who is not
really better, and whom you only say is better, to put another over
him as though he were an inferior person would be an unworthy
reflection on him; not that, as far as I am concerned, any
reflection is of much consequence to me. Let me tell you then what I
will do in order that the conversation and discussion may go on as you
desire. If Protagoras is not disposed to answer, let him ask and I
will answer; and I will endeavour to show at the same time how, as I
maintain, he ought to answer: and when I have answered as many
questions as he likes to ask, let him in like manner answer me; and if
he seems to be not very ready at answering the precise question
asked of him, you and I will unite in entreating him, as you entreated
me, not to spoil the discussion. And this will require no special
arbiter-all of you shall be arbiters.

  This was generally approved, and Protagoras, though very much
against his will, was obliged to agree that he would ask questions;
and when he had put a sufficient number of them, that he would
answer in his turn those which he was asked in short replies. He began
to put his questions as follows:-

  I am of opinion, Socrates, he said, that skill in poetry is the
principal part of education; and this I conceive to be the power of
knowing what compositions of the poets are correct, and what are
not, and how they are to be distinguished, and of explaining when
asked the reason of the difference. And I propose to transfer the
question which you and I have been discussing to the domain of poetry;
we will speak as before of virtue, but in reference to a passage of
a poet. Now Simonides says to Scopas the son of Creon the Thessalian:

  Hardly on the one hand can a man become truly good, built
four-square in hands and feet and mind, a work without a flaw.

Do you know the poem? or shall I repeat the whole?

  There is no need, I said; for I am perfectly well acquainted with
the ode-I have made a careful study of it.

  Very well, he said. And do you think that the ode is a good
composition, and true?

  Yes, I said, both good and true.

  But if there is a contradiction, can the composition be good or
true?

  No, not in that case, I replied.

  And is there not a contradiction? he asked. Reflect.

  Well, my friend, I have reflected.

  And does not the poet proceed to say, "I do not agree with the
word of Pittacus, albeit the utterance of a wise man: Hardly can a man
be good"? Now you will observe that this is said by the same poet.

  I know it.

  And do you think, he said, that the two sayings are consistent?

  Yes, I said, I think so (at the same time I could not help fearing
that there might be something in what he said). And you think
otherwise?

  Why, he said, how can he be consistent in both? First of all,
premising as his own thought, "Hardly can a man become truly good";
and then a little further on in the poem, forgetting, and blaming
Pittacus and refusing to agree with him, when he says, "Hardly can a
man be good," which is the very same thing. And yet when he blames him
who says the same with himself, he blames himself; so that he must
be wrong either in his first or his second assertion.

  Many of the audience cheered and applauded this. And I felt at first
giddy and faint, as if I had received a blow from the hand of an
expert boxer, when I heard his words and the sound of the cheering;
and to confess the truth, I wanted to get time to think what the
meaning of the poet really was. So I turned to Prodicus and called
him. Prodicus, I said, Simonides is a countryman of yours, and you
ought to come to his aid. I must appeal to you, like the river
Scamander in Homer, who, when beleaguered by Achilles, summons the
Simois to aid him, saying:

  Brother dear, let us both together stay the force of the hero.

And I summon you, for I am afraid that Protagoras will make an end
of Simonides. Now is the time to rehabilitate Simonides, by the
application of your philosophy of synonyms, which enables you to
distinguish "will" and "wish," and make other charming distinctions
like those which you drew just now. And I should like to know
whether you would agree with me; for I am of opinion that there is
no contradiction in the words of Simonides. And first of all I wish
that you would say whether, in your opinion, Prodicus, "being" is
the same as "becoming."

  Not the same, certainly, replied Prodicus.

  Did not Simonides first set forth, as his own view, that "Hardly can
a man become truly good"?

  Quite right, said Prodicus.

  And then he blames Pittacus, not, as Protagoras imagines, for
repeating that which he says himself, but for saying something
different from himself. Pittacus does not say as Simonides says,
that hardly can a man become good, but hardly can a man be good: and
our friend Prodicus would maintain that being, Protagoras, is not
the same as becoming; and if they are not the same, then Simonides
is not inconsistent with himself. I dare say that Prodicus and many
others would say, as Hesiod says,

   On the one hand, hardly can a man become good,

   For the gods have made virtue the reward of toil,

   But on the other hand, when you have climbed the height,

   Then, to retain virtue, however difficult the acquisition, is easy.

  Prodicus heard and approved; but Protagoras said: Your correction,
Socrates, involves a greater error than is contained in the sentence
which you are correcting.

  Alas! I said, Protagoras; then I am a sorry physician, and do but
aggravate a disorder which I am seeking to cure.

  Such is the fact, he said.

  How so? I asked.

  The poet, he replied, could never have made such a mistake as to say
that virtue, which in the opinion of all men is the hardest of all
things, can be easily retained.

  Well, I said, and how fortunate are we in having Prodicus among
us, at the right moment; for he has a wisdom, Protagoras, which, as
I imagine, is more than human and of very ancient date, and may be
as old as Simonides or even older. Learned as you are in many
things, you appear to know nothing of this; but I know, for I am a
disciple of his. And now, if I am not mistaken, you do not
understand the word "hard" (chalepon) in the sense which Simonides
intended; and I must correct you, as Prodicus corrects me when I use
the word "awful" (deinon) as a term of praise. If I say that
Protagoras or any one else is an "awfully" wise man, he asks me if I
am not ashamed of calling that which is good "awful"; and then he
explains to me that the term "awful" is always taken in a bad sense,
and that no one speaks of being "awfully" healthy or wealthy, or
"awful" peace, but of "awful" disease, "awful" war, "awful" poverty,
meaning by the term "awful," evil. And I think that Simonides and
his countrymen the Ceans, when they spoke of "hard" meant "evil," or
something which you do not understand. Let us ask Prodicus, for he
ought to be able to answer questions about the dialect of Simonides.
What did he mean, Prodicus, by the term "hard?"

  Evil, said Prodicus.

  And therefore, I said, Prodicus, he blames Pittacus for saying,
"Hard is the good," just as if that were equivalent to saying, Evil is
the good.

  Yes, he said, that was certainly his meaning; and he is twitting
Pittacus with ignorance of the use of terms, which in a Lesbian, who
has been accustomed to speak a barbarous language, is natural.

  Do you hear, Protagoras, I asked, what our friend Prodicus is
saying? And have you an answer for him?

  You are entirely mistaken, Prodicus, said Protagoras; and I know
very well that Simonides in using the word "hard" meant what all of us
mean, not evil, but that which is not easy-that which takes a great
deal of trouble: of this I am positive.

  I said: I also incline to believe, Protagoras, that this was the
meaning of Simonides, of which our friend Prodicus was very well
aware, but he thought that he would make fun, and try if you could
maintain your thesis; for that Simonides could never have meant the
other is clearly proved by the context, in which he says that God only
has this gift. Now he cannot surely mean to say that to be good is
evil, when he afterwards proceeds to say that God only has this
gift, and that this is the attribute of him and of no other. For if
this be his meaning, Prodicus would impute to Simonides a character of
recklessness which is very unlike his countrymen. And I should like to
tell you, I said, what I imagine to be the real meaning of Simonides
in this poem, if you will test what, in your way of speaking, would be
called my skill in poetry; or if you would rather, I will be the
listener.

  To this proposal Protagoras replied: As you please;-and Hippias,
Prodicus, and the others told me by all means to do as I proposed.

  Then now, I said, I will endeavour to explain to you my opinion
about this poem of Simonides. There is a very ancient philosophy which
is more cultivated in Crete and Lacedaemon than in any other part of
Hellas, and there are more philosophers in those countries than
anywhere else in the world. This, however, is a secret which the
Lacedaemonians deny; and they pretend to be ignorant, just because
they do not wish to have it thought that they rule the world by
wisdom, like the Sophists of whom Protagoras was speaking, and not
by valour of arms; considering that if the reason of their superiority
were disclosed, all men would be practising their wisdom. And this
secret of theirs has never been discovered by the imitators of
Lacedaemonian fashions in other cities, who go about with their ears
bruised in imitation of them, and have the caestus bound on their
arms, and are always in training, and wear short cloaks; for they
imagine that these are the practices which have enabled the
Lacedaemonians to conquer the other Hellenes. Now when the
Lacedaemonians want to unbend and hold free conversation with their
wise men, and are no longer satisfied with mere secret intercourse,
they drive out all these laconizers, and any other foreigners who
may happen to be in their country, and they hold a philosophical
seance unknown to strangers; and they themselves forbid their young
men to go out into other cities-in this they are like the Cretans-in
order that they may not unlearn the lessons which they have taught
them. And in Lacedaemon and Crete not only men but also women have a
pride in their high cultivation. And hereby you may know that I am
right in attributing to the Lacedaemonians this excellence in
philosophy and speculation: If a man converses with the most
ordinary Lacedaemonian, he will find him seldom good for much in
general conversation, but at any point in the discourse he will be
darting out some notable saying, terse and full of meaning, with
unerring aim; and the person with whom he is talking seems to be
like a child in his hands. And many of our own age and of former
ages have noted that the true Lacedaemonian type of character has
the love of philosophy even stronger than the love of gymnastics; they
are conscious that only a perfectly educated man is capable of
uttering such expressions. Such were Thales of Miletus, and Pittacus
of Mitylene, and Bias of Priene, and our own Solon, and Cleobulus
the Lindian, and Myson the Chenian; and seventh in the catalogue of
wise men was the Lacedaemonian Chilo. All these were lovers and
emulators and disciples of the culture of the Lacedaemonians, and
any one may perceive that their wisdom was of this character;
consisting of short memorable sentences, which they severally uttered.
And they met together and dedicated in the temple of Apollo at Delphi,
as the first-fruits of their wisdom, the far-famed inscriptions, which
are in all men's mouths-"Know thyself," and "Nothing too much."

  Why do I say all this? I am explaining that this Lacedaemonian
brevity was the style of primitive philosophy. Now there was a
saying of Pittacus which was privately circulated and received the
approbation of the wise, "Hard is it to be good." And Simonides, who
was ambitious of the fame of wisdom, was aware that if he could
overthrow this saying, then, as if he had won a victory over some
famous athlete, he would carry off the palm among his
contemporaries. And if I am not mistaken, he composed the entire
poem with the secret intention of damaging Pittacus and his saying.

  Let us all unite in examining his words, and see whether I am
speaking the truth. Simonides must have been a lunatic, if, in the
very first words of the poem, wanting to say only that to become
good is hard, he inserted (men) "on the one hand" ["on the one hand to
become good is hard"]; there would be no reason for the introduction
of (men), unless you suppose him to speak with a hostile reference
to the words of Pittacus. Pittacus is saying "Hard is it to be
good," and he, in refutation of this thesis, rejoins that the truly
hard thing, Pittacus, is to become good, not joining "truly" with
"good," but with "hard." Not, that the hard thing is to be truly good,
as though there were some truly good men, and there were others who
were good but not truly good (this would be a very simple observation,
and quite unworthy of Simonides); but you must suppose him to make a
trajection of the word "truly," construing the saying of Pittacus thus
(and let us imagine Pittacus to be speaking and Simonides answering
him): "O my friends," says Pittacus, "hard is it to be good," and
Simonides answers, "In that, Pittacus, you are mistaken; the
difficulty is not to be good, but on the one hand, to become good,
four-square in hands and feet and mind, without a flaw-that is hard
truly." This way of reading the passage accounts for the insertion
of (men) "on the one hand," and for the position at the end of the
clause of the word "truly," and all that follows shows this to be
the meaning. A great deal might be said in praise of the details of
the poem, which is a charming piece of workmanship, and very finished,
but such minutiae would be tedious. I should like, however, to point
out the general intention of the poem, which is certainly designed
in every part to be a refutation of the saying of Pittacus. For he
speaks in what follows a little further on as if he meant to argue
that although there is a difficulty in becoming good, yet this is
possible for a time, and only for a time. But having become good, to
remain in a good state and be good, as you, Pittacus, affirm, is not
possible, and is not granted to man; God only has this blessing;
"but man cannot help being bad when the force of circumstances
overpowers him." Now whom does the force of circumstance overpower
in the command of a vessel?-not the private individual, for he is
always overpowered; and as one who is already prostrate cannot be
overthrown, and only he who is standing upright but not he who is
prostrate can be laid prostrate, so the force of circumstances can
only overpower him who, at some time or other, has resources, and
not him who is at all times helpless. The descent of a great storm may
make the pilot helpless, or the severity of the season the
husbandman or the physician; for the good may become bad, as another
poet witnesses:

   The good are sometimes good and sometimes bad.

But the bad does not become bad; he is always bad. So that when the
force of circumstances overpowers the man of resources and skill and
virtue, then he cannot help being bad. And you, Pittacus, are
saying, "Hard is it to be good." Now there is a difficulty in becoming
good; and yet this is possible: but to be good is an impossibility-

  For he who does well is the good man, and he who does ill is the
bad.

But what sort of doing is good in letters? and what sort of doing
makes a man good in letters? Clearly the knowing of them. And what
sort of well-doing makes a man a good physician? Clearly the knowledge
of the art of healing the sick. "But he who does ill is the bad."
Now who becomes a bad physician? Clearly he who is in the first
place a physician, and in the second place a good physician; for he
may become a bad one also: but none of us unskilled individuals can by
any amount of doing ill become physicians, any more than we can become
carpenters or anything of that sort; and he who by doing ill cannot
become a physician at all, clearly cannot become a bad physician. In
like manner the good may become deteriorated by time, or toil, or
disease, or other accident (the only real doing ill is to be
deprived of knowledge), but the bad man will never become bad, for
he is always bad; and if he were to become bad, he must previously
have been good. Thus the words of the poem tend to show that on the
one hand a man cannot be continuously good, but that he may become
good and may also become bad; and again that

  They are the best for the longest time whom the gods love.

  All this relates to Pittacus, as is further proved by the sequel.
For he adds:

  Therefore I will not throw away my span of life to no purpose in
searching after the impossible, hoping in vain to find a perfectly
faultless man among those who partake of the fruit of the
broad-bosomed earth: if I find him, I will send you word.

(this is the vehement way in which he pursues his attack upon Pittacus
throughout the whole poem):

  But him who does no evil, voluntarily I praise and love;-not even
the gods war against necessity.

All this has a similar drift, for Simonides was not so ignorant as
to say that he praised those who did no evil voluntarily, as though
there were some who did evil voluntarily. For no wise man, as I
believe, will allow that any human being errs voluntarily, or
voluntarily does evil and dishonourable actions; but they are very
well aware that all who do evil and dishonourable things do them
against their will. And Simonides never says that he praises him who
does no evil voluntarily; the word "voluntarily" applies to himself.
For he was under the impression that a good man might often compel
himself to love and praise another, and to be the friend and
approver of another; and that there might be an involuntary love, such
as a man might feel to an unnatural father or mother, or country, or
the like. Now bad men, when their parents or country have any defects,
look on them with malignant joy, and find fault with them and expose
and denounce them to others, under the idea that the rest of mankind
will be less likely to take themselves to task and accuse them of
neglect; and they blame their defects far more than they deserve, in
order that the odium which is necessarily incurred by them may be
increased: but the good man dissembles his feelings, and constrains
himself to praise them; and if they have wronged him and he is
angry, he pacifies his anger and is reconciled, and compels himself to
love and praise his own flesh and blood. And Simonides, as is
probable, considered that he himself had often had to praise and
magnify a tyrant or the like, much against his will, and he also
wishes to imply to Pittacus that he does not censure him because he is
censorious.

  For I am satisfied [he says] when a man is neither bad nor very
stupid; and when he knows justice (which is the health of states), and
is of sound mind, I will find no fault with him, for I am not given to
finding fault, and there are innumerable fools

(implying that if he delighted in censure he might have abundant
opportunity of finding fault).

  All things are good with which evil is unmingled.

In these latter words he does not mean to say that all things are good
which have no evil in them, as you might say "All things are white
which have no black in them," for that would be ridiculous; but he
means to say that he accepts and finds no fault with the moderate or
intermediate state. He says:

  I do not hope to find a perfectly blameless man among those who
partake of the fruits of the broad-bosomed earth (if I find him, I
will send you word); in this sense I praise no man. But he who is
moderately good, and does no evil, is good enough for me, who love and
approve every one.

(and here observe that he uses a Lesbian word, epainemi [approve],
because he is addressing Pittacus,

  Who love and approve every one voluntarily, who does no evil:

and that the stop should be put after "voluntarily"); "but there are
some whom I involuntarily praise and love. And you, Pittacus, I
would never have blamed, if you had spoken what was moderately good
and true; but I do blame you because, putting on the appearance of
truth, you are speaking falsely about the highest matters. And this, I
said, Prodicus and Protagoras, I take to be the meaning of Simonides
in this poem.

  Hippias said: I think, Socrates, that you have given a very good
explanation of the poem; but I have also an excellent interpretation
of my own which I will propound to you, if you will allow me.

  Nay, Hippias, said Alcibiades; not now, but at some other time. At
present we must abide by the compact which was made between Socrates
and Protagoras, to the effect that as long as Protagoras is willing to
ask, Socrates should answer; or that if he would rather answer, then
that Socrates should ask.

  I said: I wish Protagoras either to ask or answer as he is inclined;
but I would rather have done with poems and odes, if he does not
object, and come back to the question about which I was asking you
at first, Protagoras, and by your help make an end of that. The talk
about the poets seems to me like a commonplace entertainment to
which a vulgar company have recourse; who, because they are not able
to converse or amuse one another, while they are drinking, with the
sound of their own voices and conversation, by reason of their
stupidity, raise the price of flute-girls in the market, hiring for
a great sum the voice of a flute instead of their own breath, to be
the medium of intercourse among them: but where the company are real
gentlemen and men of education, you will see no flute-girls, nor
dancing-girls, nor harp-girls; and they have no nonsense or games, but
are contented with one another's conversation, of which their own
voices are the medium, and which they carry on by turns and in an
orderly manner, even though they are very liberal in their
potations. And a company like this of ours, and men such as we profess
to be, do not require the help of another's voice, or of the poets
whom you cannot interrogate about meaning of what they are saying;
people who cite them declaring, some that the poet has meaning, and
others that he has another, and the point which is in dispute can
never be decided. This sort of entertainment they decline, and
prefer to talk with one another, and put one another to the proof in
conversation. And these are the models which I desire that you and I
should imitate. Leaving the poets, and keeping to ourselves, let us
try the mettle of one another and make proof of the truth in
conversation. If you have a mind to ask, I am ready to answer; or if
you would rather, do you answer, and give me the opportunity of
resuming and completing our unfinished argument.

  I made these and some similar observations; but Protagoras would not
distinctly say which he would do. Thereupon Alcibiades turned to
Callias, and said:-Do you think, Callias, that Protagoras is fair in
refusing to say whether he will or will not answer? for I certainly
think that he is unfair; he ought either to proceed with the argument,
or distinctly refuse to proceed, that we may know his intention; and
then Socrates will be able to discourse with some one else, and the
rest of the company will be free to talk with one another.

  I think that Protagoras was really made ashamed by these words of
Alcibiades and when the prayers of Callias and the company were
superadded, he was at last induced to argue, and said that I might ask
and he would answer.

  So I said: Do not imagine, Protagoras, that I have any other
interest in asking questions of you but that of clearing up my own
difficulties. For I think that Homer was very right in saying that

      When two go together, one sees before the other,

for all men who have a companion are readier in deed, word, or
thought; but if a man

          Sees a thing when he is alone,

he goes about straightway seeking until he finds some one to whom he
may show his discoveries, and who may confirm him in them. And I would
rather hold discourse with you than with any one, because I think that
no man has a better understanding of most things which a good man
may be expected to understand, and in particular of virtue. For who is
there, but you?-who not only claim to be a good man and a gentleman,
for many are this, and yet have not the power of making others good
whereas you are not only good yourself, but also the cause of goodness
in others. Moreover such confidence have you in yourself, that
although other Sophists conceal their profession, you proclaim in
the face of Hellas that you are a Sophist or teacher of virtue and
education, and are the first who demanded pay in return. How then
can I do otherwise than invite you to the examination of these
subjects, and ask questions and consult with you? I must, indeed.
And I should like once more to have my memory refreshed by you about
the questions which I was asking you at first, and also to have your
help in considering them. If I am not mistaken the question was
this: Are wisdom and temperance and courage and justice and holiness
five names of the same thing? or has each of the names a separate
underlying essence and corresponding thing having a peculiar function,
no one of them being like any other of them? And you replied that
the five names were not the names of the same thing, but that each
of them had a separate object, and that all these objects were parts
of virtue, not in the same way that the parts of gold are like each
other and the whole of which they are parts, but as the parts of the
face are unlike the whole of which they are parts and one another, and
have each of them a distinct function. I should like to know whether
this is still your opinion; or if not, I will ask you to define your
meaning, and I shall not take you to task if you now make a
different statement. For I dare say that you may have said what you
did only in order to make trial of me.

  I answer, Socrates, he said, that all these qualities are parts of
virtue, and that four out of the five are to some extent similar,
and that the fifth of them, which is courage, is very different from
the other four, as I prove in this way: You may observe that many
men are utterly unrighteous, unholy, intemperate, ignorant, who are
nevertheless remarkable for their courage.

  Stop, I said; I should like to think about that. When you speak of
brave men, do you mean the confident, or another sort of nature?

  Yes, he said; I mean the impetuous, ready to go at that which others
are afraid to approach.

  In the next place, you would affirm virtue to be a good thing, of
which good thing you assert yourself to be a teacher.

  Yes, he said; I should say the best of all things, if I am in my
right mind.

  And is it partly good and partly bad, I said, or wholly good?

  Wholly good, and in the highest degree.

  Tell me then; who are they who have confidence when diving into a
well?

  I should say, the divers.

  And the reason of this is that they have knowledge?

  Yes, that is the reason.

  And who have confidence when fighting on horseback-the skilled
horseman or the unskilled?

  The skilled.

  And who when fighting with light shields-the peltasts or the
nonpeltasts?

  The peltasts. And that is true of all other things, he said, if that
is your point: those who have knowledge are more confident than
those who have no knowledge, and they are more confident after they
have learned than before.

  And have you not seen persons utterly ignorant, I said, of these
things, and yet confident about them?

  Yes, he said, I have seen such persons far too confident.

  And are not these confident persons also courageous?

  In that case, he replied, courage would be a base thing, for the men
of whom we are speaking are surely madmen.

  Then who are the courageous? Are they not the confident?

  Yes, he said; to that statement I adhere.

  And those, I said, who are thus confident without knowledge are
really not courageous, but mad; and in that case the wisest are also
the most confident, and being the most confident are also the bravest,
and upon that view again wisdom will be courage.

  Nay, Socrates, he replied, you are mistaken in your remembrance of
what was said by me. When you asked me, I certainly did say that the
courageous are the confident; but I was never asked whether the
confident are the courageous; if you had asked me, I should have
answered "Not all of them": and what I did answer you have not
proved to be false, although you proceeded to show that those who have
knowledge are more courageous than they were before they had
knowledge, and more courageous than others who have no knowledge,
and were then led on to think that courage is the same as wisdom.
But in this way of arguing you might come to imagine that strength
is wisdom. You might begin by asking whether the strong are able,
and I should say "Yes"; and then whether those who know how to wrestle
are not more able to wrestle than those who do not know how to
wrestle, and more able after than before they had learned, and I
should assent. And when I had admitted this, you might use my
admissions in such a way as to prove that upon my view wisdom is
strength; whereas in that case I should not have admitted, any more
than in the other, that the able are strong, although I have
admitted that the strong are able. For there is a difference between
ability and strength; the former is given by knowledge as well as by
madness or rage, but strength comes from nature and a healthy state of
the body. And in like manner I say of confidence and courage, that
they are not the same; and I argue that the courageous are
confident, but not all the confident courageous. For confidence may be
given to men by art, and also, like ability, by madness and rage;
but courage comes to them from nature and the healthy state of the
soul.

  I said: You would admit, Protagoras, that some men live well and
others ill?

  He assented.

  And do you think that a man lives well who lives in pain and grief?

  He does not.

  But if he lives pleasantly to the end of his life, will he not in
that case have lived well?

  He will.

  Then to live pleasantly is a good, and to live unpleasantly an evil?

  Yes, he said, if the pleasure be good and honourable.

  And do you, Protagoras, like the rest of the world, call some
pleasant things evil and some painful things good?-for I am rather
disposed to say that things are good in as far as they are pleasant,
if they have no consequences of another sort, and in as far as they
are painful they are bad.

  I do not know, Socrates, he said, whether I can venture to assert in
that unqualified manner that the pleasant is the good and the
painful the evil. Having regard not only to my present answer, but
also to the whole of my life, I shall be safer, if I am not
mistaken, in saying that there are some pleasant things which are
not good, and that there are some painful things which are good, and
some which are not good, and that there are some which are neither
good nor evil.

  And you would call pleasant, I said, the things which participate in
pleasure or create pleasure?

  Certainly, he said.

  Then my meaning is, that in as far as they are pleasant they are
good; and my question would imply that pleasure is a good in itself.

  According to your favourite mode of speech, Socrates, "Let us
reflect about this," he said; and if the reflection is to the point,
and the result proves that pleasure and good are really the same, then
we will agree; but if not, then we will argue.

  And would you wish to begin the enquiry?

  I said; or shall I begin?

  You ought to take the lead, he said; for you are the author of the
discussion.

  May I employ an illustration? I said. Suppose some one who is
enquiring into the health or some other bodily quality of
another:-he looks at his face and at the tips of his fingers, and then
he says, Uncover your chest and back to me that I may have a better
view:-that is the sort of thing which I desire in this speculation.
Having seen what your opinion is about good and pleasure, I am
minded to say to you: Uncover your mind to me, Protagoras, and
reveal your opinion about knowledge, that I may know whether you agree
with the rest of the world. Now the rest of the world are of opinion
that knowledge is a principle not of strength, or of rule, or of
command: their notion is that a man may have knowledge, and yet that
the knowledge which is in him may be overmastered by anger, or
pleasure, or pain, or love, or perhaps by fear,-just as if knowledge
were a slave, and might be dragged about anyhow. Now is that your
view? or do you think that knowledge is a noble and commanding
thing, which cannot be overcome, and will not allow a man, if he
only knows the difference of good and evil, to do anything which is
contrary to knowledge, but that wisdom will have strength to help him?

  I agree with you, Socrates, said Protagoras; and not only so, but I,
above all other men, am bound to say that wisdom and knowledge are the
highest of human things.

  Good, I said, and true. But are you aware that the majority of the
world are of another mind; and that men are commonly supposed to
know the things which are best, and not to do them when they might?
And most persons whom I have asked the reason of this have said that
when men act contrary to knowledge they are overcome by pain, or
pleasure, or some of those affections which I was just now mentioning.

  Yes, Socrates, he replied; and that is not the only point about
which mankind are in error.

  Suppose, then, that you and I endeavour to instruct and inform
them what is the nature of this affection which they call "being
overcome by pleasure," and which they affirm to be the reason why they
do not always do what is best. When we say to them: Friends, you are
mistaken, and are saying what is not true, they would probably
reply: Socrates and Protagoras, if this affection of the soul is not
to be called "being overcome by pleasure," pray, what is it, and by
what name would you describe it?

  But why, Socrates, should we trouble ourselves about the opinion
of the many, who just say anything that happens to occur to them?

  I believe, I said, that they may be of use in helping us to discover
how courage is related to the other parts of virtue. If you are
disposed to abide by our agreement, that I should show the way in
which, as I think, our recent difficulty is most likely to be
cleared up, do you follow; but if not, never mind.

  You are quite right, he said; and I would have you proceed as you
have begun.

  Well then, I said, let me suppose that they repeat their question,
What account do you give of that which, in our way of speaking, is
termed being overcome by pleasure? I should answer thus: Listen, and
Protagoras and I will endeavour to show you. When men are overcome
by eating and drinking and other sensual desires which are pleasant,
and they, knowing them to be evil, nevertheless indulge in them, would
you not say that they were overcome by pleasure? They will not deny
this. And suppose that you and I were to go on and ask them again: "In
what way do you say that they are evil-in that they are pleasant and
give pleasure at the moment, or because they cause disease and poverty
and other like evils in the future? Would they still be evil, if
they had no attendant evil consequences, simply because they give
the consciousness of pleasure of whatever nature?"-Would they not
answer that they are not evil on account of the pleasure which is
immediately given by them, but on account of the after
consequences-diseases and the like?

  I believe, said Protagoras, that the world in general would answer
as you do.

  And in causing diseases do they not cause pain? and in causing
poverty do they not cause pain;-they would agree to that also, if I am
not mistaken?

  Protagoras assented.

  Then I should say to them, in my name and yours: Do you think them
evil for any other reason, except because they end in pain and rob
us of other pleasures:-there again they would agree?

  We both of us thought that they would.

  And then I should take the question from the opposite point of view,
and say: "Friends, when you speak of goods being painful, do you not
mean remedial goods, such as gymnastic exercises, and military
service, and the physician's use of burning, cutting, drugging, and
starving? Are these the things which are good but painful?"-they would
assent to me?

  He agreed.

  "And do you call them good because they occasion the greatest
immediate suffering and pain; or because, afterwards, they bring
health and improvement of the bodily condition and the salvation of
states and power over others and wealth?"-they would agree to the
latter alternative, if I am not mistaken?

  He assented.

  "Are these things good for any other reason except that they end
in pleasure, and get rid of and avert pain? Are you looking to any
other standard but pleasure and pain when you call them good?"-they
would acknowledge that they were not?

  I think so, said Protagoras.

  "And do you not pursue after pleasure as a good, and avoid pain as
an evil?"

  He assented.

  "Then you think that pain is an evil and pleasure is a good: and
even pleasure you deem an evil, when it robs you of greater
pleasures than it gives, or causes pains greater than the pleasure.
If, however, you call pleasure an evil in relation to some other end
or standard, you will be able to show us that standard. But you have
none to show."

  I do not think that they have, said Protagoras.

  "And have you not a similar way of speaking about pain? You call
pain a good when it takes away greater pains than those which it
has, or gives pleasures greater than the pains: then if you have
some standard other than pleasure and pain to which you refer when you
call actual pain a good, you can show what that is. But you cannot."

  True, said Protagoras.

  Suppose again, I said, that the world says to me: "Why do you
spend many words and speak in many ways on this subject?" Excuse me,
friends, I should reply; but in the first place there is a
difficulty in explaining the meaning of the expression "overcome by
pleasure"; and the whole argument turns upon this. And even now, if
you see any possible way in which evil can be explained as other
than pain, or good as other than pleasure, you may still retract.
Are you satisfied, then, at having a life of pleasure which is without
pain? If you are, and if you are unable to show any good or evil which
does not end in pleasure and pain, hear the consequences:-If what
you say is true, then the argument is absurd which affirms that a
man often does evil knowingly, when he might abstain, because he is
seduced and overpowered by pleasure; or again, when you say that a man
knowingly refuses to do what is good because he is overcome at the
moment by pleasure. And that this is ridiculous will be evident if
only we give up the use of various names, such as pleasant and
painful, and good and evil. As there are two things, let us call
them by two names-first, good and evil, and then pleasant and painful.
Assuming this, let us go on to say that a man does evil knowing that
he does evil. But some one will ask, Why? Because he is overcome, is
the first answer. And by what is he overcome? the enquirer will
proceed to ask. And we shall not be able to reply "By pleasure," for
the name of pleasure has been exchanged for that of good. In our
answer, then, we shall only say that he is overcome. "By what?" he
will reiterate. By the good, we shall have to reply; indeed we
shall. Nay, but our questioner will rejoin with a laugh, if he be
one of the swaggering sort, "That is too ridiculous, that a man should
do what he knows to be evil when he ought not, because he is
overcome by good. Is that, he will ask, because the good was worthy or
not worthy of conquering the evil?" And in answer to that we shall
clearly reply, Because it was not worthy; for if it had been worthy,
then he who, as we say, was overcome by pleasure, would not have
been wrong. "But how," he will reply, "can the good be unworthy of the
evil, or the evil of the good?" Is not the real explanation that
they are out of proportion to one another, either as greater and
smaller, or more and fewer? This we cannot deny. And when you speak of
being overcome-"what do you mean," he will say, "but that you choose
the greater evil in exchange for the lesser good?" Admitted. And now
substitute the names of pleasure and pain for good and evil, and
say, not as before, that a man does what is evil knowingly, but that
he does what is painful knowingly, and because he is overcome by
pleasure, which is unworthy to overcome. What measure is there of
the relations of pleasure to pain other than excess and defect,
which means that they become greater and smaller, and more and
fewer, and differ in degree? For if any one says: "Yes, Socrates,
but immediate pleasure differs widely from future pleasure and
pain"-To that I should reply: And do they differ in anything but in
pleasure and pain? There can be no other measure of them. And do
you, like a skilful weigher, put into the balance the pleasures and
the pains, and their nearness and distance, and weigh them, and then
say which outweighs the other. If you weigh pleasures against
pleasures, you of course take the more and greater; or if you weigh
pains against pains, you take the fewer and the less; or if
pleasures against pains, then you choose that course of action in
which the painful is exceeded by the pleasant, whether the distant
by the near or the near by the distant; and you avoid that course of
action in which the pleasant is exceeded by the painful. Would you not
admit, my friends, that this is true? I am confident that they
cannot deny this.

  He agreed with me.

  Well then, I shall say, if you agree so far, be so good as to answer
me a question: Do not the same magnitudes appear larger to your
sight when near, and smaller when at a distance? They will acknowledge
that. And the same holds of thickness and number; also sounds, which
are in themselves equal, are greater when near, and lesser when at a
distance. They will grant that also. Now suppose happiness to
consist in doing or choosing the greater, and in not doing or in
avoiding the less, what would be the saving principle of human life?
Would not the art of measuring be the saving principle; or would the
power of appearance? Is not the latter that deceiving art which
makes us wander up and down and take the things at one time of which
we repent at another, both in our actions and in our choice of
things great and small? But the art of measurement would do away
with the effect of appearances, and, showing the truth, would fain
teach the soul at last to find rest in the truth, and would thus
save our life. Would not mankind generally acknowledge that the art
which accomplishes this result is the art of measurement?

  Yes, he said, the art of measurement.

  Suppose, again, the salvation of human life to depend on the
choice of odd and even, and on the knowledge of when a man ought to
choose the greater or less, either in reference to themselves or to
each other, and whether near or at a distance; what would be the
saving principle of our lives? Would not knowledge?-a knowledge of
measuring, when the question is one of excess and defect, and a
knowledge of number, when the question is of odd and even? The world
will assent, will they not?

  Protagoras himself thought that they would.

  Well then, my friends, I say to them; seeing that the salvation of
human life has been found to consist in the right choice of
pleasures and pains,-in the choice of the more and the fewer, and
the greater and the less, and the nearer and remoter, must not this
measuring be a consideration of their excess and defect and equality
in relation to each other?

  This is undeniably true.

  And this, as possessing measure, must undeniably also be an art
and science?

  They will agree, he said.

  The nature of that art or science will be a matter of future
consideration; but the existence of such a science furnishes a
demonstrative answer to the question which you asked of me and
Protagoras. At the time when you asked the question, if you
remember, both of us were agreeing that there was nothing mightier
than knowledge, and that knowledge, in whatever existing, must have
the advantage over pleasure and all other things; and then you said
that pleasure often got the advantage even over a man who has
knowledge; and we refused to allow this, and you rejoined: O
Protagoras and Socrates, what is the meaning of being overcome by
pleasure if not this?-tell us what you call such a state:-if we had
immediately and at the time answered "Ignorance," you would have
laughed at us. But now, in laughing at us, you will be laughing at
yourselves: for you also admitted that men err in their choice of
pleasures and pains; that is, in their choice of good and evil, from
defect of knowledge; and you admitted further, that they err, not only
from defect of knowledge in general, but of that particular
knowledge which is called measuring. And you are also aware that the
erring act which is done without knowledge is done in ignorance. This,
therefore, is the meaning of being overcome by pleasure;-ignorance,
and that the greatest. And our friends Protagoras and Prodicus and
Hippias declare that they are the physicians of ignorance; but you,
who are under the mistaken impression that ignorance is not the cause,
and that the art of which I am speaking cannot be taught, neither go
yourselves, nor send your children, to the Sophists, who are the
teachers of these things-you take care of your money and give them
none; and the result is, that you are the worse off both in public and
private life:-Let us suppose this to be our answer to the world in
general: And now I should like to ask you, Hippias, and you, Prodicus,
as well as Protagoras (for the argument is to be yours as well as
ours), whether you think that I am speaking the truth or not?

  They all thought that what I said was entirely true.

  Then you agree, I said, that the pleasant is the good, and the
painful evil. And here I would beg my friend Prodicus not to introduce
his distinction of names, whether he is disposed to say pleasurable,
delightful, joyful. However, by whatever name he prefers to call them,
I will ask you, most excellent Prodicus, to answer in my sense of
the words.

  Prodicus laughed and assented, as did the others.

  Then, my friends, what do you say to this? Are not all actions
honourable and useful, of which the tendency is to make life
painless and pleasant? The honourable work is also useful and good?

  This was admitted.

  Then, I said, if the pleasant is the good, nobody does anything
under the idea or conviction that some other thing would be better and
is also attainable, when he might do the better. And this
inferiority of a man to himself is merely ignorance, as the
superiority of a man to himself is wisdom.

  They all assented.

  And is not ignorance the having a false opinion and being deceived
about important matters?

  To this also they unanimously assented.

  Then, I said, no man voluntarily pursues evil, or that which he
thinks to be evil. To prefer evil to good is not in human nature;
and when a man is compelled to choose one of two evils, no one will
choose the greater when he may have the less.

  All of us agreed to every word of this.

  Well, I said, there is a certain thing called fear or terror; and
here, Prodicus, I should particularly like to know whether you would
agree with me in defining this fear or terror as expectation of evil.

  Protagoras and Hippias agreed, but Prodicus said that this was
fear and not terror.

  Never mind, Prodicus, I said; but let me ask whether, if our
former assertions are true, a man will pursue that which he fears when
he is not compelled? Would not this be in flat contradiction to the
admission which has been already made, that he thinks the things which
he fears to be evil; and no one will pursue or voluntarily accept that
which he thinks to be evil?

  That also was universally admitted.

  Then, I said, these, Hippias and Prodicus, are our premisses; and
I would beg Protagoras to explain to us how he can be right in what he
said at first. I do not mean in what he said quite at first, for his
first statement, as you may remember, was that whereas there were five
parts of virtue none of them was like any other of them; each of
them had a separate function. To this, however, I am not referring,
but to the assertion which he afterwards made that of the five virtues
four were nearly akin to each other, but that the fifth, which was
courage, differed greatly from the others. And of this he gave me
the following proof. He said: You will find, Socrates, that some of
the most impious, and unrighteous, and intemperate, and ignorant of
men are among the most courageous; which proves that courage is very
different from the other parts of virtue. I was surprised at his
saying this at the time, and I am still more surprised now that I have
discussed the matter with you. So I asked him whether by the brave
he meant the confident. Yes, he replied, and the impetuous or goers.
(You may remember, Protagoras, that this was your answer.)

  He assented.

  Well then, I said, tell us against what are the courageous ready
to go-against the same dangers as the cowards?

  No, he answered.

  Then against something different?

  Yes, he said.

  Then do cowards go where there is safety, and the courageous where
there is danger?

  Yes, Socrates, so men say.

  Very true, I said. But I want to know against what do you say that
the courageous are ready to go-against dangers, believing them to be
dangers, or not against dangers?

  No, said he; the former case has been proved by you in the
previous argument to be impossible.

  That, again, I replied, is quite true. And if this has been
rightly proven, then no one goes to meet what he thinks to be dangers,
since the want of self-control, which makes men rush into dangers, has
been shown to be ignorance.

  He assented.

  And yet the courageous man and the coward alike go to meet that
about which they are confident; so that, in this point of view, the
cowardly and the courageous go to meet the same things.

  And yet, Socrates, said Protagoras, that to which the coward goes is
the opposite of that to which the courageous goes; the one, for
example, is ready to go to battle, and the other is not ready.

  And is going to battle honourable or disgraceful? I said.

  Honourable, he replied.

  And if honourable, then already admitted by us to be good; for all
honourable actions we have admitted to be good.

  That is true; and to that opinion I shall always adhere.

  True, I said. But which of the two are they who, as you say, are
unwilling to go to war, which is a good and honourable thing?

  The cowards, he replied.

  And what is good and honourable, I said, is also pleasant?

  It has certainly been acknowledged to be so, he replied.

  And do the cowards knowingly refuse to go to the nobler, and
pleasanter, and better?

  The admission of that, he replied, would belie our former
admissions.

  But does not the courageous man also go to meet the better, and
pleasanter, and nobler?

  That must be admitted.

  And the courageous man has no base fear or base confidence?

  True, he replied.

  And if not base, then honourable?

  He admitted this.

  And if honourable, then good?

  Yes.

  But the fear and confidence of the coward or foolhardy or madman, on
the contrary, are base?

  He assented.

  And these base fears and confidences originate in ignorance and
uninstructedness?

  True, he said.

  Then as to the motive from which the cowards act, do you call it
cowardice or courage?

  I should say cowardice, he replied.

  And have they not been shown to be cowards through their ignorance
of dangers?

  Assuredly, he said.

  And because of that ignorance they are cowards?

  He assented.

  And the reason why they are cowards is admitted by you to be
cowardice?

  He again assented.

  Then the ignorance of what is and is not dangerous is cowardice?

  He nodded assent.

  But surely courage, I said, is opposed to cowardice?

  Yes.

  Then the wisdom which knows what are and are not dangers is
opposed to the ignorance of them?

  To that again he nodded assent.

  And the ignorance of them is cowardice?

  To that he very reluctantly nodded assent.

  And the knowledge of that which is and is not dangerous is
courage, and is opposed to the ignorance of these things?

  At this point he would no longer nod assent, but was silent.

  And why, I said, do you neither assent nor dissent, Protagoras?

  Finish the argument by yourself, he said.

  I only want to ask one more question, I said. I want to know whether
you still think that there are men who are most ignorant and yet
most courageous?

  You seem to have a great ambition to make me answer, Socrates, and
therefore I will gratify you, and say, that this appears to me to be
impossible consistently with the argument.

  My only object, I said, in continuing the discussion, has been the
desire to ascertain the nature and relations of virtue; for if this
were clear, I am very sure that the other controversy which has been
carried on at great length by both of us-you affirming and I denying
that virtue can be taught-would also become clear. The result of our
discussion appears to me to be singular. For if the argument had a
human voice, that voice would be heard laughing at us and saying:
"Protagoras and Socrates, you are strange beings; there are you,
Socrates, who were saying that virtue cannot be taught,
contradicting yourself now by your attempt to prove that all things
are knowledge, including justice, and temperance, and courage,-which
tends to show that virtue can certainly be taught; for if virtue
were other than knowledge, as Protagoras attempted to prove, then
clearly virtue cannot be taught; but if virtue is entirely
knowledge, as you are seeking to show, then I cannot but suppose
that virtue is capable of being taught. Protagoras, on the other hand,
who started by saying that it might be taught, is now eager to prove
it to be anything rather than knowledge; and if this is true, it
must be quite incapable of being taught." Now I, Protagoras,
perceiving this terrible confusion of our ideas, have a great desire
that they should be cleared up. And I should like to carry on the
discussion until we ascertain what virtue is, whether capable of being
taught or not, lest haply Epimetheus should trip us up and deceive
us in the argument, as he forgot us in the story; I prefer your
Prometheus to your Epimetheus, for of him I make use, whenever I am
busy about these questions, in Promethean care of my own life. And
if you have no objection, as I said at first, I should like to have
your help in the enquiry.

  Protagoras replied: Socrates, I am not of a base nature, and I am
the last man in the world to be envious. I cannot but applaud your
energy and your conduct of an argument. As I have often said, I admire
you above all men whom I know, and far above all men of your age;
and I believe that you will become very eminent in philosophy. Let
us come back to the subject at some future time; at present we had
better turn to something else.

  By all means, I said, if that is your wish; for I too ought long
since to have kept the engagement of which I spoke before, and only
tarried because I could not refuse the request of the noble Callias.
So the conversation ended, and we went our way.

                             -THE END-


  PLATO TO THE RELATIVES AND FRIENDS OF DION. WELFARE.

  You write to me that I must consider your views the same as those of
Dion, and you urge me to aid your cause so far as I can in word and
deed. My answer is that, if you have the same opinion and desire as he
had, I consent to aid your cause; but if not, I shall think more
than once about it. Now what his purpose and desire was, I can
inform you from no mere conjecture but from positive knowledge. For
when I made my first visit to Sicily, being then about forty years
old, Dion was of the same age as Hipparinos is now, and the opinion
which he then formed was that which he always retained, I mean the
belief that the Syracusans ought to be free and governed by the best
laws. So it is no matter for surprise if some God should make
Hipparinos adopt the same opinion as Dion about forms of government.
But it is well worth while that you should all, old as well as
young, hear the way in which this opinion was formed, and I will
attempt to give you an account of it from the beginning. For the
present is a suitable opportunity.

  In my youth I went through the same experience as many other men.
I fancied that if, early in life, I became my own master, I should
at once embark on a political career. And I found myself confronted
with the following occurrences in the public affairs of my own city.
The existing constitution being generally condemned, a revolution took
place, and fifty-one men came to the front as rulers of the
revolutionary government, namely eleven in the city and ten in the
Peiraeus-each of these bodies being in charge of the market and
municipal matters-while thirty were appointed rulers with full
powers over public affairs as a whole. Some of these were relatives
and acquaintances of mine, and they at once invited me to share in
their doings, as something to which I had a claim. The effect on me
was not surprising in the case of a young man. I considered that
they would, of course, so manage the State as to bring men out of a
bad way of life into a good one. So I watched them very closely to see
what they would do.

  And seeing, as I did, that in quite a short time they made the
former government seem by comparison something precious as gold-for
among other things they tried to send a friend of mine, the aged
Socrates, whom I should scarcely scruple to describe as the most
upright man of that day, with some other persons to carry off one of
the citizens by force to execution, in order that, whether he wished
it, or not, he might share the guilt of their conduct; but he would
not obey them, risking all consequences in preference to becoming a
partner in their iniquitous deeds-seeing all these things and others
of the same kind on a considerable scale, I disapproved of their
proceedings, and withdrew from any connection with the abuses of the
time.

  Not long after that a revolution terminated the power of the
thirty and the form of government as it then was. And once more,
though with more hesitation, I began to be moved by the desire to take
part in public and political affairs. Well, even in the new
government, unsettled as it was, events occurred which one would
naturally view with disapproval; and it was not surprising that in a
period of revolution excessive penalties were inflicted by some
persons on political opponents, though those who had returned from
exile at that time showed very considerable forbearance. But once more
it happened that some of those in power brought my friend Socrates,
whom I have mentioned, to trial before a court of law, laying a most
iniquitous charge against him and one most inappropriate in his
case: for it was on a charge of impiety that some of them prosecuted
and others condemned and executed the very man who would not
participate in the iniquitous arrest of one of the friends of the
party then in exile, at the time when they themselves were in exile
and misfortune.

  As I observed these incidents and the men engaged in public affairs,
the laws too and the customs, the more closely I examined them and the
farther I advanced in life, the more difficult it seemed to me to
handle public affairs aright. For it was not possible to be active
in politics without friends and trustworthy supporters; and to find
these ready to my hand was not an easy matter, since public affairs at
Athens were not carried on in accordance with the manners and
practices of our fathers; nor was there any ready method by which I
could make new friends. The laws too, written and unwritten, were
being altered for the worse, and the evil was growing with startling
rapidity. The result was that, though at first I had been full of a
strong impulse towards political life, as I looked at the course of
affairs and saw them being swept in all directions by contending
currents, my head finally began to swim; and, though I did not stop
looking to see if there was any likelihood of improvement in these
symptoms and in the general course of public life, I postponed
action till a suitable opportunity should arise. Finally, it became
clear to me, with regard to all existing cornmunities, that they
were one and all misgoverned. For their laws have got into a state
that is almost incurable, except by some extraordinary reform with
good luck to support it. And I was forced to say, when praising true
philosophy that it is by this that men are enabled to see what justice
in public and private life really is. Therefore, I said, there will be
no cessation of evils for the sons of men, till either those who are
pursuing a right and true philosophy receive sovereign power in the
States, or those in power in the States by some dispensation of
providence become true philosophers.

  With these thoughts in my mind I came to Italy and Sicily on my
first visit. My first impressions on arrival were those of strong
disapproval-disapproval of the kind of life which was there called the
life of happiness, stuffed full as it was with the banquets of the
Italian Greeks and Syracusans, who ate to repletion twice every day,
and were never without a partner for the night; and disapproval of the
habits which this manner of life produces. For with these habits
formed early in life, no man under heaven could possibly attain to
wisdom-human nature is not capable of such an extraordinary
combination. Temperance also is out of the question for such a man;
and the same applies to virtue generally. No city could remain in a
state of tranquillity under any laws whatsoever, when men think it
right to squander all their property in extravagant, and consider it a
duty to be idle in everything else except eating and drinking and
the laborious prosecution of debauchery. It follows necessarily that
the constitutions of such cities must be constantly changing,
tyrannies, oligarchies and democracies succeeding one another, while
those who hold the power cannot so much as endure the name of any form
of government which maintains justice and equality of rights.

  With a mind full of these thoughts, on the top of my previous
convictions, I crossed over to Syracuse-led there perhaps by
chance-but it really looks as if some higher power was even then
planning to lay a foundation for all that has now come to pass with
regard to Dion and Syracuse-and for further troubles too, I fear,
unless you listen to the advice which is now for the second time
offered by me. What do I mean by saying that my arrival in Sicily at
that movement proved to be the foundation on which all the sequel
rests? I was brought into close intercourse with Dion who was then a
young man, and explained to him my views as to the ideals at which men
should aim, advising him to carry them out in practice. In doing
this I seem to have been unaware that I was, in a fashion, without
knowing it, contriving the overthrow of the tyranny which;
subsequently took place. For Dion, who rapidly assimilated my teaching
as he did all forms of knowledge, listened to me with an eagerness
which I had never seen equalled in any young man, and resolved to live
for the future in a better way than the majority of Italian and
Sicilian Greeks, having set his affection on virtue in preference to
pleasure and self-indulgence. The result was that until the death of
Dionysios he lived in a way which rendered him somewhat unpopular
among those whose manner of life was that which is usual in the courts
of despots.

  After that event he came to the conclusion that this conviction,
which he himself had gained under the influence of good teaching,
was not likely to be confined to himself. Indeed, he saw it being
actually implanted in other minds-not many perhaps, but certainly in
some; and he thought that with the aid of the Gods, Dionysios might
perhaps become one of these, and that, if such a thing did come to
pass, the result would be a life of unspeakable happiness both for
himself and for the rest of the Syracusans. Further, he thought it
essential that I should come to Syracuse by all manner of means and
with the utmost possible speed to be his partner in these plans,
remembering in his own case how readily intercourse with me had
produced in him a longing for the noblest and best life. And if it
should produce a similar effect on Dionysios, as his aim was that it
should, he had great hope that, without bloodshed, loss of life, and
those disastrous events which have now taken place, he would be able
to introduce the true life of happiness throughout the whole
territory.

  Holding these sound views, Dion persuaded Dionysios to send for
me; he also wrote himself entreating me to come by all manner of means
and with the utmost possible speed, before certain other persons
coming in contact with Dionysios should turn him aside into some way
of life other than the best. What he said, though perhaps it is rather
long to repeat, was as follows: "What opportunities," he said,
"shall we wait for, greater than those now offered to us by
Providence?" And he described the Syracusan empire in Italy and
Sicily, his own influential position in it, and the youth of Dionysios
and how strongly his desire was directed towards philosophy and
education. His own nephews and relatives, he said, would be readily
attracted towards the principles and manner of life described by me,
and would be most influential in attracting Dionysios in the same
direction, so that, now if ever, we should see the accomplishment of
every hope that the same persons might actually become both
philosophers and the rulers of great States. These were the appeals
addressed to me and much more to the same effect.

  My own opinion, so far as the young men were concerned, and the
probable line which their conduct would take, was full of
apprehension-for young men are quick in forming desires, which often
take directions conflicting with one another. But I knew that the
character of Dion's mind was naturally a stable one and had also the
advantage of somewhat advanced years.

  Therefore, I pondered the matter and was in two minds as to
whether I ought to listen to entreaties and go, or how I ought to act;
and finally the scale turned in favour of the view that, if ever
anyone was to try to carry out in practice my ideas about laws and
constitutions, now was the time for making the attempt; for if only
I could fully convince one man, I should have secured thereby the
accomplishment of all good things.

  With these views and thus nerved to the task, I sailed from home, in
the spirit which some imagined, but principally through a feeling of
shame with regard to myself, lest I might some day appear to myself
wholly and solely a mere man of words, one who would never of his
own will lay his hand to any act. Also there was reason to think
that I should be betraying first and foremost my friendship and
comradeship with Dion, who in very truth was in a position of
considerable danger. If therefore anything should happen to him, or if
he were banished by Dionysios and his other enemies and coming to us
as exile addressed this question to me: "Plato, I have come to you
as a fugitive, not for want of hoplites, nor because I had no
cavalry for defence against my enemies, but for want of words and
power of persuasion, which I knew to be a special gift of yours,
enabling you to lead young men into the path of goodness and
justice, and to establish in every case relations of friendship and
comradeship among them. It is for the want of this assistance on
your part that I have left Syracuse and am here now. And the
disgrace attaching to your treatment of me is a small matter. But
philosophy-whose praises you are always singing, while you say she
is held in dishonour by the rest of mankind-must we not say that
philosophy along with me has now been betrayed, so far as your
action was concerned? Had I been living at Megara, you would certainly
have come to give me your aid towards the objects for which I asked
it; or you would have thought yourself the most contemptible of
mankind. But as it is, do you think that you will escape the
reputation of cowardice by making excuses about the distance of the
journey, the length of the sea voyage, and the amount of labour
involved? Far from it." To reproaches of this kind what creditable
reply could I have made? Surely none.

  I took my departure, therefore, acting, so far as a man can act,
in obedience to reason and justice, and for these reasons leaving my
own occupations, which were certainly not discreditable ones, to put
myself under a tyranny which did not seem likely to harmonise with
my teaching or with myself. By my departure I secured my own freedom
from the displeasure of Zeus Xenios, and made myself clear of any
charge on the part of philosophy, which would have been exposed to
detraction, if any disgrace had come upon me for faint-heartedness and
cowardice.

  On my arrival, to cut a long story short, I found the court of
Dionysios full of intrigues and of attempts to create in the sovereign
ill-feeling against Dion. I combated these as far as I could, but with
very little success; and in the fourth month or thereabouts,
charging Dion with conspiracy to seize the throne, Dionysios put him
on board a small boat and expelled him from Syracuse with ignominy.
All of us who were Dion's friends were afraid that he might take
vengeance on one or other of us as an accomplice in Dion's conspiracy.
With regard to me, there was even a rumour current in Syracuse that
I had been put to death by Dionysios as the cause of all that had
occurred. Perceiving that we were all in this state of mind and
apprehending that our fears might lead to some serious consequence, he
now tried to win all of us over by kindness: me in particular he
encouraged, bidding me be of good cheer and entreating me on all
grounds to remain. For my flight from him was not likely to redound to
his credit, but my staying might do so. Therefore, he made a great
pretence of entreating me. And we know that the entreaties of
sovereigns are mixed with compulsion. So to secure his object he
proceeded to render my departure impossible, bringing me into the
acropolis, and establishing me in quarters from which not a single
ship's captain would have taken me away against the will of Dionysios,
nor indeed without a special messenger sent by him to order my
removal. Nor was there a single merchant, or a single official in
charge of points of departure from the country, who would have allowed
me to depart unaccompanied, and would not have promptly seized me
and taken me back to Dionysios, especially since a statement had now
been circulated contradicting the previous rumours and giving out that
Dionysios was becoming extraordinarily attached to Plato. What were
the facts about this attachment? I must tell the truth. As time went
on, and as intercourse made him acquainted with my disposition and
character, he did become more and more attached to me, and wished me
to praise him more than I praised Dion, and to look upon him as more
specially my friend than Dion, and he was extraordinarily eager
about this sort of thing. But when confronted with the one way in
which this might have been done, if it was to be done at all, he
shrank from coming into close and intimate relations with me as a
pupil and listener to my discourses on philosophy, fearing the
danger suggested by mischief-makers, that he might be ensnared, and so
Dion would prove to have accomplished all his object. I endured all
this patiently, retaining the purpose with which I had come and the
hope that he might come to desire the philosophic life. But his
resistance prevailed against me.

  The time of my first visit to Sicily and my stay there was taken
up with all these incidents. On a later occasion I left home and again
came on an urgent summons from Dionysios. But before giving the
motives and particulars of my conduct then and showing how suitable
and right it was, I must first, in order that I may not treat as the
main point what is only a side issue, give you my advice as to what
your acts should be in the present position of affairs; afterwards, to
satisfy those who put the question why I came a second time, I will
deal fully with the facts about my second visit; what I have now to
say is this.

  He who advises a sick man, whose manner of life is prejudicial to
health, is clearly bound first of all to change his patient's manner
of life, and if the patient is willing to obey him, he may go on to
give him other advice. But if he is not willing, I shall consider
one who declines to advise such a patient to be a man and a physician,
and one who gives in to him to be unmanly and unprofessional. In the
same way with regard to a State, whether it be under a single ruler or
more than one, if, while the government is being carried on
methodically and in a right course, it asks advice about any details
of policy, it is the part of a wise man to advise such people. But
when men are travelling altogether outside the path of right
government and flatly refuse to move in the right path, and start by
giving notice to their adviser that he must leave the government alone
and make no change in it under penalty of death-if such men should
order their counsellors to pander to their wishes and desires and to
advise them in what way their object may most readily and easily be
once for all accomplished, I should consider as unmanly one who
accepts the duty of giving such forms of advice, and one who refuses
it to be a true man.

  Holding these views, whenever anyone consults me about any of the
weightiest matters affecting his own life, as, for instance, the
acquisition of property or the proper treatment of body or mind, if it
seems to me that his daily life rests on any system, or if he seems
likely to listen to advice about the things on which he consults me, I
advise him with readiness, and do not content myself with giving him a
merely perfunctory answer. But if a man does not consult me at all, or
evidently does not intend to follow my advice, I do not take the
initiative in advising such a man, and will not use compulsion to him,
even if he be my own son. I would advise a slave under such
circumstances, and would use compulsion to him if he were unwilling.
To a father or mother I do not think that piety allows one to offer
compulsion, unless they are suffering from an attack of insanity;
and if they are following any regular habits of life which please them
but do not please me, I would not offend them by offering useless,
advice, nor would I flatter them or truckle to them, providing them
with the means of satisfying desires which I myself would sooner die
than cherish. The wise man should go through life with the same
attitude of mind towards his country. If she should appear to him to
be following a policy which is not a good one, he should say so,
provided that his words are not likely either to fall on deaf ears
or to lead to the loss of his own life. But force against his native
land he should not use in order to bring about a change of
constitution, when it is not possible for the best constitution to
be introduced without driving men into exile or putting them to death;
he should keep quiet and offer up prayers for his own welfare and
for that of his country.

  These are the principles in accordance with which I should advise
you, as also, jointly with Dion, I advised Dionysios, bidding him in
the first place to live his daily life in a way that would make him as
far as possible master of himself and able to gain faithful friends
and supporters, in order that he might not have the same experience as
his father. For his father, having taken under his rule many great
cities of Sicily which had been utterly destroyed by the barbarians,
was not able to found them afresh and to establish in them trustworthy
governments carried on by his own supporters, either by men who had no
ties of blood with him, or by his brothers whom he had brought up when
they were younger, and had raised from humble station to high office
and from poverty to immense wealth. Not one of these was he able to
work upon by persuasion, instruction, services and ties of kindred, so
as to make him a partner in his rule; and he showed himself inferior
to Darius with a sevenfold inferiority. For Darius did not put his
trust in brothers or in men whom he had brought up, but only in his
confederates in the overthrow of the Mede and Eunuch; and to these
he assigned portions of his empire, seven in number, each of them
greater than all Sicily; and they were faithful to him and did not
attack either him or one another. Thus he showed a pattern of what the
good lawgiver and king ought to be; for he drew up laws by which he
has secured the Persian empire in safety down to the present time.

  Again, to give another instance, the Athenians took under their rule
very many cities not founded by themselves, which had been hard hit by
the barbarians but were still in existence, and maintained their
rule over these for seventy years, because they had in each them men
whom they could trust. But Dionysios, who had gathered the whole of
Sicily into a single city, and was so clever that he trusted no one,
only secured his own safety with great difficulty. For he was badly
off for trustworthy friends; and there is no surer criterion of virtue
and vice than this, whether a man is or is not destitute of such
friends.

  This, then, was the advice which Dion and I gave to Dionysios,
since, owing to bringing up which he had received from his father,
he had had no advantages in the way of education or of suitable
lessons, in the first place...; and, in the second place, that,
after starting in this way, he should make friends of others among his
connections who were of the same age and were in sympathy with his
pursuit of virtue, but above all that he should be in harmony with
himself; for this it was of which he was remarkably in need. This we
did not say in plain words, for that would not have been safe; but
in covert language we maintained that every man in this way would save
both himself and those whom he was leading, and if he did not follow
this path, he would do just the opposite of this. And after proceeding
on the course which we described, and making himself a wise and
temperate man, if he were then to found again the cities of Sicily
which had been laid waste, and bind them together by laws and
constitutions, so as to be loyal to him and to one another in their
resistance to the attacks of the barbarians, he would, we told him,
make his father's empire not merely double what it was but many
times greater. For, if these things were done, his way would be
clear to a more complete subjugation of the Carthaginians than that
which befell them in Gelon's time, whereas in our own day his father
had followed the opposite course of levying attribute for the
barbarians. This was the language and these the exhortations given
by us, the conspirators against Dionysios according to the charges
circulated from various sources-charges which, prevailing as they
did with Dionysios, caused the expulsion of Dion and reduced me to a
state of apprehension. But when-to summarise great events which
happened in no great time-Dion returned from the Peloponnese and
Athens, his advice to Dionysios took the form of action.

  To proceed-when Dion had twice over delivered the city and
restored it to the citizens, the Syracusans went through the same
changes of feeling towards him as Dionysios had gone through, when
Dion attempted first to educate him and train him to be a sovereign
worthy of supreme power and, when that was done, to be his coadjutor
in all the details of his career. Dionysios listened to those who
circulated slanders to the effect that Dion was aiming at the
tyranny in all the steps which he took at that time his intention
being that Dionysios, when his mind had fallen under the spell of
culture, should neglect the government and leave it in his hands,
and that he should then appropriate it for himself and treacherously
depose Dionysios. These slanders were victorious on that occasion;
they were so once more when circulated among the Syracusans, winning a
victory which took an extraordinary course and proved disgraceful to
its authors. The story of what then took place is one which deserves
careful attention on the part of those who are inviting me to deal
with the present situation.

  I, an Athenian and friend of Dion, came as his ally to the court
of Dionysios, in order that I might create good will in place of a
state war; in my conflict with the authors of these slanders I was
worsted. When Dionysios tried to persuade me by offers of honours
and wealth to attach myself to him, and with a view to giving a decent
colour to Dion's expulsion a witness and friend on his side, he failed
completely in his attempt. Later on, when Dion returned from exile, he
took with him from Athens two brothers, who had been his friends,
not from community in philosophic study, but with the ordinary
companionship common among most friends, which they form as the result
of relations of hospitality and the intercourse which occurs when
one man initiates the other in the mysteries. It was from this kind of
intercourse and from services connected with his return that these two
helpers in his restoration became his companions. Having come to
Sicily, when they perceived that Dion had been misrepresented to the
Sicilian Greeks, whom he had liberated, as one that plotted to
become monarch, they not only betrayed their companion and friend, but
shared personally in the guilt of his murder, standing by his
murderers as supporters with weapons in their hands. The guilt and
impiety of their conduct I neither excuse nor do I dwell upon it.
For many others make it their business to harp upon it, and will
make it their business in the future. But I do take exception to the
statement that, because they were Athenians, they have brought shame
upon this city. For I say that he too is an Athenian who refused to
betray this same Dion, when he had the offer of riches and many
other honours. For his was no common or vulgar friendship, but
rested on community in liberal education, and this is the one thing in
which a wise man will put his trust, far more than in ties of personal
and bodily kinship. So the two murderers of Dion were not of
sufficient importance to be causes of disgrace to this city, as though
they had been men of any note.

  All this has been said with a view to counselling the friends and
family of Dion. And in addition to this I give for the third time to
you the same advice and counsel which I have given twice before to
others-not to enslave Sicily or any other State to despots-this my
counsel but-to put it under the rule of laws-for the other course is
better neither for the enslavers nor for the enslaved, for themselves,
their children's children and descendants; the attempt is in every way
fraught with disaster. It is only small and mean natures that are bent
upon seizing such gains for themselves, natures that know nothing of
goodness and justice, divine as well as human, in this life and in the
next.

  These are the lessons which I tried to teach, first to Dion,
secondly to Dionysios, and now for the third time to you. Do you
obey me thinking of Zeus the Preserver, the patron of third
ventures, and looking at the lot of Dionysios and Dion, of whom the
one who disobeyed me is living in dishonour, while he who obeyed me
has died honourably. For the one thing which is wholly right and noble
is to strive for that which is most honourable for a man's self and
for his country, and to face the consequences whatever they may be.
For none of us can escape death, nor, if a man could do so, would
it, as the vulgar suppose, make him happy. For nothing evil or good,
which is worth mentioning at all, belongs to things soulless; but good
or evil will be the portion of every soul, either while attached to
the body or when separated from it.

  And we should in very truth always believe those ancient and
sacred teachings, which declare that the soul is immortal, that it has
judges, and suffers the greatest penalties when it has been
separated from the body. Therefore also we should consider it a lesser
evil to suffer great wrongs and outrages than to do them. The covetous
man, impoverished as he is in the soul, turns a deaf ear to this
teaching; or if he hears it, he laughs it to scorn with fancied
superiority, and shamelessly snatches for himself from every source
whatever his bestial fancy supposes will provide for him the means
of eating or drinking or glutting himself with that slavish and
gross pleasure which is falsely called after the goddess of love. He
is blind and cannot see in those acts of plunder which are accompanied
by impiety what heinous guilt is attached to each wrongful deed, and
that the offender must drag with him the burden of this impiety
while he moves about on earth, and when he has travelled beneath the
earth on a journey which has every circumstance of shame and misery.

  It was by urging these and other like truths that I convinced
Dion, and it is I who have the best right to be angered with his
murderers in much the same way as I have with Dionysios. For both they
and he have done the greatest injury to me, and I might almost say
to all mankind, they by slaying the man that was willing to act
righteously, and he by refusing to act righteously during the whole of
his rule, when he held supreme power, in which rule if philosophy
and power had really met together, it would have sent forth a light to
all men, Greeks and barbarians, establishing fully for all the true
belief that there can be no happiness either for the community or
for the individual man, unless he passes his life under the rule of
righteousness with the guidance of wisdom, either possessing these
virtues in himself, or living under the rule of godly men and having
received a right training and education in morals. These were the aims
which Dionysios injured, and for me everything else is a trifling
injury compared with this.

  The murderer of Dion has, without knowing it, done the same as
Dionysios. For as regards Dion, I know right well, so far as it is
possible for a man to say anything positively about other men, that,
if he had got the supreme power, he would never have turned his mind
to any other form of rule, but that, dealing first with Syracuse,
his own native land, when he had made an end of her slavery, clothed
her in bright apparel, and given her the garb of freedom, he would
then by every means in his power have ordered aright the lives of
his fellow-citizens by suitable and excellent laws; and the thing next
in order, which he would have set his heart to accomplish, was to
found again all the States of Sicily and make them free from the
barbarians, driving out some and subduing others, an easier task for
him than it was for Hiero. If these things had been accomplished by
a man who was just and brave and temperate and a philosopher, the same
belief with regard to virtue would have been established among the
majority which, if Dionysios had been won over, would have been
established, I might almost say, among all mankind and would have
given them salvation. But now some higher power or avenging fiend
has fallen upon them, inspiring them with lawlessness, godlessness and
acts of recklessness issuing from ignorance, the seed from which all
evils for all mankind take root and grow and will in future bear the
bitterest harvest for those who brought them into being. This
ignorance it was which in that second venture wrecked and ruined
everything.

  And now, for good luck's sake, let us on this third venture
abstain from words of ill omen. But, nevertheless, I advise you, his
friends, to imitate in Dion his love for his country and his temperate
habits of daily life, and to try with better auspices to carry out his
wishes-what these were, you have heard from me in plain words. And
whoever among you cannot live the simple Dorian life according to
the customs of your forefathers, but follows the manner of life of
Dion's murderers and of the Sicilians, do not invite this man to
join you, or expect him to do any loyal or salutary act; but invite
all others to the work of resettling all the States of Sicily and
establishing equality under the laws, summoning them from Sicily
itself and from the whole Peloponnese-and have no fear even of Athens;
for there, also, are men who excel all mankind in their devotion to
virtue and in hatred of the reckless acts of those who shed the
blood of friends.

  But if, after all, this is work for a future time, whereas immediate
action is called for by the disorders of all sorts and kinds which
arise every day from your state of civil strife, every man to whom
Providence has given even a moderate share of right intelligence ought
to know that in times of civil strife there is no respite from trouble
till the victors make an end of feeding their grudge by combats and
banishments and executions, and of wreaking their vengeance on their
enemies. They should master themselves and, enacting impartial laws,
framed not to gratify themselves more than the conquered party, should
compel men to obey these by two restraining forces, respect and
fear; fear, because they are the masters and can display superior
force; respect, because they rise superior to pleasures and are
willing and able to be servants to the laws. There is no other way
save this for terminating the troubles of a city that is in a state of
civil strife; but a constant continuance of internal disorders,
struggles, hatred and mutual distrust is the common lot of cities
which are in that plight.

  Therefore, those who have for the time being gained the upper
hand, when they desire to secure their position, must by their own act
and choice select from all Hellas men whom they have ascertained to be
the best for the purpose. These must in the first place be men of
mature years, who have children and wives at home, and, as far as
possible, a long line of ancestors of good repute, and all must be
possessed of sufficient property. For a city of ten thousand
householders their numbers should be fifty; that is enough. These they
must induce to come from their own homes by entreaties and the promise
of the highest honours; and having induced them to come they must
entreat and command them to draw up laws after binding themselves by
oath to show no partiality either to conquerors or to conquered, but
to give equal and common rights to the whole State.

  When laws have been enacted, what everything then hinges on is this.
If the conquerors show more obedience to the laws than the
conquered, the whole State will be full of security and happiness, and
there will be an escape from all your troubles. But if they do not,
then do not summon me or any other helper to aid you against those who
do not obey the counsel I now give you. For this course is akin to
that which Dion and I attempted to carry out with our hearts set on
the welfare of Syracuse. It is indeed a second best course. The
first and best was that scheme of welfare to all mankind which we
attempted to carry out with the co-operation of Dionysios; but some
chance, mightier than men, brought it to nothing. Do you now, with
good fortune attending you and with Heaven's help, try to bring your
efforts to a happier issue.

  Let this be the end of my advice and injunction and of the narrative
of my first visit to Dionysios. Whoever wishes may next hear of my
second journey and voyage, and learn that it was a reasonable and
suitable proceeding. My first period of residence in Sicily was
occupied in the way which I related before giving my advice to the
relatives and friends of Dion. After those events I persuaded
Dionysios by such arguments as I could to let me go; and we made an
agreement as to what should be done when peace was made; for at that
time there was a state of war in Sicily. Dionysios said that, when
he had put the affairs of his empire in a position of greater safety
for himself, he would send for Dion and me again; and he desired
that Dion should regard what had befallen him not as an exile, but
as a change of residence. I agreed to come again on these conditions.

  When peace had been made, he began sending for me; he requested that
Dion should wait for another year, but begged that I should by all
means come. Dion now kept urging and entreating me to go. For
persistent rumours came from Sicily that Dionysios was now once more
possessed by an extraordinary desire for philosophy. For this reason
Dion pressed me urgently not to decline his invitation. But though I
was well aware that as regards philosophy such symptoms were not
uncommon in young men, still it seemed to me safer at that time to
part company altogether with Dion and Dionysios; and I offended both
of them by replying that I was an old man, and that the steps now
being taken were quite at variance with the previous agreement.

  After this, it seems, Archytes came to the court of Dionysios.
Before my departure I had brought him and his Tarentine circle into
friendly relations with Dionysios. There were some others in
Syracuse who had received some instruction from Dion, and others had
learnt from these, getting their heads full of erroneous teaching on
philosophical questions. These, it seems, were attempting to hold
discussions with Dionysios on questions connected with such
subjects, in the idea that he had been fully instructed in my views.
Now is not at all devoid of natural gifts for learning, and he has a
great craving for honour and glory. What was said probably pleased
him, and he felt some shame when it became clear that he had not taken
advantage of my teaching during my visit. For these reasons he
conceived a desire for more definite instruction, and his love of
glory was an additional incentive to him. The real reasons why he
had learnt nothing during my previous visit have just been set forth
in the preceding narrative. Accordingly, now that I was safe at home
and had refused his second invitation, as I just now related,
Dionysios seems to have felt all manner of anxiety lest certain people
should suppose that I was unwilling to visit him again because I had
formed a poor opinion of his natural gifts and character, and because,
knowing as I did his manner of life, I disapproved of it.

  It is right for me to speak the truth, and make no complaint if
anyone, after hearing the facts, forms a poor opinion of my
philosophy, and thinks that the tyrant was in the right. Dionysios now
invited me for the third time, sending a trireme to ensure me
comfort on the voyage; he sent also Archedemos-one of those who had
spent some time with Archytes, and of whom he supposed that I had a
higher opinion than of any of the Sicilian Greeks-and, with him, other
men of repute in Sicily. These all brought the same report, that
Dionysios had made progress in philosophy. He also sent a very long
letter, knowing as he did my relations with Dion and Dion's
eagerness also that I should take ship and go to Syracuse. The
letter was framed in its opening sentences to meet all these
conditions, and the tenor of it was as follows: "Dionysios to
Plato," here followed the customary greeting and immediately after
it he said, "If in compliance with our request you come now, in the
first place, Dion's affairs will be dealt with in whatever way you
yourself desire; I know that you will desire what is reasonable, and I
shall consent to it. But if not, none of Dion's affairs will have
results in accordance with your wishes, with regard either to Dion
himself or to other matters." This he said in these words; the rest it
would be tedious and inopportune to quote. Other letters arrived
from Archytes and the Tarentines, praising the philosophical studies
of Dionysios and saying that, if I did not now come, I should cause
a complete rupture in their friendship with Dionysios, which had
been brought about by me and was of no small importance to their
political interests.

  When this invitation came to me at that time in such terms, and
those who had come from Sicily and Italy were trying to drag me
thither, while my friends at Athens were literally pushing me out with
their urgent entreaties, it was the same old tale-that I must not
betray Dion and my Tarentine friends and supporters. Also I myself had
a lurking feeling that there was nothing surprising in the fact that a
young man, quick to learn, hearing talk of the great truths of
philosophy, should feel a craving for the higher life. I thought
therefore that I must put the matter definitely to the test to see
whether his desire was genuine or the reverse, and on no account leave
such an impulse unaided nor make myself responsible for such a deep
and real disgrace, if the reports brought by anyone were really
true. So blindfolding myself with this reflection, I set out, with
many fears and with no very favourable anticipations, as was natural
enough. However, I went, and my action on this occasion at any rate
was really a case of "the third to the Preserver," for I had the
good fortune to return safely; and for this I must, next to the God,
thank Dionysios, because, though many wished to make an end of me,
he prevented them and paid some proper respect to my situation.

  On my arrival, I thought that first I must put to the test the
question whether Dionysios had really been kindled with the fire of
philosophy, or whether all the reports which had come to Athens were
empty rumours. Now there is a way of putting such things to the test
which is not to be despised and is well suited to monarchs, especially
to those who have got their heads full of erroneous teaching, which
immediately my arrival I found to be very much the case with
Dionysios. One should show such men what philosophy is in all its
extent; what their range of studies is by which it is approached,
and how much labour it involves. For the man who has heard this, if he
has the true philosophic spirit and that godlike temperament which
makes him a kin to philosophy and worthy of it, thinks that he has
been told of a marvellous road lying before him, that he must
forthwith press on with all his strength, and that life is not worth
living if he does anything else. After this he uses to the full his
own powers and those of his guide in the path, and relaxes not his
efforts, till he has either reached the end of the whole course of
study or gained such power that he is not incapable of directing his
steps without the aid of a guide. This is the spirit and these are the
thoughts by which such a man guides his life, carrying out his work,
whatever his occupation may be, but throughout it all ever cleaving to
philosophy and to such rules of diet in his daily life as will give
him inward sobriety and therewith quickness in learning, a good
memory, and reasoning power; the kind of life which is opposed to this
he consistently hates. Those who have not the true philosophic temper,
but a mere surface colouring of opinions penetrating, like sunburn,
only skin deep, when they see how great the range of studies is, how
much labour is involved in it, and how necessary to the pursuit it
is to have an orderly regulation of the daily life, come to the
conclusion that the thing is difficult and impossible for them, and
are actually incapable of carrying out the course of study; while some
of them persuade themselves that they have sufficiently studied the
whole matter and have no need of any further effort. This is the
sure test and is the safest one to apply to those who live in luxury
and are incapable of continuous effort; it ensures that such a man
shall not throw the blame upon his teacher but on himself, because
he cannot bring to the pursuit all the qualities necessary to it. Thus
it came about that I said to Dionysios what I did say on that
occasion.

  I did not, however, give a complete exposition, nor did Dionysios
ask for one. For he professed to know many, and those the most
important, points, and to have a sufficient hold of them through
instruction given by others. I hear also that he has since written
about what he heard from me, composing what professes to be his own
handbook, very different, so he says, from the doctrines which he
heard from me; but of its contents I know nothing; I know indeed
that others have written on the same subjects; but who they are, is
more than they know themselves. Thus much at least, I can say about
all writers, past or future, who say they know the things to which I
devote myself, whether by hearing the teaching of me or of others,
or by their own discoveries-that according to my view it is not
possible for them to have any real skill in the matter. There
neither is nor ever will be a treatise of mine on the subject. For
it does not admit of exposition like other branches of knowledge;
but after much converse about the matter itself and a life lived
together, suddenly a light, as it were, is kindled in one soul by a
flame that leaps to it from another, and thereafter sustains itself.
Yet this much I know-that if the things were written or put into
words, it would be done best by me, and that, if they were written
badly, I should be the person most pained. Again, if they had appeared
to me to admit adequately of writing and exposition, what task in life
could I have performed nobler than this, to write what is of great
service to mankind and to bring the nature of things into the light
for all to see? But I do not think it a good thing for men that
there should be a disquisition, as it is called, on this
topic-except for some few, who are able with a little teaching to find
it out for themselves. As for the rest, it would fill some of them
quite illogically with a mistaken feeling of contempt, and others with
lofty and vain-glorious expectations, as though they had learnt
something high and mighty.

  On this point I intend to speak a little more at length; for
perhaps, when I have done so, things will be clearer with regard to my
present subject. There is an argument which holds good against the man
ventures to put anything whatever into writing on questions of this
nature; it has often before been stated by me, and it seems suitable
to the present occasion.

  For everything that exists there are three instruments by which
the knowledge of it is necessarily imparted; fourth, there is the
knowledge itself, and, as fifth, we must count the thing itself
which is known and truly exists. The first is the name, the, second
the definition, the third. the image, and the fourth the knowledge. If
you wish to learn what I mean, take these in the case of one instance,
and so understand them in the case of all. A circle is a thing
spoken of, and its name is that very word which we have just
uttered. The second thing belonging to it is its definition, made up
names and verbal forms. For that which has the name "round,"
"annular," or, "circle," might be defined as that which has the
distance from its circumference to its centre everywhere equal. Third,
comes that which is drawn and rubbed out again, or turned on a lathe
and broken up-none of which things can happen to the circle
itself-to which the other things, mentioned have reference; for it
is something of a different order from them. Fourth, comes
knowledge, intelligence and right opinion about these things. Under
this one head we must group everything which has its existence, not in
words nor in bodily shapes, but in souls-from which it is dear that it
is something different from the nature of the circle itself and from
the three things mentioned before. Of these things intelligence
comes closest in kinship and likeness to the fifth, and the others are
farther distant.

  The same applies to straight as well as to circular form, to
colours, to the good, the, beautiful, the just, to all bodies
whether manufactured or coming into being in the course of nature,
to fire, water, and all such things, to every living being, to
character in souls, and to all things done and suffered. For in the
case of all these, no one, if he has not some how or other got hold of
the four things first mentioned, can ever be completely a partaker
of knowledge of the fifth. Further, on account of the weakness of
language, these (i.e., the four) attempt to show what each thing is
like, not less than what each thing is. For this reason no man of
intelligence will venture to express his philosophical views in
language, especially not in language that is unchangeable, which is
true of that which is set down in written characters.

  Again you must learn the point which comes next. Every circle, of
those which are by the act of man drawn or even turned on a lathe,
is full of that which is opposite to the fifth thing. For everywhere
it has contact with the straight. But the circle itself, we say, has
nothing in either smaller or greater, of that which is its opposite.
We say also that the name is not a thing of permanence for any of
them, and that nothing prevents the things now called round from being
called straight, and the straight things round; for those who make
changes and call things by opposite names, nothing will be less
permanent (than a name). Again with regard to the definition, if it is
made up of names and verbal forms, the same remark holds that there is
no sufficiently durable permanence in it. And there is no end to the
instances of the ambiguity from which each of the four suffers; but
the greatest of them is that which we mentioned a little earlier,
that, whereas there are two things, that which has real being, and
that which is only a quality, when the soul is seeking to know, not
the quality, but the essence, each of the four, presenting to the soul
by word and in act that which it is not seeking (i.e., the quality), a
thing open to refutation by the senses, being merely the thing
presented to the soul in each particular case whether by statement
or the act of showing, fills, one may say, every man with puzzlement
and perplexity.

  Now in subjects in which, by reason of our defective education, we
have not been accustomed even to search for the truth, but are
satisfied with whatever images are presented to us, we are not held up
to ridicule by one another, the questioned by questioners, who can
pull to pieces and criticise the four things. But in subjects where we
try to compel a man to give a clear answer about the fifth, any one of
those who are capable of overthrowing an antagonist gets the better of
us, and makes the man, who gives an exposition in speech or writing or
in replies to questions, appear to most of his hearers to know nothing
of the things on which he is attempting to write or speak; for they
are sometimes not aware that it is not the mind of the writer or
speaker which is proved to be at fault, but the defective nature of
each of the four instruments. The process however of dealing with
all of these, as the mind moves up and down to each in turn, does
after much effort give birth in a well-constituted mind to knowledge
of that which is well constituted. But if a man is ill-constituted
by nature (as the state of the soul is naturally in the majority
both in its capacity for learning and in what is called moral
character)-or it may have become so by deterioration-not even
Lynceus could endow such men with the power of sight.

  In one word, the man who has no natural kinship with this matter
cannot be made akin to it by quickness of learning or memory; for it
cannot be engendered at all in natures which are foreign to it.
Therefore, if men are not by nature kinship allied to justice and
all other things that are honourable, though they may be good at
learning and remembering other knowledge of various kinds-or if they
have the kinship but are slow learners and have no memory-none of
all these will ever learn to the full the truth about virtue and vice.
For both must be learnt together; and together also must be learnt, by
complete and long continued study, as I said at the beginning, the
true and the false about all that has real being. After much effort,
as names, definitions, sights, and other data of sense, are brought
into contact and friction one with another, in the course of
scrutiny and kindly testing by men who proceed by question and
answer without ill will, with a sudden flash there shines forth
understanding about every problem, and an intelligence whose efforts
reach the furthest limits of human powers. Therefore every man of
worth, when dealing with matters of worth, will be far from exposing
them to ill feeling and misunderstanding among men by committing
them to writing. In one word, then, it may be known from this that, if
one sees written treatises composed by anyone, either the laws of a
lawgiver, or in any other form whatever, these are not for that man
the things of most worth, if he is a man of worth, but that his
treasures are laid up in the fairest spot that he possesses. But if
these things were worked at by him as things of real worth, and
committed to writing, then surely, not gods, but men "have
themselves bereft him of his wits."

  Anyone who has followed this discourse and digression will know well
that, if Dionysios or anyone else, great or small, has written a
treatise on the highest matters and the first principles of things, he
has, so I say, neither heard nor learnt any sound teaching about the
subject of his treatise; otherwise, he would have had the same
reverence for it, which I have, and would have shrunk from putting
it forth into a world of discord and uncomeliness. For he wrote it,
not as an aid to memory-since there is no risk of forgetting it, if
a man's soul has once laid hold of it; for it is expressed in the
shortest of statements-but if he wrote it at all, it was from a mean
craving for honour, either putting it forth as his own invention, or
to figure as a man possessed of culture, of which he was not worthy,
if his heart was set on the credit of possessing it. If then Dionysios
gained this culture from the one lesson which he had from me, we may
perhaps grant him the possession of it, though how he acquired
it-God wot, as the Theban says; for I gave him the teaching, which I
have described, on that one occasion and never again.

  The next point which requires to be made clear to anyone who
wishes to discover how things really happened, is the reason why it
came about that I did not continue my teaching in a second and third
lesson and yet oftener. Does Dionysios, after a single lesson, believe
himself to know the matter, and has he an adequate knowledge of it,
either as having discovered it for himself or learnt it before from
others, or does he believe my teaching to be worthless, or, thirdly,
to be beyond his range and too great for him, and himself to be really
unable to live as one who gives his mind to wisdom and virtue? For
if he thinks it worthless, he will have to contend with many who say
the opposite, and who would be held in far higher repute as judges
than Dionysios, if on the other hand, he thinks he has discovered or
learnt the things and that they are worth having as part of a
liberal education, how could he, unless he is an extraordinary person,
have so recklessly dishonoured the master who has led the way in these
subjects? How he dishonoured him, I will now state.

  Up to this time he had allowed Dion to remain in possession of his
property and to receive the income from it. But not long after the
foregoing events, as if he had entirely forgotten his letter to that
effect, he no longer allowed Dion's trustees to send him remittances
to the Peloponnese, on the pretence that the owner of the property was
not Dion but Dion's son, his own nephew, of whom he himself was
legally the trustee. These were the actual facts which occurred up
to the point which we have reached. They had opened my eyes as to
the value of Dionysios' desire for philosophy, and I had every right
to complain, whether I wished to do so or not. Now by this time it was
summer and the season for sea voyages; therefore I decided that I must
not be vexed with Dionysios rather than with myself and those who
had forced me to come for the third time into the strait of Scylla,

               that once again I might

         To fell Charybdis measure back my course,

but must tell Dionysios that it was impossible for me to remain
after this outrage had been put upon Dion. He tried to soothe me and
begged me to remain, not thinking it desirable for himself that I
should arrive post haste in person as the bearer of such tidings. When
his entreaties produced no effect, he promised that he himself would
provide me with transport. For my intention was to embark on one of
the trading ships and sail away, being indignant and thinking it my
duty to face all dangers, in case I was prevented from going-since
plainly and obviously I was doing no wrong, but was the party wronged.

  Seeing me not at all inclined to stay, he devised the following
scheme to make me stay during that sading season. On the next day he
came to me and made a plausible proposal: "Let us put an end," he
said, "to these constant quarrels between you and me about Dion and
his affairs. For your sake I will do this for Dion. I require him to
take his own property and reside in the Peloponnese, not as an
exile, but on the understanding that it is open for him to migrate
here, when this step has the joint approval of himself, me, and you
his friends; and this shall be open to him on the understanding that
he does not plot against me. You and your friends and Dion's friends
here must be sureties for him in this, and he must give you
security. Let the funds which he receives be deposited in the
Peloponnese and at Athens, with persons approved by you, and let
Dion enjoy the income from them but have no power to take them out
of deposit without the approval of you and your friends. For I have no
great confidence in him, that, if he has this property at his
disposal, he will act justly towards me, for it will be no small
amount; but I have more confidence in you and your friends. See if
this satisfies you; and on these conditions remain for the present
year, and at the next season you shall depart taking the property with
you. I am quite sure that Dion will be grateful to you, if you
accomplish so much on his behalf."

  When I heard this proposal I was vexed, but after reflection said
I would let him know my view of it on the following day. We agreed
to that effect for the moment, and afterwards when I was by myself I
pondered the matter in much distress. The first reflection that came
up, leading the way in my self-communing, was this: "Come suppose that
Dionysios intends to do none of the things which he has mentioned, but
that, after my departure, he writes a plausible letter to Dion, and
orders several of his creatures to write to the same effect, telling
him of the proposal which he has now made to me, making out that he
was willing to do what he proposed, but that I refused and
completely neglected Dion's interests. Further, suppose that he is not
willing to allow my departure, and without giving personal orders to
any of the merchants, makes it clear, as he easily can, to all that he
not wish me to sail, will anyone consent to take me as a passenger,
when I leave the house: of Dionysios?"

  For in addition to my other troubles, I was lodging at that time
in the garden which surround his house, from which even the gatekeeper
would have refused to let me go, unless an order had been sent to
him from Dionysios. "Suppose however that I wait for the year, I shall
be able to write word of these things to Dion, stating the position in
which I am, and the steps which I am trying to take. And if
Dionysios does any of the things which he says, I shall have
accomplished something that is not altogether to be sneered at; for
Dion's property is, at a fair estimate, perhaps not less than a
hundred talents. If however the prospect which I see looming in the
future takes the course which may reasonably be expected, I know not
what I shall do with myself. Still it is perhaps necessary to go on
working for a year, and to attempt to prove by actual fact the
machinations of Dionysios."

  Having come to this decision, on the following day I said to
Dionysios, "I have decided to remain. But," I continued, "I must ask
that you will not regard me as empowered to act for Dion, but will
along with me write a letter to him, stating what has now been
decided, and enquire whether this course satisfies him. If it does
not, and if he has other wishes and demands, he must write particulars
of them as soon as possible, and you must not as yet take any hasty
step with regard to his interests."

  This was what was said and this was the agreement which was made,
almost in these words. Well, after this the trading-ships took their
departure, and it was no longer possible for me to take mine, when
Dionysios, if you please, addressed me with the remark that half the
property must be regarded as belonging to Dion and half to his son.
Therefore, he said, he would sell it, and when it was sold would
give half to me to take away, and would leave half on the spot for the
son. This course, he said, was the most just. This proposal was a blow
to me, and I thought it absurd to argue any longer with him;
however, I said that we must wait for Dion's letter, and then once
more write to tell him of this new proposal. His next step was the
brilliant one of selling the whole of Dion's property, using his own
discretion with regard to the manner and terms of the sale and of
the purchasers. He spoke not a word to me about the matter from
beginning to end, and I followed his example and never talked to him
again about Dion's affairs; for I did not think that I could do any
good by doing so. This is the history so far of my efforts to come
to the rescue of philosophy and of my friends.

  After this Dionysios and I went on with our daily life, I with my
eyes turned abroad like a bird yearning to fly from its perch, and
he always devising some new way of scaring me back and of keeping a
tight hold on Dion's property. However, we gave out to all Sicily that
we were friends. Dionysios, now deserting the policy of his father,
attempted to lower the pay of the older members of his body guard. The
soldiers were furious, and, assembling in great numbers, declared that
they would not submit. He attempted to use force to them, shutting the
gates of the acropolis; but they charged straight for the walls,
yelling out an unintelligible and ferocious war cry. Dionysios took
fright and conceded all their demands and more to the peltasts then
assembled.

  A rumour soon spread that Heracleides had been the cause of all
the trouble. Hearing this, Heracleides kept out of the way.
Dionysios was trying to get hold of him, and being unable to do so,
sent for Theodotes to come to him in his garden. It happened that I
was walking in the garden at the same time. I neither know nor did I
hear the rest of what passed between them, but what Theodotes said
to Dionysios in my presence I know and remember. "Plato," he said,
"I am trying to convince our friend Dionysios that, if I am able to
bring Heracleides before us to defend himself on the charges which
have been made against him, and if he decides that Heracleides must no
longer live in Sicily, he should be allowed (this is my point) to take
his son and wife and sail to the Peloponnese and reside there,
taking no action there against Dionysios and enjoying the income of
his property. I have already sent for him and will send for him again;
and if he comes in obedience either to my former message or to this
one-well and good. But I beg and entreat Dionysios that, if anyone
finds Heracleides either in the country or here, no harm shall come to
him, but that he may retire from the country till Dionysios comes to
some other decision. Do you agree to this?" he added, addressing
Dionysios. "I agree," he replied, "that even if he is found at your
house, no harm shall be done to him beyond what has now been said."

  On the following day Eurybios and Theodotes came to me in the
evening, both greatly disturbed. Theodotes said, "Plato, you were
present yesterday during the promises made by Dionysios to me and to
you about Heracleides?" "Certainly," I replied. "Well," he
continued, "at this moment peltasts are scouring the country seeking
to arrest Heracleides; and he must be somewhere in this neighbourhood.
For Heaven's sake come with us to Dionysios." So we went and stood
in the presence of Dionysios; and those two stood shedding silent
tears, while I said: "These men are afraid that you may take strong
measures with regard to Heracleides contrary to what was agreed
yesterday. For it seems that he has returned and has been seen
somewhere about here." On hearing this he blazed up and turned all
colours, as a man would in a rage. Theodotes, falling before him in
tears, took his hand and entreated him to do nothing of the sort.
But I broke in and tried to encourage him, saying: "Be of good
cheer, Theodotes; Dionysios will not have the heart to take any
fresh step contrary to his promises of yesterday." Fixing his eye on
me, and assuming his most autocratic air he said, "To you I promised
nothing small or great." "By the gods," I said, "you did promise
that forbearance for which our friend here now appeals." With these
words I turned away and went out. After this he continued the hunt for
Heracleides, and Theodotes, sending messages, urged Heracleides to
take flight. Dionysios sent out Teisias and some peltasts with
orders to pursue him. But Heracleides, as it was said, was just in
time, by a small fraction of a day, in making his escape into
Carthaginian territory.

  After this Dionysios thought that his long cherished scheme not to
restore Dion's property would give him a plausible excuse for
hostility towards me; and first of all he sent me out of the
acropolis, finding a pretext that the women were obliged to hold a
sacrificial service for ten days in the garden in which I had my
lodging. He therefore ordered me to stay outside in the house of
Archedemos during this period. While I was there, Theodotes sent for
me and made a great outpouring of indignation at these occurrences,
throwing the blame on Dionysios. Hearing that I had been to see
Theodotes he regarded this, as another excuse, sister to the
previous one, for quarrelling with me. Sending a messenger he enquired
if I had really been conferring with Theodotes on his invitation
"Certainly," I replied, "Well," continued the messenger, "he ordered
me to tell you that you are not acting at all well in preferring
always Dion and Dion's friends to him." And he did not send for me
to return to his house, as though it were now clear that Theodotes and
Heracleides were my friends, and he my enemy. He also thought that I
had no kind feelings towards him because the property of Dion was
now entirely done for.

  After this I resided outside the acropolis among the mercenaries.
Various people then came to me, among them those of the ships' crews
who came from Athens, my own fellow citizens, and reported that I
was evil spoken of among the peltasts, and that some of them were
threatening to make an end of me, if they could ket hold of me
Accordingly I devised the following plan for my safety.

  I sent to Archytes and my other friends in Taras, telling them the
plight I was in. Finding some excuse for an embassy from their city,
they sent a thirty-oared galley with Lamiscos, one of themselves,
who came and entreated Dionysios about me, saying that I wanted to go,
and that he should on no account stand in my way. He consented and
allowed me to go, giving me money for the journey. But for Dion's
property I made no further request, nor was any of it restored.

  I made my way to the Peloponnese to Olympia, where I found Dion a
spectator at the Games, and told him what had occurred. Calling Zeus
to be his witness, he at once urged me with my relatives and friends
to make preparations for taking vengeance on Dionysios-our ground
for action being the breach of faith to a guest-so he put it and
regarded it, while his own was his unjust expulsion and banishment.
Hearing this, I told him that he might call my friends to his aid,
if they wished to go; "But for myself," I continued, "you and others
in a way forced me to be the sharer of Dionysios' table and hearth and
his associate in the acts of religion. He probably believed the
current slanders, that I was plotting with you against him and his
despotic rule; yet feelings of scruple prevailed with him, and he
spared my life. Again, I am hardly of the age for being comrade in
arms to anyone; also I stand as a neutral between you, if ever you
desire friendship and wish to benefit one another; so long as you
aim at injuring one another, call others to your aid." This I said,
because I was disgusted with my misguided journeyings to Sicily and my
ill-fortune there. But they disobeyed me and would not listen to my
attempts at reconciliation, and so brought on their own heads all
the evils which have since taken place. For if Dionysios had
restored to Dion his property or been reconciled with him on any
terms, none of these things would have happened, so far as human
foresight can foretell. Dion would have easily been kept in check by
my wishes and influence. But now, rushing upon one another, they
have caused universal disaster.

  Dion's aspiration however was the same that I should say my own or
that of any other right-minded man ought to be. With regard to his own
power, his friends and his country the ideal of such a man would be to
win the greatest power and honour by rendering the greatest
services. And this end is not attained if a man gets riches for
himself, his supporters and his country, by forming plots and
getting together conspirators, being all the while a poor creature,
not master of himself, overcome by the cowardice which fears to
fight against pleasures; nor is it attained if he goes on to kill
the men of substance, whom he speaks of as the enemy, and to plunder
their possessions, and invites his confederates and supporters to do
the same, with the object that no one shall say that it is his
fault, if he complains of being poor. The same is true if anyone
renders services of this kind to the State and receives honours from
her for distributing by decrees the property of the few among the
many-or if, being in charge the affairs of a great State which rules
over many small ones, he unjustly appropriates to his own State the
possessions of the small ones. For neither a Dion nor any other man
will, with his eyes open, make his way by steps like these to a
power which will be fraught with destruction to himself and his
descendants for all time; but he will advance towards constitutional
government and the framing of the justest and best laws, reaching
these ends without executions and murders even on the smallest scale.

  This course Dion actually followed, thinking it preferable to suffer
iniquitous deeds rather than to do them; but, while taking precautions
against them, he nevertheless, when he had reached the climax of
victory over his enemies, took a false step and fell, a catastrophe
not at all surprising. For a man of piety, temperance and wisdom, when
dealing with the impious, would not be entirely blind to the character
of such men, but it would perhaps not be surprising if he suffered the
catastrophe that might befall a good ship's captain, who would not
be entirely unaware of the approach of a storm, but might be unaware
of its extraordinary and startling violence, and might therefore be
overwhelmed by its force. The same thing caused Dion's downfall. For
he was not unaware that his assailants were thoroughly bad men, but he
was unaware how high a pitch of infatuation and of general
wickedness and greed they had reached. This was the cause of his
downfall, which has involved Sicily in countless sorrows.

  As to the steps which should be taken after the events which I
have now related, my advice has been given pretty fully and may be
regarded as finished; and if you ask my reasons for recounting the
story of my second journey to Sicily, it seemed to me essential that
an account of it must be given because of the strange and
paradoxical character of the incidents. If in this present account
of them they appear to anyone more intelligible, and seem to anyone to
show sufficient grounds in view of the circumstances, the present
statement is adequate and not too lengthy.

                            -THE END-



  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: THEODORUS; THEAETETUS; SOCRATES An ELEATIC.

  STRANGER, whom Theodorus and Theaetetus bring with them.

  The younger SOCRATES, who is a silent auditor.

  Theodorus. Here we are, Socrates, true to our agreement of
yesterday; and we bring with us a stranger from Elea, who is a
disciple of Parmenides and Zeno, and a true philosopher.

  Socrates. Is he not rather a god, Theodorus, who comes to us in
the disguise of a stranger? For Homer says that all the gods, and
especially the god of strangers, are companions of the meek and
just, and visit the good and evil among men. And may not your
companion be one of those higher powers, a cross-examining deity,
who has come to spy out our weakness in argument, and to cross-examine
us?

  Theod. Nay, Socrates, he is not one of the disputatious sort-he is
too good for that. And, in my opinion, he is not a god at all; but
divine he certainly is, for this is a title which I should give to all
philosophers.

  Soc. Capital, my friend! and I may add that they are almost as
hard to be discerned as the gods. For the true philosophers, and
such as are not merely made up for the occasion, appear in various
forms unrecognized by the ignorance of men, and they "hover about
cities," as Homer declares, looking from above upon human life; and
some think nothing of them, and others can never think enough; and
sometimes they appear as statesmen, and sometimes as sophists; and
then, again, to many they seem to be no better than madmen. I should
like to ask our Eleatic friend, if he would tell us, what is thought
about them in Italy, and to whom the terms are applied.

  Theod. What terms?

  Soc. Sophist, statesman, philosopher.

  Theod. What is your difficulty about them, and what made you ask?

  Soc. I want to know whether by his countrymen they are regarded as
one or two; or do they, as the names are three, distinguish also three
kinds, and assign one to each name?

  Theod. I dare say that the Stranger will not object to discuss the
question. What do you say, Stranger?

  Stranger. I am far from objecting, Theodorus, nor have I any
difficulty in replying that by us they are regarded as three. But to
define precisely the nature of each of them is by no means a slight or
easy task.

  Theod. You have happened to light, Socrates, almost on the very
question which we were asking our friend before we came hither, and he
excused himself to us, as he does now you; although he admitted that
the matter had been fully discussed, and that he remembered the
answer.

  Soc. Then do not, Stranger, deny us the first favour which we ask of
you: I am sure that you will not, and therefore I shall only beg of
you to say whether you like and are accustomed to make a long
oration on a subject which you want to explain to another, or to
proceed by the method of question and answer. I remember hearing a
very noble discussion in which Parmenides employed the latter of the
two methods, when I was a young man, and he was far advanced in years.

  Str. I prefer to talk with another when he responds pleasantly,
and is light in hand; if not, I would rather have my own say.

  Soc. Any one of the present company will respond kindly to you,
and you can choose whom you like of them; I should recommend you to
take a young person-Theaetetus, for example-unless you have a
preference for some one else.

  Str. I feel ashamed, Socrates, being a new comer into your
society, instead of talking a little and hearing others talk, to be
spinning out a long soliloquy or address, as if I wanted to show
off. For the true answer will certainly be a very long one, a great
deal longer than might be expected from such a short and simple
question. At the same time, I fear that I may seem rude and ungracious
if I refuse your courteous request, especially after what you have
said. For I certainly cannot object to your proposal, that
Theaetetus should respond, having already conversed with him myself,
and being recommended by you to take him.

  Theaetetus. But are you sure, Stranger, that this will be quite so
acceptable to the rest of the company as Socrates imagines?

  Str. You hear them applauding, Theaetetus; after that, there is
nothing more to be said. Well then, I am to argue with you, and if you
tire of the argument, you may complain of your friends and not of me.

  Theaet. I do not think that I shall tire, and if I do, I shall get
my friend here, young Socrates, the namesake of the elder Socrates, to
help; he is about my own age, and my partner at the gymnasium, and
is constantly accustomed to work with me.

  Str. Very good; you can decide about that for yourself as we
proceed. Meanwhile you and I will begin together and enquire into
the nature of the Sophist, first of the three: I should like you to
make out what he is and bring him to light in a discussion; for at
present we are only agreed about the name, but of the thing to which
we both apply the name possibly you have one notion and I another;
whereas we ought always to come to an understanding about the thing
itself in terms of a definition, and not merely about the name minus
the definition. Now the tribe of Sophists which we are investigating
is not easily caught or defined; and the world has long ago agreed,
that if great subjects are to be adequately treated, they must be
studied in the lesser and easier instances of them before we proceed
to the greatest of all. And as I know that the tribe of Sophists is
troublesome and hard to be caught, I should recommend that we practise
beforehand the method which is to be applied to him on some simple and
smaller thing, unless you can suggest a better way.

  Theaet. Indeed I cannot.

  Str. Then suppose that we work out some lesser example which will be
a pattern of the greater?

  Theaet. Good.

  Str. What is there which is well known and not great, and is yet
as susceptible of definition as any larger thing? Shall I say an
angler? He is familiar to all of us, and not a very interesting or
important person.

  Theaet. He is not.

  Str. Yet I suspect that he will furnish us with the sort of
definition and line of enquiry which we want.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. Let us begin by asking whether he is a man having art or not
having art, but some other power.

  Theaet. He is clearly a man of art.

  Str. And of arts there are two kinds?

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. There is agriculture, and the tending of mortal creatures,
and the art of constructing or moulding vessels, and there is the
art of imitation-all these may be appropriately called by a single
name.

  Theaet. What do you mean? And what is the name?

  Str. He who brings into existence something that did not exist
before is said to be a producer, and that which is brought into
existence is said to be produced.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And all the arts which were just now mentioned are
characterized by this power of producing?

  Theaet. They are.

  Str. Then let us sum them up under the name of productive or
creative art.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. Next follows the whole class of learning and cognition; then
comes trade, fighting, hunting. And since none of these produces
anything, but is only engaged in conquering by word or deed, or in
preventing others from conquering, things which exist and have been
already produced-in each and all of these branches there appears to be
an art which may be called acquisitive.

  Theaet. Yes, that is the proper name.

  Str. Seeing, then, that all arts are either acquisitive or creative,
in which class shall we place the art of the angler?

  Theaet. Clearly in the acquisitive class.

  Str. And the acquisitive may be subdivided into two parts: there
is exchange, which is voluntary and is effected by gifts, hire,
purchase; and the other part of acquisitive, which takes by force of
word or deed, may be termed conquest?

  Theaet. That is implied in what has been said.

  Str. And may not conquest be again subdivided?

  Theaet. How?

  Str. Open force may; be called fighting, and secret force may have
the general name of hunting?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And there is no reason why the art of hunting should not be
further divided.

  Theaet. How would you make the division?

  Str. Into the hunting of living and of lifeless prey.

  Theaet. Yes, if both kinds exist.

  Str. Of course they exist; but the hunting after lifeless things
having no special name, except some sorts of diving, and other small
matters, may be omitted; the hunting after living things may be called
animal hunting.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And animal hunting may be truly said to have two divisions,
land-animal hunting, which has many kinds and names, and water-animals
hunting, or the hunting after animals who swim?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And of swimming animals, one class lives on the wing and the
other in the water?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Fowling is the general term under which the hunting of all
birds is included.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. The hunting of animals who live in the water has the general
name of fishing.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And this sort of hunting may be further divided also into two
principal kinds?

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. There is one kind which takes them in nets, another which takes
them by a blow.

  Theaet. What do you mean, and how do you distinguish them?

  Str. As to the first kind-all that surrounds and encloses anything
to prevent egress, may be rightly called an enclosure.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. For which reason twig baskets, casting nets, nooses, creels,
and the like may all be termed "enclosures"?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And therefore this first kind of capture may be called by us
capture with enclosures, or something of that sort?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. The other kind, which is practised by a blow with hooks and
three pronged spears, when summed up under one name, may be called
striking, unless you, Theaetetus, can find some better name?

  Theaet. Never mind the name-what you suggest will do very well.

  Str. There is one mode of striking, which is done at night, and by
the light of a fire, and is by the hunters themselves called firing,
or spearing by firelight.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And the fishing by day is called by the general name of barbing
because the spears, too, are barbed at the point.

  Theaet. Yes, that is the term.

  Str. Of this barb-fishing, that which strikes the fish Who is
below from above is called spearing, because this is the way in
which the three-pronged spears are mostly used.

  Theaet. Yes, it is often called so.

  Str. Then now there is only one kind remaining.

  Theaet. What is that?

  Str. When a hook is used, and the fish is not struck in any chance
part of his body-he as be is with the spear, but only about the head
and mouth, and is then drawn out from below upwards with reeds and
rods:-What is the right name of that mode of fish, Theaetetus?

  Theaet. I suspect that we have now discovered the object of our
search.

  Str. Then now you and I have come to an understanding not only about
the name of the angler's art, but about the definition of the thing
itself. One half of all art was acquisitive-half of all the art
acquisitive art was conquest or taking by force, half of this was
hunting, and half of hunting was hunting animals, half of this was
hunting water animals-of this again, the under half was fishing,
half of fishing was striking; a part of striking was fishing with a
barb, and one half of this again, being the kind which strikes with
a hook and draws the fish from below upwards, is the art which we have
been seeking, and which from the nature of the operation is denoted
angling or drawing up (aspalienutike, anaspasthai).

  Theaet. The result has been quite satisfactorily brought out.

  Str. And now, following this pattern, let us endeavour to find out
what a Sophist is.

  Theaet. By all means.

  Str. The first question about the angler was, whether he was a
skilled artist or unskilled?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And shall we call our new friend unskilled, or a thorough
master of his craft?

  Theaet. Certainly not unskilled, for his name, as, indeed, you
imply, must surely express his nature.

  Str. Then he must be supposed to have some art.

  Theaet. What art?

  Str. By heaven, they are cousins! it never occurred to us.

  Theaet. Who are cousins?

  Str. The angler and the Sophist.

  Theaet. In what way are they related?

  Str. They both appear to me to be hunters.

  Theaet. How the Sophist? Of the other we have spoken.

  Str. You remember our division of hunting, into hunting after
swimming animals and land animals?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And you remember that we subdivided the swimming and left the
land animals, saying that there were many kinds of them?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Thus far, then, the Sophist and the angler, starting from the
art of acquiring, take the same road?

  Theaet. So it would appear.

  Str. Their paths diverge when they reach the art of animal
hunting; the one going to the seashore, and to the rivers and to the
lakes, and angling for the animals which are in them.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. While the other goes to land and water of another sort-rivers
of wealth and broad meadow-lands of generous youth; and he also is
intending to take the animals which are in them.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. Of hunting on land there are two principal divisions.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. One is the hunting of tame, and the other of wild animals.

  Theaet. But are tame animals ever hunted?

  Str. Yes, if you include man under tame animals. But if you like you
may say that there are no tame animals, or that, if there are, man
is not among them; or you may say that man is a tame animal but is not
hunted-you shall decide which of these alternatives you prefer.

  Theaet. I should say, Stranger, that man is a tame animal, and I
admit that he is hunted.

  Str. Then let us divide the hunting of tame animals into two parts.

  Theaet. How shall we make the division?

  Str. Let us define piracy, man-stealing, tyranny, the whole military
art, by one name, as hunting with violence.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. But the art of the lawyer, of the popular orator, and the art
of conversation may be called in one word the art of persuasion.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And of persuasion, there may be said to be two kinds?

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. One is private, and the other public.

  Theaet. Yes; each of them forms a class.

  Str. And of private hunting, one sort receives hire, and the other
brings gifts.

  Theaet. I do not understand you.

  Str. You seem never to have observed the manner in which lovers
hunt.

  Theaet. To what do you refer?

  Str. I mean that they lavish gifts on those whom they hunt in
addition to other inducements.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. Let us admit this, then, to be the amatory art.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. But that sort of hireling whose conversation is pleasing and
who baits his hook only with pleasure and exacts nothing but his
maintenance in return, we should all, if I am not mistaken, describe
as possessing flattery or an art of making things pleasant.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And that sort, which professes to form acquaintances only for
the sake of virtue, and demands a reward in the shape of money, may be
fairly called by another name?

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. And what is the name? Will you tell me?

  Theaet. It is obvious enough; for I believe that we have
discovered the Sophist: which is, as I conceive, the proper name for
the class described.

  Str. Then now, Theaetetus, his art may be traced as a branch of
the appropriative, acquisitive family-which hunts
animals,-living-land-tame animals; which hunts man,-privately-for
hire,-taking money in exchange-having the semblance of education;
and this is termed Sophistry, and is a hunt after young men of
wealth and rank-such is the conclusion.

  Theaet. Just so.

  Str. Let us take another branch of his genealogy; for he is a
professor of a great and many sided art; and if we look back at what
has preceded we see that he presents another aspect, besides that of
which we are speaking.

  Theaet. In what respect?

  Str. There were two sorts of acquisitive art; the one concerned with
hunting, the other with exchange.

  Theaet. There were.

  Str. And of the art of exchange there are two divisions, the one
of giving, and the other of selling.

  Theaet. Let us assume that.

  Str. Next, will suppose the art of selling to be divided into two
parts.

  Theaet. How?

  Str. There is one part which is distinguished as the sale of a man's
own productions; another, which is the exchange of the works of
others.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And is not that part of exchange which takes place in the city,
being about half of the whole, termed retailing?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And that which exchanges the goods of one city for those of
another by selling and buying is the exchange of the merchant?

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. And you are aware that this exchange of the merchant is of
two kinds: it is partly concerned with food for the use of the body,
and partly with the food of the soul which is bartered and received in
exchange for money.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. You want to know what is the meaning of food for the soul;
the other kind you surely understand.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Take music in general and painting and marionette playing and
many other things, which are purchased in one city, and carried away
and sold in another-wares of the soul which are hawked about either
for the sake of instruction or amusement;-may not he who takes them
about and sells them be quite as truly called a merchant as he who
sells meats and drinks?

  Theaet. To be sure he may.

  Str. And would you not call by the same name him who buys up
knowledge and goes about from city to city exchanging his wares for
money?

  Theaet. Certainly I should.

  Str. Of this merchandise of the soul, may not one part be fairly
termed the art of display? And there is another part which is
certainly not less ridiculous, but being a trade in learning must be
called by some name germane to the matter?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. The latter should have two names,-one descriptive of the sale
of the knowledge of virtue, and the other of the sale of other kinds
of knowledge.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. The name of art-seller corresponds well enough to the latter;
but you must try and tell me the name of the other.

  Theaet. He must be the Sophist, whom we are seeking; no other name
can possibly be right.

  Str. No other; and so this trader in virtue again turns out to be
our friend the Sophist, whose art may now be traced from the art of
acquisition through exchange, trade, merchandise, to a merchandise
of the soul which is concerned with speech and the knowledge of
virtue.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And there may be a third reappearance of him;-for he may have
settled down in a city, and may fabricate as well as buy these same
wares, intending to live by selling them, and he would still be called
a Sophist?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Then that part of acquisitive art which exchanges, and of
exchange which either sells a man's own productions or retails those
of others; as the case may be, and in either way sells the knowledge
of virtue, you would again term Sophistry?

  Theaet. I must, if I am to keep pace with the argument.

  Str. Let us consider once more whether there may not be yet
another aspect of sophistry.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. In the acquisitive there was a subdivision of the combative
or fighting art.

  Theaet. There was.

  Str. Perhaps we had better divide it.

  Theaet. What shall be the divisions?

  Str. There shall be one division of the competitive, and another
of the pugnacious.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. That part of the pugnacious which is contest of bodily strength
may be properly called by some such name as violent.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And when the war is one of words, it may be termed controversy?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And controversy may be of two kinds.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. When long speeches are answered by long speeches, and there
is public discussion about the just and unjust, that is forensic
controversy.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And there is a private sort of controversy, which is cut up
into questions and answers, and this is commonly called disputation?

  Theaet. Yes, that is the name.

  Str. And of disputation, that sort which is only a discussion
about contracts, and is carried on at random, and without rules-art,
is recognized by the reasoning faculty to be a distinct class, but has
hitherto had no distinctive name, and does not deserve to receive
one from us.

  Theaet. No; for the different sorts of it are too minute and
heterogeneous.

  Str. But that which proceeds by rules of art to dispute about
justice and injustice in their own nature, and about things in
general, we have been accustomed to call argumentation (Eristic)?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And of argumentation, one sort wastes money, and the other
makes money.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. Suppose we try and give to each of these two classes a name.

  Theaet. Let us do so.

  Str. I should say that the habit which leads a man to neglect his
own affairs for the pleasure of conversation, of which the style is
far from being agreeable to the majority of his hearers, may be fairly
termed loquacity: such is my opinion.

  Theaet. That is the common name for it.

  Str. But now who the other is, who makes money out of private
disputation, it is your turn to say.

  Theaet. There is only one true answer: he is the wonderful
Sophist, of whom we are in pursuit, and who reappears again for the
fourth time.

  Str. Yes, and with a fresh pedigree, for he is the money-making
species of the Eristic, disputatious, controversial. pugnacious,
combative, acquisitive family, as the argument has already proven.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. How true was the observation that he was a many-sided animal,
and not to be caught with one hand, as they say!

  Theaet. Then you must catch him with two.

  Str. Yes, we must, if we can. And therefore let us try, another
track in our pursuit of him: You are aware that there are certain
menial occupations which have names among servants?

  Theaet. Yes, there are many such; which of them do you mean?

  Str. I mean such as sifting, straining, winnowing, threshing.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And besides these there are a great many more, such as carding,
spinning, adjusting the warp and the woof; and thousands of similar
expressions are used in the arts.

  Theaet. Of what are they to be patterns, and what are we going to do
with them all?

  Str. I think that in all of these there is implied a notion of
division.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Then if, as I was saying, there is one art which includes all
of them, ought not that art to have one name?

  Theaes. And what is the name of the art?

  Str. The art of discerning or discriminating.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. Think whether you cannot divide this.

  Theaet. I should have to think a long while.

  Str. In all the previously named processes either like has been
separated from like or the better from the worse.

  Theaet. I see now what you mean.

  Str, There is no name for the first kind of separation; of the
second, which throws away the worse and preserves the better, I do
know a name.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. Every discernment or discrimination of that kind, as I have
observed, is called a purification.

  Theaet. Yes, that is the usual expression.

  Str. And any one may see that purification is of two kinds.

  Theaet. Perhaps so, if he were allowed time to think; but I do not
see at this moment.

  Str. There are many purifications of bodies which may with propriety
be comprehended under a single name.

  Theaet. What are they, and what is their name?

  Str. There is the purification of living bodies in their inward
and in their outward parts, of which the former is duly effected by
medicine and gymnastic, the latter by the not very dignified art of
the bath-man; and there is the purification of inanimate substances-to
this the arts of fulling and of furbishing in general attend in a
number of minute particulars, having a variety of names which are
thought ridiculous.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. There can be no doubt that they are thought ridiculous,
Theaetetus; but then the dialectical art never considers whether the
benefit to be derived from the purge is greater or less than that to
be derived from the sponge, and has not more interest in the one
than in the other; her endeavour is to know what is and is not kindred
in all arts, with a view to the acquisition of intelligence; and
having this in view, she honours them all alike, and when she makes
comparisons, she counts one of them not a whit more ridiculous than
another; nor does she esteem him who adduces as his example of
hunting, the general's art, at all more decorous than another who
cites that of the vermin-destroyer, but only as the greater
pretender of the two. And as to your question concerning the name
which was to comprehend all these arts of purification, whether of
animate or inanimate bodies, the art of dialectic is in no wise
particular about fine words, if she maybe only allowed to have a
general name for all other purifications, binding them up together and
separating them off from the purification of the soul or intellect.
For this is the purification at which she wants to arrive, and this we
should understand to be her aim.

  Theaet. Yes, I understand; and I agree that there are two sorts of
purification and that one of them is concerned with the soul, and that
there is another which is concerned with the body.

  Str. Excellent; and now listen to what I am going to say, and try to
divide further the first of the two.

  Theaet. Whatever line of division you suggest, I will endeavour to
assist you.

  Str. Do we admit that virtue is distinct from vice in the soul?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And purification was to leave the good and to cast out whatever
is bad?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Then any taking away of evil from the soul may be properly
called purification?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And in the soul there are two kinds of evil.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. The one may be compared to disease in the body, the other to
deformity.

  Theaet. I do not understand.

  Str. Perhaps you have never reflected that disease and discord are
the same.

  Theaet. To this, again, I know not what I should reply.

  Str. Do you not conceive discord to be a dissolution of kindred
clements, originating in some disagreement?

  Theaet. Just that.

  Str. And is deformity anything but the want of measure, which is
always unsightly?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Str. And do we not see that opinion is opposed to desire, pleasure
to anger, reason to pain, and that all these elements are opposed to
one another in the souls of bad men?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And yet they must all be akin?

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. Then we shall be right in calling vice a discord and disease of
the soul?

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. And when things having motion, an aiming at an appointed
mark, continually miss their aim and glance aside, shall we say that
this is the effect of symmetry among them, or of the want of symmetry?

  Theaet. Clearly of the want of symmetry.

  Str. But surely we know that no soul is voluntarily ignorant of
anything?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Str. And what is ignorance but the aberration of a mind which is
bent on truth, and in which the process of understanding is perverted?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Then we are to regard an unintelligent soul as deformed and
devoid of symmetry?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. Then there are these two kinds of evil in the soul-the one
which is generally called vice, and is obviously a disease of the
soul...

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And there is the other, which they call ignorance, and which,
because existing only in the soul, they will not allow to be vice.

  Theaet. I certainly admit what I at first disputed-that there are
two kinds of vice in the soul, and that we ought to consider
cowardice, intemperance, and injustice to be alike forms of disease in
the soul, and ignorance, of which there are all sorts of varieties, to
be deformity.

  Str. And in the case of the body are there not two arts, which
have to do with the two bodily states?

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. There is gymnastic, which has to do with deformity, and
medicine, which has to do with disease.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And where there is insolence and injustice and cowardice, is
not chastisement the art which is most required?

  Theaet. That certainly appears to be the opinion of mankind.

  Str. Again, of the various kinds of ignorance, may not instruction
be rightly said to be the remedy?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And of the art of instruction, shall we say that there is one
or many kinds? At any rate there are two principal ones. Think.

  Theaet. I will.

  Str. I believe that I can see how we shall soonest arrive at the
answer to this question.

  Theaet. How?

  Str. If we can discover a line which divides ignorance into two
halves. For a division of ignorance into two parts will certainly
imply that the art of instruction is also twofold, answering to the
two divisions of ignorance.

  Theaet. Well, and do you see what you are looking for?

  Str. I do seem to myself to see one very large and bad sort of
ignorance which is quite separate, and may be weighed in the scale
against all other sorts of ignorance put together.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. When a person supposes that he knows, and does not know this
appears to be the great source of all the errors of the intellect.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And this, if I am not mistaken, is the kind of ignorance
which specially earns the title of stupidity.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. What name, then, shall be given to the sort of instruction
which gets rid of this?

  Theaet. The instruction which you mean, Stranger, is, I should
imagine, not the teaching of handicraft arts, but what, thanks to
us, has been termed education in this part the world.

  Str. Yes, Theaetetus, and by nearly all Hellenes. But we have
still to consider whether education admits of any further division.

  Theaet. We have.

  Str. I think that there is a point at which such a division is
possible.

  Theaet. Where?

  Str. Of education, one method appears to be rougher, and another
smoother.

  Theaet. How are we to distinguish the two?

  Str. There is the time-honoured mode which our fathers commonly
practised towards their sons, and which is still adopted by
many-either of roughly reproving their errors, or of gently advising
them; which varieties may be correctly included under the general term
of admonition.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. But whereas some appear to have arrived at the conclusion
that all ignorance is involuntary, and that no one who thinks
himself wise is willing to learn any of those things in which he is
conscious of his own cleverness, and that the admonitory sort of
instruction gives much trouble and does little good-

  Theaet. There they are quite right.

  Str. Accordingly, they set to work to eradicate the spirit of
conceit in another way.

  Theaet. In what way?

  Str. They cross-examine a man's words, when he thinks that he is
saying something and is really saying nothing, and easily convict
him of inconsistencies in his opinions; these they then collect by the
dialectical process, and placing them side by side, show that they
contradict one another about the same things, in relation to the
same things, and in the same respect. He, seeing this, is angry with
himself, and grows gentle towards others, and thus is entirely
delivered from great prejudices and harsh notions, in a way which is
most amusing to the hearer, and produces the most lasting good
effect on the person who is the subject of the operation. For as the
physician considers that the body will receive no benefit from
taking food until the internal obstacles have been removed, so the
purifier of the soul is conscious that his patient will receive no
benefit from the application of knowledge until he is refuted, and
from refutation learns modesty; he must be purged of his prejudices
first and made to think that he knows only what he knows, and no more.

  Theaet. That is certainly the best and wisest state of mind.

  Str. For all these reasons, Theaetetus, we must admit that
refutation is the greatest and chiefest of purifications, and he who
has not been refuted, though he be the Great King himself, is in an
awful state of impurity; he is uninstructed and deformed in those
things in which he who would be truly blessed ought to be fairest
and purest.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. And who are the ministers of this art?
I am afraid to say the Sophists.

  Theaet. Why?

  Str. Lest we should assign to them too high a prerogative.

  Theaet. Yet the Sophist has a certain likeness to our minister of
purification.

  Str. Yes, the same sort of likeness which a wolf, who is the
fiercest of animals, has to a dog, who is the gentlest. But he who
would not be found tripping, ought to be very careful in this matter
of comparisons, for they are most slippery things. Nevertheless, let
us assume that the Sophists are the men. I say this provisionally, for
I think that the line which divides them will be marked enough if
proper care is taken.

  Theaet. Likely enough.

  Str. Let us grant, then, that from the discerning art comes
purification, and from purification let there be separated off a
part which is concerned with the soul; of this mental purification
instruction is a portion, and of instruction education, and of
education, that refutation of vain conceit which has been discovered
in the present argument; and let this be called by you and me the
nobly-descended art of Sophistry.

  Theaet. Very well; and yet, considering the number of forms in which
he has presented himself, I begin to doubt how I can with any truth or
confidence describe the real nature of the Sophist.

  Str. You naturally feel perplexed; and yet I think that he must be
still more perplexed in his attempt to escape us, for as the proverb
says, when every way is blocked, there is no escape; now, then, is the
time of all others to set upon him.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. First let us wait a moment and recover breath, and while we are
resting, we may reckon up in how many forms he has appeared. In the
first place, he was discovered to be a paid hunter after wealth and
youth.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. In the second place, he was a merchant in the goods of the
soul.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. In the third place, he has turned out to be a retailer of the
same sort of wares.

  Theaet. Yes; and in the fourth place, he himself manufactured the
learned wares which he sold.

  Str. Quite right; I will try and remember the fifth myself. He
belonged to the fighting class, and was further distinguished as a
hero of debate, who professed the eristic art.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. The sixth point was doubtful, and yet we at last agreed that he
was a purger of souls, who cleared away notions obstructive to
knowledge.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. Do you not see that when the professor of any art has one
name and many kinds of knowledge, there must be something wrong? The
multiplicity of names which is applied to him shows that the common
principle to which all these branches of knowledge are tending, is not
understood.

  Theaet. I should imagine this to be the case.

  Str. At any rate we will understand him, and no indolence shall
prevent us. Let us begin again, then, and re-examine some of our
statements concerning the Sophist; there was one thing which
appeared to me especially characteristic of him.

  Theaet. To what are you referring?

  Str. We were saying of him, if I am not mistaken, that he was a
disputer?

  Theaet. We were.

  Str. And does he not also teach others the art of disputation?

  Theaet. Certainly he does.

  Str. And about what does he profess that he teaches men to
dispute? To begin at the beginning-Does he make them able to dispute
about divine things, which are invisible to men in general?

  Theaet. At any rate, he is said to do so.

  Str. And what do you say of the visible things in heaven and
earth, and the like?

  Theaet. Certainly he disputes, and teaches to dispute about them.

  Str. Then, again, in private conversation, when any universal
assertion is made about generation and essence, we know that such
persons are tremendous argufiers, and are able to impart their own
skill to others.

  Theaet. Undoubtedly.

  Str. And do they not profess to make men able to dispute about law
and about politics in general?

  Theaet. Why, no one would have anything to say to them, if they
did not make these professions.

  Str. In all and every art, what the craftsman ought to say in answer
to any question is written down in a popular form, and he who likes
may learn.

  Theaet. I suppose that you are referring to the precepts of
Protagoras about wrestling and the other arts?

  Str. Yes, my friend, and about a good many other things. In a
word, is not the art of disputation a power of disputing about all
things?

  Theaet. Certainly; there does not seem to be much which is left out.

  Str. But oh! my dear youth, do you suppose this possible? for
perhaps your young eyes may see things which to our duller sight do
not appear.

  Theaet. To what are you alluding? I do not think that I understand
your present question.

  Str. I ask whether anybody can understand all things.

  Theaet. Happy would mankind be if such a thing were possible!

  Soc. But how can any one who is ignorant dispute in a rational
manner against him who knows?

  Theaet. He cannot.

  Str. Then why has the sophistical art such a mysterious power?

  Theaet. To what do you refer?

  Str. How do the Sophists make young men believe in their supreme and
universal wisdom? For if they neither disputed nor were thought to
dispute rightly, or being thought to do so were deemed no wiser for
their controversial skill, then, to quote your own observation, no one
would give them money or be willing to learn their art.

  Theaet. They certainly would not.

  Str. But they are willing.

  Theaet. Yes, they are.

  Str. Yes, and the reason, as I should imagine, is that they are
supposed to have knowledge of those things about which they dispute?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And they dispute about all things?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And therefore, to their disciples, they appear to be all-wise?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. But they are not; for that was shown to be impossible.

  Theaet. Impossible, of course.

  Str. Then the Sophist has been shown to have a sort of conjectural
or apparent knowledge only of all things, which is not the truth?

  Theaet. Exactly; no better description of him could be given.

  Str. Let us now take an illustration, which will still more
clearly explain his nature.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. I will tell you, and you shall answer me, giving your very
closest attention. Suppose that a person were to profess, not that
he could speak or dispute, but that he knew how to make and do all
things, by a single art.

  Theaet. All things?

  Str. I see that you do not understand the first word that I utter,
for you do not understand the meaning of "all."

  Theaet. No, I do not.

  Str. Under all things, I include you and me, and also animals and
trees.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. Suppose a person to say that he will make you and me, and all
creatures.

  Theaet. What would he mean by "making"? He cannot be a
husbandman;-for you said that he is a maker of animals.

  Str. Yes; and I say that he is also the maker of the sea, and the
earth, and the heavens, and the gods, and of all other things; and,
further, that he can make them in no time, and sell them for a few
pence.

  Theaet. That must be a jest.

  Str. And when a man says that he knows all things, and can teach
them to another at a small cost, and in a short time, is not that a
jest?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And is there any more artistic or graceful form of jest than
imitation?

  Theaet. Certainly not; and imitation is a very comprehensive term,
which includes under one class the most diverse sorts of things.

  Str. We know, of course, that he who professes by one art to make
all things is really a painter, and by the painter's art makes
resemblances of real things which have the same name with them; and he
can deceive the less intelligent sort of young children, to whom he
shows his pictures at a distance, into the belief that he has the
absolute power of making whatever he likes.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And may there not be supposed to be an imitative art of
reasoning? Is it not possible to enchant the hearts of young men by
words poured through their ears, when they are still at a distance
from the truth of facts, by exhibiting to them fictitious arguments,
and making them think that they are true, and that the speaker is
the wisest of men in all things?

  Theaet. Yes; why should there not be another such art?

  Str. But as time goes on, and their hearers advance in years, and
come into closer contact with realities, and have learnt by sad
experience to see and feel the truth of things, are not the greater
part of them compelled to change many opinions which they formerly
entertained, so that the great appears small to them, and the easy
difficult, and all their dreamy speculations are overturned by the
facts of life?

  Theaet. That is my view, as far as I can judge, although, at my age,
I may be one of those who see things at a distance only.

  Str. And the wish of all of us, who are your friends, is and
always will be to bring you as near to the truth as we can without the
sad reality. And now I should like you to tell me, whether the Sophist
is not visibly a magician and imitator of true being; or are we
still disposed to think that he may have a true knowledge of the
various matters about which he disputes?

  Theaet. But how can he, Stranger? Is there any doubt, after what has
been said, that he is to be located in one of the divisions of
children's play?

  Str. Then we must place him in the class of magicians and mimics.

  Theaet. Certainly we must.

  Str. And now our business is not to let the animal out, for we
have got him in a sort of dialectical net, and there is one thing
which he decidedly will not escape.

  Theaet. What is that?

  Str. The inference that he is a juggler.

  Theaet. Precisely my own opinion of him.

  Str. Then, clearly, we ought as soon as possible to divide the
image-making art, and go down into the net, and, if the Sophist does
not run away from us, to seize him according to orders and deliver him
over to reason, who is the lord of the hunt, and proclaim the
capture of him; and if he creeps into the recesses of the imitative
art, and secretes himself in one of them, to divide again and follow
him up until in some sub-section of imitation he is caught. For our
method of tackling each and all is one which neither he nor any
other creature will ever escape in triumph.

  Theaet. Well said; and let us do as you propose.

  Str. Well, then, pursuing the same analytic method as before, I
think that I can discern two divisions of the imitative art, but I
am not as yet able to see in which of them the desired form is to be
found.

  Theaet. Will you tell me first what are two divisions of which you
are speaking?

  Str. One is the art of likeness-making;-generally a likeness of
anything is made by producing a copy which is executed according to
the proportions of the original, similar in length and breadth and
depth, each thing receiving also its appropriate colour.

  Theaet. Is not this always the aim of imitation?

  Str. Not always; in works either of sculpture or of painting,
which are of any magnitude, there is a certain degree of deception;
-for artists were to give the true proportions of their fair works,
the upper part, which is farther off, would appear to be out of
proportion in comparison with the lower, which is nearer; and so
they give up the truth in their images and make only the proportions
which appear to be beautiful, disregarding the real ones.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And that which being other is also like, may we not fairly call
a likeness or image?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And may we not, as I did just now, call that part of the
imitative art which is concerned with making such images the art of
likeness making?

  Theaet. Let that be the name.

  Str. And what shall we call those resemblances of the beautiful,
which appear such owing to the unfavourable position of the spectator,
whereas if a person had the power of getting a correct view of works
of such magnitude, they would appear not even like that to which
they profess to be like? May we not call these "appearances," since
they appear only and are not really like?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. There is a great deal of this kind of thing in painting, and in
all imitation.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. And may we not fairly call the sort of art, which produces an
appearance and not an image, phantastic art?

  Theaet. Most fairly.

  Str. These then are the two kinds of image making-the art of
making likenesses, and phantastic or the art of making appearances?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. I was doubtful before in which of them I should place the
Sophist, nor am I even now able to see clearly; verily he is a
wonderful and inscrutable creature. And now in the cleverest manner he
has got into an impossible place.

  Theaet. Yes, he has.

  Str. Do you speak advisedly, or are you carried away at the moment
by the habit of assenting into giving a hasty answer?

  Theaet. May I ask to what you are referring?

  Str. My dear friend, we are engaged in a very difficult
speculation-there can be no doubt of that; for how a thing can
appear and seem, and not be, or how a man can say a thing which is not
true, has always been and still remains a very perplexing question.
Can any one say or think that falsehood really exists, and avoid being
caught in a contradiction? Indeed, Theaetetus, the task is a difficult
one.

  Theaet. Why?

  Str. He who says that falsehood exists has the audacity to assert
the being of not-being; for this is implied in the possibility of
falsehood. But, my boy, in the days when I was a boy, the great
Parmenides protested against this doctrine, and to the end of his life
he continued to inculcate the same lesson-always repeating both in
verse and out of verse:

   Keep your mind from this way of enquiry, for never will you show
that not-being is

Such is his testimony, which is confirmed by the very expression
when sifted a little. Would you object to begin with the consideration
of the words themselves?

  Theaet. Never mind about me; I am only desirous that you should
carry on the argument in the best way, and that you should take me
with you.

  Str. Very good; and now say, do we venture to utter the forbidden
word "not-being"?

  Theaet. Certainly we do.

  Str. Let us be serious then, and consider the question neither in
strife nor play: suppose that one of the hearers of Parmenides was
asked, "To is the term 'not-being' to be applied?"-do you know what
sort of object he would single out in reply, and what answer he
would make to the enquirer?

  Theaet. That is a difficult question, and one not to be answered
at all by a person like myself.

  Str. There is at any rate no difficulty in seeing that the predicate
"not-being" is not applicable to any being.

  Theaet. None, certainly.

  Str. And if not to being, then not to something.

  Theaet. Of course not.

  Str. It is also plain, that in speaking of something we speak of
being, for to speak of an abstract something naked and isolated from
all being is impossible.

  Theaet. Impossible.

  Str. You mean by assenting to imply that he who says something
must say some one thing?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Some in the singular (ti) you would say is the sign of one,
some in the dual (tine) of two, some in the plural (tines) of many?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Str. Then he who says "not something" must say absolutely nothing.

  Theaet. Most assuredly.

  Str. And as we cannot admit that a man speaks and says nothing, he
who says "not-being" does not speak at all.

  Theaet. The difficulty of the argument can no further go.

  Str. Not yet, my friend, is the time for such a word; for there
still remains of all perplexities the first and greatest, touching the
very foundation of the matter.

  Theaet. What do you mean? Do not be afraid to speak.

  Str. To that which is, may be attributed some other thing which is?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. But can anything which is, be attributed to that which is not?

  Theaet. Impossible.

  Str. And all number is to be reckoned among things which are?

  Theaet. Yes, surely number, if anything, has a real existence.

  Str. Then we must not attempt to attribute to not-being number
either in the singular or plural?

  Theaet. The argument implies that we should be wrong in doing so.

  Str. But how can a man either express in words or even conceive in
thought things which are not or a thing which is not without number?

  Theaet. How indeed?

  Str. When we speak of things which are not attributing plurality
to not-being?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. But, on the other hand, when we say "what is not," do we not
attribute unity?

  Theaet. Manifestly.

  Str. Nevertheless, we maintain that you may not and ought not to
attribute being to not-being?

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. Do you see, then, that not-being in itself can neither be
spoken, uttered, or thought, but that it is unthinkable,
unutterable, unspeakable, indescribable?

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. But, if so, I was wrong in telling you just now that the
difficulty which was coming is the greatest of all.

  Theaet. What! is there a greater still behind?

  Str. Well, I am surprised, after what has been said already, that
you do not see the difficulty in which he who would refute the
notion of not-being is involved. For he is compelled to contradict
himself as soon as he makes the attempt.

  Theaet. What do you mean? Speak more clearly.

  Str. Do not expect clearness from me. For I, who maintain that
not-being has no part either in the one or many, just now spoke and am
still speaking of not-being as one; for I say "not-being." Do you
understand?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And a little while ago I said that not-being is unutterable,
unspeakable, indescribable: do you follow?

  Theaet. I do after a fashion.

  Str. When I introduced the word "is," did I not contradict what I
said before?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Str. And in using the singular verb, did I not speak of not-being as
one?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And when I spoke of not-being as indescribable and
unspeakable and unutterable, in using each of these words in the
singular, did I not refer to not-being as one?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And yet we say that, strictly speaking, it should not be
defined as one or many, and should not even be called "it," for the
use of the word "it" would imply a form of unity.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. How, then, can any one put any faith in me? For now, as always,
I am unequal to the refutation of not-being. And therefore, as I was
saying, do not look to me for the right way of speaking about
not-being; but come, let us try the experiment with you.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. Make a noble effort, as becomes youth, and endeavour with all
your might to speak of not-being in a right manner, without
introducing into it either existence or unity or plurality.

  Theaet. It would be a strange boldness in me which would attempt the
task when I see you thus discomfited.

  Str. Say no more of ourselves; but until we find some one or other
who can speak of not-being without number, we must acknowledge that
the Sophist is a clever rogue who will not be got out of his hole.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. And if we say to him that he professes an art of making
appearances, he will grapple with us and retort our argument upon
ourselves; and when we call him an image-maker he will say, "Pray what
do you mean at all by an image?" -and I should like to know,
Theaetetus, how we can possibly answer the younker's question?

  Theaet. We shall doubtless tell him of the images which are
reflected in water or in mirrors; also of sculptures, pictures, and
other duplicates.

  Str. I see, Theaetetus, that you have never made the acquaintance of
the Sophist.

  Theaet. Why do you think so?

  Str. He will make believe to have his eyes shut, or to have none.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. When you tell him of something existing in a mirror, or in
sculpture, and address him as though he had eyes, he will laugh you to
scorn, and will pretend that he knows nothing of mirrors and
streams, or of sight at all; he will say that he is asking about an
idea.

  Theaet. What can he mean?

  Str. The common notion pervading all these objects, which you
speak of as many, and yet call by the single name of image, as
though it were the unity under which they were all included. How
will you maintain your ground against him?

  Theaet. How. Stranger, can I describe an image except as something
fashioned in the likeness of the true?

  Str. And do you mean this something to be some other true thing,
or what do you mean?

  Theaet. Certainly not another true thing, but only a resemblance.

  Str. And you mean by true that which really is?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And the not true is that which is the opposite of the true?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Str. A resemblance, then, is not really real, if, as you say, not
true?

  Theaet. Nay, but it is in a certain sense.

  Str. You mean to say, not in a true sense?

  Theaet. Yes; it is in reality only an image.

  Str. Then what we call an image is in reality really unreal.

  Theaet. In what a strange complication of being and not-being we are
involved!

  Str. Strange! I should think so. See how, by his reciprocation of
opposites, the many-headed Sophist has compelled us, quite against our
will, to admit the existence of not-being.

  Theaet. Yes, indeed, I see.

  Str. The difficulty is how to define his art without falling into
a contradiction.

  Theaet. How do you mean? And where does the danger lie?

  Str. When we say that he deceives us with an illusion, and that
his art is illusory, do we mean that our soul is led by his art to
think falsely, or what do we mean?

  Theaet. There is nothing else to be said.

  Str. Again, false opinion is that form of opinion which thinks the
opposite of the truth:-You would assent?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. You mean to say that false opinion thinks what is not?

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. Does false opinion think that things which are not are not,
or that in a certain sense they are?

  Theaet. Things that are not must be imagined to exist in a certain
sense, if any degree of falsehood is to be possible.

  Str. And does not false opinion also think that things which most
certainly exist do not exist at all?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And here, again, is falsehood?

  Theaet. Falsehood-yes.

  Str. And in like manner, a false proposition will be deemed to be
one which are, the nonexistence of things which are, and the existence
of things which are not.

  Theaet. There is no other way in which a false proposition can
arise.

  Str. There is not; but the Sophist will deny these statements. And
indeed how can any rational man assent to them, when the very
expressions which we have just used were before acknowledged by us
to be unutterable, unspeakable, indescribable, unthinkable? Do you see
his point, Theaetetus?

  Theaet. Of course he will say that we are contradicting ourselves
when we hazard the assertion, that falsehood exists in opinion and
in words; for in maintaining this, we are compelled over and over
again to assert being of not-being, which we admitted just now to be
an utter impossibility.

  Str. How well you remember! And now it is high time to hold a
consultation as to what we ought to do about the Sophist; for if we
persist in looking for him in the class of false workers and
magicians, you see that the handles for objection and the difficulties
which will arise are very numerous and obvious.

  Theaet. They are indeed.

  Str. We have gone through but a very small portion of them, and they
are really infinite.

  Theaet. If that is the case, we cannot possibly catch the Sophist.

  Str. Shall we then be so faint-hearted as to give him up?

  Theaet. Certainly not, I should say, if we can get the slightest
hold upon him.

  Str. Will you then forgive me, and, as your words imply, not be
altogether displeased if I flinch a little from the grasp of such a
sturdy argument?

  Theaet. To be sure I will.

  Str. I have a yet more urgent request to make.

  Theaet. Which is-?

  Str. That you will promise not to regard me as a parricide.

  Theaet. And why?

  Str. Because, in self-defence, I must test the philosophy of my
father Parmenides, and try to prove by main force, that in a certain
sense not-being is, and that being, on the other hand, is not.

  Theaet. Some attempt of the kind is clearly needed.

  Str. Yes, a blind man, as they say, might see that, and, unless
these questions are decided in one way or another, no one when he
speaks false words, or false opinion, or idols, or images or
imitations or appearances, or about the arts which are concerned
with them; can avoid falling into ridiculous contradictions.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. And therefore I must venture to lay hands on my father's
argument; for if I am to be over-scrupulous, I shall have to give
the matter up.

  Theaet. Nothing in the world should ever induce us to do so.

  Str. I have a third little request which I wish to make.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. You heard me-say what-I have always felt and still feel-that
I have no heart for this argument?

  Theaet. I did.

  Str. I tremble at the thought of what I have said, and expect that
you will deem me mad, when you hear of my sudden changes and
shiftings; let me therefore observe, that I am examining the
question entirely out of regard for you.

  Theaet. There is no reason for you to fear that I shall impute any
impropriety to you, if you attempt this refutation and proof; take
heart, therefore, and proceed.

  Str. And where shall I begin the perilous enterprise? I think that
the road which I must take is-

  Theaet. Which?-Let me hear.

  Str. I think that we had better, first of all, consider the points
which at present are regard as self-evident, lest we may have fallen
into some confusion, and be too ready to assent to one another,
fancying that we are quite clear about them.

  Theaet. Say more distinctly what you mean.

  Str. I think that Parmenides, and all ever yet undertook to
determine the number and nature of existences, talked to us in
rather a light and easy strain.

  Theaet. How?

  Str. As if we had been children, to whom they repeated each his
own mythus or story;-one said that there were three principles, and
that at one time there was war between certain of them; and then again
there was peace, and they were married and begat children, and brought
them up; and another spoke of two principles,-a moist and a dry, or
a hot and a cold, and made them marry and cohabit. The Eleatics,
however, in our part of the world, say that things are many in name,
but in nature one; this is their mythus, which goes back to
Xenophanes, and is even older. Then there are Ionian, and in more
recent times Sicilian muses, who have arrived at the conclusion that
to unite the two principles is safer, and to say that being is one and
many, and that these are held together by enmity and friendship,
ever parting, ever meeting, as the-severer Muses assert, while the
gentler ones do not insist on the perpetual strife and peace, but
admit a relaxation and alternation of them; peace and unity
sometimes prevailing under the sway of Aphrodite, and then again
plurality and war, by reason of a principle of strife. Whether any
of them spoke the truth in all this is hard to determine; besides,
antiquity and famous men should have reverence, and not be liable to
accusations; so serious; Yet one thing may be said of them without
offence-

  Theaet. What thing?

  Str. That they went on their several ways disdaining to notice
people like ourselves; they did not care whether they took us with
them, or left us behind them.

  Theaet. How do you mean?

  Str. I mean to say, that when they talk of one, two, or more
elements, which are or have become or are becoming, or again of heat
mingling with cold, assuming in some other part of their works
separations and mixtures,-tell me, Theaetetus, do you understand
what they mean by these expressions? When I was a younger man, I
used to fancy that I understood quite well what was meant by the
term "not-being," which is our present subject of dispute; and now you
see in what a fix we are about it.

  Theaet. I see.

  Str. And very likely we have been getting into the same perplexity
about "being," and yet may fancy that when anybody utters the word, we
understand him quite easily, although we do not know about
not-being. But we may be; equally ignorant of both.

  Theaet. I dare say.

  Str. And the same may be said of all the terms just mentioned.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. The consideration of most of them may be deferred; but we had
better now discuss the chief captain and leader of them.

  Theaet. Of what are you speaking? You clearly think that we must
first investigate what people mean by the word "being."

  Str. You follow close at heels, Theaetetus. For the right method,
I conceive, will be to call into our presence the dualistic
philosophers and to interrogate them. "Come," we will say, "Ye, who
affirm that hot and cold or any other two principles are the universe,
what is this term which you apply to both of them, and what do you
mean when you say that both and each of them 'are'? How are we to
understand the word 'are'? Upon your view, are we to suppose that
there is a third principle over and above the other two-three in
all, and not two? For clearly you cannot say that one of the two
principles is being, and yet attribute being equally to both of
them; for, if you did, whichever of the two is identified with
being, will comprehend the other; and so they will be one and not
two."

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. But perhaps you mean to give the name of "being" to both of
them together?

  Theaet. Quite likely.

  Str. "Then, friends," we shall reply to them, "the answer is plainly
that the two will still be resolved into one."

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. "Since then, we are in a difficulty, please to tell us what you
mean, when you speak of being; for there can be no doubt that you
always from the first understood your own meaning, whereas we once
thought that we understood you, but now we are in a great strait.
Please to begin by explaining this matter to us, and let us no
longer fancy that we understand you, when we entirely misunderstand
you." There will be no impropriety in our demanding an answer to
this question, either of the dualists or of the pluralists?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Str. And what about the assertors of the oneness of the all-must
we not endeavour to ascertain from them what they mean by "being"?

  Theaet. By all means.

  Str. Then let them answer this question: One, you say, alone is?
"Yes," they will reply.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And there is something which you call "being"?

  Theaet. "Yes."

  Str. And is being the same as one, and do you apply two names to the
same thing?

  Theaet. What will be their answer, Stranger?

  Str. It is clear, Theaetetus, that he who asserts the unity of being
will find a difficulty in answering this or any other question.

  Theaet. Why so?

  Str. To admit of two names, and to affirm that there is nothing
but unity, is surely ridiculous?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And equally irrational to admit that a name is anything?

  Theaet. How so?

  Str. To distinguish the name from the thing, implies duality.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And yet he who identifies the name with the thing will be
compelled to say that it is the name of nothing, or if he says that it
is the name of something, even then the name will only be the name
of a name, and of nothing else.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And the one will turn out to be only one of one, and being
absolute unity, will represent a mere name.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And would they say that the whole is other than the one that
is, or the same with it?

  Theaet. To be sure they would, and they actually say so.

  Str. If being is a whole, as Parmenides sings,-

  Every way like unto the fullness of a well-rounded sphere,

  Evenly balanced from the centre on every side,

  And must needs be neither greater nor less in any way,

  Neither on this side nor on that-

then being has a centre and extremes, and, having these, must also
have parts.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Yet that which has parts may have the attribute of unity in all
the parts, and in this way being all and a whole, may be one?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. But that of which this is the condition cannot be absolute
unity?

  Theaet. Why not?

  Str. Because, according to right reason, that which is truly one
must be affirmed to be absolutely indivisible.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. But this indivisible, if made up of many parts, will contradict
reason.

  Theaet. I understand.

  Str. Shall we say that being is one and a whole, because it has
the attribute of unity? Or shall we say that being is not a whole at
all?

  Theaet. That is a hard alternative to offer.

  Str. Most true; for being, having in a certain sense the attribute
of one, is yet proved not to be the same as one, and the all is
therefore more than one.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And yet if being be not a whole, through having the attribute
of unity, and there be such a thing as an absolute whole, being
lacks something of its own nature?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Upon this view, again, being, having a defect of being, will
become not-being?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And, again, the all becomes more than one, for being and the
whole will each have their separate nature.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. But if the whole does not exist at all, all the previous
difficulties remain the same, and there will be the further
difficulty, that besides having no being, being can never have come
into being.

  Theaet. Why so?

  Str. Because that which comes into being always comes into being
as a whole, so that he who does not give whole a place among beings,
cannot speak either of essence or generation as existing.

  Theaet. Yes, that certainly appears to be true.

  Str. Again; how can that which is not a whole have any quantity? For
that which is of a certain quantity must necessarily be the whole of
that quantity.

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Str. And there will be innumerable other points, each of them
causing infinite trouble to him who says that being is either, one
or two.

  Theaet. The difficulties which are dawning upon us prove this; for
one objection connects with another, and they are always involving
what has preceded in a greater and worse perplexity.

  Str. We are far from having exhausted the more exact thinkers who
treat of being and not-being. But let us be content to leave them, and
proceed to view those who speak less precisely; and we shall find as
the result of all, that the nature of being is quite as difficult to
comprehend as that of not-being.

  Theaet. Then now we will go to the others.

  Str. There appears to be a sort of war of Giants and Gods going on
amongst them; they are fighting with one another about the nature of
essence.

  Theaet. How is that?

  Str. Some of them are dragging down all things from heaven and
from the unseen to earth, and they literally grasp in their hands
rocks and oaks; of these they lay hold, and obstinately maintain, that
the things only which can be touched or handled have being or essence,
because they define being and body as one, and if any one else says
that what is not a body exists they altogether despise him, and will
hear of nothing but body.

  Theaet. I have often met with such men, and terrible fellows they
are.

  Str. And that is the reason why their opponents cautiously defend
themselves from above, out of an unseen world, mightily contending
that true essence consists of certain intelligible and incorporeal
ideas; the bodies of the materialists, which by them are maintained to
be the very truth, they break up into little bits by their
arguments, and affirm them to be, not essence, but generation and
motion. Between the two armies, Theaetetus, there is always an endless
conflict raging concerning these matters.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Let us ask each party in turn, to give an account of that which
they call essence.

  Theaet. How shall we get it out of them?

  Str. With those who make being to consist in ideas, there will be
less difficulty, for they are civil people enough; but there will be
very great difficulty, or rather an absolute impossibility, in getting
an opinion out of those who drag everything down to matter. Shall I
tell you what we must do?

  Theaet. What?

  Str. Let us, if we can, really improve them; but if this is not
possible, let us imagine them to be better than they are, and more
willing to answer in accordance with the rules of argument, and then
their opinion will be more worth having; for that which better men
acknowledge has more weight than that which is acknowledged by
inferior men. Moreover we are no respecters of persons, but seekers
after time.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. Then now, on the supposition that they are improved, let us ask
them to state their views, and do you interpret them.

  Theaet. Agreed.

  Str. Let them say whether they would admit that there is such a
thing as a mortal animal.

  Theaet. Of course they would.

  Str. And do they not acknowledge this to be a body having a soul?

  Theaet. Certainly they do.

  Str. Meaning to say the soul is something which exists?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And do they not say that one soul is just, and another
unjust, and that one soul is wise, and another foolish?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And that the just and wise soul becomes just and wise by the
possession of justice and wisdom, and the opposite under opposite
circumstances?

  Theaet. Yes, they do.

  Str. But surely that which may be present or may be absent will be
admitted by them to exist?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And, allowing that justice, wisdom, the other virtues, and
their opposites exist, as well as a soul in which they inhere, do they
affirm any of them to be visible and tangible, or are they all
invisible?

  Theaet. They would say that hardly any of them are visible.

  Str. And would they say that they are corporeal?

  Theaet. They would distinguish: the soul would be said by them to
have a body; but as to the other qualities of justice, wisdom, and the
like, about which you asked, they would not venture either to deny
their existence, or to maintain that they were all corporeal.

  Str. Verily, Theaetetus, I perceive a great improvement in them; the
real aborigines, children of the dragon's teeth, would have been
deterred by no shame at all, but would have obstinately asserted
that nothing is which they are not able to squeeze in their hands.

  Theaet. That is pretty much their notion.

  Str. Let us push the question; for if they will admit that any, even
the smallest particle of being, is incorporeal, it is enough; they
must then say what that nature is which is common to both the
corporeal and incorporeal, and which they have in their mind's eye
when they say of both of them that they "are." Perhaps they may be
in a difficulty; and if this is the case, there is a possibility
that they may accept a notion of ours respecting the nature of
being, having nothing of their own to offer.

  Theaet. What is the notion? Tell me, and we shall soon see.

  Str. My notion would be, that anything which possesses any sort of
power to affect another, or to be affected by another, if only for a
single moment, however trifling the cause and however slight the
effect, has real existence; and I hold that the definition of being is
simply power of

  Theaet. They accept your suggestion, having nothing better of
their own to offer.

  Str. Very good; perhaps we, as well as they, may one day change
our minds; but, for the present, this may be regarded as the
understanding which is established with them.

  Theaet. Agreed.

  Str. Let us now go to the friends of ideas; of their opinions,
too, you shall be the interpreter.

  Theaet. I will.

  Str. To them we say-You would distinguish essence from generation?

  Theaet. "Yes," they reply.

  Str. And you would allow that we participate in generation, with the
body, and through perception, but we participate with the soul through
in true essence; and essence you would affirm to be always the same
and immutable, whereas generation or becoming varies?

  Theaet. Yes; that is what we should affirm.

  Str. Well, fair sirs, we say to them, what is this participation,
which you assert of both? Do you agree with our recent definition?

  Theaet. What definition?

  Str. We said that being was an active or passive energy, arising out
of a certain power which proceeds from elements meeting with one
another. Perhaps your cars, Theaetetus, may fail to catch their
answer, which I recognize because I have been accustomed to hear it.

  Theaet. And what is their answer?

  Str. They deny the truth of what we were just now, saying to the
aborigines about existence.

  Theaet. What was that?

  Str. Any power of doing or suffering in a degree however slight
was held by us to be a sufficient definition of being?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. They deny this, and say that the power of doing or suffering is
confined to becoming, and that neither power is applicable to being.

  Theaet. And is there not some truth in what they say?

  Str. Yes; but our reply will be that we want to ascertain from
them more distinctly, whether they further admit that the soul
knows, and that being or essence is known.

  Theaet. There can be no doubt that they say so.

  Str. And is knowing and being known, doing or suffering, or both, or
is the one doing and the other suffering, or has neither any share
in either?

  Theaet. Clearly, neither has any share in either; for if they say
anything else, they will contradict themselves.

  Str. I understand; but they will allow that if to know is active,
then, of course, to be known is passive. And on this view being, in so
far as it is known, is acted upon by knowledge, and is therefore in
motion; for that which is in a state of rest cannot be acted upon,
as we affirm.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And, O heavens, can we ever be made to believe that motion
and life and soul and mind are not present with perfect being? Can
we imagine that, being is devoid of life and mind, and exists in awful
unmeaningness an everlasting fixture?

  Theaet. That would be a dreadful thing to admit, Stranger.

  Str. But shall we say that has mind and not life?

  Theaet. How is that possible?

  Str. Or shall we say that both inhere in perfect being, but that
it has no soul which contains them?

  Theaet. And in what other way can it contain them?

  Str. Or that being has mind and life and soul, but although
endowed with soul remains absolutely unmoved?

   Theaet. All three suppositions appear to me to be irrational.

  Str. Under being, then, we must include motion, and that which is
moved.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Then, Theaetetus, our inference is, that if there is no motion,
neither is there any mind anywhere, or about anything or belonging
to any one.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And yet this equally follows, if we grant that all things are
in motion-upon this view too mind has no existence.

  Theaet. How so?

  Str. Do you think that sameness of condition and mode and subject
could ever exist without a principle of rest?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Str. Can you see how without them mind could exist, or come into
existence anywhere?

  Theaet. No.

  Str. And surely contend we must in every possible way against him
who would annihilate knowledge and reason and mind, and yet ventures
to speak confidently about anything.

  Theaet. Yes, with all our might.

  Str. Then the philosopher, who has the truest reverence for these
qualities, cannot possibly accept the notion of those who say that the
whole is at rest, either as unity or in many forms: and he will be
utterly deaf to those who assert universal motion. As children say
entreatingly "Give us both." so he will include both the moveable
and immoveable in his definition of being and all.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. And now, do we seem to have gained a fair notion of being?

  Theaet. Yes truly.

  Str. Alas, Theaetetus, methinks that we are now only beginning to
see the real difficulty of the enquiry into the nature of it.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. O my friend, do you not see that nothing can exceed out
ignorance, and yet we fancy that we are saying something good?

  Theaet. I certainly thought that we were; and I do not at all
understand how we never found out our desperate case.

  Str. Reflect: after having made, these admissions, may we not be
justly asked, the same questions which we ourselves were asking of
those who said that all was hot and cold?

  Theaet. What were they? Will you recall them to my mind?

  Str. To be sure, I will remind you of them, by putting the same
questions, to you which I did to them, and then we shall get on.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Would you not say that rest and motion are in the most entire
opposition to one another?

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. And yet you would say that both and either of them equally are?

  Theaet. I should.

  Str. And when you admit that both or either of them are, do you mean
to say that both or either, of them are in motion?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Str. Or do you wish to imply that they are both at rest, when you
say that they are?

  Theaet. Of course not.

  Str. Then you conceive of being as some third and distinct nature,
under which rest and motion are alike included; and, observing that
they both participate in being, you declare that they are.

  Theaet. Truly we seem to have an intimation that being is some third
thing, when we say that rest and motion are.

  Str. Then being is not the combination of rest and motion, but
something different from them.

  Theaet. So it would appear.

  Str. Being, then, according to its own nature, is neither in
motion nor at rest.

  Theaet. That is very much the truth.

  Str. Where, then, is a man to look for help who would have any clear
or fixed notion of being in his mind?

  Theaet. Where, indeed?

  Str. I scarcely think that he can look anywhere; for that which is
not in motion must be at rest, and again, that which is not at rest
must be in motion; but being is placed outside of both these
classes. Is this possible?

  Theaet. Utterly impossible.

  Str. Here, then, is another thing which we ought to bear in mind.

  Theaet. What?

  Str. When we were asked to what we were to assign the appellation of
not-being, we were in the greatest difficulty:-do you remember?

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. And are we not now in as a difficulty about being?

  Theaes. I should say, Stranger, that we are in one which is, if
possible, even greater.

  Str. Then let us acknowledge the difficulty; and as being and
not-being are involved in the same perplexity, there is hope that when
the one appears more or less distinctly, the other will equally
appear; and if we are able to see neither there may still be a
chance of steering our way in between them, without any great
discredit.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. Let us enquire, then, how we come to predicate many names of
the same thing.

  Theaet. Give an example.

  Str. I mean that we speak of man, for example, under many names-that
we attribute to him colours and forms and magnitudes and virtues and
vices, in all of which instances and in ten thousand others we not
only speak of him as a man, but also as good, and having number-less
other attributes, and in the same way anything else which we
originally supposed to be one is described by us as many, and under
many names.

  Theaet. That is true.

  Str. And thus we provide a rich feast for tyros, whether young or
old; for there is nothing easier than to argue that the one cannot
be many, or the many one; and great is their delight in denying that a
man is good; for man, they insist, is man and good is good. I dare say
that you have met with persons who take-an interest in such
matters-they are often elderly men, whose meagre sense is thrown
into amazement by these discoveries of theirs, which they believe to
be the height of wisdom.

  Theaet. Certainly, I have.

  Str. Then, not to exclude any one who has ever speculated at all
upon the nature of being, let us put our questions to them as well
as to our former friends.

  Theaet. What questions?

  Str. Shall we refuse to attribute being to motion and rest, or
anything to anything, and assume that they do not mingle, and are
incapable of participating in one another? Or shall we gather all into
one class of things communicable with one another? Or are some
things communicable and others not?-Which of these alternatives,
Theaetetus, will they prefer?

  Theaet. I have nothing to answer on their behalf. Suppose that you
take all these hypotheses in turn, and see what are the consequences
which follow from each of them.

  Str. Very good, and first let us assume them to say that nothing
is capable of participating in anything else in any respect; in that
case rest and motion cannot participate in being at all.

  Theaet. They cannot.

  Str. But would either of them be if not participating in being?

  Theaet. No.

  Str. Then by this admission everything is instantly overturned, as
well the doctrine of universal motion as of universal rest, and also
the doctrine of those who distribute being into immutable and
everlasting kinds; for all these add on a notion of being, some
affirming that things "are" truly in motion, and others that they
"are" truly at rest.

  Theaes. Just so.

  Str. Again, those who would at one time compound, and at another
resolve all things, whether making them into one and out of one
creating infinity, or dividing them into finite clements, and
forming compounds out of these; whether they suppose the processes
of creation to be successive or continuous, would be talking
nonsense in all this if there were no admixture.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Most ridiculous of all will the men themselves be who want to
carry out the argument and yet forbid us to call anything, because
participating in some affection from another, by the name of that
other.

  Theaet. Why so?

  Str. Why, because they are compelled to use the words "to be,"
"apart," "from others. "in itself," and ten thousand more, which
they cannot give up, but must make the connecting links of
discourse; and therefore they do not require to be refuted by
others, but their enemy, as the saying is, inhabits the same house
with them; they are always carrying about with them an adversary, like
the wonderful ventriloquist, Eurycles, who out of their own bellies
audibly contradicts them.

  Theaet. Precisely so; a very true and exact illustration.

  Str. And now, if we suppose that all things have the power of
communion with one another -what will follow?

  Theaet. Even I can solve that riddle.

  Str. How?

  Theaet. Why, because motion itself would be at rest, and rest
again in motion, if they could be attributed to one another.

  Str. But this is utterly impossible.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. Then only the third hypothesis remains.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. For, surely, either all things have communion with all; or
nothing with any other thing; or some things communicate with some
things and others not.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And two out of these three suppositions have been found to be
impossible.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Every one then, who desires to answer truly, will adopt the
third and remaining hypothesis of the communion of some with some.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. This communion of some with some may be illustrated by the case
of letters; for some letters do not fit each other, while others do.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. And the vowels, especially, are a sort of bond which pervades
all the other letters, so that without a vowel one consonant cannot be
joined to another.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. But does every one know what letters will unite with what? Or
is art required in order to do so?

  Theaet. What is required.

  Str. What art?

  Theaet. The art of grammar.

  Str. And is not this also true of sounds high and low?-Is not he who
has the art to know what sounds mingle, a musician, and he who is
ignorant, not a musician?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And we shall find this to be generally true of art or the
absence of art.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. And as classes are admitted by us in like manner to be some
of them capable and others incapable of intermixture, must not he
who would rightly show what kinds will unite and what will not,
proceed by the help of science in the path of argument? And will he
not ask if the connecting links are universal, and so capable of
intermixture with all things; and again, in divisions, whether there
are not other universal classes, which make them possible?

  Theaet. To be sure he will require science, and, if I am not
mistaken, the very greatest of all sciences.

  Str. How are we to call it? By Zeus, have we not lighted unwittingly
upon our free and noble science, and in looking for the Sophist have
we not entertained the philosopher unawares?

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. Should we not say that the division according to classes, which
neither makes the same other, nor makes other the same, is the
business of the dialectical science?

  Theaet. That is what we should say.

  Str. Then, surely, he who can divide rightly is able to see
clearly one form pervading a scattered multitude, and many different
forms contained under one higher form; and again, one form knit
together into a single whole and pervading many such wholes, and
many forms, existing only in separation and isolation. This is the
knowledge of classes which determines where they can have communion
with one another and where not.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And the art of dialectic would be attributed by you only to the
philosopher pure and true?

  Theaet. Who but he can be worthy?

  Str. In this region we shall always discover the philosopher, if
we look for him; like the Sophist, he is not easily discovered, but
for a different reason.

  Theaet. For what reason?

  Str. Because the Sophist runs away into the darkness of not-being,
in which he has learned by habit to feel about, and cannot be
discovered because of the darkness of the place. is not that true?

  Theaet. It seems to be so.

  Str. And the philosopher, always holding converse through reason
with the idea of being, is also dark from excess of light; for the
souls of the many have no eye which can endure the vision of the
divine.

  Theaet. Yes; that seems to be quite as true as the other.

  Str. Well, the philosopher may hereafter be more fully considered by
us, if we are disposed; but the Sophist must clearly not be allowed to
escape until we have had a good look at him.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. Since, then, we are agreed that some classes have a communion
with one another, and others not, and some have communion with a few
and others with many, and that there is no reason why some should
not have universal communion with all, let us now pursue the
enquiry, as the argument suggests, not in relation to all ideas,
lest the multitude of them should confuse us, but let us select a
few of those which are reckoned to be the principal ones, and consider
their several natures and their capacity of communion with one
another, in order that if we are not able to apprehend with perfect
clearness the notions of being and not-being, we may at least not fall
short in the consideration of them, so far as they come within the
scope of the present enquiry, if peradventure we may be allowed to
assert the reality of not-being, and yet escape unscathed.

  Theaet. We must do so.

  Str. The most important of all the genera are those which we were
just now mentioning-being and rest and motion.

  Theaet. Yes, by far.

  Str. And two of these are, as we affirm, incapable of communion with
one another.

  Theaet. Quite incapable.

  Str. Whereas being surely has communion with both of them, for
both of them are?

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. That makes up three of them.

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. And each of them is other than the remaining two, but the
same with itself.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. But then, what is the meaning of these two words, "same" and
"other"? Are they two new kinds other than the three, and yet always
of necessity intermingling with them, and are we to have five kinds
instead of three; or when we speak of the same and other, are we
unconsciously speaking of one of the three first kinds?

  Theaet. Very likely we are.

  Str. But, surely, motion and rest are neither the other nor the
same.

  Theaet. How is that?

  Str. Whatever we attribute to motion and rest in common, cannot be
either of them.

  Theaet. Why not?

  Str. Because motion would be at rest and rest in motion, for
either of them, being predicated of both, will compel the other to
change into the opposite of its own nature, because partaking of its
opposite.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. Yet they surely both partake of the same and of the other?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Then we must not assert that motion, any more than rest, is
either the same or the other.

  Theaet. No; we must not.

  Str. But are we to conceive that being and the same are identical?

  Theaet. Possibly.

  Str. But if they are identical, then again in saying that motion and
rest have being, we should also be saying that they are the same.

  Theaet. Which surely cannot be.

  Str. Then being and same cannot be one.

  Theaet. Scarcely.

  Str. Then we may suppose the same to be a fourth class, which is now
to be added to the three others.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And shall we call the other a fifth class? Or should we
consider being and other to be two names of the same class?

  Theaet. Very likely.

  Str. But you would agree, if I am not mistaken, that existences
are relative as well as absolute?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And the other is always relative to other?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. But this would not be the case unless being and the other
entirely differed; for, if the other, like being, were absolute as
well as relative, then there would have been a kind of other which was
not other than other. And now we find that what is other must of
necessity be what it is in relation to some other.

  Theaet. That is the true state of the case.

  Str. Then we must admit the other as the fifth of our selected
classes.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And the fifth class pervades all classes, for they all differ
from one another, not by reason of their own nature, but because
they partake of the idea of the other.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. Then let us now put the case with reference to each of the
five.

  Theaet. How?

  Str. First there is motion, which we affirm to be absolutely "other"
than rest: what else can we say?

  Theaet. It is so.

  Str. And therefore is not rest.

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Str. And yet is, because partaking of being.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Again, motion is other than the same?

  Theaet. Just so.

  Str. And is therefore not the same.

  Theaet. It is not.

  Str. Yet, surely, motion is the same, because all things partake
of the same.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. Then we must admit, and not object to say, that motion is the
same and is not the same, for we do not apply the terms "same" and
"not the same," in the same sense; but we call it the "same," in
relation to itself, because partaking of the same; and not the same,
because having communion with the other, it is thereby severed from
the same, and has become not that but other, and is therefore
rightly spoken of as "not the same."

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. And if absolute motion in any point of view partook of rest,
there would be no absurdity in calling motion stationary.

  Theaet. Quite right, -that is, on the supposition that some
classes mingle with one another, and others not.

  Str. That such a communion of kinds is according to nature, we had
already proved before we arrived at this part of our discussion.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Let us proceed, then. we not say that motion is other than
the other, having been also proved by us to be other than the same and
other than rest?

  Theaet. That is certain.

  Str. Then, according to this view, motion is other and also not
other?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. What is the next step? Shall we say that motion is other than
the three and not other than the fourth-for we agreed that there are
five classes about and in the sphere of which we proposed to make
enquiry?

  Theaet. Surely we cannot admit that the number is less than it
appeared to be just now.

  Str. Then we may without fear contend that motion is other than
being?

  Theaet. Without the least fear.

  Str. The plain result is that motion, since it partakes of being,
really is and also is not?

  Theaet. Nothing can be plainer.

  Str. Then not-being necessarily exists in the case of motion and
of every class; for the nature of the other entering into them all,
makes each of them other than being, and so non-existent; and
therefore of all of them, in like manner, we may truly say that they
are not-and again, inasmuch as they partake of being, that they are
and are existent.

  Theaet. So we may assume.

  Str. Every class, then, has plurality of being and infinity of
not-being.

  Theaet. So we must infer.

  Str. And being itself may be said to be other than the other kinds.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Then we may infer that being is not, in respect of as many
other things as there are; for not-being these it is itself one, and
is: not the other things, which are infinite in number.

  Theaet. That is not far from the truth.

  Str. And we must not quarrel with this result, since it is of the
nature of classes to have communion with one another; and if any one
denies our present statement [viz., that being is not, etc.], let
him first argue with our former conclusion [i.e., respecting the
communion of ideas], and then he may proceed to argue with what
follows.

  Theaet. Nothing can be fairer.

  Str. Let me ask you to consider a further question.

  Theaet. What question?

  Str. When we speak of not-being, we speak, I suppose, not of
something opposed to being, but only different.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. When we speak of something as not great, does the expression
seem to you to imply what is little any more than what is equal?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Str. The negative particles, ou and me, when prefixed to words, do
not imply opposition, but only difference from the words, or more
correctly from the things represented by the words, which follow them.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. There is another point to be considered, if you do not object.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. The nature of the other appears to me to be divided into
fractions like knowledge.

  Theaet. How so?

  Str. Knowledge, like the other, is one; and yet the various parts of
knowledge have each of them their own particular name, and hence there
are many arts and kinds of knowledge.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And is not the case the same with the parts of the other, which
is also one?

  Theaet. Very likely; but will you tell me how?

  Str. There is some part of the other which is opposed to the
beautiful?

  Theaet. There is.

  Str. Shall we say that this has or has not a name?

  Theaet. It has; for whatever we call not beautiful is other than the
beautiful, not than something else.

  Str. And now tell me another thing.

  Theaet. What?

  Str. Is the not-beautiful anything but this-an existence parted
off from a certain kind of existence, and again from another point
of view opposed to an existing something?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Then the not-beautiful turns out to be the opposition of
being to being?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. But upon this view, is the beautiful a more real and the
not-beautiful a less real existence?

  Theaet. Not at all.

  Str. And the not-great may be said to exist, equally with the great?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And, in the same way, the just must be placed in the same
category with the not-just the one cannot be said to have any more
existence than the other.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. The same may be said of other things; seeing that the nature of
the other has a real existence, the parts of this nature must
equally be supposed to exist.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Str. Then, as would appear, the opposition of a part of the other,
and of a part of being, to one another, is, if I may venture to say
so, as truly essence as being itself, and implies not the opposite
of being, but only what is other than being.

  Theaet. Beyond question.

  Str. What then shall we call it?

  Theaet. Clearly, not-being; and this is the very nature for which
the Sophist compelled us to search.

  Str. And has not this, as you were saying, as real an existence as
any other class? May I not say with confidence that not-being has an
assured existence, and a nature of its own? just as the great was
found to be great and the beautiful beautiful, and the not-great
not-great, and the not-beautiful not-beautiful, in the same manner
not-being has been found to be and is not-being, and is to be reckoned
one among the many classes of being. Do you, Theaetetus, still feel
any doubt of this?

  Theaet. None whatever.

  Str. Do you observe that our scepticism has carried us beyond the
range of Parmenides' prohibition?

  Theaet. In what?

  Str. We have advanced to a further point, and shown him more than he
for bad us to investigate.

  Theaet. How is that?

  Str. Why, because he says-

   Not-being never is, and do thou keep thy thoughts from this way
of enquiry.

  Theaet. Yes, he says so.

  Str. Whereas, we have not only proved that things which are not are,
but we have shown what form of being not-being is; for we have shown
that the nature of the other is, and is distributed over all things in
their relations to one another, and whatever part of the other is
contrasted with being, this is precisely what we have ventured to call
not-being.

  Theaet. And surely, Stranger, we were quite right.

  Str. Let not any one say, then, that while affirming the
opposition of not-being to being, we still assert the being of
not-being; for as to whether there is an opposite of being, to that
enquiry we have long said good-bye-it may or may not be, and may or
may not be capable of definition. But as touching our present
account of not-being, let a man either convince us of error, or, so
long as he cannot, he too must say, as we are saying, that there is
a communion of classes, and that being, and difference or other,
traverse all things and mutually interpenetrate, so that the other
partakes of being, and by reason of this participation is, and yet
is not that of which it partakes, but other, and being other than
being, it is clearly a necessity that not-being should be. again,
being, through partaking of the other, becomes a class other than
the remaining classes, and being other than all of them, is not each
one of them, and is not all the rest, so that undoubtedly there are
thousands upon thousands of cases in which being is not, and all other
things, whether regarded individually or collectively, in many
respects are, and in many respects are not.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And he who is sceptical of this contradiction, must think how
he can find something better to say; or if. he sees a puzzle, and
his pleasure is to drag words this way and that, the argument will
prove to him, that he is not making a worthy use of his faculties; for
there is no charm in such puzzles, and there is no difficulty in
detecting them; but we can tell him of something else the pursuit of
which is noble and also difficult.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. A thing of which I have already spoken;-letting alone these
puzzles as involving no difficulty, he should be able to follow, and
criticize in detail every argument, and when a man says that the
same is in a manner other, or that other is the same, to understand
and refute him from his own point of view, and in the same respect
in which he asserts either of these affections. But to show that
somehow and in some sense the same is other, or the other same, or the
great small, or the like unlike; and to delight in always bringing
forward such contradictions, is no real refutation, but is clearly the
new-born babe of some one who is only beginning to approach the
problem of being.

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. For certainly, my friend, the attempt to separate all
existences from one another is a barbarism and utterly unworthy of
an educated or philosophical mind.

  Theaet. Why so?

  Str. The attempt at universal separation is the final annihilation
of all reasoning; for only by the union of conceptions with one
another do we attain to discourse of reason.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And, observe that we were only just in time in making a
resistance to such separatists, and compelling them to admit that
one thing mingles with another.

  Theaet. Why so?

  Str. Why, that we might be able to assert discourse to be a kind
of being; for if we could not, the worst of all consequences would
follow; we should have no philosophy. Moreover, the necessity for
determining the nature of discourse presses upon us at this moment; if
utterly deprived of it, we could no more hold discourse; and
deprived of it we should be if we admitted that there was no admixture
of natures at all.

  Theaet. Very true. But I do not understand why at this moment we
must determine the nature of discourse.

  Str. Perhaps you will see more clearly by the help of the
following explanation.

  Theaet. What explanation?

  Str. Not-being has been acknowledged by us to be one among many
classes diffused over all being.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And thence arises the question, whether not-being mingles
with opinion and language.

  Theaet. How so?

  Str. If not-being has no part in the proposition, then all things
must be true; but if not-being has a part, then false opinion and
false speech are possible, for. think or to say what is not-is
falsehood, which thus arises in the region of thought and in speech.

  Theaet. That is quite true.

  Str. And where there is falsehood surely there must be deceit.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And if there is deceit, then all things must be full of idols
and images and fancies.

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Str. Into that region the Sophist, as we said, made his escape, and,
when he had got there, denied the very possibility of falsehood; no
one, he argued, either conceived or uttered falsehood, inasmuch as
not-being did not in any way partake of being.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And now, not-being has been shown to partake of being, and
therefore he will not continue fighting in this direction, but he will
probably say that some ideas partake of not-being, and some not, and
that language and opinion are of the non-partaking class; and he
will still fight to the death against the existence of the
image-making and phantastic art, in which we have placed him, because,
as he will say, opinion and language do not partake of not-being,
and unless this participation exists, there can be no such thing as
falsehood. And, with the view of meeting this evasion, we must begin
by enquiring into the nature of language, opinion, and imagination, in
order that when we find them we may find also that they have communion
with not-being, and, having made out the connection of them, may
thus prove that falsehood exists; and therein we will imprison the
Sophist, if he deserves it, or, if not, we will let him go again and
look for him in another class.

  Theaet. Certainly, Stranger, there appears to be truth in what was
said about the Sophist at first, that he was of a class not easily
caught, for he seems to have abundance of defences, which he throws
up, and which must every one of them be stormed before we can reach
the man himself. And even now, we have with difficulty got through his
first defence, which is the not-being of not-being, and lo! here is
another; for we have still to show that falsehood exists in the sphere
of language and opinion, and there will be another and another line of
defence without end.

  Str. Any one, Theaetetus, who is able to advance even a little ought
to be of good cheer, for what would he who is dispirited at a little
progress do, if he were making none at all, or even undergoing a
repulse? Such a faint heart, as the proverb says, will never take a
city: but now that we have succeeded thus far, the citadel is ours,
and what remains is easier.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. Then, as I was saying, let us first of all obtain a
conception of language and opinion, in order that we may have
clearer grounds for determining, whether not-being has any concern
with them, or whether they are both always true, and neither of them
ever false.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Then, now, let us speak of names, as before we were speaking of
ideas and letters; for that is the direction in which the answer may
be expected.

  Theaet. And what is the question at issue about names?

  Str. The question at issue is whether all names may be connected
with one another, or none, or only some of them.

  Theaet. Clearly the last is true.

  Str. I understand you to say that words which have a meaning when in
sequence may be connected, but that words which have no meaning when
in sequence cannot be connected?

  Theaet. What are you saying?

  Str. What I thought that you intended when you gave your assent; for
there are two sorts of intimation of being which are given by the
voice.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. One of them is called nouns, and the other verbs.

  Theaet. Describe them.

  Str. That which denotes action we call a verb.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And the other, which is an articulate mark set on those who
do the actions, we call a noun.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. A succession of nouns only is not a sentence any more than of
verbs without nouns.

  Theaet. I do not understand you.

  Str. I see that when you gave your assent you had something else
in your mind. But what I intended to say was, that a mere succession
of nouns or of verbs is not discourse.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. I mean that words like "walks," "runs," "sleeps," or any
other words which denote action, however many of them you string
together, do not make discourse.

  Theaet. How can they?

  Str. Or, again, when you say "lion," "stag," "horse," or any other
words which denote agents -neither in this way of stringing words
together do you attain to discourse; for there is no expression of
action or inaction, or of the existence of existence or
non-existence indicated by the sounds, until verbs are mingled with
nouns; then the words fit, and the smallest combination of them
forms language, and is the simplest and least form of discourse.

  Theaet. Again I ask, What do you mean?

  Str. When any one says "A man learns," should you not call this
the simplest and least of sentences?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Yes, for he now arrives at the point of giving an intimation
about something which is, or is becoming, or has become, or will be.
And he not only names, but he does something, by connecting verbs with
nouns; and therefore we say that he discourses, and to this connection
of words we give the name of discourse.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And as there are some things which fit one another, and other
things which do not fit, so there are some vocal signs which do, and
others which do not, combine and form discourse.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. There is another small matter.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. A sentence must and cannot help having a subject.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And must be of a certain quality.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And now let us mind what we are about.

  Theaet. We must do so.

  Str. I will repeat a sentence to you in which a thing and an
action are combined, by the help of a noun and a verb; and you shall
tell me of whom the sentence speaks.

  Theaet. I will, to the best my power.

  Str. "Theaetetus sits"-not a very long sentence.

  Theaet. Not very.

  Str. Of whom does the sentence speak, and who is the subject that is
what you have to tell.

  Theaet. Of me; I am the subject.

  Str. Or this sentence, again-

  Theaet. What sentence?

  Str. "Theaetetus, with whom I am now speaking, is flying."

  Theaet. That also is a sentence which will be admitted by every
one to speak of me, and to apply to me.

  Str. We agreed that every sentence must necessarily have a certain
quality.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And what is the quality of each of these two sentences?

  Theaet. The one, as I imagine, is false, and the other true.

  Str. The true says what is true about you?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And the false says what is other than true?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And therefore speaks of things which are not as if they were?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And say that things are real of you which are not; for, as we
were saying, in regard to each thing or person, there is much that
is and much that is not.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. The second of the two sentences which related to you was
first of all an example of the shortest form consistent with our
definition.

  Theaet. Yes, this was implied in recent admission.

  Str. And, in the second place, it related to a subject?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Who must be you, and can be nobody else?

  Theaet. Unquestionably.

  Str. And it would be no sentence at all if there were no subject,
for, as we proved, a sentence which has no subject is impossible.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. When other, then, is asserted of you as the same, and not-being
as being, such a combination of nouns and verbs is really and truly
false discourse.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Str. And therefore thought, opinion, and imagination are now
proved to exist in our minds both as true and false.

  Theaet. How so?

  Str. You will know better if you first gain a knowledge of what they
are, and in what they severally differ from one another.

  Theaet. Give me the knowledge which you would wish me to gain.

  Str. Are not thought and speech the same, with this exception,
that what is called thought is the unuttered conversation of the
soul with herself?

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. But the stream of thought which flows through the lips and is
audible is called speech?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And we know that there exists in speech...

  Theaet. What exists?

  Str. Affirmation.

  Theaet. Yes, we know it.

  Str. When the affirmation or denial takes Place in silence and in
the mind only, have you any other name by which to call it but
opinion?

  Theaet. There can be no other name.

  Str. And when opinion is presented, not simply, but in some form
of sense, would you not call it imagination?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. And seeing that language is true and false, and that thought is
the conversation of the soul with herself, and opinion is the end of
thinking, and imagination or phantasy is the union of sense and
opinion, the inference is that some of them, since they are akin to
language, should have an element of falsehood as well as of truth?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Str. Do you perceive, then, that false opinion and speech have
been discovered sooner than we expected?-For just now we seemed to
be undertaking a task which would never be accomplished.

  Theaet. I perceive.

  Str. Then let us not be discouraged about the future; but now having
made this discovery, let us go back to our previous classification.

  Theaet. What classification?

  Str. We divided image-making into two sorts; the one
likeness-making, the other imaginative or phantastic.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And we said that we were uncertain in which we should place the
Sophist.

  Theaet. We did say so.

  Str. And our heads began to go round more and more when it was
asserted that there is no such thing as an image or idol or
appearance, because in no manner or time or place can there ever be
such a thing as falsehood.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And now, since there has been shown to be false speech and
false opinion, there may be imitations of real existences, and out
of this condition of the mind an art of deception may arise.

  Theaet. Quite possible.

  Str. And we have: already admitted, in what preceded, that the
Sophist was lurking in one of the divisions of the likeness-making
art?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Let us, then, renew the attempt, and in dividing any class,
always take the part to the right, holding fast to that which holds
the Sophist, until we have stripped him of all his common
properties, and reached his difference or peculiar. Then we may
exhibit him in his true nature, first to ourselves and then to kindred
dialectical spirits.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. You may remember that all art was originally divided by us into
creative and acquisitive.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And the Sophist was flitting before us in the acquisitive
class, in the subdivisions of hunting, contests, merchandise, and
the like.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. But now that the imitative art has enclosed him, it is clear
that we must begin by dividing the art of creation; for imitation is a
kind of creation of images, however, as we affirm, and not of real
things.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. In the first place, there are two kinds of creation.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. One of them is human and the other divine.

  Theaet. I do not follow.

  Str. Every power, as you may remember our saying originally, which
causes things to exist, not previously existing, was defined by us
as creative.

  Theaet. I remember.

  Str. Looking, now, at the world and all the animals and plants, at
things which grow upon the earth from seeds and roots, as well as at
inanimate substances which are formed within the earth, fusile or
non-fusile, shall we say that they come into existence-not having
existed previously-by the creation of God, or shall we agree with
vulgar opinion about them?

  Theaet. What is it?

  Str. The opinion that nature brings them into being from some
spontaneous and unintelligent cause. Or shall we say that they are
created by a divine reason and a knowledge which comes from God?

  Theaet. I dare say that, owing to my youth, I may often waver in
my view, but now when I look at you and see that you incline to
refer them to God, I defer to your authority.

  Str. Nobly said, Theaetetus, and if I thought that you were one of
those who would hereafter change your mind, I would have gently argued
with you, and forced you to assent; but as I perceive that you will
come of yourself and without any argument of mine, to that belief
which, as you say, attracts you, I will not forestall the work of
time. Let me suppose then, that things which are said to be made by
nature are the work of divine art, and that things which are made by
man out of these are work of human art. And so there are two kinds
of making and production, the one human and the other divine.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Then, now, subdivide each of the two sections which we have
already.

  Theaet. How do you mean?

  Str. I mean to say that you should make a vertical division of
production or invention, as you have already made a lateral one.

  Theaet. I have done so.

  Str. Then, now, there are in all four parts or segments-two of
them have reference to us and are human, and two of them have
reference to the gods and are divine.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And, again, in the division which was supposed to be made in
the other way, one part in each subdivision is the making of the
things themselves, but the two remaining parts may be called the
making of likenesses; and so the productive art is again divided
into two parts.

  Theaet. Tell me the divisions once more.

  Str. I suppose that we, and the other animals, and the elements
out of which things are made-fire, water, and the like-are known by us
to be each and all the creation and work of God.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. And there are images of them, which are not them, but which
correspond to them; and these are also the creation of a wonderful
skill.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Str. The appearances which spring up of themselves in sleep or by
day, such as a shadow when darkness arises in a fire, or the
reflection which is produced when the light in bright and smooth
objects meets on their surface with an external light, and creates a
perception the opposite of our ordinary sight.

  Theaet. Yes; and the images as well as the creation are equally
the work of a divine hand.

  Str. And what shall we say of human art? Do we not make one house by
the art of building, and another by the art of drawing, which is a
sort of dream created by man for those who are awake?

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Str. And other products of human creation are twofold and go in
pairs; there is the thing, with which the art of making the thing is
concerned, and the image, with which imitation is concerned.

  Theaet. Now I begin to understand, and am ready to acknowledge
that there are two kinds of production, and each of them two fold;
in the lateral division there is both a divine and a human production;
in the vertical there are realities and a creation of a kind of
similitudes.

  Str. And let us not forget that of the imitative class the one
part to have been likeness making, and the other phantastic, if it
could be shown that falsehood is a reality and belongs to the class of
real being.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. And this appeared to be the case; and therefore now, without
hesitation, we shall number the different kinds as two.

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Then, now, let us again divide the phantastic art.

  Theaet. Where shall we make the division?

  Str. There is one kind which is produced by an instrument, and
another in which the creator of the appearance is himself the
instrument.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Str. When any one makes himself appear like another in his figure or
his voice, imitation is the name for this part of the phantastic art.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Str. Let this, then, be named the art of mimicry, and this the
province assigned to it; as for the other division, we are weary and
will give that up, leaving to some one else the duty of making the
class and giving it a suitable name.

  Theaet. Let us do as you say-assign a sphere to the one and leave
the other.

  Str. There is a further distinction, Theaetetus, which is worthy
of our consideration, and for a reason which I will tell you.

  Theaet. Let me hear.

  Str. There are some who imitate, knowing what they imitate, and some
who do not know. And what line of distinction can there possibly be
greater than that which divides ignorance from knowledge?

  Theaet. There can be no greater.

  Str. Was not the sort of imitation of which we spoke just now the
imitation of those who know? For he who would imitate you would surely
know you and your figure?

  Theaet. Naturally.

  Str. And what would you say of the figure or form of justice or of
virtue in general? Are we not well aware that many, having no
knowledge of either, but only a sort of opinion, do their best to show
that this opinion is really entertained by them, by expressing it,
as far as they can, in word and deed?

  Theaet. Yes, that is very common.

  Str. And do they always fail in their attempt to be thought just,
when they are not? Or is not the very opposite true?

  Theaet. The very opposite.

  Str. Such a one, then, should be described as an imitator-to be
distinguished from the other, as he who is ignorant is distinguished
from him who knows?

  Theaet. True.

  Str. Can we find a suitable name for each of them? This is clearly
not an easy task; for among the ancients there was some confusion of
ideas, which prevented them from attempting to divide genera into
species; wherefore there is no great abundance of names. Yet, for
the sake of distinctness, I will make bold to call the imitation which
coexists with opinion, the imitation of appearance-that which coexists
with science, a scientific or learned imitation.

  Theaet. Granted.

  Str. The former is our present concern, for the Sophist was
classed with imitators indeed, but not among those who have knowledge.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Str. Let us, then, examine our imitator of appearance, and see
whether he is sound, like a piece of iron, or whether there is still
some crack in him.

  Theaet. Let us examine him.

  Str. Indeed there is a very considerable crack; for if you look, you
find that one of the two classes of imitators is a simple creature,
who thinks that he knows that which he only fancies; the other sort
has knocked about among arguments, until he suspects and fears that he
is ignorant of that which to the many he pretends to know.

  Theaet. There are certainly the two kinds which you describe.

  Str. Shall we regard one as the simple imitator-the other as the
dissembling or ironical imitator?

  Theaet. Very good.

  Str. And shall we further speak of this latter class as having one
or two divisions?

  Theaet. Answer yourself.

  Str. Upon consideration, then, there appear to me to be two; there
is the dissembler, who harangues a multitude in public in a long
speech, and the dissembler, who in private and in short speeches
compels the person who is conversing with him to contradict himself.

  Theaet. What you say is most true.

  Str. And who is the maker of the longer speeches? Is he the
statesman or the popular orator?

  Theaet. The latter.

  Str. And what shall we call the other? Is he the philosopher or
the Sophist?

  Theaet. The philosopher he cannot be, for upon our view he is
ignorant; but since he is an imitator of the wise he will have a
name which is formed by an adaptation of the word sothos. What shall
we name him? I am pretty sure that I cannot be mistaken in terming him
the true and very Sophist.

  Str. Shall we bind up his name as we did before, making a chain from
one end of his genealogy to the other?

  Theaet. By all means.

  Str. He, then, who traces the pedigree of his art as follows-who,
belonging to the conscious or dissembling section of the art of
causing self-contradiction, is an imitator of appearance, and is
separated from the class of phantastic which is a branch of
image-making into that further division of creation, the juggling of
words, a creation human, and not divine-any one who affirms the real
Sophist to be of this blood and lineage will say the very truth.

  Theaet. Undoubtedly.

                           -THE END-


  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: THEODORUS; SOCRATES; THE ELEATIC STRANGER;

  THE YOUNGER SOCRATES

  Socrates. I owe you many thanks, indeed, Theodorus, for the
acquaintance both of Theaetetus and of the Stranger.

  Theodorus. And in a little while, Socrates, you will owe me three
times as many, when they have completed for you the delineation of the
Statesman and of the Philosopher, as well as of the Sophist.

  Soc. Sophist, statesman, philosopher! O my dear Theodorus, do my
ears truly witness that this is the estimate formed of them by the
great calculator and geometrician?

  Theod. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I mean that you rate them all at the same value, whereas they
are really separated by an interval, which no geometrical ratio can
express.

  Theod. By Ammon, the god of Cyrene, Socrates, that is a very fair
hit; and shows that you have not forgotten your geometry. I will
retaliate on you at some other time, but I must now ask the
Stranger, who will not, I hope, tire of his goodness to us, to proceed
either with the Statesman or with the Philosopher, whichever he
prefers.

  Stranger. That is my duty, Theodorus; having begun I must go on, and
not leave the work unfinished. But what shall be done with Theaetetus?

  Theod. In what respect?

  Str. Shall we relieve him, and take his companion, the Young
Socrates, instead of him? What do you advise?

  Theod. Yes, give the other a turn, as you propose. The young
always do better when they have intervals of rest.

  Soc. I think, Stranger, that both of them may be said to be in
some way related to me; for the one, as you affirm, has the cut of
my ugly face, the other is called by my name. And we should always
be on the look-out to recognize a kinsman by the style of his
conversation. I myself was discoursing with Theaetetus yesterday,
and I have just been listening to his answers; my namesake I have
not yet examined, but I must. Another time will, do for me; to-day let
him answer you.

  Str. Very good. Young Socrates, do you hear what the elder
Socrates is proposing?

  Young Socrates. I do.

  Str. And do you agree to his proposal?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. As you do not object, still less can I. After the Sophist,
then, I think that the Statesman naturally follows next in the order
of enquiry. And please to say, whether he, too, should be ranked among
those who have science.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. Then the sciences must be divided as before?

  Y. Soc. I dare say.

  Str. But yet the division will not be the same?

  Y. Soc. How then?

  Str. They will be divided at some other point.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. Where shall we discover the path of the Statesman? We must find
and separate off, and set our seal upon this, and we will set the mark
of another class upon all diverging paths. Thus the soul will conceive
of ail kinds of knowledge under two classes.

  Y. Soc. To find the path is your business, Stranger, and not mine.

  Str. Yes, Socrates, but the discovery, when once made, must be yours
as well as mine.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Well, and are not arithmetic and certain other kindred arts,
merely abstract knowledge, wholly separated from action?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. But in the art of carpentering and all other handicrafts, the
knowledge of the workman is merged in his work; he not only knows, but
he also makes things which previously did not exist.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Then let us divide sciences in general into those which are
practical and those which are-purely intellectual.

  Y. Soc. Let us assume these two divisions of science, which is one
whole.

  Str. And are "statesman," "king," "master," or "householder," one
and the same; or is there a science or art answering to each of
these names? Or rather, allow me to put the matter in another way.

  Y. Soc. Let me hear.

  Str. If any one who is in a private station has the skill to
advise one of the public physicians, must not he also be called a
physician?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And if any one who is in a private station is able to advise
the ruler of a country, may not he be said to have the knowledge which
the ruler himself ought to have?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. But, surely the science of a true king is royal science?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And will not he who possesses this knowledge, whether he
happens to be a ruler or a private man, when regarded only in
reference to his art, be truly called "royal"?

  Y. Soc. He certainly ought to be.

  Str. And the householder and master are the same?

  Y. Soc. Of course.

  Str. Again, a large household may be compared to a small state:-will
they differ at all, as far as government is concerned?

  Y. Soc. They will not.

  Str. Then, returning to the point which we were just now discussing,
do we not clearly see that there is one science of all of them; and
this science may be called either royal or political or economical; we
will not quarrel with any one about the name.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. This too, is evident, that the king cannot do much with his
hands, or with his whole body, towards the maintenance of his
empire, compared with what he does by the intelligence and strength of
his mind.

  Y. Soc. Clearly not.

  Str. Then, shall we say that the king has a greater affinity to
knowledge than to manual arts and to practical life in general?

  Y. Soc. Certainly he has.

  Str. Then we may put all together as one and the
same-statesmanship and the statesman-the kingly science and the king.

  Y. Soc. Clearly.

  Str. And now we shall only be proceeding in due order if we go on to
divide the sphere of knowledge?

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Think whether you can find any joint or parting in knowledge.

  Y. Soc. Tell me of what sort.

  Str. Such as this: You may remember that we made an art of
calculation?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. Which was, unmistakably, one of the arts of knowledge?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And to this art of calculation which discerns the differences
of numbers shall we assign any other function except to pass
judgment on their differences?

  Y. Soc. How could we?

  Str. You know that the master-builder does not work himself, but
is the ruler of workmen?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. He contributes knowledge, not manual labour?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And may therefore be justly said to share in theoretical
science?

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. But he ought not, like the calculator, to regard his
functions as at and when he has formed a judgment;-he must assign to
the individual workmen their appropriate task until they have
completed the work.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Are not all such sciences, no less than arithmetic and the
like, subjects of pure knowledge; and is not the difference between
the two classes, that the one sort has the power of judging only,
and the other of ruling as well?

  Y. Soc. That is evident.

  Str. May we not very properly say, that of all knowledge, there
are there are two divisions-one which rules, and the other which
judges?

  Y. Soc. I should think so.

  Str. And when men have anything to do in common, that they should be
of one mind is surely a desirable thing?

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Then while we are at unity among ourselves, we need not mind
about the fancies of others?

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. And now, in which of these divisions shall we place the
king?-Is he a judge and a kind of spectator? Or shall we assign to him
the art of command-for he is a ruler?

  Y. Soc. The latter, clearly.

  Str. Then we must see whether there is any mark of division in the
art of command too. I am inclined to think that there is a distinction
similar to that of manufacturer and retail dealer, which parts off the
king from the herald.

  Y. Soc. How is this?

  Str. Why, does not the retailer receive and sell over again the
productions of others, which have been sold before?

  Y. Soc. Certainly he does.

  Str. And is not the herald under command, and does he not receive
orders, and in his turn give them to others?

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Then shall we mingle the kingly art in the same class with
the art of the herald, the interpreter, the boatswain, the prophet,
and the numerous kindred arts which exercise command; or, as in the
preceding comparison we spoke of manufacturers, or sellers for
themselves, and of retailers,-seeing, too, that the class of supreme
rulers, or rulers for themselves, is almost nameless-shall we make a
word following the same analogy, and refer kings to a supreme or
ruling-for-self science, leaving the rest to receive a name from
some one else? For we are seeking the ruler; and our enquiry is not
concerned with him who is not a ruler.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Thus a very fair distinction has been attained between the
man who gives his own commands, and him who gives another's. And now
let us see if the supreme power allows of any further division.

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. I think that it does; and please to assist me in making the
division.

  Y. Soc. At what point?

  Str. May not all rulers be supposed to command for the sake of
producing something?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Nor is there any difficulty in dividing the things produced
into two classes.

  Y. Soc. How would you divide them?

  Str. Of the whole class some have life and some are without life.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And by the help of this distinction we may make, if we
please, a subdivision of the section of knowledge which commands.

  Y. Soc. At what point?

  Str. One part may be set over the production of lifeless, the
other of living objects; and in this way the whole will be divided.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. That division, then, is complete; and now we may leave one
half, and take up the other; which may also be divided into two.

  Y. Soc. Which of the two halves do you men?

  Str. Of course that which exercises command about animals. For,
surely, the royal science is not like that of a master-workman, a
science presiding over lifeless objects;-the king has a nobler
function, which is the management and control of living beings.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And the breeding and tending of living beings may be observed
to be sometimes a tending of the individual; in other cases, a
common care of creatures in flocks?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. But the statesman is not a tender of individuals-not like the
driver or groom of a single ox or horse; he is rather to be compared
with the keeper of a drove of horses or oxen.

  Y. Soc. Yes, I see, thanks to you.

  Str. Shall we call this art of tending many animals together, the
art of managing a herd, or the art of collective management?

  Y. Soc. No matter;-Whichever suggests itself to us in the course
of conversation.

  Str. Very good, Socrates; and, if you continue to be not too
particular about names, you will be all the richer in wisdom when
you are an old man. And now, as you say, leaving the discussion of the
name, -can you see a way in which a person, by showing the art of
herding to be of two kinds, may cause that which is now sought amongst
twice the number of things, to be then sought amongst half that
number?

  Y. Soc. I will try;-there appears to me to be one management of
men and another of beasts.

  Str. You have certainly divided them in a most straightforward and
manly style; but you have fallen into an error which hereafter I think
that we had better avoid.

  Y. Soc. What is the error?

  Str. I think that we had better not cut off a single small portion
which is not a species, from many larger portions; the part should
be a species. To separate off at once the subject of investigation, is
a most excellent plan, if only the separation be rightly made; and you
were under the impression that you were right, because you saw that
you would come to man; and this led you to hasten the steps. But you
should not chip off too small a piece, my friend; the safer way is
to cut through the middle; which is also the more likely way of
finding classes. Attention to this principle makes all the
difference in a process of enquiry.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean, Stranger?

  Str. I will endeavour to speak more plainly out of love to your good
parts, Socrates; and, although I cannot at present entirely explain
myself, I will try, as we proceed, to make my meaning a little
clearer.

  Y. Soc. What was the error of which, as you say, we were guilty in
our recent division?

  Str. The error was just as if some one who wanted to divide the
human race, were to divide them after the fashion which prevails in
this part of the world; here they cut off the Hellenes as one species,
and all the other species of mankind, which are innumerable, and
have no ties or common language, they include under the single name of
"barbarians," and because they have one name they are supposed to be
of one species also. Or suppose that in dividing numbers you were to
cut off ten thousand from all the rest, and make of it one species,
comprehending the first under another separate name, you might say
that here too was a single class, because you had given it a single
name. Whereas you would make a much better and more equal and
logical classification of numbers, if you divided them into odd and
even; or of the human species, if you divided them into male and
female; and only separated off Lydians or Phrygians, or any other
tribe, and arrayed them against the rest of the world, when you
could no longer make a division into parts which were also classes.

  Y. Soc. Very true; but I wish that this distinction between a part
and a class could still be made somewhat plainer.

  Str. O Socrates, best of men, you are imposing upon me a very
difficult task. We have already digressed further from our original
intention than we ought, and you would have us wander still further
away. But we must now return to our subject; and hereafter, when there
is a leisure hour, we will follow up the other track; at the same time
I wish you to guard against imagining that you ever heard me declare-

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. That a class and a part are distinct.

  Y. Soc. What did I hear, then?

  Str. That a class is necessarily a part, but there is no similar
necessity that a part should be a dass; that is the view which I
should always wish you to attribute to me, Socrates.

  Y. Soc. So be it.

  Str. There is another thing which I should like to know.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. The point at which we digressed; for, if I am not mistaken, the
exact place was at the question, Where you would divide the management
of herds. To this you appeared rather too ready to answer that them
were two species of animals; man being one, and all brutes making up
the other.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. I thought that in taking away a part you imagined that the
remainder formed a class, because you were able to call them by the
common name of brutes.

  Y. Soc. That again is true.

  Str. Suppose now, O most courageous of dialecticians, that some wise
and understanding creature, such as a crane is reputed to be, were, in
imitation of you, to make a similar division, and set up cranes
against all other animals to their own special glorification, at the
same time jumbling together all the others, including man, under the
appellation of brutes,-here would be the sort of error which we must
try to avoid.

  Y. Soc. How can we be safe?

  Str. If we do not divide the whole class of animals, we shall be
less likely to fall into that error.

  Y. Soc. We had better not take the whole?

  Str. Yes, there lay the source of error in our former division.

  Y. Soc. How?

  Str. You remember how that part of the art of knowledge which was
concerned with command, had to do with the rearing of living
creatures,-I mean, with animals in herds?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. In that case, there was already implied a division of all
animals into tame and wild; those whose nature can be tamed are called
tame, and those which cannot be tamed are called wild.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And the political science of which we are in search, is and
ever was concerned with tame animals, and is also confined to
gregarious animals.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. But then ought not to divide, as we did, taking the whole class
at once. Neither let us be in too great haste to arrive quickly at the
political science; for this mistake has already brought upon us the
misfortune of which the proverb speaks.

  Y. Soc. What misfortune?

  Str. The misfortune of too much haste, which is too little speed.

  Y. Soc. And all the better, Stranger;-we got what we deserved.

  Str. Very well: Let us then begin again, and endeavour to divide the
collective rearing of animals; for probably the completion of the
argument will best show what you are so anxious to know. Tell me,
then-

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. Have you ever heard, as you very likely may-for I do not
suppose that you ever actually visited them-of the preserves of fishes
in the Nile, and in the ponds of the Great King; or you may have
seen similar preserves in wells at home?

  Y. Soc. Yes, to be sure, I have seen them, and I have often heard
the others described.

  Str. And you may have heard also, and may have been-assured by
report, although you have not travelled in those regions, of nurseries
of geese and cranes in the plains of Thessaly?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. I asked you, because here is a new division of the management
of herds, into the management of land and of water herds.

  Y. Soc. There is.

  Str. And do you agree that we ought to divide the collective rearing
of herds into two corresponding parts, the one the rearing of water,
and the other the rearing of land herds?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. There is surely no need to ask which of these two contains
the royal art, for it is evident to everybody.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Any one can divide the herds which feed on dry land?

  Y. Soc. How would you divide them?

  Str. I should distinguish between those which fly and those which
walk.

  Y. Soc. Most true.

  Str. And where shall we look for the political animal? Might not
an idiot, so to speak, know that he is a pedestrian?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. The art of managing the walking animal has to be further
divided, just as you might have an even number.

  Y. Soc. Clearly.

  Str. Let me note that here appear in view two ways to that part or
class which the argument aims at reaching-the one is speedier way,
which cuts off a small portion and leaves a large; the other agrees
better with the principle which we were laying down, that as far as we
can we should divide in the middle; but it is longer. We can take
either of them, whichever we please.

  Y. Soc. Cannot we have both ways?

  Str. Together? What a thing to ask! but, if you take them in turn,
you clearly may.

  Y. Soc. Then I should like to have them in turn.

  Str. There will be no difficulty, as we are near the end; if we
had been at the beginning, or in the middle, I should have demurred to
your request; but now, in accordance with your desire, let us begin
with the longer way; while we are fresh, we shall get on better. And
now attend to the division.

  Y. Soc. Let me hear.

  Str. The tame walking herding animals are distributed by nature into
two classes.

  Y. Soc. Upon what principle?

  Str. The one grows horns; and the other is without horns.

  Y. Soc. Clearly.

  Str. Suppose that you divide the science which manages pedestrian
animals into two corresponding parts, and define them; for if you
try to invent names for them, you will find the intricacy too great.

  Y. Soc. How must I speak of them, then?

  Str. In this way: let the science of managing pedestrian animals
be divided into two parts and one part assigned to the horned herd and
the other to the herd that has no horns.

  Y. Soc. All that you say has been abundantly proved, and may
therefore, be assumed.

  Str. The king is clearly the shepherd a polled herd, who have no
horns.

  Y. Soc. That is evident.

  Str. Shall we break up this hornless herd into sections, and
endeavour to assign to him what is his?

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. Shall we distinguish them by their having or not having
cloven feet, or by their mixing or not mixing the breed? You know what
I mean.

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. I mean that horses and asses naturally breed from one another.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. But the remainder of the hornless herd of tame animals will not
mix the breed.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And of which has the Statesman charge,-of the mixed or of the
unmixed race?

  Y. Soc. Clearly of the unmixed.

  Str. I suppose that we must divide this again as before.

  Y. Soc. We must.

  Str. Every tame and herding animal has now been split up, with the
exception of two species; for I hardly think that dogs should be
reckoned among gregarious animals.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not; but how shall we divide the two remaining
species?

  Str. There is a measure of difference which may be appropriately
employed by you and Theaetetus, who are students of geometry.

  Y. Soc. What is that?

  Str. The diameter; and, again, the diameter of a diameter.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. How does man walk, but as a diameter whose power is two feet?

  Y. Soc. Just so.

  Str. And the power of the remaining kind, being the power of twice
two feet, may be said to be the diameter of our diameter.

  Y. Soc. Certainly; and now I think that I pretty nearly understand
you.

  Str. In these divisions, Socrates, I descry what would make
another famous jest.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. Human beings have come out in the same class with the freest
and airiest of creation, and have been running a race with them.

  Y. Soc. I remark that very singular coincidence.

  Str. And would you not expect the slowest to arrive last?

  Y. Soc. Indeed I should.

  Str. And there is a still more ridiculous consequence, that the king
is found running about with the herd and in close competition with the
bird-catcher, who of all mankind is most of an adept at the airy life.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Then here, Socrates, is still clearer evidence of the truth
of what was said in the enquiry about the Sophist?

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. That the dialectical method is no respecter of persons, and
does not set the great above the small, but always arrives in her
own way at the truest result.

  Y. Soc. Clearly.

  Str. And now, I will not wait for you to ask the, but will of my own
accord take you by the shorter road to the definition of a king.

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. I say that we should have begun at first by dividing land
animals into biped and quadruped; and since the winged herd, and
that alone, comes out in the same class with man, should divide bipeds
into those which have feathers and those which have not, and when they
have been divided, and the art of the management of mankind is brought
to light, the time will have come to produce our Statesman and
ruler, and set him like a charioteer in his place, and hand over to
him the reins of state, for that too is a vocation which belongs to
him.

  Y. Soc. Very good; you have paid me the debt-I mean, that you have
completed the argument, and I suppose that you added the digression by
way of interest.

  Str. Then now, let us go back to the beginning, and join the
links, which together make the definition of the name of the
Statesman's art.

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. The science of pure knowledge had, as we said originally, a
part which was the science of rule or command, and from this was
derived another part, which was called command-for-self, on the
analogy of selling-for-self; an important section of this was the
management of living animals, and this again was further limited to
the manage merit of them in herds; and again in herds of pedestrian
animals. The chief division of the latter was the art of managing
pedestrian animals which are without horns; this again has a part
which can only be comprehended under one term by joining together
three names-shepherding pure-bred animals. The only further
subdivision is the art of man herding-this has to do with bipeds,
and is what we were seeking after, and have now found, being at once
the royal and political.

  Y. Soc. To be sure.

  Str. And do you think, Socrates, that we really have done as you
say?

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. Do you think, I mean, that we have really fulfilled our
intention?-There has been a sort of discussion, and yet the
investigation seems to me not to be perfectly worked out: this is
where the enquiry fails.

  Y. Soc. I do not understand.

  Str. I will try to make the thought, which is at this moment present
in my mind, clearer to us both.

  Y. Soc. Let me hear.

  Str. There were many arts of shepherding, and one of them was the
political, which had the charge of one particular herd?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And this the argument defined to be the art of rearing, not
horses or other brutes, but the art of rearing man collectively?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Note, however, a difference which distinguishes the king from
all other shepherds.

  Y. Soc. To what do you refer?

  Str. I want to ask, whether any one of the other herdsmen has a
rival who professes and claims to share with him in the management
of the herd?

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. I mean to say that merchants husbandmen, providers of food, and
also training-masters and physicians, will all contend with the
herdsmen of humanity, whom we call Statesmen, declaring that they
themselves have the care of rearing of managing mankind, and that they
rear not only the common herd, but also the rulers themselves.

  Y. Soc. Are they not right in saying so?

  Str. Very likely they may be, and we will consider their claim.
But we are certain of this,-that no one will raise a similar claim
as against the herdsman, who is allowed on all hands to be the sole
and only feeder and physician of his herd; he is also their matchmaker
and accoucheur; no one else knows that department of science. And he
is their merry-maker and musician, as far as their nature is
susceptible of such influences, and no one can console and soothe
his own herd better than he can, either with the natural tones of
his voice or with instruments. And the same may be said of tenders
of animals in general.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. But if this is as you say, can our argument about the king be
true and unimpeachable? Were we right in selecting him out of ten
thousand other claimants to be the shepherd and rearer of the human
flock?

  Y. Soc. Surely not.

  Str. Had we not reason just to now apprehend, that although we may
have described a sort of royal form, we have not as yet accurately
worked out the true image of the Statesman? and that we cannot
reveal him as he truly is in his own nature, until we have
disengaged and separated him from those who bang about him and claim
to share in his prerogatives?

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And that, Socrates, is what we must do, if we do not mean to
bring disgrace upon the argument at its close.

  Y. Soc. We must certainly avoid that.

  Str. Then let us make a new beginning, and travel by a different
road.

  Y. Soc. What road?

  Str. I think that we may have a little amusement; there is a
famous tale, of which a good portion may with advantage be interwoven,
and then we may resume our series of divisions, and proceed in the old
path until we arrive at the desired summit. Shall we do as I say?

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. Listen, then, to a tale which a child would love to hear; and
you are not too old for childish amusement.

  Y. Soc. Let me hear.

  Str. There did really happen, and will again happen, like many other
events of which ancient tradition has preserved the record, the
portent which is traditionally said to have occurred in the quarrel of
Atreus and Thyestes. You have heard no doubt, and remember what they
say happened at that time?

  Y. Soc. I suppose you to mean the token of the birth of the golden
lamb.

  Str. No, not that; but another part of the story, which tells how
the sun and the stars once rose in the west, and set in the east,
and that the god reversed their motion, and gave them that which
they now have as a testimony to the right of Atreus.

  Y. Soc. Yes; there is that legend also.

  Str. Again, we have been often told of the reign of Cronos.

  Y. Soc. Yes, very often.

  Str. Did you ever hear that the men of former times were
earthborn, and not begotten of one another?

  Y. Soc. Yes, that is another old tradition.

  Str. All these stories, and ten thousand others which are still more
wonderful, have a common origin; many of them have been lost in the
lapse of ages, or are repeated only in a disconnected form; but the
origin of them is what no one has told, and may as well be told now;
for the tale is suited to throw light on the nature of the king.

  Y. Soc. Very good; and I hope that you will give the whole story,
and leave out nothing.

  Str. Listen, then. There is a time when God himself guides and helps
to roll the world in its course; and there is a time, on the
completion of a certain cycle, when he lets go, and the world being
a living creature, and having originally received intelligence from
its author and creator turns about and by an inherent necessity
revolves in the opposite direction.

  Y. Soc. Why is that?

  Str. Why, because only the most divine things of all remain ever
unchanged and the same, and body is not included in this class. Heaven
and the universe, as we have termed them, although they have been
endowed by the Creator with many glories, partake of a bodily
nature, and therefore cannot be entirely free from perturbation. But
their motion is, as far as possible, single and in the same place, and
of the same kind; and is therefore only subject to a reversal, which
is the least alteration possible. For the lord of all moving things is
alone able to move of himself; and to think that he moves them at
one time in one direction and at another time in another is blasphemy.
Hence we must not say that the world is either self-moved always, or
all made to go round by God in two opposite courses; or that two Gods,
having opposite purposes, make it move round. But as I have already
said (and this is the only remaining alternative) the world is
guided at one time by an external power which is divine and receives
fresh life and immortality from the renewing hand of the Creator,
and again, when let go, moves spontaneously, being set free at such
a time as to have, during infinite cycles of years, a reverse
movement: this is due to its perfect balance, to its vast size, and to
the fact that it turns on the smallest pivot.

  Y. Soc. Your account of the world seems to be very reasonable
indeed.

  Str. Let us now reflect and try to gather from what has been said
the nature of the phenomenon which we affirmed to be the cause of
all these wonders. It is this.

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. The reversal which takes place from time to time of the
motion of the universe.

  Y. Soc. How is that the cause?

  Str. Of all changes of the heavenly motions, we may consider this to
be the greatest and most complete.

  Y. Soc. I should imagine so.

  Str. And it may be supposed to result in the greatest changes to the
human beings who are the inhabitants of the world at the time.

  Y. Soc. Such changes would naturally occur.

  Str. And animals, as we know, survive with difficulty great and
serious changes of many different kinds when they come upon them at
once.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Hence there necessarily occurs a great destruction of them,
which extends also to-the life of man; few survivors of the race are
left, and those who remain become the subjects of several novel and
remarkable phenomena, and of one in particular, which takes place at
the time when the transition is made to the cycle opposite to that
in which we are now living.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. The life of all animals first came to a standstill, and the
mortal nature ceased to be or look older, and was then reversed and
grew young and delicate; the white locks of the aged darkened again,
and the cheeks the bearded man became smooth, and recovered their
former bloom; the bodies of youths in their prime grew softer and
smaller, continually by day and night returning and becoming
assimilated to the nature of a newly-born child in mind as well as
body; in the succeeding stage they wasted away and wholly disappeared.
And the bodies of those who died by violence at that time quickly
passed through the like changes, and in a few days were no more seen.

  Y. Soc. Then how, Stranger, were the animals created in those
days; and in what way were they begotten of one another?

  Str. It is evident, Socrates, that there was no such thing in the
then order of nature as the procreation of animals from one another;
the earth-born race, of which we hear in story, was the one which
existed in those days-they rose again from the ground; and of this
tradition, which is now-a-days often unduly discredited, our
ancestors, who were nearest in point of time to the end of the last
period and came into being at the beginning of this, are to us the
heralds. And mark how consistent the sequel of the tale is; after
the return of age to youth, follows the return of the dead, who are
lying in the earth, to life; simultaneously with the reversal of the
world the wheel of their generation has been turned back, and they are
put together and rise and live in the opposite order, unless God has
carried any of them away to some other lot. According to this
tradition they of necessity sprang from the earth and have the name of
earth-born, and so the above legend clings to them.

  Y. Soc. Certainly that is quite consistent with what has preceded;
but tell me, was the life which you said existed in the reign of
Cronos in that cycle of the world, or in this? For the change in the
course of the stars and the sun must have occurred in both.

  Str. I see that you enter into my meaning;-no, that blessed and
spontaneous life does not belong to the present cycle of the world,
but to the previous one, in which God superintended the whole
revolution of the universe; and the several parts the universe were
distributed under the rule. certain inferior deities, as is the way in
some places still There were demigods, who were the shepherds of the
various species and herds of animals, and each one was in all respects
sufficient for those of whom he was the shepherd; neither was there
any violence, or devouring of one another or war or quarrel among
them; and I might tell of ten thousand other blessings, which belonged
to that dispensation. The reason why the life of man was, as tradition
says, spontaneous, is as follows: In those days God himself was
their shepherd, and ruled over them, just as man, over them, who is by
comparison a divine being, still rules over the lower animals. Under
him there were no forms of government or separate possession of
women and children; for all men rose again from the earth, having no
memory, of the past. And although they had nothing of this sort, the
earth gave them fruits in abundance, which grew on trees and shrubs
unbidden, and were not planted by the hand of man. And they dwelt
naked, and mostly in the open air, for the temperature of their
seasons, was mild; and they had no beds, but lay on Soft couches of
grass, which grew plentifully out of: the earth. Such was the life
of man in the days of Cronos, Socrates; the character of our present
life which is said to be under Zeus, you know from your own
experience. Can you, and will you, determine which of them you deem
the happier?

  Y. Soc. Impossible.

  Str. Then shall I determine for you as well as I can?

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. Suppose that the nurslings of Cronos, having this boundless
leisure, and the power of holding intercourse, not only with men,
but with the brute creation, had used all these advantages with a view
to philosophy, conversing with the brutes as well as with one another,
and learning of every nature which was gifted with any special
power, and was able to contribute some special experience to the store
of wisdom there would be no difficulty in deciding that they would
be a thousand times happier than the men of our own day. Or, again, if
they had merely eaten and drunk until they were full, and told stories
to one another and to the animals-such stories as are now attributed
to them-in this case also, as I should imagine, the answer would be
easy. But until some satisfactory witness can be found of the love
of that age for knowledge and: discussion, we had better let the
matter drop, and give the reason why we have unearthed this tale,
and then we shall be able to get on.

  In the fulness of time, when the change was to take place, and the
earth-born race had all perished, and every soul had completed its
proper cycle of births and been sown in the earth her appointed number
of times, the pilot of the universe let the helm go, and retired to
his place of view; and then Fate and innate desire reversed the motion
of the world. Then also all the inferior deities who share the rule of
the supreme power, being informed of what was happening, let go the
parts of the world which were under their control. And the world
turning round with a sudden shock, being impelled in an opposite
direction from beginning to end, was shaken by a mighty earthquake,
which wrought a new destruction of all manner of animals.
Afterwards, when sufficient time had elapsed, the tumult and confusion
and earthquake ceased, and the universal creature, once more at
peace attained to a calm, and settle down into his own orderly and
accustomed course, having the charge and rule of himself and of all
the creatures which are contained in him, and executing, as far as
he remembered them, the instructions of his Father and Creator, more
precisely at first, but afterwords with less exactness. The reason
of the falling off was the admixture of matter in him; this was
inherent in the primal nature, which was full of disorder, until
attaining to the present order. From God, the constructor; the world
received all that is good in him, but from a previous state came
elements of evil and unrighteousness, which, thence derived, first
of all passed into the world, and were then transmitted to the
animals. While the world was aided by the pilot in nurturing the
animals, the evil was small, and great the good which he produced, but
after the separation, when the world was let go, at first all
proceeded well enough; but, as time went there was more and more
forgetting, and the old discord again held sway and burst forth in
full glory; and at last small was the good, and great was the
admixture of evil, and there was a danger of universal ruin to the
world, and the things contained in him. Wherefore God, the orderer
of all, in his tender care, seeing that the world was in great
straits, and fearing that all might be dissolved in the storm and
disappear in infinite chaos, again seated himself at the helm; and
bringing back the elements which had fallen into dissolution and
disorder to the motion which had prevailed under his dispensation,
he set them in order and restored them, and made the world
imperishable and immortal.

  And this is the whole tale, of which the first part will suffice
to illustrate the nature of the king. For when the world turned
towards the present cycle of generation, the age of man again stood
still, and a change opposite to the previous one was the result. The
small creatures which had almost disappeared grew in and stature,
and the newly-born children of the earth became grey and died and sank
into the earth again. All things changed, imitating and following
the condition of the universe, and of necessity agreeing with that
in their mode of conception and generation and nurture; for no animal;
was any longer allowed to come into being in the earth through the
agency of other creative beings, but as the world was ordained to be
the lord of his own progress, in like manner the parts were ordained
to grow and generate and give nourishment, as far as they could, of
themselves, impelled by a similar movement. And so we have arrived
at the real end of this discourse; for although there might be much to
tell of the lower animals, and of the condition out of which they
changed and of the causes of the change, about men there is not
much, and that little is more to the purpose. Deprived of the care
of God, who had possessed and tended them, they were left helpless and
defenceless, and were torn in pieces by the beasts, who were
naturally fierce and had now grown wild. And in the first ages they
were still without skill or resource; the food which once grew
spontaneously had failed, and as yet they knew not how to procure
it, because they-had never felt the pressure of necessity. For all
these reasons they were in a great strait; wherefore also the gifts
spoken of in the old tradition were imparted to man by the gods,
together with so much teaching and education as was indispensable;
fire was given to them by Prometheus, the arts by Hephaestus and his
fellow-worker, Athene, seeds and plants by others. From these is
derived all that has helped to frame human life; since the care of the
Gods, as I was saying, had now failed men, and they had to order their
course of life for themselves, and were their own masters, just like
the universal creature whom they imitate and follow, ever changing, as
he changes, and ever living and growing, at one time in one manner,
and at another time in another. Enough of the story, which may be of
use in showing us how greatly we erred in the delineation of the
king and the statesman in our previous discourse.

  Y. Soc. What was this great error of which you speak?

  Str. There were two; the first a lesser one, the other was an
error on a much larger and grander scale.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. I mean to say that when we were asked about a king and
statesman of the present; and generation, we told of a shepherd of a
human flock who belonged to the other cycle, and of one who was a
god when he ought to have been a man; and this a great error. Again,
we declared him to be, the ruler of the entire State, without,
explaining how: this was not the whole truth, nor very intelligible;
but still it was true, and therefore the second error was not so,
great as the first.

  Y Soc. Very good.

  Str. Before we can expect to have a perfect description of the
statesman we must define the nature of his office.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And the myth was introduced in order to show, not only that all
others are rivals of true shepherd who is the object of our search,
but in order that we might have a clearer view of him who is alone
worthy to receive this appellation, because, he alone of shepherds and
herdsmen, according to the image which we have employed, has the
care of human beings.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And I cannot help thinking, Socrates, that the form of the
divine shepherd is even higher than that of a king; whereas the
statesmen who are now on earth seem to be much more like their
subjects in character, and which more nearly to partake of their
breeding and education.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Still they must be investigated all the same, to see whether,
like the divine shepherd, they are above their subjects or on a
level with them.

  Y. Soc. Of course.

  Str. To resume:-Do you remember that we spoke of a
command-for-self exercised over animals, not singly but
collectively, which we called the art of rearing a herd?

  Y. Soc. Yes, I remember.

  Str. There, somewhere, lay our error; for we never included or
mentioned the Statesman; and we did not observe that he had no place
in our nomenclature.

  Y. Soc. How was that?

  Str. All other herdsmen "rear" their herds, but this is not a
suitable term to apply to the Statesman; we should use a name which is
common to them all.

  Y. Soc. True, if there be such a name.

  Str. Why, is not "care" of herds applicable to all? For this implies
no feeding, or any special duty; if we say either "tending" the herds,
or "managing" the herds, or "having the care" of them, the same word
will include all, and then we may wrap up the Statesman with the rest,
as the argument seems to require.

  Y. Soc. Quite right; but how shall we take the-next step in the
division?

  Str. As before we divided the art of "rearing" herds accordingly
as they were land or water herds, winged and wingless, mixing or not
mixing the breed, horned and hornless, so we may divide by these
same differences the "teading" of herds, comprehending in our
definition the kingship of to-day and the rule of Cronos.

  Y. Soc. That is clear; but I still ask, what is to follow.

  Str. If the word had been "managing" herds, instead of feeding or
rearing them, no one would have argued that there was no care of men
in the case of the politician, although it was justly contended,
that there was no human art of feeding them which was worthy of the
name, or at least, if there were, many a man had a prior and greater
right to share in such an art than any king.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. But no other art or science will have a prior or better right
than the royal science to care for human society and to rule over
men in general.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. In the next place, Socrates, we must surely notice that a great
error was committed at the end of our analysis.

  Y. Soc. What was it?

  Str. Why, supposing we were ever so sure that there is such an art
as the art of rearing or feeding bipeds, there was no reason why we
should call this the royal or political art, as though there were no
more to be said.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. Our first duty, as we were saying, was to remodel the name,
so as to have the notion of care rather than of feeding, and then to
divide, for there may be still considerable divisions.

  Y. Soc. How can they be made?

  Str. First, by separating the divine shepherd from the human
guardian or manager.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And the art of management which is assigned to man would
again have to be subdivided.

  Y. Soc. On what principle?

  Str. On the principle of voluntary and compulsory.

  Y. Soc. Why?

  Str. Because, if I am not mistaken, there has been an error here;
for our simplicity led us to rank king and tyrant together, whereas
they are utterly distinct, like their modes of government.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Then, now, as I said, let us make the correction and divide
human care into two parts, on the principle of voluntary and
compulsory.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And if we call the management of violent rulers tyranny, and
the voluntary management of herds of voluntary bipeds politics, may we
not further assert that he who has this latter art of management is
the true king and statesman?

  Y. Soc. I think, Stranger, that we have now completed the account of
the Statesman.

  Str. Would that we had Socrates, but I have to satisfy myself as
well as you; and in my judgment the figure of the king is not yet
perfected; like statuaries who, in their too great haste, having
overdone the several parts of their work, lose time in cutting them
down, so too we, partly out of haste, partly out of haste, partly
out of a magnanimous desire to expose our former error, and also
because we imagined that a king required grand illustrations, have
taken up a marvellous lump of fable, and have been obliged to use more
than was necessary. This made us discourse at large, and,
nevertheless, the story never came to an end. And our discussion might
be compared to a picture of some living being which had been fairly
drawn in outline, but had not yet attained the life and clearness
which is given by the blending of colours. Now to intelligent
persons a living being had better be delineated by language and
discourse than by any painting or work of art: to the duller sort by
works of art.

  Y. Soc. Very true; but what is the imperfection which still remains?
I wish that you would tell me.

  Str. The higher ideas, my dear friend, can hardly be set forth
except through the medium of examples; every man seems to know all
things in a dreamy sort of way, and then again to wake up and to
know nothing.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. I fear that I have been unfortunate in raising a question about
our experience of knowledge.

  Y. Soc. Why so?

  Str. Why, because my "example" requires the assistance of another
example.

  Y. Soc. Proceed; you need not fear that I shall tire.

  Str. I will proceed, finding, as I do, such a ready listener in you:
when children are beginning to know their letters-

  Y. Soc. What are you going to say?

  Str. That they distinguish the several letters well enough in very
short and easy syllables, and are able to tell them correctly.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Whereas in other syllables they do not recognize them, and
think and speak falsely of them.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Will not the best and easiest way of bringing them to a
knowledge of what they do not as yet know be-

  Y. Soc. Be what?

  Str. To refer them first of all to cases in which they judge
correctly about the letters in question, and then to compare these
with the cases in which they do not as yet know, and to show them that
the letters are the same, and have the same character in both
combination, until all cases in which they are right have been
Placed side by side with all cases in which they are wrong. In this
way they have examples, and are made to learn that each letter in
every combination is always the same and not another, and is always
called by the same name.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Are not examples formed in this manner? We take a thing and
compare it with another distinct instance of the same thing, of
which we have a right conception, and out of the comparison there
arises one true notion, which includes both of them.

  Y. Soc. Exactly.

  Str. Can we wonder, then, that the soul has the same uncertainty
about the alphabet of things, and sometimes and in some cases is
firmly fixed by the truth in each particular, and then, again, in
other cases is altogether at sea; having somehow or other a correction
of combinations; but when the elements are transferred into the long
and difficult language (syllables) of facts, is again ignorant of
them?

  Y. Soc. There is nothing wonderful in that.

  Str. Could any one, my friend, who began with false opinion ever
expect to arrive even at a small portion of truth and to attain
wisdom?

  Y. Soc. Hardly.

  Str. Then you and I will not be far wrong in trying to see the
nature of example in general in a small and particular instance;
afterwards from lesser things we intend to pass to the royal class,
which is the highest form of the same nature, and endeavour to
discover by rules of art what the management of cities is; and then
the dream will become a reality to us.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Then, once more, let us resume the previous argument, and as
there were innumerable rivals of the royal race who claim to have
the care of states, let us part them all off, and leave him alone;
and, as I was saying, a model or example of this process has first
to be framed.

  Y. Soc. Exactly.

  Str. What model is there which is small, and yet has any analogy
with the political occupation? Suppose, Socrates, that if we have no
other example at hand, we choose weaving, or, more precisely,
weaving of wool-this will be quite enough, without taking the whole of
weaving, to illustrate our meaning?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Why should we not apply to weaving the same processes of
division and subdivision which we have already applied to other
classes; going once more as rapidly as we can through all the steps
until we come to that which is needed for our purpose?

  Y. Soc. How do you mean?

  Str. I shall reply by actually performing the process.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. All things which we make or acquire are either creative or
preventive; of the preventive class are antidotes, divine and human,
and also defences; and defences are either military weapons or
protections; and protections are veils, and also shields against
heat and cold, and shields against heat and cold are shelters and
coverings; and coverings are blankets and garments; and garments are
some of them in one piece, and others of them are made in several
parts; and of these latter some are stitched, others are fastened
and not stitched; and of the not stitched, some are made of the sinews
of plants, and some of hair; and of these, again, some are cemented
with water and earth, and others are fastened together by
themselves. And these last defences and coverings which are fastened
together by themselves are called clothes, and the art which
superintends them we may call, from the nature of the operation, the
art of clothing, just as before the art of the Statesman was derived
from the State; and may we not say that the art of weaving, at least
that largest portion of it which was concerned with the making of
clothes, differs only in name from this art of clothing, in the same
way that, in the previous case, the royal science differed from the
political?

  Y. Soc. Most true.

  Str. In the next place, let us make the reflection, that the art
of weaving clothes, which an incompetent person might fancy to have
been sufficiently described, has been separated off from several
others which are of the same family, but not from the co-operative
arts.

  Y. Soc. And which are the kindred arts?

  Str. I see that I have not taken you with me. So I think that we had
better go backwards, starting from the end. We just now parted off
from the weaving of clothes, the making of blankets, which differ from
each other in that one is put under and the other is put around! and
these are what I termed kindred arts.

  Y. Soc. I understand.

  Str. And we have subtracted the manufacture of all articles made
of flax and cords, and all that we just now metaphorically termed
the sinews of plants, and we have also separated off the process of
felting and the putting together of materials by stitching and sewing,
of which the most important part is the cobbler's art.

  Y. Soc. Precisely.

  Str. Then we separated off the currier's art, which prepared
coverings in entire pieces, and the art of sheltering, and
subtracted the various arts of making water-tight which are employed
in building, and in general in carpentering, and in other crafts,
and all such arts as furnish impediments to thieving and acts of
violence, and are concerned with making the lids of boxes and the
fixing of doors, being divisions of the art of joining; and we also
cut off the manufacture of arms, which is a section of the great and
manifold art of making defences; and we originally began by parting
off the whole of the magic art which is concerned with antidoter,
and have left, as would appear, the very art of which we were in
search, the art of protection against winter cold, which fabricates
woollen defences, and has the name of weaving.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Yes, my boy, but that is not all; for the first process to
which the material is subjected is the opposite of weaving.

  Y. Soc. How so?

  Str. Weaving is a sort of uniting?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. But the first process is a separation of the clotted and matted
fibres?

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. I mean the work of the carder's art; for we cannot say that
carding is weaving, or that the carder is a weaver.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. Again, if a person were to say that the art of making the
warp and the woof was the art of weaving, he would say what was
paradoxical and false.

  Y. Soc. To be sure.

  Str. Shall we say that the whole art of the fuller or of the
mender has nothing to do with the care and treatment clotes, or are we
to regard all these as arts of weaving?

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. And yet surely all these arts will maintain that they are
concerned with the treatment and production of clothes; they will
dispute the exclusive prerogative of weaving, and though assigning a
larger sphere to that, will still reserve a considerable field for
themselves.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Besides these, there are the arts which make tools and
instruments of weaving, and which will claim at least to be
cooperative causes in every work of the weaver.

  Y. Soc. Most true.

  Str. Well, then, suppose that we define weaving, or rather that part
of it which has been selected by us, to be the greatest and noblest of
arts which are concerned with woollen garments-shall we be right? Is
not the definition, although true, wanting in clearness and
completeness; for do not all those other arts require to be first
cleared away?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Then the next thing will be to separate them, in order that the
argument may proceed in a regular manner?

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. Let us consider, in the first place, that there are two kinds
of arts entering into everything which we do.

  Y. Soc. What are they?

  Str. The one kind is the conditional or cooperative, the other the
principal cause.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. The arts which do not manufacture the actual thing, but which
furnish the necessary tools for the manufacture, without which the
several arts could not fulfil their appointed work, are
co-operative; but those which make the things themselves are causal.

  Y. Soc. A very reasonable distinction.

  Str. Thus the arts which make spindles, combs, and other instruments
of the production of clothes may be called co-operative, and those
which treat and fabricate the things themselves, causal.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. The arts of washing and mending, and the other preparatory arts
which belong to the causal class, and form a division of the great art
of adornment, may be all comprehended under what we call the
fuller's art.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Carding and spinning threads and all the parts of the process
which are concerned with the actual manufacture of a woollen garment
form a single art, which is one of thow universally acknowledged-the
art of working in wool.

  Y. Soc. To be sure.

  Str. Of working in wool again, there are two divisions, and both
these are parts of two arts at once.

  Y. Soc. How is that?

  Str. Carding and one half of the use of the comb, and the other
processes of wool-working which separate the composite, may be classed
together as belonging both to the art of woolworking, and also to
one of the two great arts which are of universal application-the art
of composition and the art of division.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. To the latter belong carding and the other processes of which I
was just now speaking the art of discernment or division in wool and
yarn, which is effected in one manner with the comb and in another
with the hands, is variously described under all the names which I
just now mentioned.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Again, let us take some process of woolworking which is also
a portion of the art of composition, and, dismissing the elements of
division which we found there, make two halves, one on the principle
of composition, and the other on the principle of division.

  Y. Soc. Let that be done.

  Str. And once more, Socrates, we must divide the part which
belongs at once both to woolworking and composition, if we are ever to
discover satisfactorily the aforesaid art of weaving.

  Y. Soc. We must.

  Str. Yes, certainly, and let us call one part of the art the art
of twisting threads, the other the art of combining them.

  Y. Soc. Do I understand you, in speaking of twisting, to be
referring to manufacture of the warp?

  Str. Yes, and of the woof too; how, if not by twisting, is the
woof made?

  Y. Soc. There is no other way.

  Str. Then suppose that you define the warp and the woof, for I think
that the definition will be of use to you.

  Y. Soc. How shall I define them?

  Str. As thus: A piece of carded wool which is drawn out lengthwise
and breadth-wise is said to be pulled out.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And the wool thus prepared when twisted by the spindle, and
made into a firm thread, is called the warp, And the art which
regulates these operations the art of spinning the warp.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And the threads which are more loosely spun, having a
softness proportioned to the intertexture of the warp and to the
degree of force used in dressing the cloth-the threads which are
thus spun are called the woof, and the art which is set over them
may be called the art of spinning the woof.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And, now, there can be no mistake about the nature of the
part of weaving which we have undertaken to define. For when that part
of the art of composition which is employed in the working of wool
forms a web by the regular intertexture of warp and woof, the entire
woven substance is called by us a woollen garment, and the art which
presides over this is the art of weaving.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. But why did we not say at once that weaving is the art of
entwining warp and woof, instead of making a long and useless circuit?

  Y. Soc. I thought, Stranger, that there was nothing useless in
what was said.

  Str. Very likely, but you may not always think so, my sweet
friend; and in case any feeling of dissatisfaction should hereafter
arise in your mind, as it very well may, let me lay down a principle
which will apply to arguments in general.

  Y. Soc. Proceed.

  Str. Let us begin by considering the whole nature of excess and
defect, and then we shall have a rational ground on which we may
praise or blame too much length or too much shortness in discussions
of this kind.

  Y. Soc. Let us do so.

  Str. The points on which I think that we ought to dwell are the
following:-

  Y. Soc. What?

   Str. Length and shortness, excess and defect; with all of these the
art of measurement is conversant.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And the art of measurement has to be divided into two parts,
with a view to our present purpose.

  Y. Soc. Where would you make the division?

  Str. As thus: I would make two parts, one having regard to the
relativity of greatness and smallness to each other; and there is
another, without which the existence of production would be
impossible.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. Do you not think that it is only natural for the greater to
be called greater with reference to the less alone, and the less
reference to the greater alone?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. Well, but is there not also something exceeding and exceeded by
the principle of the mean, both in speech and action, and is not
this a reality, and the chief mark of difference between good and
bad men?

  Y. Soc. Plainly.

  Str. Then we must suppose that the great and small exist and are
discerned in both these ways, and not, as we were saying before,
only relatively to one another, but there must also be another
comparison of them with the mean or ideal standard; would you like
to hear the reason why?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. If we assume the greater to exist only in relation to the less,
there will never be any comparison of either with the mean.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And would not this doctrine be the ruin of all the arts and
their creations; would not the art of the Statesman and the
aforesaid art of weaving disappear? For all these arts are on the
watch against excess and defect, not as unrealities, but as real
evils, which occasion a difficulty in action; and the excellence of
beauty of every work of art is due to this observance of measure.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. But if the science of the Statesman disappears, the search
for the royal science will be impossible.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Well, then, as in the case of the Sophist we extorted the
inference that not-being had an existence, because here was the
point at which the argument eluded our grasp, so in this we must
endeavour to show that the greater and, less are not only to be
measured with one another, but also have to do with the production
of the mean; for if this is not admitted, neither a statesman nor
any other man of action can be an undisputed master of his science.

  Y. Soc. Yes, we must certainly do again what we did then.

  Str. But this, Socrates, is a greater work than the other, of
which we only too well remember the length. I think, however, that
we may fairly assume something of this sort-

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. That we shall some day require this notion of a mean with a
view to the demonstration of absolute truth; meanwhile, the argument
that the very existence of the arts must be held to depend on the
possibility of measuring more or less, not only with one another,
but also with a view to the attainment of the mean, seems to afford
a grand support and satisfactory proof of the doctrine which we are
maintaining; for if there are arts, there is a standard of measure,
and if there is a standard of measure, there are arts; but if either
is wanting, there is neither.

  Y. Soc. True; and what is the next step?

  Str. The next step clearly is to divide the art of measurement
into two parts, all we have said already, and to place in the one part
all the arts which measure number, length, depth, breadth, swiftness
with their opposites; and to have another part in which they are
measured with the mean, and the fit, and the opportune, and the due,
and with all those words, in short, which denote a mean or standard
removed from the extremes.

  Y. Soc. Here are two vast divisions, embracing two very different
spheres.

  Str. There are many accomplished men, Socrates, who say, believing
themselves to speak wisely, that the art of measurement is
universal, and has to do with all things. And this means what we are
now saying; for all things which come within the province of art do
certainly in some sense partake of measure. But these persons, because
they are not accustomed to distinguish classes according to real
forms, jumble together two widely different things, relation to one
another, and to a standard, under the idea that they are the same, and
also fall into the converse error of dividing other things not
according to their real parts. Whereas the right way is, if a man
has first seen the unity of things, to go on with the enquiry and
not desist until he has found all the differences contained in it
which form distinct classes; nor again should he be able to rest
contented with the manifold diversities which are seen in a
multitude of things until he has comprehended all of them that have
any affinity within the bounds of one similarity and embraced them
within the reality of a single kind. But we have said enough on this
head, and also of excess and defect; we have only to bear in mind that
two divisions of the art of measurement have been discovered which are
concerned with them, and not forget what they are.

  Y. Soc. We will not forget.

  Str. And now that this discussion is completed, let us go on to
consider another question, which concerns not this argument only but
the conduct of such arguments in general.

  Y. Soc. What is this new question?

  Str. Take the case of a child who is engaged in learning his
letters: when he is asked what letters make up a word, should we say
that the question is intended to improve his grammatical knowledge
of that particular word, or of all words?

  Y. Soc. Clearly, in order that he may have a better knowledge of all
words.

  Str. And is our enquiry about the Statesman intended only to improve
our knowledge of politics, or our power of reasoning generally?

  Y. Soc. Clearly, as in the former example, the purpose is general.

  Str. Still less would any rational man seek to analyse the notion of
weaving for its own sake. But people seem to forget that some things
have sensible images, which are readily known, and can be easily
pointed out when any one desires to answer an enquirer without any
trouble or argument; whereas the greatest and highest truths have no
outward image of themselves visible to man, which he who wishes to
satisfy the soul of the enquirer can adapt to the eye of sense, and
therefore we ought to train ourselves to give and accept a rational
account of them; for immaterial things, which are the noblest and
greatest, are shown only in thought and idea, and in no other way, and
all that we are now saying is said for the sake of them. Moreover,
there is always less difficulty in fixing the mind on small matters
than on great.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Let us call to mind the bearing of all this.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. I wanted to get rid of any impression of tediousness which we
may have experienced in the discussion about weaving, and the reversal
of the universe, and in the discussion concerning the Sophist and
the being of not-being. I know that they were felt to be too long, and
I reproached myself with this, fearing that they might be not only
tedious but irrelevant; and all that I have now said is only
designed to prevent the recurrence of any such disagreeables for the
future.

  Y. Soc. Very good. Will you proceed?

  Str. Then I would like to observe that you and I, remembering what
has been said, should praise or blame the length or shortness of
discussions, not by comparing them with one another, but with what
is fitting, having regard to the part of measurement, which, as we
said, was to be borne in mind.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And yet, not everything is to be judged even with a view to
what is fitting; for we should only want such a length as is suited to
give pleasure, if at all, as a secondary matter; and reason tells
us, that we should be contented to make the ease or rapidity of an
enquiry, not our first, but our second object; the first and highest
of all being to assert the great method of division according to
species-whether the discourse be shorter or longer is not to the
point. No offence should be taken at length, but the longer and
shorter are to be employed indifferently, according as either of
them is better calculated to sharpen the wits of the auditors.
Reason would also say to him who censures the length of discourses
on such occasions and cannot away with their circumlocution, that he
should not be in such a hurry to have done with them, when he can only
complain that they are tedious, but he should prove that if they had
been shorter they would have made those who took part in them better
dialecticians, and more capable of expressing the truth of things;
about any other praise and blame, he need not trouble himself-he
should pretend not to hear them. But we have had enough of this, as
you will probably agree with me in thinking. Let us return to our
Statesman, and apply to his case the aforesaid example of weaving.

  Y. Soc. Very good;-let us do as you say.

  Str. The art of the king has been separated from the similar arts of
shepherds, and, indeed, from all those which have to do with herds
at all. There still remain, however, of the causal and co-operative
arts those which are immediately concerned with States, and which must
first be distinguished from one another.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. You know that these arts cannot easily be divided into two
halves; the reason will be very: evident as we proceed.

  Y. Soc. Then we had better do so.

  Str. We must carve them like a victim into members or limbs, since
we cannot bisect them. For we certainly should divide everything
into as few parts as possible.

  Y. Soc. What is to be done in this case?

  Str. What we did in the example of weaving-all those arts which
furnish the tools were regarded by us as co-operative.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. So now, and with still more reason, all arts which make any
implement in a State, whether great or small, may be regarded by us as
co-operative, for without them neither State nor Statesmanship would
be possible; and yet we are not inclined to say that any of them is
a product of the kingly art.

  Y. Soc. No, indeed.

  Str. The task of separating this class from others is not an easy
one; for there is plausibility in saying that anything in the world is
the instrument of doing something. But there is another dass of
possessions in, a city, of which I have a word to say.

  Y. Soc. What class do you mean?

  Str. A class which may be described as not having this power; that
is to say, not like an instrument, framed for production, but designed
for the preservation of that which is produced.

  Y. Soc. To what do you refer?

  Str. To the class of vessels, as they are comprehensively termed,
which are constructed for the preservation of things moist and dry, of
things prepared in the fire or out of the fire; this is a very large
class, and has, if I am not mistaken, literally nothing to do with the
royal art of which we are in search.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. There is also a third class of possessions to be noted,
different from these and very extensive, moving or resting on land
or water, honourable and also dishonourable. The whole of this class
has one name, because it is intended to be sat upon, being always a
seat for something.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. A vehicle, which is certainly not the work of the Statesman,
but of the carpenter, potter, and coppersmith.

  Y. Soc. I understand.

  Str. And is there not a fourth class which is again different, and
in which most of the things formerly mentioned are contained-every
kind of dress, most sorts of arms, walls and enclosures, whether of
earth or stone, and ten thousand other thing? all of which being
made for the sake of defence, may be truly called defences, and are
for the most part to be regarded as the work of the builder or of
the weaver, rather than of the Statesman.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Shall we add a fifth class, of ornamentation and drawing, and
of the imitations produced, by drawing and music, which are designed
for amusement only, and may be fairly comprehended under one name?

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. Plaything is the name.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. That one name may be fitly predicated of all of them, for
none of these things have a serious purpose-amusement is their sole
aim.

  Y. Soc. That again I understand.

  Str. Then there is a class which provides materials for all these,
out of which and in which the arts already mentioned fabricate their
works;-this manifold class, I say, which is the creation and offspring
of many other arts, may I not rank sixth?

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. I am referring to gold, silver, and other metals, and all
that wood-cutting and shearing of every sort provides for the art of
carpentry and plaiting; and there is the process of barking and
stripping the cuticle of plants, and the currier's art, which strips
off the skins of animals, and other similar arts which manufacture
corks and papyri and cords, and provide for the manufacture of
composite species out of simple kinds-the whole class may be termed
the primitive and simple possession of man, and with this the kingly
science has no concern at all.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. The provision of food and of all other things which mingle
their particles with the particles of the human body; and minister
to the body, will form a seventh class, which may be called by the
general term of nourishment, unless you have any better name to offer.
This, however, appertains rather to the husbandman, huntsman, trainer,
doctor, cook, and is not to be assigned to the Statesman's art.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. These seven classes include nearly every description of
property, with the exception of tame animals. Consider;-there was
the original material, which ought to have been placed first; next
come instruments, vessels, vehicles, defences, playthings,
nourishment; small things, which may be-included under one of these-as
for example, coins, seals and stamps, are omitted, for they have not
in them the character of any larger kind which includes them; but some
of them may, with a little forcing, be placed among ornaments, and
others may be made to harmonize with the class of implements. The
art of herding, which has been already divided into parts, will
include all property in tame animals except slaves.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. The class of slaves and ministers only remains, and I suspect
that in this the real aspirants for the throne, who are the rivals
of the king in the formation of the political web, will be discovered;
just as spinners, carders, and the rest of them, were the rivals of
the weaver. All the others, who were termed co-operators, have been
got rid of among the occupations already mentioned, and separated from
the royal and political science.

  Y. Soc. I agree.

  Str. Let us go a little nearer, in order that we may be more certain
of the complexion of this remaining class.

  Y. Soc. Let us do so.

  Str. We shall find from our present point of view that the
greatest servants are in a case and condition which is the reverse
of what we anticipated.

  Y. Soc. Who are they?

  Str. Those who have been purchased, and have so become
possessions; these are unmistakably slaves, and certainly do not claim
royal science.

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. Again, freemen who of their own accord become the servants of
the other classes in a State, and who exchange and equalise the
products of husbandry and the other arts, some sitting in the
market-place, others going from city to city by land or sea, and
giving money in exchange for money or for other productions-the
money-changer, the merchant, the ship-owner, the retailer, will not
put in any claim to statecraft or politics?

  Y. Soc. No; unless, indeed, to the politics of commerce.

  Str. But surely men whom we see acting as hirelings and serfs, and
too happy to turn their hand to anything, will not profess to share in
royal science?

  Y. Soc. Certainly not.

  Str. But what would you say of some other serviceable officials?

  Y. Soc. Who are they, and what services do they perform?

  Str. There are heralds, and scribes perfected by practice, and
divers others who have great skill in various sorts of business
connected with the government of states-what shall we call them?

  Y. Soc. They are the officials, and servants of the rulers, as you
just now called them, but not themselves rulers.

  Str. There may be something strange in any servant pretending to
be a ruler, and yet I do not think that I could have been dreaming
when I imagined that the principal claimants to political science
would be found somewhere in this neighbourhood.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Well, let us draw nearer, and try the claims of some who have
not yet been tested; in the first place, there are diviners, who
have a portion of servile or ministerial science, and are thought to
be the interpreters of the gods to men.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. There is also the priestly class, who, as the law declares,
know how to give the gods gifts from men in the form of sacrifices
which are acceptable to them, and to ask on our behalf blessings in
return from them. Now both these are branches of the servile or
ministerial art.

  Y. Soc. Yes, clearly.

  Str. And here I think that we seem to be getting on the right track;
for the priest and the diviner are swollen with pride and prerogative,
and they create an awful impression of themselves by the magnitude
of their enterprises; in Egypt, the king himself is not allowed to
reign, unless he have priestly powers, and if he should be of
another class and has thrust himself in, he must get enrolled in the
priesthood. In many parts of Hellas, the duty of offering the most
solemn propitiatory sacrifices is assigned to the highest
magistracies, and here, at Athens, the most solemn and national of the
ancient sacrifices are supposed to be celebrated by him who has been
chosen by lot to be the King Archon.

  Y. Soc. Precisely.

  Str. But who are these other kings and priests elected by lot who
now come into view followed by their retainers and a vast throng, as
the former class disappears and the scene changes?

  Y. Soc. Whom can you mean?

  Str. They are a strange crew.

  Y. Soc. Why strange?

  Str. A minute ago I thought that they were animals of every tribe;
for many of them are like lions and centaurs, and many more like
satyrs and such weak and shifty creatures;-Protean shapes quickly
changing into one another's forms and natures; and now, Socrates, I
begin to see who they are.

  Y. Soc. Who are they? You seem to be gazing on some strange vision.

  Str. Yes; every one looks strange when you do not know him; and just
now I myself fell into this mistake-at first sight, coming suddenly
upon him, I did not recognize the politician and his troop.

  Y. Soc. Who is he?

  Str. The chief of Sophists and most accomplished of wizards, who
must at any cost be separated from the true king or Statesman, if we
are ever to see daylight in the present enquiry.

  Y. Soc. That is a hope not lightly to be renounced.

  Str. Never, if I can help it; and, first, let me ask you a question.

  Y. Soc. What?

  Str. Is not monarchy a recognized form of government?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And, after monarchy, next in order comes the government of
the few?

  Y. Soc. Of course.

  Str. Is not the third form of government the rule of the
multitude, which is called by the name of democracy?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And do not these three expand in a manner into five,
producing out of themselves two other names Y. Soc. What are they?

  Y. Soc. What are they?

  Str. There is a criterion of voluntary and involuntary, poverty
and riches, law and the absence of law, which men now-a-days apply
to them; the two first they subdivide accordingly, and ascribe to
monarchy two forms and two corresponding names, royalty and tyranny.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And the government of the few they distinguish by the names
of aristocracy and oligarchy.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Democracy alone, whether rigidly observing the laws or not, and
whether the multitude rule over the men of property with their consent
or against their consent, always in ordinary language has the same
name.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. But do you suppose that any form of government which is defined
by these characteristics of the one, the few, or the many, of
poverty or wealth, of voluntary or compulsory submission, of written
law or the absence of law, can be a right one?

  Y. Soc. Why not?

  Str. Reflect; and follow me.

  Y. Soc. In what direction?

  Str. Shall we abide by what we said at first, or shall we retract
our words?

  Y. Soc. To what do you refer?

  Str. If I am not mistaken, we said that royal power was a science?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And a science of a peculiar kind, which was selected out of the
rest as having a character which is at once judicial and
authoritative?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And there was one kind of authority over lifeless things and
another other living animals; and so we proceeded in the division step
by step up to this point, not losing the idea of science, but unable
as yet to determine the nature of the particular science?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Hence we are led to observe that the distinguishing principle
of the State cannot be the few or many, the voluntary or
involuntary, poverty or riches; but some notion of science must
enter into it, if we are to be consistent with what has preceded.

  Y. Soc. And we must be consistent.

  Str. Well, then, in which of these various forms of States may the
science of government, which is among the greatest of all sciences and
most difficult to acquire, be supposed to reside? That we must
discover, and then we shall see who are the false politicians who
pretend to be politicians but are not, although they persuade many,
and shall separate them from the wise king.

  Y. Soc. That, as the argument has already intimated, will be our
duty.

  Str. Do you think that the multitude in a State can attain political
science?

  Y. Soc. Impossible.

  Str. But, perhaps, in a city of a thousand men, there would be a
hundred, or say fifty, who could?

  Y. Soc. In that case political science would certainly be the
easiest of all sciences; there could not be found in a city of that
number as many really first-rate draught-players, if judged by the
standard of the rest of Hellas, and there would certainly not be as
many kings. For kings we may truly call those who possess royal
science, whether they rule or not, as was shown in the previous
argument.

  Str. Thank you for reminding me; and the consequence is that any
true form of government can only be supposed to be the government of
one, two, or, at any rate, of a few.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And these, whether they rule with the will, or against the will
of their subjects, with written laws or. without written laws, and
whether they are poor or rich, and whatever be the nature of their
rule, must be supposed, according to our present view, to rule on some
scientific principle; just as the physician, whether he cures us
against our will or with our will, and whatever be his mode of
treatment-incision, burning, or the infliction of some other
pain-whether he practises out of a book or not out of a book, and
whether he be rich or poor, whether he purges or reduces in some other
way, or even fattens his patients, is a physician all the same, so
long as he exercises authority over them according to rules of art, if
he only does them good and heals and saves them. And this we lay
down to be the only proper test of the art of medicine, or of any
other art of command.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. Then that can be the only true form of government in which
the governors are really found to possess science, and are not mere
pretenders, whether they rule according to law or without law,
over-willing or unwilling subjects, and are rich or poor
themselves-none of these things can with any propriety be included
in the notion of the ruler.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And whether with a view to the public good they purge the State
by killing some, or exiling some; whether they reduce the size of
the body corporate by sending out from the hive swarms of citizens,
or, by introducing persons from without, increase it; while they act
according to the rules of wisdom and justice, and use their power with
a view to the general security and improvement, the city over which
they rule, and which has these characteristics, may be described as
the only true State. All other governments are not genuine or real;
but only imitations of this, and some of them are better and some of
them are worse; the better are said to be well governed, but they
are mere imitations like the others.

  Y. Soc. I agree, Stranger, in the greater part of what you say;
but as to their ruling without laws-the expression has a harsh sound.

  Str. You have been too quick for me, Socrates; I was just going to
ask you whether you objected to any of my statements. And now I see
that we shall have to consider this notion of there being good
government without laws.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. There can be no doubt that legislation is in a manner the
business of a king, and yet the best thing of all is not that the
law should rule, but that a man should rule, supposing him to have
wisdom and royal power. Do you see why this is?

  Y. Soc. Why?

  Str. Because the law does not perfectly comprehend what is noblest
and most just for all and therefore cannot enforce what is best. The
differences of men and actions, and the endless irregular movements of
human things, do not admit of -any universal and simple rule. And no
art whatsoever can lay down a rule which will last for all time.

  Y. Soc. Of course not.

  Str. But the law is always striving to make one;-like an obstinate
and ignorant tyrant, who will not allow anything to be done contrary
to his appointment, or any question to be asked-not even in sudden
changes of circumstances, when something happens to be better than
what he commanded for some one.

  Y. Soc. Certainly; the law treats us all precisely in the manner
which you describe.

  Str. A perfectly simple principle can never be applied to a state of
things which is the reverse of simple.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Then if the law is not the perfection of right, why are we
compelled to make laws at all? The reason of this has next to be
investigated.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Let me ask, whether you have not meetings for gymnastic
contests in your city, such as there are in other cities, at which men
compete in running, wrestling, and the like?

  Y. Soc. Yes; they are very common among us.

  Str. And what are the rules which are enforced on their pupils by
professional trainers or by others having similar authority? Can you
remember?

  Y. Soc. To what do you refer?

  Str. The training-masters do not issue minute rules for individuals,
or give every individual what is exactly suited to his constitution;
they think that they ought to go more roughly to work, and to
prescribe generally the regimen, which will benefit the majority.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And therefore they assign equal amounts of exercise to them
all; they send them forth together, and let them rest together from
their running, wrestling, or whatever the form of bodily exercise
may be.

  Y. So True.

  Str. And now observe that the legislator who has to preside over the
herd, and to enforce justice in their dealings with one another,
will not be able, in enacting for the general good, to provide exactly
what is suitable for each particular case.

  Y. Soc. He cannot be expected to do so.

  Str. He will lay down laws in a general form for the majority,
roughly meeting the cases of individuals; and some of them he will
deliver in writing, and others will be unwritten; and these last
will be traditional customs of the country.

  Y. Soc. He will be right.

  Str. Yes, quite right; for how can he sit at every man's side all
through his life, prescribing for him the exact particulars of his
duty? Who, Socrates, would be equal to such a task? No one who
really had the royal science, if he had been able to do this, would
have imposed upon himself the restriction of a written law.

  Y. Soc. So I should infer from what has now been said.

  Str. Or rather, my good friend, from what is going to be said.

  Y. Soc. And what is that?

  Str. Let us put to ourselves the case of a physician, or trainer,
who is about to go into a far country, and is expecting to be a long
time away from his patients-thinking that his instructions will not be
remembered unless they are written down, he will leave notes of them
for the use of his pupils or patients.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. But what would you say, if he came back sooner than he had
intended, and, owing to an unexpected change of the winds or other
celestial influences, something else happened to be better for
them-would he not venture to suggest this new remedy, although not
contemplated in his former prescription? Would he persist in observing
the original law, neither himself giving any few commandments, nor the
patient daring to do otherwise than was prescribed, under the idea
that this course only was healthy and medicinal, all others noxious
and heterodox? Viewed in the light of science and true art, would
not all such enactments be utterly ridiculous?

  Y. Soc. Utterly.

  Str. And if he who gave laws, written or unwritten, determining what
was good or bad, honourable or dishonourable, just or unjust, to the
tribes of men who flock together in their several cities, and are
governed accordance with them; if, I say, the wise legislator were
suddenly to come again, or another like to him, is he to be prohibited
from changing them?-would not this prohibition be in reality quite
as ridiculous as the other?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Do you know a plausible saying of the common people which is in
point?

  Y. Soc. I do not recall what you mean at the moment.

  Str. They say that if any one knows how the ancient laws may be
improved, he must first persuade his own State of the improvement, and
then he may legislate, but not otherwise.

  Y. Soc. And are they not right?

  Str. I dare say. But supposing that he does use some gentle violence
for their good, what is this violence to be called? Or rather,
before you answer, let me ask the same question in reference to our
previous instances.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. Suppose that a skilful physician has a patient, of whatever sex
or age, whom he compels against his will to do something for his
good which is contrary to the written rules; what is this compulsion
to be called? Would you ever dream of calling it a violation of the
art, or a breach of the laws of health? Nothing could be more unjust
than for the patient to whom such violence is applied, to charge the
physician who practises the violence with wanting skill or aggravating
his disease.

  Y. Soc. Most true.

  Str. In the political art error is not called disease, but evil,
or disgrace, or injustice.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. And when the citizen, contrary to law and custom, is
compelled to do what is juster and better and nobler than he did
before, the last and most absurd thing which he could say about such
violence is that he has incurred disgrace or evil or injustice at
the hands of those who compelled him.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. And shall we say that the violence, if exercised by a rich man,
is just, and if by a poor man, unjust? May not any man, rich or
poor, with or without laws, with the will of the citizens or against
the will of the citizens, do what is for their interest? Is not this
the true principle of government, according to which the wise and good
man will order the affairs of his subjects? As the pilot, by
watching continually over the interests of the ship and of the
crew-not by laying down rules, but by making his art a law-preserves
the lives of his fellow-sailors, even and in the self-same way, may
there not be a true form of polity created by those who are able to
govern in a similar spirit, and who show a strength of art which is
superior to the law? Nor can wise rulers ever err while they,
observing the one great rule of distributing justice to the citizens
with intelligence and skill, are able to preserve them, and, as far as
may be, to make them better from being worse.

  Y. Soc. No one can deny what has been now said.

  Str. Neither, if you consider, can any one deny the other statement.

  Y. Soc. What was it?

  Str. We said that no great number of persons, whoever they may be,
can attain political knowledge, or order a State wisely, but that
the true government is to be found in a small body, or in an
individual, and that other States are but imitations of this, as we
said a little while ago, some for the better and some for the worse.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean? I cannot have understood your previous
remark about imitations.

  Str. And yet the mere suggestion which I hastily threw out is highly
important, even if we leave the question where it is, and do not
seek by the discussion of it to expose the error which prevails in
this matter.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. The idea which has to be grasped by us is not easy or familiar;
but we may attempt to express it thus:-Supposing the government of
which I have been speaking to be the only true model, then the
others must use the written laws of this-in no other can they be
saved; they will have to do what is now generally approved, although
not the best thing in the world.

  Y. Soc. What is this?

  Str. No citizen should do anything contrary to the laws, and any
infringement of them should be punished with death and the most
extreme penalties; and this is very right and good when regarded as
the second best thing, if you set aside the first, of which I was just
now speaking. Shall I explain the nature of what call the second best?

  Y. Soc. By all means.

  Str. I must again have recourse to my favourite images; through
them, and them alone, can I describe kings and rulers.

  Y. Soc. What images?

  Str. The noble pilot and the wise physician, who "is worth many
another man"-in the similitude of these let us endeavour to discover
some image of the king.

  Y. Soc. What sort of image?

  Str. Well, such as this:-Every man will reflect that he suffers
strange things at the hands of both of them; the physician; saves
any whom he wishes to save, and any whom he wishes to maltreat he
maltreats-cutting or burning them; and at the same time requiring them
to bring him patients, which are a sort of tribute, of which little or
nothing is spent upon the sick man, and the greater part is consumed
by him and his domestics; and the finale is that he receives money
from the relations of the sick man or from some enemy of his; and puts
him out of the way. And the pilots of ships are guilty, of
numberless evil deeds of the same kind; they intentionally play
false and leave you ashore when the hour of sailing arrives; or they
cause mishaps at sea and cast away their freight; and are guilty of
other rogueries. Now suppose that we, bearing all this in mind, were
to determine, after consideration, that neither of these arts shall
any longer be allowed to exercise absolute control either over freemen
or over slaves, but that we will summon an assembly either of all
the people, or of the rich only, that anybody who likes, whatever
may be his calling, or even if he have no calling, may offer an
opinion either about seamanship or about diseases-whether as to the
manner in which physic or surgical instruments are to be applied to
the patient, or again about the vessels and the nautical implements
which are required in navigation, and how to meet the dangers of winds
and waves which are incidental to the voyage, how to behave when
encountering pirates, and what is to be done with the old fashioned
galleys, if they have to fight with others of a similar build-and
that, whatever shall be decreed by the multitude on these points, upon
the advice of persons skilled or unskilled, shall be written down on
triangular tablets and columns, or enacted although unwritten to be
national customs; and that in all future time vessels shall be
navigated and remedies administered to the patient after this fashion.

  Y. Soc. What a strange notion!

  Str. Suppose further, that the pilots and physicians are appointed
annually, either out of the rich, or out of the whole people, and that
they are elected by lot; and that after their election they navigate
vessels and heal the sick according to the written rules.

  Y. Soc. Worse and worse.

  Str. But hear what follows:-When the year of office has expired, the
pilot or physician has to come before a court of review, in which
the judges are either selected from the wealthy classes or chosen by
lot out of the whole people; and anybody who pleases may be their
accuser, and may lay to their charge, that during the past year they
have not navigated their vessels or healed their patients according to
the letter of the law and the ancient customs of their ancestors;
and if either of them is condemned, some of the judges must fix what
he is to suffer or pay.

  Y. Soc. He who is willing to take a command under such conditions,
deserves to suffer any penalty.

  Str. Yet once more, we shall have to enact that if any one is
detected enquiring into piloting and navigation, or into health and
the true nature of medicine, or about the winds, or other conditions
of the atmosphere, contrary to the written rules, and has any
ingenious notions about such matters, he is not to be called a pilot
or physician, but a cloudy prating sophist;-further, on the ground
that he is a corrupter of the young, who would persuade them. to
follow the art of medicine or piloting in an unlawful manner, and to
exercise an arbitrary rule over their patients or ships, any one who
is qualified by law may inform against him, and indict him in some
court, and then if he is found to be persuading any, whether young
or old, to act contrary to the written law, he is to be punished
with the utmost rigour; for no one should presume to be wiser than the
laws; and as touching healing and health and piloting and
navigation, the nature of them is known to all, for anybody may
learn the written laws and the national customs. If such were the mode
of procedure, Socrates, about these sciences and about generalship,
and any branch of hunting, or about painting or imitation in
general, or carpentry, or any sort of handicraft, or husbandry, or
planting, or if we were to see an art of rearing horses, or tending
herds, or divination, or any ministerial service, or
draught-playing, or any science conversant with number, whether simple
or square or cube, or comprising motion-I say, if all these things
were done in this way according to written regulations, and not
according to art, what would be the result?

  Y. Soc. All the arts would utterly perish, and could never be
recovered, because enquiry would be unlawful. And human life, which is
bad enough already, would then become utterly unendurable.

  Str. But what, if while compelling all these operations to be
regulated by written law, we were to appoint as the guardian of the
laws some one elected by a show of hands, or by lot, and he caring
nothing about the laws, were to act contrary to them from motives of
interest or favour, and without knowledge-would not this be a still
worse evil than the former?

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. To go against the laws, which are based upon long experience,
and the wisdom of counsellors who have graciously recommended them and
persuaded the multitude to pass them, would be a far greater and
more ruinous error than any adherence to written law?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. Therefore, as there is a danger of this, the next best thing in
legislating is not to allow either the individual or the multitude
to break the law in any respect whatever.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. The laws would be copies of the true particulars of action as
far as they admit of being written down from the lips of those who
have knowledge?

  Y. Soc. Certainly they would.

  Str. And, as we were saying, he who has knowledge and is a true
Statesman, will do many things within his own sphere of action by
his art without regard to the laws, when he is of opinion that
something other than that which he has written down and enjoined to be
observed during his absence would be better.

  Y. Soc. Yes, we said so.

  Str. And any individual or any number of men, having fixed laws,
in acting contrary to them with a view to something better, would only
be acting, as far as they are able, like the true Statesman?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. If they had no knowledge of what they were doing, they would
imitate the truth, and they would always imitate ill; but if they
had knowledge, the imitation would be the perfect truth, and an
imitation no longer.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. And the principle that no great number of men are able to
acquire a knowledge of any art has been already admitted by us.

  Y. Soc. Yes, it has.

  Str. Then the royal or political art, if there be such an art,
will never be attained either by the wealthy or by the other mob.

  Y. Soc. Impossible.

  Str. Then the nearest approach which these lower forms of government
can ever make to the true government of the one scientific ruler, is
to do nothing contrary to their own written laws and national customs.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. When the rich imitate the true form, such a government is
called aristocracy; and when they are regardless of the laws,
oligarchy.

  Y Soc. True.

  Str. Or again, when an individual rules according to law in
imitation of him who knows, we call him a king; and if he rules
according to law, we give him the same name, whether he rules with
opinion or with knowledge.

  Y. Soc. To be sure.

  Str. And when an individual truly possessing knowledge rules, his
name will surely be the same-he will be called a king; and thus the
five names of governments, as they are now reckoned, become one.

  Y. Soc. That is true.

  Str. And when an individual ruler governs neither by law nor by
custom, but following in the steps of the true man of science pretends
that he can only act for the best by violating the laws, while in
reality appetite and ignorance are the motives of the imitation, may
not such an one be called a tyrant?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And this we believe to be the origin of the tyrant and the
king, of oligarchies, and aristocracies, and democracies-because men
are offended at the one monarch, and can never be made to believe that
any one can be worthy of such authority, or is able and willing in the
spirit of virtue and knowledge to act justly and holily to all; they
fancy that he will be a despot who will wrong and harm and slay whom
he pleases of us; for if there could be such a despot as we
describe, they would acknowledge that we ought to be too glad to
have him, and that he alone would be the happy ruler of a true and
perfect State.

  Y. Soc. To be sure.

  Str. But then, as the State is not like a beehive, and has no
natural head who is at once recognized to be the superior both in body
and in mind, mankind are obliged to meet and make laws, and
endeavour to approach as nearly as they can to the true form of
government.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And when the foundation of politics is in the letter only and
in custom, and knowledge is divorced from action, can we wonder
Socrates, at the miseries which there are, and always will be, in
States? Any other art, built on such a foundation and thus
conducted, would ruin all that it touched. Ought we not rather to
wonder at the natural strength of the political bond? For States
have endured all this, time out of mind, and yet some of them still
remain and are not overthrown, though many of them, like ships at sea,
founder from time to time, and perish, and have perished and will hire
after perish, through the badness of their pilots and crews, who
have the worst sort of ignorance of the highest truths-I mean to
say, that they are wholly unaquainted with politics, of which, above
all other sciences, they believe themselves to have acquired the
most perfect knowledge.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Then the question arises:-which of these untrue forms of
government is the least oppressive to their subjects, though they
are all oppressive; and which is the worst of them? Here is a
consideration which is beside our present purpose, and yet having
regard to the whole it seems to influence all our actions: we must
examine it.

  Y. Soc. Yes, we must.

  Str. You may say that of the three forms, the same is at once the
hardest and the easiest.

  Y. Soc. What do you mean?

  Str. I am speaking of the three forms of government, which I
mentioned at the beginning of this discussion-monarchy, the rule of
the few, and the rule of the many.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. If we divide each of these we shall have six, from which the
true one may be distinguished as a seventh.

  Y. Soc. How would you make the division?

  Str. Monarchy divides into royalty and tyranny; the rule of the
few into aristocracy, which has an auspicious name, and oligarchy; and
democracy or the rule of the many, which before was one, must now be
divided.

  Y. Soc. On what principle of division?

  Str. On the same principle as before, although the name is now
discovered to have a twofold meaning;-For the distinction of ruling
with law or without applies to this as well as to the rest.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. The division made no difference when we were looking for the
perfect State, as we showed before. But now that this has been
separated off, and, as we said, the others alone are left for us,
the principle of law and the absence of law will bisect them all.

  Y. Soc. That would seem follow, from what has been said.

  Str. Then monarchy, when bound by good prescriptions or laws, is the
best of all the six, and when lawless is the most bitter and
oppressive to the subject.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. The government of the few which is intermediate between that of
the one and many; is also intermediate in good and evil; but the
government of the many is in every respect weak and unable to do
either any great good or any great evil, when compared with the
others, because the offices are too minutely subdivided and too many
hold them. And this therefore is the worst of all lawful
governments, and the best of all lawless ones. If they are all without
the restraints of law, democracy is the form in which to live is best;
if they are well ordered then this is the last which you should
choose, as royalty, the first form, is the best, with the exception of
the seventh for that excels them all, and is among States what God
is among men.

  Y. Soc. You are quite right, and we should choose that above all.

  Str. The members of all these States, with the exception of the
one which has knowledge may be set aside as being not Statesmen but
partisans-upholders of the most monstrous idols, and themselves idols;
and, being the greatest imitators and magicians, they are also the
greatest of Sophists.

  Y. Soc. The name of Sophist after many windings in the argument
appears to have been most justly fixed upon the politicians, as they
are termed.

  Str. And so our satyric drama has been played out; and the troop
of Centaurs and Satyrs, however unwilling to leave the stage, have
at last been separated from the political science.

  Y. Soc. So I perceive.

  Str. There remain, however, natures still more troublesome,
because they are more nearly akin to the king, and more difficult to
discern; the examination of them may be compared to the process of
refining gold.

  Y. Soc. What is your meaning?

  Str. The workmen begin by sifting away the earth and stones and
the like; there remain in a confused mass the valuable clements akin
to gold, which can only be separated by fire-copper, silver, and other
precious metals; these are at last refined away by the use of tests,
until the gold is left quite pure.

  Y. Soc. Yes, that is the way in which these things are said to be
done.

  Str. In like manner, all alien and uncongenial matter has been
separated from political science, and what is precious and of a
kindred nature has been left; there remain the nobler arts of the
general and the judge, and the higher sort of oratory which is an ally
of the royal art, and persuades men to do justice, and assists in
guiding the helm of States:-How can we best clear away all these,
leaving him whom we seek alone and unalloyed?

  Y. Soc. That is obviously what has in some way to be attempted.

  Str. If the attempt is all that is wanting, he shall certainly be
brought to light; and I think that the illustration of music may
assist in exhibiting him. Please to answer me a question.

  Y. Soc. What question?

  Str. There is such a thing as learning music or handicraft arts in
general?

  Y. Soc. There is.

  Str. And is there any higher art or science, having power to
decide which of these arts are and are not to be learned;-what do
you say?

  Y. Soc. I should answer that there is.

  Str. And do we acknowledge this science to be different from the
others?

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. And ought the other sciences to be superior to this, or no
single science to any other? Or ought this science to be the
overseer and governor of all the others?

  Y. Soc. The latter.

  Str. You mean to say that the science which judges whether we
ought to learn or not, must be superior to the science which is
learned or which teaches?

  Y. Soc. Far superior.

  Str. And the science which determines whether we ought to persuade
or not, must be superior to the science which is able to persuade?

  Y. Soc. Of course.

  Str. Very good; and to what science do we assign the power of
persuading a multitude by a pleasing tale and not by teaching?

  Y. Soc. That power, I think, must clearly be assigned to rhetoric.

  Str. And to what science do we give the power of determining whether
we are to employ persuasion or force towards any one, or to refrain
altogether?

  Y. Soc. To that science which governs the arts of speech and
persuasion.

  Str. Which, if I am not mistaken, will be politics?

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Rhetoric seems to be quickly distinguished from politics, being
a different species, yet ministering to it.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. But what would you think of another sort of power or science?

  Y. Soc. What science?

  Str. The science which has to do with military operations against
our enemies-is that to be regarded as a science or not?

  Y. Soc. How can generalship and military tactics be regarded as
other than a science?

  Str. And is the art which is able and knows how to advise when we
are to go to war, or to make peace, the same as this or different?

  Y. Soc. If we are to be consistent, we must say different.

  Str. And we must also suppose that this rules the other, if we are
not to give up our former notion?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And, considering how great and terrible the whole art of war
is, can we imagine any which is superior to it but the truly royal?

  Y. Soc. No other.

  Str. The art of the general is only ministerial, and therefore not
political?

  Y. Soc. Exactly.

  Str. Once more let us consider the nature of the righteous judge.

  Y. Soc. Very good.

  Str. Does he do anything but decide the dealings of men with one
another to be just or unjust in accordance with the standard which
he receives from the king and legislator-showing his own peculiar
virtue only in this, that he is not perverted by gifts, or fears, or
pity, or by any sort of favour or enmity, into deciding the suits of
men with one another contrary to the appointment of the legislator?

  Y. Soc. No; his office is such as you describe.

  Str. Then the inference is that the power of the judge is not royal,
but only the power of a guardian of the law which ministers to the
royal power?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. The review of all these sciences shows that none of them is
political or royal. For the truly royal ought not itself to act, but
to rule over those who are able to act; the king ought to know what is
and what is not a fitting opportunity for taking the initiative in
matters of the greatest importance, whilst others, should execute
his orders.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And, therefore, the arts which we have described, as they
have no authority over themselves or one another, but are each of them
concerned with some special action of their own, have, as they ought
to have, special names corresponding to their several actions.

  Y. Soc. I agree.

  Str. And the science which is over them all, and has charge of the
laws, and of all matters affecting the State, and truly weaves them
all into one, if we would describe under a name characteristic of
their common nature, most truly we may call politics.

  Y. Soc. Exactly so.

  Str. Then, now that we have discovered the various classes in a
State, shall I analyse politics after the pattern which weaving
supplied?

  Y. Soc. I greatly wish that you would.

  Str. Then I must describe the nature of the royal web, and show
how the various threads are woven into one piece.

  Y. Soc. Clearly.

  Str. A task has to be accomplished, which although difficult,
appears to be necessary.

  Y. Soc. Certainly the attempt must be made.

  Str. To assume that one part of virtue differs in kind from another,
is a position easily assailable by contentious disputants, who
appeal to popular opinion.

  Y. Soc. I do not understand.

  Str. Let me put the matter in another way: I suppose that you
would consider courage to be a part of virtue?

  Y. Soc. Certainly I should.

  Str. And you would think temperance to be different from courage;
and likewise to be a part of virtue?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. I shall venture to put forward a strange theory about them.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. That they are two principles which thoroughly hate one
another and are antagonistic throughout a great part of nature.

  Y. Soc. How singular!

  Str. Yes very-for all the parts of virtue are commonly said to be
friendly to one another.

  Y. Soc. Yes.

  Str. Then let us carefully investigate whether this is universally
true, or whether there are not parts of virtue which are at war with
their kindred in some respect.

  Y. Soc. Tell me how we shall consider that question.

  Str. We must extend our enquiry to all those things which we
consider beautiful and at the same time place in two opposite classes.

  Y. Soc. Explain; what are they?

  Str. Acuteness and quickness, whether in body or soul or in the
movement of sound, and the imitations of them which painting and music
supply, you must have praised yourself before now, or been present
when others praised them.

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And do you remember the terms in which they are praised?

  Y. Soc. I do not.

  Str. I wonder whether I can explain to you in words the thought
which is passing in my mind.

  Y. Soc. Why not?

  Str. You fancy that this is all so easy: Well, let us consider these
notions with reference to the opposite classes of action under which
they fall. When we praise quickness and energy and acuteness,
whether of mind or body or sound, we express our praise of the quality
which we admire by one word, and that one word is manliness or
courage.

  Y. Soc. How?

  Str. We speak of an action as energetic and brave, quick and
manly, and vigorous too; and when we apply the name of which I speak
as the common attribute of all these natures, we certainly praise
them.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. And do we not often praise the quiet strain of action also?

  Y. Soc. To be sure.

  Str. And do we not then say the opposite of what we said of the
other?

  Y. Soc. How do you mean?

  Str. We exclaim How calm! How temperate! in admiration of the slow
and quiet working of the intellect, and of steadiness and gentleness
in action, of smoothness and depth of voice, and of all rhythmical
movement and of music in general, when these have a proper
solemnity. Of all such actions we predicate not courage, but a name
indicative of order.

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. But when, on the other hand, either of these is out of place,
the names of either are changed into terms of censure.

  Y. Soc. How so?

  Str. Too great sharpness or quickness or hardness is termed violence
or madness; too great slowness or gentleness is called cowardice or
sluggishness; and we may observe, that for the most part these
qualities, and the temperance and manliness of the opposite
characters, are arrayed as enemies on opposite sides, and do not
mingle with one another in their respective actions; and if we
pursue the enquiry, we shall find that men who have these different
qualities of mind differ from one another.

  Y. Soc. In what respect?

  Str. In respect of all the qualities which I mentioned, and very
likely of many others. According to their respective affinities to
either class of actions they distribute praise and blame-praise to the
actions which are akin to their own, blame to those of the opposite
party-and out of this many quarrels and occasions of quarrel arise
among them.

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. The difference between the two classes is often a trivial
concern; but in a state, and when affecting really important
matters, becomes of all disorders the most hateful.

  Y. Soc. To what do you refer?

  Str. To nothing short of the whole regulation of human life. For the
orderly class are always ready to lead a peaceful life, quietly
doing their own business; this is their manner of behaving with all
men at home, and they are equally ready to find some way of keeping
the peace with foreign States. And on account of this fondness of
theirs for peace, which is often out of season where their influence
prevails, they become by degrees unwarlike, and bring up their young
men to be like themselves; they are at the mercy of their enemies;
whence in a few years they and their children and the whole city often
pass imperceptibly from the condition of freemen into that of slaves.

  Y. Soc. What a cruel fate!

  Str. And now think of what happens with the more courageous natures.
Are they not always inciting their country to go to war, owing to
their excessive love of the military life? they raise up enemies
against themselves many and mighty, and either utterly ruin their
native land or enslave and subject it to its foes?

  Y. Soc. That, again, is true.

  Str. Must we not admit, then, that where these two classes exist.
they always feel the greatest antipathy and antagonism towards one
another?

  Y. Soc. We cannot deny it.

  Str. And returning to the enquiry with which we began, have we not
found that considerable portions of virtue are at variance with one
another, and give rise to a similar opposition in the characters who
are endowed with them?

  Y. Soc. True.

  Str. Let us consider a further point.

  Y. Soc. What is it?

  Str. I want to know, whether any constructive art will make any,
even the most trivial thing, out of bad and good materials
indifferently, if this can be helped? does not all art rather reject
the bad as far as possible, and accept the good and fit materials, and
from these elements, whether like or unlike, gathering them all into
one, work out some nature or idea?

  Y. Soc. To, be sure.

  Str. Then the true and natural art of statesmanship will never allow
any State to be formed by a combination of good and bad men, if this
can be avoided; but will begin by testing human natures in play, and
after testing them, will entrust them to proper teachers who are the
ministers of her purposes-she will herself give orders, and maintain
authority; just as the art of weaving continually gives orders and
maintains authority over the carders and all the others who prepare
the material for the work, commanding the subsidiary arts to execute
the works which she deems necessary for making the web.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. In like manner, the royal science appears to me to be the
mistress of all lawful educators and instructors, and having this
queenly power, will not permit them to train men in what will
produce characters unsuited to the political constitution which she
desires to create, but only in what will produce such as are suitable.
Those which have no share of manliness and temperance, or any other
virtuous inclination, and, from the necessity of an evil nature, are
violently carried away to godlessness and insolence and injustice, she
gets rid of by death and exile, and punishes them with the greatest of
disgraces.

  Y. Soc. That is commonly said.

  Str. But those who are wallowing in ignorance and baseness she
bows under the yoke of slavery.

  Y. Soc. Quite right.

  Str. The rest of the citizens, out of whom, if they have
education, something noble may be made, and who are capable of being
united by the Statesman, the kingly art blends and weaves together;
taking on the one hand those whose natures tend rather to courage,
which is the stronger element and may be regarded as the warp, and
on the other hand those which incline to order and gentleness, and
which are represented in the figure as spun thick and soft after the
manner of the woof-these, which are naturally opposed, she seeks to
bind and weave together in the following manner:

  Y. Soc. In what manner?

  Str. First of all, she takes the eternal element of the soul and
binds it with a divine cord, to which it is akin, and then the
animal nature, and binds that with human cords.

  Y. Soc. I do not understand what you mean.

  Str. The meaning is, that the opinion about the honourable and the
just and good and their opposites, which is true and confirmed by
reason, is a divine principle, and when implanted in the soul, is
implanted, as I maintain, in a nature of heavenly birth.

  Y. Soc. Yes; what else should it be?

  Str. Only the Statesman and the good legislator, having the
inspiration of the royal muse, can implant this opinion, and he,
only in the rightly educated, whom we were just now describing.

  Y. Soc. Likely enough.

  Str. But him who cannot, we will not designate by any of the names
which are the subject of the present which are the subject of the
present enquiry.

  Y. Soc. Very right.

  Str. The courageous soul when attaining this truth becomes
civilized, and rendered more capable of partaking of justice; but when
not partaking, is inclined to brutality. Is not that true?

  Y. Soc. Certainly.

  Str. And again, the peaceful and orderly nature, if sharing in these
opinions, becomes temperate and wise, as far as this may be in a
State, but if not, deservedly obtains the ignominious name of
silliness.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. Can we say that such a connection as this will lastingly
unite the evil with one another or with the good, or that any
science would seriously think of using a bond of this kind to join
such materials?

  Y. Soc. Impossible.

  Str. But in those who were originally of a noble nature, and who
have been nurtured in noble ways, and in those only, may we not say
that union is implanted by law, and that this is the medicine which
art prescribes for them, and of all the bonds which unite the
dissimilar and contrary parts of virtue is not this, as I was
saying, the divinest?

  Y. Soc. Very true.

  Str. Where this divine bond exists there is no difficulty in
imagining, or when you have imagined, in creating the other bonds,
which are human only.

  Y. Soc. How is that, and what bonds do you mean?

  Str. Rights of intermarriage, and ties which are formed between
States by giving and taking children in marriage, or between
individuals by private betrothals and espousals. For most persons
form; marriage connection without due regard to what is best for the
procreation of children.

  Y. Soc. In what way?

  Str. They seek after wealth and power, which, in matrimony are
objects not worthy-even of a serious censure.

  Y. Soc. There is no need to consider them at all.

  Str. More reason is-there to consider the practice of those who make
family their chief aim, and to indicate their error.

  Y. Soc. Quite true.

  Str. They act on no true principle at all; they seek their ease
and receive with open arms those are like themselves, and hate those
who are unlike them, being too much influenced by feelings of dislike.

  Y. Soc. How so?

  Str. The quiet orderly class seek for natures like their own, and as
far as they can they marry and give in marriage exclusively in this
class, and the courageous do the same; they seek natures like their
own, whereas they should both do precisely the opposite.

  Y. Soc. How and why is that?

  Str. Because courage, when untempered by the gentler nature during
many generations, may at first bloom and strengthen, but at last
bursts forth into downright madness.

  Y. Soc. Like enough.

  Str. And then, again, the soul which is over-full of modesty and has
no element of courage in many successive generations, is apt to grow
too indolent, and at last to become utterly paralyzed and useless.

  Y. Soc. That, again, is quite likely.

  Str. It was of these bonds I said that there would be no
difficulty in creating them, if only both classes originally held
the same opinion about the honourable and good;-indeed, in this single
work, the whole process of royal weaving is comprised-never to allow
temperate natures to be separated from the brave, but to weave them
together, like the warp and the woof, by common sentiments and honours
and reputation, and by the giving of pledges to one another; and out
of them forming one smooth and even web, to entrust to them the
offices of State.

  Y. Soc. How do you mean?

  Str. Where one officer only is needed, you must choose a ruler who
has both these qualities-when many, you must mingle some of each,
for the temperate ruler is very careful and just and safe, but is
wanting in thoroughness and go.

  Y. Soc. Certainly, that is very true.

  Str. The character of the courageous, on the other hand, falls short
of the former in justice and caution, but has the power of action in a
remarkable degree, and where either of these two qualities is wanting,
there cities. cannot altogether prosper either in their public or
private life.

  Y. Soc. Certainly they cannot.

  Str. This then we declare to be the completion of the web of
political Action, which is created by a direct intertexture of the
brave and temperate natures, whenever the royal science has drawn
the two minds into communion with one another by unanimity and
friendship, and having perfected the noblest and best of all the
webs which political life admits, and enfolding therein all other
inhabitants of cities, whether slaves or freemen, binds them in one
fabric and governs and presides over them, and, in so far as to be
happy is vouchsafed to a city, in no particular fails to secure
their happiness.

  Y. Soc. Your picture, Stranger, of the king and statesman, no less
than of the Sophist, is quite perfect.

                            -THE END-


  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: APOLLODORUS, who repeats to his companion
the dialogue which he had heard from Aristodemus, and had already once
narrated to Glaucon; PHAEDRUS; PAUSANIAS; ERYXIMACHUS; ARISTOPHANES;
AGATHON; SOCRATES; ALCIBIADES; A TROOP OF REVELLERS. Scene: The
House of Agathon.

  Concerning the things about which you ask to be informed I believe
that I am not ill-prepared with an answer. For the day before
yesterday I was coming from my own home at Phalerum to the city, and
one of my acquaintance, who had caught a sight of me from behind,
hind, out playfully in the distance, said: Apollodorus, O thou
Phalerian man, halt! So I did as I was bid; and then he said, I was
looking for you, Apollodorus, only just now, that I might ask you
about the speeches in praise of love, which were delivered by
Socrates, Alcibiades, and others, at Agathon's supper. Phoenix, the
son of Philip, told another person who told me of them; his
narrative was very indistinct, but he said that you knew, and I wish
that you would give me an account of them. Who, if not you, should
be the reporter of the words of your friend? And first tell me, he
said, were you present at this meeting?

  Your informant, Glaucon, I said, must have been very indistinct
indeed, if you imagine that the occasion was recent; or that I could
have been of the party.

  Why, yes, he replied, I thought so.

  Impossible: I said. Are you ignorant that for many years Agathon has
not resided at Athens; and not three have elapsed since I became
acquainted with Socrates, and have made it my daily business to know
all that he says and does. There was a time when I was running about
the world, fancying myself to be well employed, but I was really a
most wretched thing, no better than you are now. I thought that I
ought to do anything rather than be a philosopher.

  Well, he said, jesting apart, tell me when the meeting occurred.

  In our boyhood, I replied, when Agathon won the prize with his first
tragedy, on the day after that on which he and his chorus offered
the sacrifice of victory.

  Then it must have been a long while ago, he said; and who told
you-did Socrates?

  No indeed, I replied, but the same person who told Phoenix;-he was a
little fellow, who never wore any shoes Aristodemus, of the deme of
Cydathenaeum. He had been at Agathon's feast; and I think that in
those days there was no one who was a more devoted admirer of
Socrates. Moreover, I have asked Socrates about the truth of some
parts of his narrative, and he confirmed them. Then, said Glaucon, let
us have the tale over again; is not the road to Athens just made for
conversation? And so we walked, and talked of the discourses on
love; and therefore, as I said at first, I am not ill-prepared to
comply with your request, and will have another rehearsal of them if
you like. For to speak or to hear others speak of philosophy always
gives me the greatest pleasure, to say nothing of the profit. But when
I hear another strain, especially that of you rich men and traders,
such conversation displeases me; and I pity you who are my companions,
because you think that you are doing something when in reality you are
doing nothing. And I dare say that you pity me in return, whom you
regard as an unhappy creature, and very probably you are right. But
I certainly know of you what you only think of me-there is the
difference.

  Companion. I see, Apollodorus, that you are just the same-always
speaking evil of yourself, and of others; and I do believe that you
pity all mankind, with the exception of Socrates, yourself first of
all, true in this to your old name, which, however deserved I know how
you acquired, of Apollodorus the madman; for you are always raging
against yourself and everybody but Socrates.

  Apollodorus. Yes, friend, and the reason why I am said to be mad,
and out of my wits, is just because I have these notions of myself and
you; no other evidence is required.

  Com. No more of that, Apollodorus; but let me renew my request
that you would repeat the conversation.

  Apoll. Well, the tale of love was on this wise:-But perhaps I had
better begin at the beginning, and endeavour to give you the exact
words of Aristodemus:

  He said that he met Socrates fresh from the bath and sandalled;
and as the sight of the sandals was unusual, he asked him whither he
was going that he had been converted into such a beau:-

  To a banquet at Agathon's, he replied, whose invitation to his
sacrifice of victory I refused yesterday, fearing a crowd, but
promising that I would come to-day instead; and so I have put on my
finery, because he is such a fine man. What say you to going with me
unasked?

  I will do as you bid me, I replied.

  Follow then, he said, and let us demolish the proverb:

    To the feasts of inferior men the good unbidden go;

instead of which our proverb will run:-

    To the feasts of the good the good unbidden go;

and this alteration may be supported by the authority of Homer
himself, who not only demolishes but literally outrages the proverb.
For, after picturing Agamemnon as the most valiant of men, he makes
Menelaus, who is but a fainthearted warrior, come unbidden to the
banquet of Agamemnon, who is feasting and offering sacrifices, not the
better to the worse, but the worse to the better.

  I rather fear, Socrates, said Aristodemus, lest this may still be my
case; and that, like Menelaus in Homer, I shall be the inferior
person, who

    To the leasts of the wise unbidden goes.

But I shall say that I was bidden of you, and then you will have to
make an excuse.

    Two going together,

he replied, in Homeric fashion, one or other of them may invent an
excuse by the way.

  This was the style of their conversation as they went along.
Socrates dropped behind in a fit of abstraction, and desired
Aristodemus, who was waiting, to go on before him. When he reached the
house of Agathon he found the doors wide open, and a comical thing
happened. A servant coming out met him, and led him at once into the
banqueting-hall in which the guests were reclining, for the banquet
was about to begin. Welcome, Aristodemus, said Agathon, as soon as
he appeared-you are just in time to sup with us; if you come on any
other matter put it off, and make one of us, as I was looking for
you yesterday and meant to have asked you, if I could have found
you. But what have you done with Socrates?

  I turned round, but Socrates was nowhere to be seen; and I had to
explain that he had been with me a moment before, and that I came by
his invitation to the supper.

  You were quite right in coming, said Agathon; but where is he
himself?

  He was behind me just now, as I entered, he said, and I cannot think
what has become of him.

  Go and look for him, boy, said Agathon, and bring him in; and do
you, Aristodemus, meanwhile take the place by Eryximachus.

  The servant then assisted him to wash, and he lay down, and
presently another servant came in and reported that our friend
Socrates had retired into the portico of the neighbouring house.
"There he is fixed," said he, "and when I call to him he will not
stir."

  How strange, said Agathon; then you must call him again, and keep
calling him.

  Let him alone, said my informant; he has a way of stopping
anywhere and losing himself without any reason. I believe that he will
soon appear; do not therefore disturb him.

  Well, if you think so, I will leave him, said Agathon. And then,
turning to the servants, he added, "Let us have supper without waiting
for him. Serve up whatever you please, for there; is no one to give
you orders; hitherto I have never left you to yourselves. But on
this occasion imagine that you art our hosts, and that I and the
company are your guests; treat us well, and then we shall commend
you." After this, supper was served, but still no-Socrates; and during
the meal Agathon several times expressed a wish to send for him, but
Aristodemus objected; and at last when the feast was about half
over-for the fit, as usual, was not of long duration-Socrates entered;
Agathon, who was reclining alone at the end of the table, begged
that he would take the place next to him; that "I may touch you," he
said, "and have the benefit of that wise thought which came into
your mind in the portico, and is now in your possession; for I am
certain that you would not have come away until you had found what you
sought."

  How I wish, said Socrates, taking his place as he was desired,
that wisdom could be infused by touch, out of the fuller the emptier
man, as water runs through wool out of a fuller cup into an emptier
one; if that were so, how greatly should I value the privilege of
reclining at your side! For you would have filled me full with a
stream of wisdom plenteous and fair; whereas my own is of a very
mean and questionable sort, no better than a dream. But yours is
bright and full of promise, and was manifested forth in all the
splendour of youth the day before yesterday, in the presence of more
than thirty thousand Hellenes.

  You are mocking, Socrates, said Agathon, and ere long you and I will
have to determine who bears off the palm of wisdom-of this Dionysus
shall be the judge; but at present you are better occupied with
supper.

  Socrates took his place on the couch, and supped with the rest;
and then libations were offered, and after a hymn had been sung to the
god, and there had been the usual ceremonies, they were about to
commence drinking, when Pausanias said, And now, my friends, how can
we drink with least injury to ourselves? I can assure you that I
feel severely the effect of yesterday's potations, and must have
time to recover; and I suspect that most of you are in the same
predicament, for you were of the party yesterday. Consider then: How
can the drinking be made easiest?

  I entirely agree, said Aristophanes, that we should, by all means,
avoid hard drinking, for I was myself one of those who were
yesterday drowned in drink.

  I think that you are right, said Eryximachus, the son of Acumenus;
but I should still like to hear one other person speak: Is Agathon
able to drink hard?

  I am not equal to it, said Agathon.

  Then, the Eryximachus, the weak heads like myself, Aristodemus,
Phaedrus, and others who never can drink, are fortunate in finding
that the stronger ones are not in a drinking mood. (I do not include
Socrates, who is able either to drink or to abstain, and will not
mind, whichever we do.) Well, as of none of the company seem
disposed to drink much, I may be forgiven for saying, as a
physician, that drinking deep is a bad practice, which I never follow,
if I can help, and certainly do not recommend to another, least of all
to any one who still feels the effects of yesterday's carouse.

  I always do what you advise, and especially what you prescribe as
a physician, rejoined Phaedrus the Myrrhinusian, and the rest of the
company, if they are wise, will do the same.

  It was agreed that drinking was not to be the order of the day,
but that they were all to drink only so much as they pleased.

  Then, said Eryximachus, as you are all agreed that drinking is to be
voluntary, and that there is to be no compulsion, I move, in the
next place, that the flute-girl, who has just made her appearance,
be told to go away and play to herself, or, if she likes, to the women
who are within. To-day let us have conversation instead; and, if you
will allow me, I will tell you what sort of conversation. This
proposal having been accepted, Eryximachus proceeded as follows:-

  I will begin, he said, after the manner of Melanippe in Euripides,

                  Not mine the word

which I am about to speak, but that of Phaedrus. For often he says
to me in an indignant tone: "What a strange thing it is,
Eryximachus, that, whereas other gods have poems and hymns made in
their honour, the great and glorious god, Love, has no encomiast among
all the poets who are so many. There are the worthy sophists too-the
excellent Prodicus for example, who have descanted in prose on the
virtues of Heracles and other heroes; and, what is still more
extraordinary, I have met with a philosophical work in which the
utility of salt has been made the theme of an eloquent discourse;
and many other like things have had a like honour bestowed upon
them. And only to think that there should have been an eager
interest created about them, and yet that to this day no one has
ever dared worthily to hymn Love's praises! So entirely has this great
deity been neglected." Now in this Phaedrus seems to me to be quite
right, and therefore I want to offer him a contribution; also I
think that at the present moment we who are here assembled cannot do
better than honour the. god Love. If you agree with me, there will
be no lack of conversation; for I mean to propose that each of us in
turn, going from left to right, shall make a speech in honour of Love.
Let him give us the best which he can; and Phaedrus, because he is
sitting first on the left hand, and because he is the father of the
thought, shall begin.

  No one will vote against you, Eryximachus, said Socrates. How can
I oppose your motion, who profess to understand nothing but matters of
love; nor, I presume, will Agathon and Pausanias; and there can be
no doubt of Aristophanes, whose whole concern is with Dionysus and
Aphrodite; nor will any one disagree of those whom I, see around me.
The proposal, as I am aware, may seem rather hard upon us whose
place is last; but we shall be contented if we hear some good speeches
first. Let Phaedrus begin the praise of Love, and good luck to him.
All the company expressed their assent, and desired him to do as
Socrates bade him.

  Aristodemus did not recollect all that was said, nor do I
recollect all that he related to me; but I will tell you what I
thought most worthy of remembrance, and what the chief speakers said.

  Phaedrus began by affirming that love is a mighty god, and wonderful
among gods and men, but especially wonderful in his birth. For he is
the eldest of the gods, which is an honour to him; and a proof of
his claim to this honour is, that of his parents there is no memorial;
neither poet nor prose-writer has ever affirmed that he had any. As
Hesiod says:

     First Chaos came, and then broad-bosomed Earth,

     The everlasting seat of all that is,

     And Love.

In other words, after Chaos, the Earth and Love, these two, came
into being. Also Parmenides sings of Generation:

     First in the train of gods, he fashioned Love.

And Acusilaus agrees with Hesiod. Thus numerous are the witnesses
who acknowledge Love to be the eldest of the gods. And not only is
he the eldest, he is also the source of the greatest benefits to us.
For I know not any greater blessing to a young man who is beginning
life than a virtuous lover or to the lover than a beloved youth. For
the principle which ought to be the guide of men who would nobly
live at principle, I say, neither kindred, nor honour, nor wealth, nor
any other motive is able to implant so well as love. Of what am I
speaking? Of the sense of honour and dishonour, without which
neither states nor individuals ever do any good or great work. And I
say that a lover who is detected in doing any dishonourable act, or
submitting through cowardice when any dishonour is done to him by
another, will be more pained at being detected by his beloved than
at being seen by his father, or by his companions, or by any one else.
The beloved too, when he is found in any disgraceful situation, has
the same feeling about his lover. And if there were only some way of
contriving that a state or an army should be made up of lovers and
their loves, they would be the very best governors of their own
city, abstaining from all dishonour, and emulating one another in
honour; and when fighting at each other's side, although a mere
handful, they would overcome the world. For what lover would not
choose rather to be seen by all mankind than by his beloved, either
when abandoning his post or throwing away his arms? He would be
ready to die a thousand deaths rather than endure this. Or who would
desert his beloved or fail him in the hour of danger? The veriest
coward would become an inspired hero, equal to the bravest, at such
a time; Love would inspire him. That courage which, as Homer says, the
god breathes into the souls of some heroes, Love of his own nature
infuses into the lover.

  Love will make men dare to die for their beloved-love alone; and
women as well as men. Of this, Alcestis, the daughter of Pelias, is
a monument to all Hellas; for she was willing to lay down her life
on behalf of her husband, when no one else would, although he had a
father and mother; but the tenderness of her love so far exceeded
theirs, that she made them seem to be strangers in blood to their
own son, and in name only related to him; and so noble did this action
of hers appear to the gods, as well as to men, that among the many who
have done virtuously she is one of the very few to whom, in admiration
of her noble action, they have granted the privilege of returning
alive to earth; such exceeding honour is paid by the gods to the
devotion and virtue of love. But Orpheus, the son of Oeagrus, the
harper, they sent empty away, and presented to him an apparition
only of her whom he sought, but herself they would not give up,
because he showed no spirit; he was only a harp-player, and did
not-dare like Alcestis to die for love, but was contriving how he
might enter hades alive; moreover, they afterwards caused him to
suffer death at the hands of women, as the punishment of his
cowardliness. Very different was the reward of the true love of
Achilles towards his lover Patroclus-his lover and not his love (the
notion that Patroclus was the beloved one is a foolish error into
which Aeschylus has fallen, for Achilles was surely the fairer of
the two, fairer also than all the other heroes; and, as Homer
informs us, he was still beardless, and younger far). And greatly as
the gods honour the virtue of love, still the return of love on the
part of the beloved to the lover is more admired and valued and
rewarded by them, for the lover is more divine; because he is inspired
by God. Now Achilles was quite aware, for he had been told by his
mother, that he might avoid death and return home, and live to a
good old age, if he abstained from slaying Hector. Nevertheless he
gave his life to revenge his friend, and dared to die, not only in his
defence, but after he was dead Wherefore the gods honoured him even
above Alcestis, and sent him to the Islands of the Blest. These are my
reasons for affirming that Love is the eldest and noblest and
mightiest of the gods; and the chiefest author and giver of virtue
in life, and of happiness after death.

  This, or something like this, was the speech of Phaedrus; and some
other speeches followed which Aristodemus did not remember; the next
which he repeated was that of Pausanias. Phaedrus, he said, the
argument has not been set before us, I think, quite in the right
form;-we should not be called upon to praise Love in such an
indiscriminate manner. If there were only one Love, then what you said
would be well enough; but since there are more Loves than
one,-should have begun by determining which of them was to be the
theme of our praises. I will amend this defect; and first of all I
would tell you which Love is deserving of praise, and then try to hymn
the praiseworthy one in a manner worthy of him. For we all know that
Love is inseparable from Aphrodite, and if there were only one
Aphrodite there would be only one Love; but as there are two goddesses
there must be two Loves.

  And am I not right in asserting that there are two goddesses? The
elder one, having no mother, who is called the heavenly
Aphrodite-she is the daughter of Uranus; the younger, who is the
daughter of Zeus and Dione-her we call common; and the Love who is her
fellow-worker is rightly named common, as the other love is called
heavenly. All the gods ought to have praise given to them, but not
without distinction of their natures; and therefore I must try to
distinguish the characters of the two Loves. Now actions vary
according to the manner of their performance. Take, for example,
that which we are now doing, drinking, singing and talking these
actions are not in themselves either good or evil, but they turn out
in this or that way according to the mode of performing them; and when
well done they are good, and when wrongly done they are evil; and in
like manner not every love, but only that which has a noble purpose,
is noble and worthy of praise. The Love who is the offspring of the
common Aphrodite is essentially common, and has no discrimination,
being such as the meaner sort of men feel, and is apt to be of women
as well as of youths, and is of the body rather than of the soul-the
most foolish beings are the objects of this love which desires only to
gain an end, but never thinks of accomplishing the end nobly, and
therefore does good and evil quite indiscriminately. The goddess who
is his mother is far younger than the other, and she was born of the
union of the male and female, and partakes of both.

  But the offspring of the heavenly Aphrodite is derived from a mother
in whose birth the female has no part,-she is from the male only; this
is that love which is of youths, and the goddess being older, there is
nothing of wantonness in her. Those who are inspired by this love turn
to the male, and delight in him who is the more valiant and
intelligent nature; any one may recognise the pure enthusiasts in
the very character of their attachments. For they love not boys, but
intelligent, beings whose reason is beginning to be developed, much
about the time at which their beards begin to grow. And in choosing
young men to be their companions, they mean to be faithful to them,
and pass their whole life in company with them, not to take them in
their inexperience, and deceive them, and play the fool with them,
or run away from one to another of them. But the love of young boys
should be forbidden by law, because their future is uncertain; they
may turn out good or bad, either in body or soul, and much noble
enthusiasm may be thrown away upon them; in this matter the good are a
law to themselves, and the coarser sort of lovers ought to be
restrained by force; as we restrain or attempt to restrain them from
fixing their affections on women of free birth. These are the
persons who bring a reproach on love; and some have been led to deny
the lawfulness of such attachments because they see the impropriety
and evil of them; for surely nothing that is decorously and lawfully
done can justly be censured.

  Now here and in Lacedaemon the rules about love are perplexing,
but in most cities they are simple and easily intelligible; in Elis
and Boeotia, and in countries having no gifts of eloquence, they are
very straightforward; the law is simply in favour of these connexions,
and no one, whether young or old, has anything to say to their
discredit; the reason being, as I suppose, that they are men of few
words in those parts, and therefore the lovers do not like the trouble
of pleading their suit. In Ionia and other places, and generally in
countries which are subject to the barbarians, the custom is held to
be dishonourable; loves of youths share the evil repute in which
philosophy and gymnastics are held because they are inimical to
tyranny; for the interests of rulers require that their subjects
should be poor in spirit and that there should be no strong bond of
friendship or society among them, which love, above all other motives,
is likely to inspire, as our Athenian tyrants-learned by experience;
for the love of Aristogeiton and the constancy of Harmodius had
strength which undid their power. And, therefore, the ill-repute
into which these attachments have fallen is to be ascribed to the evil
condition of those who make them to be ill-reputed; that is to say, to
the self-seeking of the governors and the cowardice of the governed;
on the other hand, the indiscriminate honour which is given to them in
some countries is attributable to the laziness of those who hold
this opinion of them. In our own country a far better principle
prevails, but, as I was saying, the explanation of it is rather
perplexing. For, observe that open loves are held to be more
honourable than secret ones, and that the love of the noblest and
highest, even if their persons are less beautiful than others, is
especially honourable.

  Consider, too, how great is the encouragement which all the world
gives to the lover; neither is he supposed to be doing anything
dishonourable; but if he succeeds he is praised, and if he fail he
is blamed. And in the pursuit of his love the custom of mankind allows
him to do many strange things, which philosophy would bitterly censure
if they were done from any motive of interest, or wish for office or
power. He may pray, and entreat, and supplicate, and swear, and lie on
a mat at the door, and endure a slavery worse than that of any
slave-in any other case friends and enemies would be equally ready
to prevent him, but now there is no friend who will be ashamed of
him and admonish him, and no enemy will charge him with meanness or
flattery; the actions of a lover have a grace which ennobles them; and
custom has decided that they are highly commendable and that there
no loss of character in them; and, what is strangest of all, he only
may swear and forswear himself (so men say), and the gods will forgive
his transgression, for there is no such thing as a lover's oath.
Such is the entire liberty which gods and men have allowed the
lover, according to the custom which prevails in our part of the
world. From this point of view a man fairly argues in Athens to love
and to be loved is held to be a very honourable thing. But when
parents forbid their sons to talk with their lovers, and place them
under a tutor's care, who is appointed to see to these things, and
their companions and equals cast in their teeth anything of the sort
which they may observe, and their elders refuse to silence the
reprovers and do not rebuke them-any one who reflects on all this
will, on the contrary, think that we hold these practices to be most
disgraceful. But, as I was saying at first, the truth as I imagine is,
that whether such practices are honourable or whether they are
dishonourable is not a simple question; they are honourable to him who
follows them honourably, dishonourable to him who follows them
dishonourably. There is dishonour in yielding to the evil, or in an
evil manner; but there is honour in yielding to the good, or in an
honourable manner.

  Evil is the vulgar lover who loves the body rather than the soul,
inasmuch as he is not even stable, because he loves a thing which is
in itself unstable, and therefore when the bloom of youth which he was
desiring is over, he takes wing and flies away, in spite of all his
words and promises; whereas the love of the noble disposition is
life-long, for it becomes one with the everlasting. The custom of
our country would have both of them proven well and truly, and would
have us yield to the one sort of lover and avoid the other, and
therefore encourages some to pursue, and others to fly; testing both
the lover and beloved in contests and trials, until they show to which
of the two classes they respectively belong. And this is the reason
why, in the first place, a hasty attachment is held to be
dishonourable, because time is the true test of this as of most
other things; and secondly there is a dishonour in being overcome by
the love of money, or of wealth, or of political power, whether a
man is frightened into surrender by the loss of them, or, having
experienced the benefits of money and political corruption, is
unable to rise above the seductions of them. For none of these
things are of a permanent or lasting nature; not to mention that no
generous friendship ever sprang from them. There remains, then, only
one way of honourable attachment which custom allows in the beloved,
and this is the way of virtue; for as we admitted that any service
which the lover does to him is not to be accounted flattery or a
dishonour to himself, so the beloved has one way only of voluntary
service which is not dishonourable, and this is virtuous service.

  For we have a custom, and according to our custom any one who does
service to another under the idea that he will be improved by him
either in wisdom, or, in some other particular of virtue-such a
voluntary service, I say, is not to be regarded as a dishonour, and is
not open to the charge of flattery. And these two customs, one the
love of youth, and the other the practice of philosophy and virtue
in general, ought to meet in one, and then the beloved may
honourably indulge the lover. For when the lover and beloved come
together, having each of them a law, and the lover thinks that he is
right in doing any service which he can to his gracious loving one;
and the other that he is right in showing any kindness which he can to
him who is making him wise and good; the one capable of
communicating wisdom and virtue, the other seeking to acquire them
with a view to education and wisdom, when the two laws of love are
fulfilled and meet in one-then, and then only, may the beloved yield
with honour to the lover. Nor when love is of this disinterested
sort is there any disgrace in being deceived, but in every other
case there is equal disgrace in being or not being deceived. For he
who is gracious to his lover under the impression that he is rich, and
is disappointed of his gains because he turns out to be poor, is
disgraced all the same: for he has done his best to show that he would
give himself up to any one's "uses base" for the sake of money; but
this is not honourable. And on the same principle he who gives himself
to a lover because he is a good man, and in the hope that he will be
improved by his company, shows himself to be virtuous, even though the
object of his affection turn out to be a villain, and to have no
virtue; and if he is deceived he has committed a noble error. For he
has proved that for his part he will do anything for anybody with a
view to virtue and improvement, than which there can be nothing
nobler. Thus noble in every case is the acceptance of another for
the sake of virtue. This is that love which is the love of the
heavenly godess, and is heavenly, and of great price to individuals
and cities, making the lover and the beloved alike eager in the work
of their own improvement. But all other loves are the offspring of the
other, who is the common goddess. To you, Phaedrus, I offer this my
contribution in praise of love, which is as good as I could make
extempore.

  Pausanias came to a pause-this is the balanced way in which I have
been taught by the wise to speak; and Aristodemus said that the turn
of Aristophanes was next, but either he had eaten too much, or from
some other cause he had the hiccough, and was obliged to change
turns with Eryximachus the physician, who was reclining on the couch
below him. Eryximachus, he said, you ought either to stop my hiccough,
or to speak in my turn until I have left off.

  I will do both, said Eryximachus: I will speak in your turn, and
do you speak in mine; and while I am speaking let me recommend you
to hold your breath, and if after you have done so for some time the
hiccough is no better, then gargle with a little water; and if it
still continues, tickle your nose with something and sneeze; and if
you sneeze once or twice, even the most violent hiccough is sure to
go. I will do as you prescribe, said Aristophanes, and now get on.

  Eryximachus spoke as follows: Seeing that Pausanias made a fair
beginning, and but a lame ending, I must endeavour to supply his
deficiency. I think that he has rightly distinguished two kinds of
love. But my art further informs me that the double love is not merely
an affection of the soul of man towards the fair, or towards anything,
but is to be found in the bodies of all animals and in productions
of the earth, and I may say in all that is; such is the conclusion
which I seem to have gathered from my own art of medicine, whence I
learn how great and wonderful and universal is the deity of love,
whose empire extends over all things, divine as well as human. And
from medicine I would begin that I may do honour to my art. There
are in the human body these two kinds of love, which are confessedly
different and unlike, and being unlike, they have loves and desires
which are unlike; and the desire of the healthy is one, and the desire
of the diseased is another; and as Pausanias was just now saying
that to indulge good men is honourable, and bad men
dishonourable:-so too in the body the good and healthy elements are to
be indulged, and the bad elements and the elements of disease are
not to be indulged, but discouraged. And this is what the physician
has to do, and in this the art of medicine consists: for medicine
may be regarded generally as the knowledge of the loves and desires of
the body, and how to satisfy them or not; and the best physician is he
who is able to separate fair love from foul, or to convert one into
the other; and he who knows how to eradicate and how to implant
love, whichever is required, and can reconcile the most hostile
elements in the constitution and make them loving friends, is
skilful practitioner. Now the: most hostile are the most opposite,
such as hot and cold, bitter and sweet, moist and dry, and the like.
And my ancestor, Asclepius, knowing how-to implant friendship and
accord in these elements, was the creator of our art, as our friends
the poets here tell us, and I believe them; and not only medicine in
every branch but the arts of gymnastic and husbandry are under his
dominion.

  Any one who pays the least attention to the subject will also
perceive that in music there is the same reconciliation of
opposites; and I suppose that this must have been the meaning, of
Heracleitus, although, his words are not accurate, for he says that is
united by disunion, like the harmony-of bow and the lyre. Now there is
an absurdity saying that harmony is discord or is composed of elements
which are still in a state of discord. But what he probably meant was,
that, harmony is composed of differing notes of higher or lower
pitch which disagreed once, but are now reconciled by the art of
music; for if the higher and lower notes still disagreed, there
could be there could be no harmony-clearly not. For harmony is a
symphony, and symphony is an agreement; but an agreement of
disagreements while they disagree there cannot be; you cannot
harmonize that which disagrees. In like manner rhythm is compounded of
elements short and long, once differing and now-in accord; which
accordance, as in the former instance, medicine, so in all these other
cases, music implants, making love and unison to grow up among them;
and thus music, too, is concerned with the principles of love in their
application to harmony and rhythm. Again, in the essential nature of
harmony and rhythm there is no difficulty in discerning love which has
not yet become double. But when you want to use them in actual life,
either in the composition of songs or in the correct performance of
airs or metres composed already, which latter is called education,
then the difficulty begins, and the good artist is needed. Then the
old tale has to be repeated of fair and heavenly love -the love of
Urania the fair and heavenly muse, and of the duty of accepting the
temperate, and those who are as yet intemperate only that they may
become temperate, and of preserving their love; and again, of the
vulgar Polyhymnia, who must be used with circumspection that the
pleasure be enjoyed, but may not generate licentiousness; just as in
my own art it is a great matter so to regulate the desires of the
epicure that he may gratify his tastes without the attendant evil of
disease. Whence I infer that in music, in medicine, in all other
things human as which as divine, both loves ought to be noted as far
as may be, for they are both present.

  The course of the seasons is also full of both these principles; and
when, as I was saying, the elements of hot and cold, moist and dry,
attain the harmonious love of one another and blend in temperance
and harmony, they bring to men, animals, and plants health and plenty,
and do them no harm; whereas the wanton love, getting the upper hand
and affecting the seasons of the year, is very destructive and
injurious, being the source of pestilence, and bringing many other
kinds of diseases on animals and plants; for hoar-frost and hail and
blight spring from the excesses and disorders of these elements of
love, which to know in relation to the revolutions of the heavenly
bodies and the seasons of the year is termed astronomy. Furthermore
all sacrifices and the whole province of divination, which is the
art of communion between gods and men-these, I say, are concerned with
the preservation of the good and the cure of the evil love. For all
manner of impiety is likely to ensue if, instead of accepting and
honouring and reverencing the harmonious love in all his actions, a
man honours the other love, whether in his feelings towards gods or
parents, towards the living or the dead. Wherefore the business of
divination is to see to these loves and to heal them, and divination
is the peacemaker of gods and men, working by a knowledge of the
religious or irreligious tendencies which exist in human loves. Such
is the great and mighty, or rather omnipotent force of love in
general. And the love, more especially, which is concerned with the
good, and which is perfected in company with temperance and justice,
whether among gods or men, has the greatest power, and is the source
of all our happiness and harmony, and makes us friends with the gods
who are above us, and with one another. I dare say that I too have
omitted several things which might be said in praise of Love, but this
was not intentional, and you, Aristophanes, may now supply the
omission or take some other line of commendation; for I perceive
that you are rid of the hiccough.

  Yes, said Aristophanes, who followed, the hiccough is gone; not,
however, until I applied the sneezing; and I wonder whether the
harmony of the body has a love of such noises and ticklings, for I
no sooner applied the sneezing than I was cured.

  Eryximachus said: Beware, friend Aristophanes, although you are
going to speak, you are making fun of me; and I shall have to watch
and see whether I cannot have a laugh at your expense, when you
might speak in peace.

  You are right, said Aristophanes, laughing. I will unsay my words;
but do you please not to watch me, as I fear that in the speech
which I am about to make, instead of others laughing with me, which is
to the manner born of our muse and would be all the better, I shall
only be laughed at by them.

  Do you expect to shoot your bolt and escape, Aristophanes? Well,
perhaps if you are very careful and bear in mind that you will be
called to account, I may be induced to let you off.

  Aristophanes professed to open another vein of discourse; he had a
mind to praise Love in another way, unlike that either of Pausanias or
Eryximachus. Mankind; he said, judging by their neglect of him, have
never, as I think, at all understood the power of Love. For if they
had understood him they would surely have built noble temples and
altars, and offered solemn sacrifices in his honour; but this is not
done, and most certainly ought to be done: since of all the gods he is
the best friend of men, the helper and the healer of the ills which
are the great impediment to the happiness of the race. I will try to
describe his power to you, and you shall teach the rest of the world
what I am teaching you. In the first place, let me treat of the nature
of man and what has happened to it; for the original human nature
was not like the present, but different. The sexes were not two as
they are now, but originally three in number; there was man, woman,
and the union of the two, having a name corresponding to this double
nature, which had once a real existence, but is now lost, and the word
"Androgynous" is only preserved as a term of reproach. In the second
place, the primeval man was round, his back and sides forming a
circle; and he had four hands and four feet, one head with two
faces, looking opposite ways, set on a round neck and precisely alike;
also four ears, two privy members, and the remainder to correspond. He
could walk upright as men now do, backwards or forwards as he pleased,
and he could also roll over and over at a great pace, turning on his
four hands and four feet, eight in all, like tumblers going over and
over with their legs in the air; this was when he wanted to run
fast. Now the sexes were three, and such as I have described them;
because the sun, moon, and earth are three;-and the man was originally
the child of the sun, the woman of the earth, and the man-woman of the
moon, which is made up of sun and earth, and they were all round and
moved round and round: like their parents. Terrible was their might
and strength, and the thoughts of their hearts were great, and they
made an attack upon the gods; of them is told the tale of Otys and
Ephialtes who, as Homer says, dared to scale heaven, and would have
laid hands upon the gods. Doubt reigned in the celestial councils.
Should they kill them and annihilate the race with thunderbolts, as
they had done the giants, then there would be an end of the sacrifices
and worship which men offered to them; but, on the other hand, the
gods could not suffer their insolence to be unrestrained.

  At last, after a good deal of reflection, Zeus discovered a way.
He said: "Methinks I have a plan which will humble their pride and
improve their manners; men shall continue to exist, but I will cut
them in two and then they will be diminished in strength and increased
in numbers; this will have the advantage of making them more
profitable to us. They shall walk upright on two legs, and if they
continue insolent and will not be quiet, I will split them again and
they shall hop about on a single leg." He spoke and cut men in two,
like a sorb-apple which is halved for pickling, or as you might divide
an egg with a hair; and as he cut them one after another, he bade
Apollo give the face and the half of the neck a turn in order that the
man might contemplate the section of himself: he would thus learn a
lesson of humility. Apollo was also bidden to heal their wounds and
compose their forms. So he gave a turn to the face and pulled the skin
from the sides all over that which in our language is called the
belly, like the purses which draw in, and he made one mouth at the
centre, which he fastened in a knot (the same which is called the
navel); he also moulded the breast and took out most of the
wrinkles, much as a shoemaker might smooth leather upon a last; he
left a few, however, in the region of the belly and navel, as a
memorial of the primeval state. After the division the two parts of
man, each desiring his other half, came together, and throwing their
arms about one another, entwined in mutual embraces, longing to grow
into one, they were on the point of dying from hunger and
self-neglect, because they did not like to do anything apart; and when
one of the halves died and the other survived, the survivor sought
another mate, man or woman as we call them, being the sections of
entire men or women, and clung to that. They were being destroyed,
when Zeus in pity of them invented a new plan: he turned the parts
of generation round to the front, for this had not been always their
position and they sowed the seed no longer as hitherto like
grasshoppers in the ground, but in one another; and after the
transposition the male generated in the female in order that by the
mutual embraces of man and woman they might breed, and the race
might continue; or if man came to man they might be satisfied, and
rest, and go their ways to the business of life: so ancient is the
desire of one another which is implanted in us, reuniting our original
nature, making one of two, and healing the state of man.

  Each of us when separated, having one side only, like a flat fish,
is but the indenture of a man, and he is always looking for his
other half. Men who are a section of that double nature which was once
called Androgynous are lovers of women; adulterers are generally of
this breed, and also adulterous women who lust after men: the women
who are a section of the woman do not care for men, but have female
attachments; the female companions are of this sort. But they who
are a section of the male follow the male, and while they are young,
being slices of the original man, they hang about men and embrace
them, and they are themselves the best of boys and youths, because
they have the most manly nature. Some indeed assert that they are
shameless, but this is not true; for they do not act thus from any
want of shame, but because they are valiant and manly, and have a
manly countenance, and they embrace that which is like them. And these
when they grow up become our statesmen, and these only, which is a
great proof of the truth of what I am saving. When they reach
manhood they are loves of youth, and are not naturally inclined to
marry or beget children,-if at all, they do so only in obedience to
the law; but they are satisfied if they may be allowed to live with
one another unwedded; and such a nature is prone to love and ready
to return love, always embracing that which is akin to him. And when
one of them meets with his other half, the actual half of himself,
whether he be a lover of youth or a lover of another sort, the pair
are lost in an amazement of love and friendship and intimacy, and
would not be out of the other's sight, as I may say, even for a
moment: these are the people who pass their whole lives together;
yet they could not explain what they desire of one another. For the
intense yearning which each of them has towards the other does not
appear to be the desire of lover's intercourse, but of something
else which the soul of either evidently desires and cannot tell, and
of which she has only a dark and doubtful presentiment. Suppose
Hephaestus, with his instruments, to come to the pair who are lying
side, by side and to say to them, "What do you people want of one
another?" they would be unable to explain. And suppose further, that
when he saw their perplexity he said: "Do you desire to be wholly one;
always day and night to be in one another's company? for if this is
what you desire, I am ready to melt you into one and let you grow
together, so that being two you shall become one, and while you live a
common life as if you were a single man, and after your death in the
world below still be one departed soul instead of two-I ask whether
this is what you lovingly desire, and whether you are satisfied to
attain this?"-there is not a man of them who when he heard the
proposal would deny or would not acknowledge that this meeting and
melting into one another, this becoming one instead of two, was the
very expression of his ancient need. And the reason is that human
nature was originally one and we were a whole, and the desire and
pursuit of the whole is called love. There was a time, I say, when
we were one, but now because of the wickedness of mankind God has
dispersed us, as the Arcadians were dispersed into villages by the
Lacedaemonians. And if we are not obedient to the gods, there is a
danger that we shall be split up again and go about in
basso-relievo, like the profile figures having only half a nose
which are sculptured on monuments, and that we shall be like tallies.

  Wherefore let us exhort all men to piety, that we may avoid evil,
and obtain the good, of which Love is to us the lord and minister; and
let no one oppose him-he is the enemy of the gods who oppose him.
For if we are friends of the God and at peace with him we shall find
our own true loves, which rarely happens in this world at present. I
am serious, and therefore I must beg Eryximachus not to make fun or to
find any allusion in what I am saying to Pausanias and Agathon, who,
as I suspect, are both of the manly nature, and belong to the class
which I have been describing. But my words have a wider
application-they include men and women everywhere; and I believe
that if our loves were perfectly accomplished, and each one
returning to his primeval nature had his original true love, then
our race would be happy. And if this would be best of all, the best in
the next degree and under present circumstances must be the nearest
approach to such an union; and that will be the attainment of a
congenial love. Wherefore, if we would praise him who has given to
us the benefit, we must praise the god Love, who is our greatest
benefactor, both leading us in this life back to our own nature, and
giving us high hopes for the future, for he promises that if we are
pious, he will restore us to our original state, and heal us and
make us happy and blessed. This, Eryximachus, is my discourse of love,
which, although different to yours, I must beg you to leave unassailed
by the shafts of your ridicule, in order that each may have his
turn; each, or rather either, for Agathon and Socrates are the only
ones left.

  Indeed, I am not going to attack you, said Eryximachus, for I
thought your speech charming, and did I not know that Agathon and
Socrates are masters in the art of love, I should be really afraid
that they would have nothing to say, after the world of things which
have been said already. But, for all that, I am not without hopes.

  Socrates said: You played your part well, Eryximachus; but if you
were as I am now, or rather as I shall be when Agathon has spoken, you
would, indeed, be in a great strait.

  You want to cast a spell over me, Socrates, said Agathon, in the
hope that I may be disconcerted at the expectation raised among the
audience that I shall speak well.

  I should be strangely forgetful, Agathon replied Socrates, of the
courage and magnanimity which you showed when your own compositions
were about to be exhibited, and you came upon the stage with the
actors and faced the vast theatre altogether undismayed, if I
thought that your nerves could be fluttered at a small party of
friends.

  Do you think, Socrates, said Agathon, that my head is so full of the
theatre as not to know how much more formidable to a man of sense a
few good judges are than many fools?

  Nay, replied Socrates, I should be very wrong in attributing to you,
Agathon, that or any other want of refinement. And I am quite aware
that if you happened to meet with any whom you thought wise, you would
care for their opinion much more than for that of the many. But then
we, having been a part of the foolish many in the theatre, cannot be
regarded as the select wise; though I know that if you chanced to be
in the presence, not of one of ourselves, but of some really wise man,
you would be ashamed of disgracing yourself before him-would you not?

  Yes, said Agathon.

  But before the many you would not be ashamed, if you thought that
you were doing something disgraceful in their presence?

  Here Phaedrus interrupted them, saying: not answer him, my dear
Agathon; for if he can only get a partner with whom he can talk,
especially a good-looking one, he will no longer care about the
completion of our plan. Now I love to hear him talk; but just at
present I must not forget the encomium on Love which I ought to
receive from him and from every one. When you and he have paid your
tribute to the god, then you may talk.

  Very good, Phaedrus, said Agathon; I see no reason why I should
not proceed with my speech, as I shall have many other opportunities
of conversing with Socrates. Let me say first how I ought to speak,
and then speak:-

  The previous speakers, instead of praising the god Love, or
unfolding his nature, appear to have congratulated mankind on the
benefits which he confers upon them. But I would rather praise the god
first, and then speak of his gifts; this is always the right way of
praising everything. May I say without impiety or offence, that of all
the blessed gods he is the most blessed because he is the fairest
and best? And he is the fairest: for, in the first place, he is the
youngest, and of his youth he is himself the witness, fleeing out of
the way of age, who is swift enough, swifter truly than most of us
like:-Love hates him and will not come near him; but youth and love
live and move together-like to like, as the proverb says. Many
things were said by Phaedrus about Love in which I agree with him; but
I cannot agree that he is older than Iapetus and Kronos:-not so; I
maintain him to be the youngest of the gods, and youthful ever. The
ancient doings among the gods of which Hesiod and Parmenides spoke, if
the tradition of them be true, were done of Necessity and not Love;
had Love been in those days, there would have been no chaining or
mutilation of the gods, or other violence, but peace and sweetness, as
there is now in heaven, since the rule of Love began.

  Love is young and also tender; he ought to have a poet like Homer to
describe his tenderness, as Homer says of Ate, that she is a goddess
and tender:

     Her feet are tender, for she sets her steps,

     Not on the ground but on the heads of men:

herein is an excellent proof of her tenderness that,-she walks not
upon the hard but upon the soft. Let us adduce a similar proof of
the tenderness of Love; for he walks not upon the earth, nor yet
upon skulls of men, which are not so very soft, but in the hearts
and souls of both god, and men, which are of all things the softest:
in them he walks and dwells and makes his home. Not in every soul
without exception, for Where there is hardness he departs, where there
is softness there he dwells; and nestling always with his feet and
in all manner of ways in the softest of soft places, how can he be
other than the softest of all things? Of a truth he is the tenderest
as well as the youngest, and also he is of flexile form; for if he
were hard and without flexure he could not enfold all things, or
wind his way into and out of every soul of man undiscovered. And a
proof of his flexibility and symmetry of form is his grace, which is
universally admitted to be in an especial manner the attribute of
Love; ungrace and love are always at war with one another. The
fairness of his complexion is revealed by his habitation among the
flowers; for he dwells not amid bloomless or fading beauties,
whether of body or soul or aught else, but in the place of flowers and
scents, there he sits and abides. Concerning the beauty of the god I
have said enough; and yet there remains much more which I might say.
Of his virtue I have now to speak: his greatest glory is that he can
neither do nor suffer wrong to or from any god or any man; for he
suffers not by force if he suffers; force comes not near him,
neither when he acts does he act by force. For all men in all things
serve him of their own free will, and where there is voluntary
agreement, there, as the laws which are the lords of the city say,
is justice. And not only is he just but exceedingly temperate, for
Temperance is the acknowledged ruler of the pleasures and desires, and
no pleasure ever masters Love; he is their master and they are his
servants; and if he conquers them he must be temperate indeed. As to
courage, even the God of War is no match for him; he is the captive
and Love is the lord, for love, the love of Aphrodite, masters him, as
the tale runs; and the master is stronger than the servant. And if
he conquers the bravest of all others, he must be himself the bravest.

  Of his courage and justice and temperance I have spoken, but I
have yet to speak of his wisdom-and according to the measure of my
ability I must try to do my best. In the first place he is a poet (and
here, like Eryximachus, I magnify my art), and he is also the source
of poesy in others, which he could not be if he were not himself a
poet. And at the touch of him every one becomes a poet, even though he
had no music in him before; this also is a proof that Love is a good
poet and accomplished in all the fine arts; for no one can give to
another that which he has not himself, or teach that of which he has
no knowledge. Who will deny that the creation of the animals is his
doing? Are they not all the works his wisdom, born and begotten of
him? And as to the artists, do we not know that he only of them whom
love inspires has the light of fame?-he whom Love touches riot walks
in darkness. The arts of medicine and archery and divination were
discovered by Apollo, under the guidance of love and desire; so that
he too is a disciple of Love. Also the melody of the Muses, the
metallurgy of Hephaestus, the weaving of Athene, the empire of Zeus
over gods and men, are all due to Love, who was the inventor of
them. And so Love set in order the empire of the gods-the love of
beauty, as is evident, for with deformity Love has no concern. In
the days of old, as I began by saying, dreadful deeds were done
among the gods, for they were ruled by Necessity; but now since the
birth of Love, and from the Love of the beautiful, has sprung every
good in heaven and earth. Therefore, Phaedrus, I say of Love that he
is the fairest and best in himself, and the cause of what is fairest
and best in all other things. And there comes into my mind a line of
poetry in which he is said to be the god who

     Gives peace on earth and calms the stormy deep,

     Who stills the winds and bids the sufferer sleep.

This is he who empties men of disaffection and fills them with
affection, who makes them to meet together at banquets such as
these: in sacrifices, feasts, dances, he is our lord-who sends
courtesy and sends away discourtesy, who gives kindness ever and never
gives unkindness; the friend of the good, the wonder of the wise,
the amazement of the gods; desired by those who have no part in him,
and precious to those who have the better part in him; parent of
delicacy, luxury, desire, fondness, softness, grace; regardful of
the good, regardless of the evil: in every word, work, wish,
fear-saviour, pilot, comrade, helper; glory of gods and men, leader
best and brightest: in whose footsteps let every man follow, sweetly
singing in his honour and joining in that sweet strain with which love
charms the souls of gods and men. Such is the speech, Phaedrus,
half-playful, yet having a certain measure of seriousness, which,
according to my ability, I dedicate to the god.

  When Agathon had done speaking, Aristodemus said that there was a
general cheer; the young man was thought to have spoken in a manner
worthy of himself, and of the god. And Socrates, looking at
Eryximachus, said: Tell me, son of Acumenus, was there not reason in
my fears? and was I not a true prophet when I said that Agathon
would make a wonderful oration, and that I should be in a strait?

  The part of the prophecy which concerns Agathon, replied
Eryximachus, appears to me to be true; but, not the other part-that
you will be in a strait.

  Why, my dear friend, said Socrates, must not I or any one be in a
strait who has to speak after he has heard such a rich and varied
discourse? I am especially struck with the beauty of the concluding
words-who could listen to them without amazement? When I reflected
on the immeasurable inferiority of my own powers, I was ready to run
away for shame, if there had been a possibility of escape. For I was
reminded of Gorgias, and at the end of his speech I fancied that
Agathon was shaking at me the Gorginian or Gorgonian head of the great
master of rhetoric, which was simply to turn me and my speech, into
stone, as Homer says, and strike me dumb. And then I perceived how
foolish I had been in consenting to take my turn with you in
praising love, and saying that I too was a master of the art, when I
really had no conception how anything ought to be praised. For in my
simplicity I imagined that the topics of praise should be true, and
that this being presupposed, out of the true the speaker was to choose
the best and set them forth in the best manner. And I felt quite
proud, thinking that I knew the nature of true praise, and should
speak well. Whereas I now see that the intention was to attribute to
Love every species of greatness and glory, whether really belonging to
him not, without regard to truth or falsehood-that was no matter;
for the original, proposal seems to have been not that each of you
should really praise Love, but only that you should appear to praise
him. And so you attribute to Love every imaginable form of praise
which can be gathered anywhere; and you say that "he is all this," and
"the cause of all that," making him appear the fairest and best of all
to those who know him not, for you cannot impose upon those who know
him. And a noble and solemn hymn of praise have you rehearsed. But
as I misunderstood the nature of the praise when I said that I would
take my turn, I must beg to be absolved from the promise which I
made in ignorance, and which (as Euripides would say) was a promise of
the lips and not of the mind. Farewell then to such a strain: for I do
not praise in that way; no, indeed, I cannot. But if you like to
here the truth about love, I am ready to speak in my own manner,
though I will not make myself ridiculous by entering into any
rivalry with you. Say then, Phaedrus, whether you would like, to
have the truth about love, spoken in any words and in any order
which may happen to come into my mind at the time. Will that be
agreeable to you?

  Aristodemus said that Phaedrus and the company bid him speak in
any manner which he thought best. Then, he added, let me have your
permission first to ask Agathon a few more questions, in order that
I may take his admissions as the premisses of my discourse.

  I grant the permission, said Phaedrus: put your questions.
Socrates then proceeded as follows:-

  In the magnificent oration which you have just uttered, I think that
you were right, my dear Agathon, in proposing to speak of the nature
of Love first and afterwards of his works-that is a way of beginning
which I very much approve. And as you have spoken so eloquently of his
nature, may I ask you further, Whether love is the love of something
or of nothing? And here I must explain myself: I do not want you to
say that love is the love of a father or the love of a mother-that
would be ridiculous; but to answer as you would, if I asked is a
father a father of something? to which you would find no difficulty in
replying, of a son or daughter: and the answer would be right.

  Very true, said Agathon.

  And you would say the same of a mother?

  He assented.

  Yet let me ask you one more question in order to illustrate my
meaning: Is not a brother to be regarded essentially as a brother of
something?

  Certainly, he replied.

  That is, of a brother or sister?

  Yes, he said.

  And now, said Socrates, I will ask about Love:-Is Love of
something or of nothing?

  Of something, surely, he replied.

  Keep in mind what this is, and tell me what I want to know-whether
Love desires that of which love is.

  Yes, surely.

  And does he possess, or does he not possess, that which he loves and
desires?

  Probably not, I should say.

  Nay, replied Socrates, I would have you consider whether
"necessarily" is not rather the word. The inference that he who
desires something is in want of something, and that he who desires
nothing is in want of nothing, is in my judgment, Agathon absolutely
and necessarily true. What do you think?

  I agree with you, said Agathon.

  Very good. Would he who is great, desire to be great, or he who is
strong, desire to be strong?

  That would be inconsistent with our previous admissions.

  True. For he who is anything cannot want to be that which he is?

  Very true.

  And yet, added Socrates, if a man being strong desired to be strong,
or being swift desired to be swift, or being healthy desired to be
healthy, in that case he might be thought to desire something which he
already has or is. I give the example in order that we may avoid
misconception. For the possessors of these qualities, Agathon, must be
supposed to have their respective advantages at the time, whether they
choose or not; and who can desire that which he has? Therefore when
a person says, I am well and wish to be well, or I am rich and wish to
be rich, and I desire simply to have what I have-to him we shall
reply: "You, my friend, having wealth and health and strength, want to
have the continuance of them; for at this moment, whether you choose
or no, you have them. And when you say, I desire that which I have and
nothing else, is not your meaning that you want to have what you now
have in the future? "He must agree with us-must he not?

  He must, replied Agathon.

  Then, said Socrates, he desires that what he has at present may be
preserved to him in the future, which is equivalent to saying that
he desires something which is non-existent to him, and which as yet he
has not got.

  Very true, he said.

  Then he and every one who desires, desires that which he has not
already, and which is future and not present, and which he has not,
and is not, and of which he is in want;-these are the sort of things
which love and desire seek?

  Very true, he said.

  Then now, said Socrates, let us recapitulate the argument. First, is
not love of something, and of something too which is wanting to a man?

  Yes, he replied.

  Remember further what you said in your speech, or if you do not
remember I will remind you: you said that the love of the beautiful
set in order the empire of the gods, for that of deformed things there
is no love-did you not say something of that kind?

  Yes, said Agathon.

  Yes, my friend, and the remark was a just one. And if this is
true, Love is the love of beauty and not of deformity?

  He assented.

  And the admission has been already made that Love is of something
which a man wants and has not?

  True, he said.

  Then Love wants and has not beauty?

  Certainly, he replied.

  And would you call that beautiful which wants and does not possess
beauty?

  Certainly not.

  Then would you still say that love is beautiful?

  Agathon replied: I fear that I did not understand what I was saying.

  You made a very good speech, Agathon, replied Socrates; but there is
yet one small question which I would fain ask:-Is not the good also
the beautiful?

  Yes.

  Then in wanting the beautiful, love wants also the good?

  I cannot refute you, Socrates, said Agathon:-Let us assume that what
you say is true.

  Say rather, beloved Agathon, that you cannot refute the truth; for
Socrates is easily refuted.

  And now, taking my leave of you, I would rehearse a tale of love
which I heard from Diotima of Mantineia, a woman wise in this and in
many other kinds of knowledge, who in the days of old, when the
Athenians offered sacrifice before the coming of the plague, delayed
the disease ten years. She was my instructress in the art of love, and
I shall repeat to you what she said to me, beginning with the
admissions made by Agathon, which are nearly if not quite the same
which I made to the wise woman when she questioned me-I think that
this will be the easiest way, and I shall take both parts myself as
well as I can. As you, Agathon, suggested, I must speak first of the
being and nature of Love, and then of his works. First I said to her
in nearly the same words which he used to me, that Love was a mighty
god, and likewise fair and she proved to me as I proved to him that,
by my own showing, Love was neither fair nor good. "What do you
mean, Diotima," I said, "is love then evil and foul?" "Hush," she
cried; "must that be foul which is not fair?" "Certainly," I said.
"And is that which is not wise, ignorant? do you not see that there is
a mean between wisdom and ignorance?" "And what may that be?" I
said. "Right opinion," she replied; "which, as you know, being
incapable of giving a reason, is not knowledge (for how can
knowledge be devoid of reason? nor again, ignorance, for neither can
ignorance attain the truth), but is clearly something which is a
mean between ignorance and wisdom." "Quite true," I replied. "Do not
then insist," she said, "that what is not fair is of necessity foul,
or what is not good evil; or infer that because love is not fair and
good he is therefore foul and evil; for he is in a mean between them."
"Well," I said, "Love is surely admitted by all to be a great god."
"By those who know or by those who do not know?" "By all." "And how,
Socrates," she said with a smile, "can Love be acknowledged to be a
great god by those who say that he is not a god at all?" "And who
are they?" I said. "You and I are two of them," she replied. "How
can that be?" I said. "It is quite intelligible," she replied; "for
you yourself would acknowledge that the gods are happy and fair of
course you would-would to say that any god was not?" "Certainly
not," I replied. "And you mean by the happy, those who are the
possessors of things good or fair?" "Yes." "And you admitted that
Love, because he was in want, desires those good and fair things of
which he is in want?" "Yes, I did." "But how can he be a god who has
no portion in what is either good or fair?" "Impossible." "Then you
see that you also deny the divinity of Love."

  "What then is Love?" I asked; "Is he mortal?" "No." "What then?" "As
in the former instance, he is neither mortal nor immortal, but in a
mean between the two." "What is he, Diotima?" "He is a great spirit
(daimon), and like all spirits he is intermediate between the divine
and the mortal." "And what," I said, "is his power?" "He
interprets," she replied, "between gods and men, conveying and
taking across to the gods the prayers and sacrifices of men, and to
men the commands and replies of the gods; he is the mediator who spans
the chasm which divides them, and therefore in him all is bound
together, and through him the arts of the prophet and the priest,
their sacrifices and mysteries and charms, and all, prophecy and
incantation, find their way. For God mingles not with man; but through
Love. all the intercourse, and converse of god with man, whether awake
or asleep, is carried on. The wisdom which understands this is
spiritual; all other wisdom, such as that of arts and handicrafts,
is mean and vulgar. Now these spirits or intermediate powers are
many and diverse, and one of them is Love. "And who," I said, "was his
father, and who his mother?" "The tale," she said, "will take time;
nevertheless I will tell you. On the birthday of Aphrodite there was a
feast of the gods, at which the god Poros or Plenty, who is the son of
Metis or Discretion, was one of the guests. When the feast was over,
Penia or Poverty, as the manner is on such occasions, came about the
doors to beg. Now Plenty who was the worse for nectar (there was no
wine in those days), went into the garden of Zeus and fell into a
heavy sleep, and Poverty considering her own straitened circumstances,
plotted to have a child by him, and accordingly she lay down at his
side and conceived love, who partly because he is naturally a lover of
the beautiful, and because Aphrodite is herself beautiful, and also
because he was born on her birthday, is her follower and attendant.
And as his parentage is, so also are his fortunes. In the first
place he is always poor, and anything but tender and fair, as the many
imagine him; and he is rough and squalid, and has no shoes, nor a
house to dwell in; on the bare earth exposed he lies under the open
heaven, in-the streets, or at the doors of houses, taking his rest;
and like his mother he is always in distress. Like his father too,
whom he also partly resembles, he is always plotting against the
fair and good; he is bold, enterprising, strong, a mighty hunter,
always weaving some intrigue or other, keen in the pursuit of
wisdom, fertile in resources; a philosopher at all times, terrible
as an enchanter, sorcerer, sophist. He is by nature neither mortal nor
immortal, but alive and flourishing at one moment when he is in
plenty, and dead at another moment, and again alive by reason of his
father's nature. But that which is always flowing in is always flowing
out, and so he is never in want and never in wealth; and, further,
he is in a mean between ignorance and knowledge. The truth of the
matter is this: No god is a philosopher. or seeker after wisdom, for
he is wise already; nor does any man who is wise seek after wisdom.
Neither do the ignorant seek after Wisdom. For herein is the evil of
ignorance, that he who is neither good nor wise is nevertheless
satisfied with himself: he has no desire for that of which he feels no
want." "But-who then, Diotima," I said, "are the lovers of wisdom,
if they are neither the wise nor the foolish?" "A child may answer
that question," she replied; "they are those who are in a mean between
the two; Love is one of them. For wisdom is a most beautiful thing,
and Love is of the beautiful; and therefore Love is also a
philosopher: or lover of wisdom, and being a lover of wisdom is in a
mean between the wise and the ignorant. And of this too his birth is
the cause; for his father is wealthy and wise, and his mother poor and
foolish. Such, my dear Socrates, is the nature of the spirit Love. The
error in your conception of him was very natural, and as I imagine
from what you say, has arisen out of a confusion of love and the
beloved, which made you think that love was all beautiful. For the
beloved is the truly beautiful, and delicate, and perfect, and
blessed; but the principle of love is of another nature, and is such
as I have described."

  I said, "O thou stranger woman, thou sayest well; but, assuming Love
to be such as you say, what is the use of him to men?" "That,
Socrates," she replied, "I will attempt to unfold: of his nature and
birth I have already spoken; and you acknowledge that love is of the
beautiful. But some one will say: Of the beautiful in what, Socrates
and Diotima?-or rather let me put the question more dearly, and ask:
When a man loves the beautiful, what does he desire?" I answered her
"That the beautiful may be his." "Still," she said, "the answer
suggests a further question: What is given by the possession of
beauty?" "To what you have asked," I replied, "I have no answer
ready." "Then," she said, "Let me put the word 'good' in the place
of the beautiful, and repeat the question once more: If he who loves
good, what is it then that he loves? "The possession of the good," I
said. "And what does he gain who possesses the good?" "Happiness," I
replied; "there is less difficulty in answering that question." "Yes,"
she said, "the happy are made happy by the acquisition of good things.
Nor is there any need to ask why a man desires happiness; the answer
is already final." "You are right." I said. "And is this wish and this
desire common to all? and do all men always desire their own good,
or only some men?-what say you?" "All men," I replied; "the desire
is common to all." "Why, then," she rejoined, "are not all men,
Socrates, said to love, but only some them? whereas you say that all
men are always loving the same things." "I myself wonder," I said,-why
this is." "There is nothing to wonder at," she replied; "the reason is
that one part of love is separated off and receives the name of the
whole, but the other parts have other names." "Give an
illustration," I said. She answered me as follows: "There is poetry,
which, as you know, is complex; and manifold. All creation or
passage of non-being into being is poetry or making, and the processes
of all art are creative; and the masters of arts are all poets or
makers." "Very true." "Still," she said, "you know that they are not
called poets, but have other names; only that portion of the art which
is separated off from the rest, and is concerned with music and metre,
is termed poetry, and they who possess poetry in this sense of the
word are called poets." "Very true," I said. "And the same holds of
love. For you may say generally that all desire of good and
happiness is only the great and subtle power of love; but they who are
drawn towards him by any other path, whether the path of
money-making or gymnastics or philosophy, are not called lovers -the
name of the whole is appropriated to those whose affection takes one
form only-they alone are said to love, or to be lovers." "I dare say,"
I replied, "that you are right." "Yes," she added, "and you hear
people say that lovers are seeking for their other half; but I say
that they are seeking neither for the half of themselves, nor for
the whole, unless the half or the whole be also a good. And they
will cut off their own hands and feet and cast them away, if they
are evil; for they love not what is their own, unless perchance
there be some one who calls what belongs to him the good, and what
belongs to another the evil. For there is nothing which men love but
the good. Is there anything?" "Certainly, I should say, that there
is nothing." "Then," she said, "the simple truth is, that men love the
good." "Yes," I said. "To which must be added that they love the
possession of the good? "Yes, that must be added." "And not only the
possession, but the everlasting possession of the good?" "That must be
added too." "Then love," she said, "may be described generally as
the love of the everlasting possession of the good?" "That is most
true."

  "Then if this be the nature of love, can you tell me further," she
said, "what is the manner of the pursuit? what are they doing who show
all this eagerness and heat which is called love? and what is the
object which they have in view? Answer me." "Nay, Diotima," I replied,
"if I had known, I should not have wondered at your wisdom, neither
should I have come to learn from you about this very matter."
"Well," she said, "I will teach you:-The object which they have in
view is birth in beauty, whether of body or, soul." "I do not
understand you," I said; "the oracle requires an explanation." "I will
make my meaning dearer," she replied. "I mean to say, that all men are
bringing to the birth in their bodies and in their souls. There is a
certain age at which human nature is desirous of
procreation-procreation which must be in beauty and not in
deformity; and this procreation is the union of man and woman, and
is a divine thing; for conception and generation are an immortal
principle in the mortal creature, and in the inharmonious they can
never be. But the deformed is always inharmonious with the divine, and
the beautiful harmonious. Beauty, then, is the destiny or goddess of
parturition who presides at birth, and therefore, when approaching
beauty, the conceiving power is propitious, and diffusive, and benign,
and begets and bears fruit: at the sight of ugliness she frowns and
contracts and has a sense of pain, and turns away, and shrivels up,
and not without a pang refrains from conception. And this is the
reason why, when the hour of conception arrives, and the teeming
nature is full, there is such a flutter and ecstasy about beauty whose
approach is the alleviation of the pain of travail. For love,
Socrates, is not, as you imagine, the love of the beautiful only."
"What then?" "The love of generation and of birth in beauty." "Yes," I
said. "Yes, indeed," she replied. "But why of generation?" "Because to
the mortal creature, generation is a sort of eternity and
immortality," she replied; "and if, as has been already admitted, love
is of the everlasting possession of the good, all men will necessarily
desire immortality together with good: Wherefore love is of
immortality."

  All this she taught me at various times when she spoke of love.
And I remember her once saying to me, "What is the cause, Socrates, of
love, and the attendant desire? See you not how all animals, birds, as
well as beasts, in their desire of procreation, are in agony when they
take the infection of love, which begins with the desire of union;
whereto is added the care of offspring, on whose behalf the weakest
are ready to battle against the strongest even to the uttermost, and
to die for them, and will, let themselves be tormented with hunger
or suffer anything in order to maintain their young. Man may be
supposed to act thus from reason; but why should animals have these
passionate feelings? Can you tell me why?" Again I replied that I
did not know. She said to me: "And do you expect ever to become a
master in the art of love, if you do not know this?" "But I have
told you already, Diotima, that my ignorance is the reason why I
come to you; for I am conscious that I want a teacher; tell me then
the cause of this and of the other mysteries of love." "Marvel not,"
she said, "if you believe that love is of the immortal, as we have
several times acknowledged; for here again, and on the same
principle too, the mortal nature is seeking as far as is possible to
be everlasting and immortal: and this is only to be attained by
generation, because generation always leaves behind a new existence in
the place of the old. Nay even in the life, of the same individual
there is succession and not absolute unity: a man is called the
same, and yet in the short interval which elapses between youth and
age, and in which every animal is said to have life and identity, he
is undergoing a perpetual process of loss and reparation-hair,
flesh, bones, blood, and the whole body are always changing. Which
is true not only of the body, but also of the soul, whose habits,
tempers, opinions, desires, pleasures, pains, fears, never remain
the same in any one of us, but are always coming and going; and
equally true of knowledge, and what is still more surprising to us
mortals, not only do the sciences in general spring up and decay, so
that in respect of them we are never the same; but each of them
individually experiences a like change. For what is implied in the
word 'recollection,' but the departure of knowledge, which is ever
being forgotten, and is renewed and preserved by recollection, and
appears to be the same although in reality new, according to that
law of succession by which all mortal things are preserved, not
absolutely the same, but by substitution, the old worn-out mortality
leaving another new and similar existence behind unlike the divine,
which is always the same and not another? And in this way, Socrates,
the mortal body, or mortal anything, partakes of immortality; but
the immortal in another way. Marvel not then at the love which all men
have of their offspring; for that universal love and interest is for
the sake of immortality."

  I was astonished at her words, and said: "Is this really true, O
thou wise Diotima?" And she answered with all the authority of an
accomplished sophist: "Of that, Socrates, you may be assured;-think
only of the ambition of men, and you will wonder at the
senselessness of their ways, unless you consider how they are
stirred by the love of an immortality of fame. They are ready to run
all risks greater far than they would have for their children, and
to spend money and undergo any sort of toil, and even to die, for
the sake of leaving behind them a name which shall be eternal. Do
you imagine that Alcestis would have died to save Admetus, or Achilles
to avenge Patroclus, or your own Codrus in order to preserve the
kingdom for his sons, if they had not imagined that the memory of
their virtues, which still survives among us, would be immortal? Nay,"
she said, "I am persuaded that all men do all things, and the better
they are the more they do them, in hope of the glorious fame of
immortal virtue; for they desire the immortal.

  "Those who are pregnant in the body only, betake themselves to women
and beget children-this is the character of their love; their
offspring, as they hope, will preserve their memory and giving them
the blessedness and immortality which they desire in the future. But
souls which are pregnant-for there certainly are men who are more
creative in their souls than in their bodies conceive that which is
proper for the soul to conceive or contain. And what are these
conceptions?-wisdom and virtue in general. And such creators are poets
and all artists who are deserving of the name inventor. But the
greatest and fairest sort of wisdom by far is that which is
concerned with the ordering of states and families, and which is
called temperance and justice. And he who in youth has the seed of
these implanted in him and is himself inspired, when he comes to
maturity desires to beget and generate. He wanders about seeking
beauty that he may beget offspring-for in deformity he will beget
nothing-and naturally embraces the beautiful rather than the
deformed body; above all when he finds fair and noble and
well-nurtured soul, he embraces the two in one person, and to such
an one he is full of speech about virtue and the nature and pursuits
of a good man; and he tries to educate him; and at the touch of the
beautiful which is ever present to his memory, even when absent, he
brings forth that which he had conceived long before, and in company
with him tends that which he brings forth; and they are married by a
far nearer tie and have a closer friendship than those who beget
mortal children, for the children who are their common offspring are
fairer and more immortal. Who, when he thinks of Homer and Hesiod
and other great poets, would not rather have their children than
ordinary human ones? Who would not emulate them in the creation of
children such as theirs, which have preserved their memory and given
them everlasting glory? Or who would not have such children as
Lycurgus left behind him to be the saviours, not only of Lacedaemon,
but of Hellas, as one may say? There is Solon, too, who is the revered
father of Athenian laws; and many others there are in many other
places, both among hellenes and barbarians, who have given to the
world many noble works, and have been the parents of virtue of every
kind; and many temples have been raised in their honour for the sake
of children such as theirs; which were never raised in honour of any
one, for the sake of his mortal children.

  "These are the lesser mysteries of love, into which even you,
Socrates, may enter; to the greater and more hidden ones which are the
crown of these, and to which, if you pursue them in a right spirit,
they will lead, I know not whether you will be able to attain. But I
will do my utmost to inform you, and do you follow if you can. For
he who would proceed aright in this matter should begin in youth to
visit beautiful forms; and first, if he be guided by his instructor
aright, to love one such form only-out of that he should create fair
thoughts; and soon he will of himself perceive that the beauty of
one form is akin to the beauty of another; and then if beauty of
form in general is his pursuit, how foolish would he be not to
recognize that the beauty in every form is and the same! And when he
perceives this he will abate his violent love of the one, which he
will despise and deem a small thing, and will become a lover of all
beautiful forms; in the next stage he will consider that the beauty of
the mind is more honourable than the beauty of the outward form. So
that if a virtuous soul have but a little comeliness, he will be
content to love and tend him, and will search out and bring to the
birth thoughts which may improve the young, until he is compelled to
contemplate and see the beauty of institutions and laws, and to
understand that the beauty of them all is of one family, and that
personal beauty is a trifle; and after laws and institutions he will
go on to the sciences, that he may see their beauty, being not like
a servant in love with the beauty of one youth or man or
institution, himself a slave mean and narrow-minded, but drawing
towards and contemplating the vast sea of beauty, he will create
many fair and noble thoughts and notions in boundless love of
wisdom; until on that shore he grows and waxes strong, and at last the
vision is revealed to him of a single science, which is the science of
beauty everywhere. To this I will proceed; please to give me your very
best attention:

  "He who has been instructed thus far in the things of love, and
who has learned to see the beautiful in due order and succession, when
he comes toward the end will suddenly perceive a nature of wondrous
beauty (and this, Socrates, is the final cause of all our former
toils)-a nature which in the first place is everlasting, not growing
and decaying, or waxing and waning; secondly, not fair in one point of
view and foul in another, or at one time or in one relation or at
one place fair, at another time or in another relation or at another
place foul, as if fair to some and-foul to others, or in the
likeness of a face or hands or any other part of the bodily frame,
or in any form of speech or knowledge, or existing in any other being,
as for example, in an animal, or in heaven or in earth, or in any
other place; but beauty absolute, separate, simple, and everlasting,
which without diminution and without increase, or any change, is
imparted to the ever-growing and perishing beauties of all other
things. He who from these ascending under the influence of true
love, begins to perceive that beauty, is not far from the end. And the
true order of going, or being led by another, to the things of love,
is to begin from the beauties of earth and mount upwards for the
sake of that other beauty, using these as steps only, and from one
going on to two, and from two to all fair forms, and from fair forms
to fair practices, and from fair practices to fair notions, until from
fair notions he arrives at the notion of absolute beauty, and at
last knows what the essence of beauty is. This, my dear Socrates,"
said the stranger of Mantineia, "is that life above all others which
man should live, in the contemplation of beauty absolute; a beauty
which if you once beheld, you would see not to be after the measure of
gold, and garments, and fair boys and youths, whose presence now
entrances you; and you and many a one would be content to live
seeing them only and conversing with them without meat or drink, if
that were possible-you only want to look at them and to be with
them. But what if man had eyes to see the true beauty-the divine
beauty, I mean, pure and dear and unalloyed, not clogged with the
pollutions of mortality and all the colours and vanities of human
life-thither looking, and holding converse with the true beauty simple
and divine? Remember how in that communion only, beholding beauty with
the eye of the mind, he will be enabled to bring forth, not images
of beauty, but realities (for he has hold not of an image but of a
reality), and bringing forth and nourishing true virtue to become
the friend of God and be immortal, if mortal man may. Would that be an
ignoble life?"

  Such, Phaedrus-and I speak not only to you, but to all of you-were
the words of Diotima; and I am persuaded of their truth. And being
persuaded of them, I try to persuade others, that in the attainment of
this end human nature will not easily find a helper better than
love: And therefore, also, I say that every man ought to honour him as
I myself honour him, and walk in his ways, and exhort others to do the
same, and praise the power and spirit of love according to the measure
of my ability now and ever.

  The words which I have spoken, you, Phaedrus, may call an encomium
of love, or anything else which you please.

  When Socrates had done speaking, the company applauded, and
Aristophanes was beginning to say something in answer to the
allusion which Socrates had made to his own speech, when suddenly
there was a great knocking at the door of the house, as of
revellers, and the sound of a flute-girl was heard. Agathon told the
attendants to go and see who were the intruders. "If they are
friends of ours," he said, "invite them in, but if not, say that the
drinking is over." A little while afterwards they heard the voice of
Alcibiades resounding in the court; he was in a great state of
intoxication and kept roaring and shouting "Where is Agathon? Lead
me to Agathon," and at length, supported by the flute-girl and some of
his attendants, he found his way to them. "Hail, friends," he said,
appearing-at the door crown, with a massive garland of ivy and
violets, his head flowing with ribands. "Will you have a very
drunken man as a companion of your revels? Or shall I crown Agathon,
which was my intention in coming, and go away? For I was unable to
come yesterday, and therefore I am here to-day, carrying on my head
these ribands, that taking them from my own head, I may crown the head
of this fairest and wisest of men, as I may be allowed to call him.
Will you laugh at me because I am drunk? Yet I know very well that I
am speaking the truth, although you may laugh. But first tell me; if I
come in shall we have the understanding of which I spoke? Will you
drink with me or not?"

  The company were vociferous in begging that he would take his
place among them, and Agathon specially invited him. Thereupon he
was led in by the people who were with him; and as he was being led,
intending to crown Agathon, he took the ribands from his own head
and held them in front of his eyes; he was thus prevented from
seeing Socrates, who made way for him, and Alcibiades took the
vacant place between Agathon and Socrates, and in taking the place
he embraced Agathon and crowned him. Take off his sandals, said
Agathon, and let him make a third on the same couch.

  By all means; but who makes the third partner in our revels? said
Alcibiades, turning round and starting up as he caught sight of
Socrates. By Heracles, he said, what is this? here is Socrates
always lying in wait for me, and always, as his way is, coming out
at all sorts of unsuspected places: and now, what have you to say
for yourself, and why are you lying here, where I perceive that you
have contrived to find a place, not by a joker or lover of jokes, like
Aristophanes, but by the fairest of the company?

  Socrates turned to Agathon and said: I must ask you to protect me,
Agathon; for the passion of this man has grown quite a serious
matter to me. Since I became his admirer I have never been allowed
to speak to any other fair one, or so much as to look at them. If I
do, he goes wild with envy and jealousy, and not only abuses me but
can hardly keep his hands off me, and at this moment he may do me some
harm. Please to see to this, and either reconcile me to him, or, if he
attempts violence, protect me, as I am in bodily fear of his mad and
passionate attempts.

  There can never be reconciliation between you and me, said
Alcibiades; but for the present I will defer your chastisement. And
I must beg you, Agathoron, to give me back some of the ribands that
I may crown the marvellous head of this universal despot-I would not
have him complain of me for crowning you, and neglecting him, who in
conversation is the conqueror of all mankind; and this not only
once, as you were the day before yesterday, but always. Whereupon,
taking some of the ribands, he crowned Socrates, and again reclined.

  Then he said: You seem, my friends, to be sober, which is a thing
not to be endured; you must drink-for that was the agreement under
which I was admitted-and I elect myself master of the feast until
you are well drunk. Let us have a large goblet, Agathon, or rather, he
said, addressing the attendant, bring me that wine-cooler. The
wine-cooler which had caught his eye was a vessel holding more than
two quarts-this he filled and emptied, and bade the attendant fill
it again for Socrates. Observe, my friends, said Alcibiades, that this
ingenious trick of mine will have no effect on Socrates, for he can
drink any quantity of wine and not be at all nearer being drunk.
Socrates drank the cup which the attendant filled for him.

  Eryximachus said! What is this Alcibiades? Are we to have neither
conversation nor singing over our cups; but simply to drink as if we
were thirsty?

  Alcibiades replied: Hail, worthy son of a most wise and worthy sire!

  The same to you, said Eryximachus; but what shall we do?

  That I leave to you, said Alcibiades.

     The wise physician skilled our wounds to heal

shall prescribe and we will obey. What do you want?

  Well, said Eryximachus, before you appeared we had passed a
resolution that each one of us in turn should make a speech in
praise of love, and as good a one as he could: the turn was passed
round from left to right; and as all of us have spoken, and you have
not spoken but have well drunken, you ought to speak, and then
impose upon Socrates any task which you please, and he on his right
hand neighbour, and so on.

  That is good, Eryximachus, said Alcibiades; and yet the
comparison, of a drunken man's speech with those of sober men is
hardly fair; and I should like to know, sweet friend, whether you
really believe-what Socrates was just now saying; for I can assure you
that the very reverse is the fact, and that if I praise any one but
himself in his presence, whether God or man, he will hardly keep his
hands off me.

  For shame, said Socrates.

  Hold your tongue, said Alcibiades, for by Poseidon, there is no
one else whom I will praise when you are-of the company.

  Well then, said Eryximachus, if you like praise Socrates.

  What do you think, Eryximachus-? said Alcibiades: shall I attack
him: and inflict the punishment before you all?

  What are you about? said Socrates; are you going to raise a laugh at
my expense? Is that the meaning of your praise?

  I am going to speak the truth, if you will permit me.

  I not only permit, but exhort you to speak the truth.

  Then I will begin at once, said Alcibiades, and if I say anything
which is not true, you may interrupt me if you will, and say "that
is a lie," though my intention is to speak the truth. But you must not
wonder if I speak any how as things come into my mind; for the
fluent and orderly enumeration of all your singularities is not a task
which is easy to a man in my condition.

  And now, my boys, I shall praise Socrates in a figure which will
appear to him to be a caricature, and yet I speak, not to make fun
of him, but only for the truth's sake. I say, that he is exactly
like the busts of Silenus, which are set up in the statuaries,
shops, holding pipes and flutes in their mouths; and they are made
to open in the middle, and have images of gods inside them. I say also
that hit is like Marsyas the satyr. You yourself will not deny,
Socrates, that your face is like that of a satyr. Aye, and there is
a resemblance in other points too. For example, you are a bully, as
I can prove by witnesses, if you will not confess. And are you not a
flute-player? That you are, and a performer far more wonderful than
Marsyas. He indeed with instruments used to charm the souls of men
by the powers of his breath, and the players of his music do so still:
for the melodies of Olympus are derived from Marsyas who taught
them, and these, whether they are played by a great master or by a
miserable flute-girl, have a power which no others have; they alone
possess the soul and reveal the wants of those who have need of gods
and mysteries, because they are divine. But you produce the same
effect with your words only, and do not require the flute; that is the
difference between you and him. When we hear any other speaker, even
very good one, he produces absolutely no effect upon us, or not
much, whereas the mere fragments of you and your words, even at
second-hand, and however imperfectly repeated, amaze and possess the
souls of every man, woman, and child who comes within hearing of them.
And if I were not, afraid that you would think me hopelessly drunk,
I would have sworn as well as spoken to the influence which they
have always had and still have over me. For my heart leaps within me
more than that of any Corybantian reveller, and my eyes rain tears
when I hear them. And I observe that many others are affected in the
same manner. I have heard Pericles and other great orators, and I
thought that they spoke well, but I never had any similar feeling;
my soul was not stirred by them, nor was I angry at the thought of
my own slavish state. But this Marsyas has often brought me to such
pass, that I have felt as if I could hardly endure the life which I am
leading (this, Socrates, you will admit); and I am conscious that if I
did not shut my ears against him, and fly as from the voice of the
siren, my fate would be like that of others,-he would transfix me, and
I should grow old sitting at his feet. For he makes me confess that
I ought not to live as I do, neglecting the wants of my own soul,
and busying myself with the concerns of the Athenians; therefore I
hold my ears and tear myself away from him. And he is the only
person who ever made me ashamed, which you might think not to be in my
nature, and there is no one else who does the same. For I know that
I cannot answer him or say that I ought not to do as he bids, but when
I leave his presence the love of popularity gets the better of me. And
therefore I run away and fly from him, and when I see him I am ashamed
of what I have confessed to him. Many a time have I wished that he
were dead, and yet I know that I should be much more sorry than
glad, if he were to die: so that am at my wit's end.

  And this is what I and many others have suffered, from the
flute-playing of this satyr. Yet hear me once more while I show you
how exact the image is, and. how marvellous his power. For let me tell
you; none of you know him; but I will reveal him to you; having begun,
I must go on. See you how fond he is of the fair? He is always with
them and is always being smitten by them, and then again he knows
nothing and is ignorant of all thing such is the appearance which he
puts on. Is he not like a Silenus in this? To be sure he is: his outer
mask is the carved head of the Silenus; but, O my companions in drink,
when he is opened, what temperance there is residing within! Know
you that beauty and wealth and honour, at which the many wonder, are
of no account with him, and are utterly despised by him: he regards
not at all the persons who are gifted with them; mankind are nothing
to him; all his life is spent in mocking and flouting at them. But
when I opened him, and looked within at his serious purpose, I saw
in him divine and golden images of such fascinating beauty that I
was ready to do in a moment whatever Socrates commanded: they may have
escaped the observation of others, but I saw them. Now I fancied
that he was seriously enamoured of my beauty, and I thought that I
should therefore have a grand opportunity of hearing him tell what
he knew, for I had a wonderful opinion of the attractions of my youth.
In the prosecution of this design, when I next went to him, I sent
away the attendant who usually accompanied me (I will confess the
whole truth, and beg you to listen; and if I speak falsely, do you,
Socrates, expose the falsehood). Well, he and I were alone together,
and I thought that when there was nobody with us, I should hear him
speak the language which lovers use to their loves when they are by
themselves, and I was delighted. Nothing of the sort; he conversed
as usual, and spent the day with me and then went away. Afterwards I
challenged him to the palaestra; and he wrestled and closed with me,
several times when there was no one present; I fancied that I might
succeed in this manner. Not a bit; I made no way with him. Lastly,
as I had failed hitherto, I thought that I must take stronger measures
and attack him boldly, and, as I had begun, not give him up, but see
how matters stood between him and me. So I invited him to sup with me,
just as if he were a fair youth, and I a designing lover. He was not
easily persuaded to come; he did, however, after a while accept the
invitation, and when he came the first time, he wanted to go away at
once as soon as supper was over, and I had not the face to detain him.
The second time, still in pursuance of my design, after we had supped,
I went on conversing far into the night, and when he wanted to go
away, I pretended that the hour was late and that he had much better
remain. So he lay down on the couch next to me, the same on which he
had supped, and there was no one but ourselves sleeping in the
apartment. All this may be told without shame to any one. But what
follows I could hardly tell you if I were sober. Yet as the proverb
says, "In vino veritas," whether with boys, or without them; and
therefore I must speak. Nor, again, should I be justified in
concealing the lofty actions of Socrates when I come to praise him.
Moreover I have felt the serpent's sting; and he who has suffered,
as they say, is willing to tell his fellow-sufferers only, as they
alone will be likely to understand him, and will not be extreme in
judging of the sayings or doings which have been wrung from his agony.
For I have been bitten by a more than viper's tooth; I have known in
my soul, or in my heart, or in some other part, that worst of pangs,
more violent in ingenuous youth than any serpent's tooth, the pang
of philosophy, which will make a man say or do anything. And you
whom I see around me, Phaedrus and Agathon and Eryximachus and
Pausanias and Aristodemus and Aristophanes, all of you, and I need not
say Socrates himself, have had experience of the same madness and
passion in your longing after wisdom. Therefore listen and excuse my
doings then and my sayings now. But let the attendants and other
profane and unmannered persons close up the doors of their ears.

  When the lamp was put out and the servants had gone away, I
thought that I must be plain with him and have no more ambiguity. So I
gave him a shake, and I said: "Socrates, are you asleep?" "No," he
said. "Do you know what I am meditating? "What are you meditating?" he
said. "I think," I replied, "that of all the lovers whom I have ever
had you are the only one who is worthy of me, and you appear to be too
modest to speak. Now I feel that I should be a fool to refuse you this
or any other favour, and therefore I come to lay at your feet all that
I have and all that my friends have, in the hope that you will
assist me in the way of virtue, which I desire above all things, and
in which I believe that you can help me better than any one else.
And I should certainly have more reason to be ashamed of what wise men
would say if I were to refuse a favour to such as you, than of what
the world who are mostly fools, would say of me if I granted it." To
these words he replied in the ironical manner which is so
characteristic of him: "Alcibiades, my friend, you have indeed an
elevated aim if what you say is true, and if there really is in me any
power by which you may become better; truly you must see in me some
rare beauty of a kind infinitely higher than any which I see in you.
And therefore, if you mean to share with me and to exchange beauty for
beauty, you will have greatly the advantage of me; you will gain
true beauty in return for appearance-like Diomede, gold in exchange
for brass. But look again, sweet friend, and see whether you are not
deceived in me. The mind begins to grow critical when the bodily eye
fails, and it will be a long time before you get old." Hearing this, I
said: "I have told you my purpose, which is quite serious, and do
you consider what you think best for you and me." "That is good," he
said; "at some other time then we will consider and act as seems
best about this and about other matters." Whereupon, I fancied that
was smitten, and that the words which I had uttered like arrows had
wounded him, and so without waiting to hear more I got up, and
throwing my coat about him crept under his threadbare cloak, as the
time of year was winter, and there I lay during the whole night having
this wonderful monster in my arms. This again, Socrates, will not be
denied by you. And yet, notwithstanding all, he was so superior to
my solicitations, so contemptuous and derisive and disdainful of my
beauty-which really, as I fancied, had some attractions-hear, O
judges; for judges you shall be of the haughty virtue of
Socrates-nothing more happened, but in the morning when I awoke (let
all the gods and goddesses be my witnesses) I arose as from the
couch of a father or an elder brother.

  What do you suppose must have been my feelings, after this
rejection, at the thought of my own dishonour? And yet I could not
help wondering at his natural temperance and self-restraint and
manliness. I never imagined that I could have met with a man such as
he is in wisdom and endurance. And therefore I could not be angry with
him or renounce his company, any more than I could hope to win him.
For I well knew that if Ajax could not be wounded by steel, much
less he by money; and my only chance of captivating him by my personal
attractions had faded. So I was at my wit's end; no one was ever
more hopelessly enslaved by another. All this happened before he and I
went on the expedition to Potidaea; there we messed together, and I
had the opportunity of observing his extraordinary power of sustaining
fatigue. His endurance was simply marvellous when, being cut off
from our supplies, we were compelled to go without food-on such
occasions, which often happen in time of war, he was superior not only
to me but to everybody; there was no one to be compared to him. Yet at
a festival he was the only person who had any real powers of
enjoyment; though not willing to drink, he could if compelled beat
us all at that,-wonderful to relate! no human being had ever seen
Socrates drunk; and his powers, if I am not mistaken, will be tested
before long. His fortitude in enduring cold was also surprising. There
was a severe frost, for the winter in that region is really
tremendous, and everybody else either remained indoors, or if they
went out had on an amazing quantity of clothes, and were well shod,
and had their feet swathed in felt and fleeces: in the midst of
this, Socrates with his bare feet on the ice and in his ordinary dress
marched better than the other soldiers who had shoes, and they
looked daggers at him because he seemed to despise them.

  I have told you one tale, and now I must tell you another, which
is worth hearing, 'Of the doings and sufferings of the enduring
man', while he was on the expedition. One morning he was thinking
about something which he could not resolve; he would not give it up,
but continued thinking from early dawn until noon-there he stood fixed
in thought; and at noon attention was drawn to him, and the rumour ran
through the wondering crowd that Socrates had been standing and
thinking about something ever since the break of day. At last, in
the evening after supper, some Ionians out of curiosity (I should
explain that this was not in winter but in summer), brought out
their mats and slept in the open air that they might watch him and see
whether he would stand all night. There he stood until the following
morning; and with the return of light he offered up a prayer to the
sun, and went his way. I will also tell, if you please-and indeed I am
bound to tell of his courage in battle; for who but he saved my
life? Now this was the engagement in which I received the prize of
valour: for I was wounded and he would not leave me, but he rescued me
and my arms; and he ought to have received the prize of valour which
the generals wanted to confer on me partly on account of my rank,
and I told them so, (this, again Socrates will not impeach or deny),
but he was more eager than the generals that I and not he should
have the prize. There was another occasion on which his behaviour
was very remarkable-in the flight of the army after the battle of
Delium, where he served among the heavy-armed-I had a better
opportunity of seeing him than at Potidaea, for I was myself on
horseback, and therefore comparatively out of danger. He and Laches
were retreating, for the troops were in flight, and I met them and
told them not to be discouraged, and promised to remain with them; and
there you might see him, Aristophanes, as you describe, just as he
is in the streets of Athens, stalking like a and rolling his eyes,
calmly contemplating enemies as well as friends, and making very
intelligible to anybody, even from a distance, that whoever attacked
him would be likely to meet with a stout resistance; and in this way
he and his companion escaped-for this is the sort of man who is
never touched in war; those only are pursued who are running away
headlong. I particularly observed how superior he was to Laches in
presence of mind. Many are the marvels which I might narrate in praise
of Socrates; most of his ways might perhaps be paralleled in another
man, but his absolute unlikeness to any human being that is or ever
has been is perfectly astonishing. You may imagine Brasidas and others
to have been like Achilles; or you may imagine Nestor and Antenor to
have been like Perides; and the same may be said of other famous
men, but of this strange being you will never be able to find any
likeness, however remote, either among men who now are or who ever
have been-other than that which I have already suggested of Silenus
and the satyrs; and they represent in a figure not only himself, but
his words. For, although I forgot to mention this to you before, his
words are like the images of Silenus which open; they are ridiculous
when you first hear them; he clothes himself in language that is
like the skin of the wanton satyr-for his talk is of pack-asses and
smiths and cobblers and curriers, and he is always repeating the
same things in the same words, so that any ignorant or inexperienced
person might feel disposed to laugh at him; but he who opens the
bust and sees what is within will find that they are the only words
which have a meaning in them, and also the most divine, abounding in
fair images of virtue, and of the widest comprehension, or rather
extending to the whole duty of a good and honourable man.

  This, friends, is my praise of Socrates. I have added my blame of
him for his ill-treatment of me; and he has ill-treated not only me,
but Charmides the son of Glaucon, and Euthydemus the son of Diocles,
and many others in the same way-beginning as their lover he has
ended by making them pay their addresses to him. Wherefore I say to
you, Agathon, "Be no deceived by him; learn from me: and take warning,
and do not be a fool and learn by experience, as the proverb says."

  When Alcibiades had finished, there was a laugh at his
outspokenness; for he seemed to be still in love with Socrates. You
are sober, Alcibiades, said Socrates, or you would never have gone
so far about to hide the purpose of your satyr's praises, for all this
long story is only an ingenious circumlocution, of which the point
comes in by the way at the end; you want to get up a quarrel between
me and Agathon, and your notion-is that I ought to love you and nobody
else, and that you and you only ought to love Agathon. But the plot of
this Satyric or Silenic drama has been detected, and you must not
allow him, Agathon, to set us at variance.

  I believe you are right, said Agathon, and I am disposed to think
that his intention in placing himself between you and me was only to
divide us; but he shall gain nothing by that move; for I will go and
lie on the couch next to you.

  Yes, yes, replied Socrates, by all means come here and lie on the
couch below me.

  Alas, said Alcibiades, how I am fooled by this man; he is determined
to get the better of me at every turn. I do beseech you, allow Agathon
to lie between us.

  Certainly not, said Socrates, as you praised me, and I in turn ought
to praise my neighbour on the right, he will be out of order in
praising me again when he ought rather to be praised by me, and I must
entreat you to consent to this, and not be jealous, for I have a great
desire to praise the youth.

  Hurrah! cried Agathon, I will rise instantly, that I may be
praised by Socrates.

  The usual way, said Alcibiades; where Socrates is, no one else has
any chance with the fair; and now how readily has he invented a
specious reason for attracting Agathon to himself.

  Agathon arose in order that he might take his place on the couch
by Socrates, when suddenly a band of revellers entered, and spoiled
the order of the banquet. Some one who was going out having left the
door open, they had found their way in, and made themselves at home;
great confusion ensued, and every one was compelled to drink large
quantities of wine. Aristodemus said that Eryximachus, Phaedrus, and
others went away-he himself fell asleep, and as the nights were long
took a good rest: he was awakened towards daybreak by a crowing of
cocks, and when he awoke, the others were either asleep, or had gone
away; there remained only Socrates, Aristophanes, and Agathon, who
were drinking out of a large goblet which they passed round, and
Socrates was discoursing to them. Aristodemus was only half awake, and
he did not hear the beginning of the discourse; the chief thing
which he remembered was Socrates compelling the other two to
acknowledge that the genius of comedy was the same with that of
tragedy, and that the true artist in tragedy was an artist in comedy
also. To this they were constrained to assent, being drowsy, and not
quite following the argument. And first of all Aristophanes dropped
off, then, when the day was already dawning, Agathon. Socrates, having
laid them to sleep, rose to depart; Aristodemus, as his manner was,
following him. At the Lyceum he took a bath, and passed the day as
usual. In the evening he retired to rest at his own home.

                              -THE END-


  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES; THEODORUS; THEAETETUS
Euclid and Terpsion meet in front of Euclid's house in Megara; they
enter the house, and the dialogue is read to them by a servant.

  Euclid. Have you only just arrived from the country, Terpsion?

  Terpsion. No, I came some time ago: and I have been in the Agora
looking for you, and wondering that I could not find you.

  Euc. But I was not in the city.

  Terp. Where then?

  Euc. As I was going down to the harbour, I met Theaetetus-he was
being carried up to Athens from the army at Corinth.

  Terp. Was he alive or dead?

  Euc. He was scarcely alive, for he has been badly wounded; but he
was suffering even more from the sickness which has broken out in
the army.

  Terp. The dysentery, you mean?

  Euc. Yes.

  Terp. Alas! what a loss he will be!

  Euc. Yes, Terpsion, he is a noble fellow; only to-day I heard some
people highly praising his behaviour in this very battle.

  Terp. No wonder; I should rather be surprised at hearing anything
else of him. But why did he go on, instead of stopping at Megara?

  Euc. He wanted to get home: although I entreated and advised him
to remain he would not listen to me; so I set him on his way, and
turned back, and then I remembered what Socrates had said of him,
and thought how remarkably this, like all his predictions, had been
fulfilled. I believe that he had seen him a little before his own
death, when Theaetetus was a youth, and he had a memorable
conversation with him, which he repeated to me when I came to
Athens; he was full of admiration of his genius, and said that he
would most certainly be a great man, if he lived.

  Terp. The prophecy has certainly been fulfilled; but what was the
conversation? can you tell me?

  Euc. No, indeed, not offhand; but I took notes of it as soon as I
got home; these I filled up from memory, writing them out at
leisure; and whenever I went to Athens, I asked Socrates about any
point which I had forgotten, and on my return I made corrections; thus
I have nearly the whole conversation written down.

  Terp. I remember-you told me; and I have always been intending to
ask you to show me the writing, but have put off doing so; and now,
why should we not read it through?-having just come from the
country, I should greatly like to rest.

  Euc. I too shall be very glad of a rest, for I went with
Theaetetus as far as Erineum. Let us go in, then, and, while we are
reposing, the servant shall read to us.

  Terp. Very good.

  Euc. Here is the roll, Terpsion; I may observe that I have
introduced Socrates, not as narrating to me, but as actually
conversing with the persons whom he mentioned-these were, Theodorus
the geometrician (of Cyrene), and Theaetetus. I have omitted, for
the sake of convenience, the interlocutory words "I said," "I
remarked," which he used when he spoke of himself, and again, "he
agreed," or "disagreed," in the answer, lest the repetition of them
should be troublesome.

  Terp. Quite right, Euclid.

  Euc. And now, boy, you may take the roll and read.

              Euclid's servant reads.

  Socrates. If I cared enough about the Cyrenians, Theodorus, I
would ask you whether there are any rising geometricians or
philosophers in that part of the world. But I am more interested in
our own Athenian youth, and I would rather know who among them are
likely to do well. I observe them as far as I can myself, and I
enquire of any one whom they follow, and I see that a great many of
them follow you, in which they are quite right, considering your
eminence in geometry and in other ways. Tell me then, if you have
met with any one who is good for anything.

  Theodorus. Yes, Socrates, I have become acquainted with one very
remarkable Athenian youth, whom I commend to you as well worthy of
your attention. If he had been a beauty I should have been afraid to
praise him, lest you should suppose that I was in love with him; but
he is no beauty, and you must not be offended if I say that he is very
like you; for he has a snub nose and projecting eyes, although these
features are less marked in him than in you. Seeing, then, that he has
no personal attractions, I may freely say, that in all my
acquaintance, which is very large, I never knew anyone who was his
equal in natural gifts: for he has a quickness of apprehension which
is almost unrivalled, and he is exceedingly gentle, and also the
most courageous of men; there is a union of qualities in him such as I
have never seen in any other, and should scarcely have thought
possible; for those who, like him, have quick and ready and
retentive wits, have generally also quick tempers; they are ships
without ballast, and go darting about, and are mad rather than
courageous; and the steadier sort, when they have to face study, prove
stupid and cannot remember. Whereas he moves surely and smoothly and
successfully in the path of knowledge and enquiry; and he is full of
gentleness, flowing on silently like a river of oil; at his age, it is
wonderful.

  Soc. That is good news; whose son is he?

  Theod. The name of his father I have forgotten, but the youth
himself is the middle one of those who are approaching us; he and
his companions have been anointing themselves in the outer court,
and now they seem to have finished, and are towards us. Look and see
whether you know him.

  Soc. I know the youth, but I do not know his name; he is the son
of Euphronius the Sunian, who was himself an eminent man, and such
another as his son is, according to your account of him; I believe
that he left a considerable fortune.

  Theod. Theaetetus, Socrates, is his name; but I rather think that
the property disappeared in the hands of trustees; notwithstanding
which he is wonderfully liberal.

  Soc. He must be a fine fellow; tell him to come and sit by me.

  Theod. I will. Come hither, Theaetetus, and sit by Socrates.

  Soc. By all means, Theaetetus, in order that I may see the
reflection of myself in your face, for Theodorus says that we are
alike; and yet if each of us held in his hands a lyre, and he said
that they were, tuned alike, should we at once take his word, or
should we ask whether he who said so was or was not a musician?

  Theaetetus. We should ask.

  Soc. And if we found that he was, we should take his word; and if
not, not?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And if this supposed, likeness of our faces is a matter of
any interest to us we should enquire whether he who says that we are
alike is a painter or not?

  Theaet. Certainly we should.

  Soc. And is Theodorus a painter?

  Theaet. I never heard that he was.

  Soc. Is he a geometrician?

  Theaet. Of course he is, Socrates.

  Soc. And is he an astronomer and calculator and musician, and in
general an educated man?

  Theaet. I think so.

  Soc. If, then, he remarks on a similarity in our persons, either
by way of praise or blame, there is no particular reason why we should
attend to him.

  Theaet. I should say not.

  Soc. But if he praises the virtue or wisdom which are the mental
endowments of either of us, then he who hears the praises will
naturally desire to examine him who is praised: and he again should be
willing to exhibit himself.

  Theaet. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. Then now is the time, my dear Theaetetus, for me to examine,
and for you to exhibit; since although Theodorus has praised many a
citizen and stranger in my hearing, never did I hear him praise any
one as he has been praising you.

  Theaet. I am glad to hear it, Socrates; but what if he was only in
jest?

  Soc. Nay, Theodorus is not given to jesting; and I cannot allow
you to retract your consent on any such pretence as that. If you do,
he will have to swear to his words; and we are perfectly sure that
no one will be found to impugn him. Do not be shy then, but stand to
your word.

  Theaet. I suppose I must, if you wish it.

  Soc. In the first place, I should like to ask what you learn of
Theodorus: something of geometry, perhaps?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And astronomy and harmony and calculation?

  Theaet. I do my best.

  Soc. Yes, my boy, and so do I: and my desire is to learn of him,
or of anybody who seems to understand these things. And I get on
pretty well in general; but there is a little difficulty which I
want you and the company to aid me in investigating. Will you answer
me a question: "Is not learning growing wiser about that which you
learn?"

  Theaet. Of course.

  Soc. And by wisdom the wise are wise?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And is that different in any way from knowledge?

  Theaet. What?

  Soc. Wisdom; are not men wise in that which they know?

  Theaet. Certainly they are.

  Soc. Then wisdom and knowledge are the same?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Herein lies the difficulty which I can never solve to my
satisfaction-What is knowledge? Can we answer that question? What
say you? which of us will speak first? whoever misses shall sit
down, as at a game of ball, and shall be donkey, as the boys say; he
who lasts out his competitors in the game without missing, shall be
our king, and shall have the right of putting to us any questions
which he pleases. .. Why is there no reply? I hope, Theodorus, that
I am not betrayed into rudeness by my love of conversation? I only
want to make us talk and be friendly and sociable.

  Theod. The reverse of rudeness, Socrates: but I would rather that
you would ask one of the young fellows; for the truth is, that I am
unused to your game of question and answer, and I am too old to learn;
the young will be more suitable, and they will improve more than I
shall, for youth is always able to improve. And so having made a
beginning with Theaetetus, I would advise you to go on with him and
not let him off.

  Soc. Do you hear, Theaetetus, what Theodorus says? The
philosopher, whom you would not like to disobey, and whose word
ought to be a command to a young man, bids me interrogate you. Take
courage, then, and nobly say what you think that knowledge is.

  Theaet. Well, Socrates, I will answer as you and he bid me; and if
make a mistake, you will doubtless correct me.

  Soc. We will, if we can.

  Theaet. Then, I think that the sciences which I learn from
Theodorus-geometry, and those which you just now mentioned-are
knowledge; and I would include the art of the cobbler and other
craftsmen; these, each and all of, them, are knowledge.

  Soc. Too much, Theaetetus, too much; the nobility and liberality
of your nature make you give many and diverse things, when I am asking
for one simple thing.

  Theaet. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. Perhaps nothing. I will endeavour, however, to explain what I
believe to be my meaning: When you speak of cobbling, you mean the art
or science of making shoes?

  Theaet. Just so.

  Soc. And when you speak of carpentering, you mean the art of
making wooden implements?

  Theaet. I do.

  Soc. In both cases you define the subject matter of each of the
two arts?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. But that, Theaetetus, was not the point of my question: we
wanted to know not the subjects, nor yet the number of the arts or
sciences, for we were not going to count them, but we wanted to know
the nature of knowledge in the abstract. Am I not right?

  Theaet. Perfectly right.

  Soc. Let me offer an illustration: Suppose that a person were to ask
about some very trivial and obvious thing-for example, What is clay?
and we were to reply, that there is a clay of potters, there is a clay
of oven-makers, there is a clay of brick-makers; would not the
answer be ridiculous?

  Theaet. Truly.

  Soc. In the first place, there would be an absurdity in assuming
that he who asked the question would understand from our answer the
nature of "clay," merely because we added "of the image-makers," or of
any other workers. How can a man understand the name of anything, when
he does not know the nature of it?

  Theaet. He cannot.

  Soc. Then he who does not know what science or knowledge is, has
no knowledge of the art or science of making shoes?

  Theaet. None.

  Soc. Nor of any other science?

  Theaet. No.

  Soc. And when a man is asked what science or knowledge is, to give
in answer the name of some art or science is ridiculous; for the
-question is, "What is knowledge?" and he replies, "A knowledge of
this or that."

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Moreover, he might answer shortly and simply, but he makes an
enormous circuit. For example, when asked about the day, he might have
said simply, that clay is moistened earth-what sort of clay is not
to the point.

  Theaet. Yes, Socrates, there is no difficulty as you put the
question. You mean, if I am not mistaken, something like what occurred
to me and to my friend here, your namesake Socrates, in a recent
discussion.

  Soc. What was that, Theaetetus?

  Theaet. Theodorus was writing out for us something about roots, such
as the roots of three or five, showing that they are incommensurable
by the unit: he selected other examples up to seventeen-there he
stopped. Now as there are innumerable roots, the notion occurred to us
of attempting to include them all under one name or class.

  Soc. And did you find such a class?

  Theaet. I think that we did; but I should like to have your opinion.

  Soc. Let me hear.

  Theaet. We divided all numbers into two classes: those which are
made up of equal factors multiplying into one another, which we
compared to square figures and called square or equilateral
numbers;-that was one class.

  Soc. Very good.

  Theaet. The intermediate numbers, such as three and five, and
every other number which is made up of unequal factors, either of a
greater multiplied by a less, or of a less multiplied by a greater,
and when regarded as a figure, is contained in unequal sides;-all
these we compared to oblong figures, and called them oblong numbers.

  Soc. Capital; and what followed?

  Theaet. The lines, or sides, which have for their squares the
equilateral plane numbers, were called by us lengths or magnitudes;
and the lines which are the roots of (or whose squares are equal to)
the oblong numbers, were called powers or roots; the reason of this
latter name being, that they are commensurable with the former
[i.e., with the so-called lengths or magnitudes] not in linear
measurement, but in the value of the superficial content of their
squares; and the same about solids.

  Soc. Excellent, my boys; I think that you fully justify the
praises of Theodorus, and that he will not be found guilty of false
witness.

  Theaet. But I am unable, Socrates, to give you a similar answer
about knowledge, which is what you appear to want; and therefore
Theodorus is a deceiver after all.

  Soc. Well, but if some one were to praise you for running, and to
say that he never met your equal among boys, and afterwards you were
beaten in a race by a grown-up man, who was a great runner-would the
praise be any the less true?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. And is the discovery of the nature of knowledge so small a
matter, as just now said? Is it not one which would task the powers of
men perfect in every way?

  Theaet. By heaven, they should be the top of all perfection!

   Soc. Well, then, be of good cheer; do not say that Theodorus was
mistaken about you, but do your best to ascertain the true nature of
knowledge, as well as of other things.

  Theaet. I am eager enough, Socrates, if that would bring to light
the truth.

  Soc. Come, you made a good beginning just now; let your own answer
about roots be your model, and as you comprehended them all in one
class, try and bring the many sorts of knowledge under one definition.

  Theaet. I can assure you, Socrates, that I have tried very often,
when the report of questions asked by you was brought to me; but I can
neither persuade myself that I have a satisfactory answer to give, nor
hear of any one who answers as you would have him; and I cannot
shake off a feeling of anxiety.

  Soc. These are the pangs of labour, my dear Theaetetus; you have
something within you which you are bringing to the birth.

  Theaet. I do not know, Socrates; I only say what I feel.

  Soc. And have you never heard, simpleton, that I am the son of a
midwife, brave and burly, whose name was Phaenarete?

  Theaet. Yes, I have.

  Soc. And that I myself practise midwifery?

  Theaet. No, never.

  Soc. Let me tell you that I do though, my friend: but you must not
reveal the secret, as the world in general have not found me out;
and therefore they only say of me, that I am the strangest of
mortals and drive men to their wits' end. Did you ever hear that too?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Shall I tell you the reason?

  Theaet. By all means.

  Soc. Bear in mind the whole business of the mid-wives, and then
you will see my meaning better:-No woman, as you are probably aware,
who is still able to conceive and bear, attends other women, but
only those who are past bearing.

  Theaet. Yes; I know.

  Soc. The reason of this is said to be that Artemis-the goddess of
childbirth-is not a mother, and she honours those who are like
herself; but she could not allow the barren to be mid-wives, because
human nature cannot know the mystery of an art without experience; and
therefore she assigned this office to those who are too old to bear.

  Theaet. I dare say.

  Soc. And I dare say too, or rather I am absolutely certain, that the
mid-wives know better than others who is pregnant and who is not?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. And by the use of potions and incantations they are able to
arouse the pangs and to soothe them at will; they can make those
bear who have a difficulty in bearing, and if they think fit they
can smother the embryo in the womb.

  Theaet. They can.

  Soc. Did you ever remark that they are also most cunning
matchmakers, and have a thorough knowledge of what unions are likely
to produce a brave brood?

  Theaet. No, never.

  Soc. Then let me tell you that this is their greatest pride, more
than cutting the umbilical cord. And if you reflect, you will see that
the same art which cultivates and gathers in the fruits of the
earth, will be most likely to know in what soils the several plants or
seeds should be deposited.

  Theaet. Yes, the same art.

  Soc. And do you suppose that with women the case is otherwise?

  Theaet. I should think not.

  Soc. Certainly not; but mid-wives are respectable women who have a
character to lose, and they avoid this department of their profession,
because they are afraid of being called procuresses, which is a name
given to those who join together man and woman in an unlawful and
unscientific way; and yet the true midwife is also the true and only
matchmaker.

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. Such are the mid-wives, whose task is a very important one
but not so important as mine; for women do not bring into the world at
one time real children, and at another time counterfeits which are
with difficulty distinguished from them; if they did, then the,
discernment of the true and false birth would be the crowning
achievement of the art of midwifery-you would think so?

  Theaet. Indeed I should.

  Soc. Well, my art of midwifery is in most respects like theirs;
but differs, in that I attend men and not women; and look after
their souls when they are in labour, and not after their bodies: and
the triumph of my art is in thoroughly examining whether the thought
which the mind of the young man brings forth is a false idol or a
noble and true birth. And like the mid-wives, I am barren, and the
reproach which is often made against me, that I ask questions of
others and have not the wit to answer them myself, is very just-the
reason is, that the god compels-me to be a midwife, but does not allow
me to bring forth. And therefore I am not myself at all wise, nor have
I anything to show which is the invention or birth of my own soul, but
those who converse with me profit. Some of them appear dull enough
at first, but afterwards, as our acquaintance ripens, if the god is
gracious to them, they all make astonishing progress; and this in
the opinion of others as well as in their own. It is quite dear that
they never learned anything from me; the many fine discoveries to
which they cling are of their own making. But to me and the god they
owe their delivery. And the proof of my words is, that many of them in
their ignorance, either in their self-conceit despising me, or falling
under the influence of others, have gone away too soon; and have not
only lost the children of whom I had previously delivered them by an
ill bringing up, but have stifled whatever else they had in them by
evil communications, being fonder of lies and shams than of the truth;
and they have at last ended by seeing themselves, as others see
them, to be great fools. Aristeides, the son of Lysimachus, is one
of them, and there are many others. The truants often return to me,
and beg that I would consort with them again-they are ready to go to
me on their knees and then, if my familiar allows, which is not always
the case, I receive them, and they begin to grow again. Dire are the
pangs which my art is able to arouse and to allay in those who consort
with me, just like the pangs of women in childbirth; night and day
they are full of perplexity and travail which is even worse than
that of the women. So much for them. And there are -others,
Theaetetus, who come to me apparently having nothing in them; and as I
know that they have no need of my art, I coax them into marrying
some one, and by the grace of God I can generally tell who is likely
to do them good. Many of them I have given away to Prodicus, and
many to other inspired sages. I tell you this long story, friend
Theaetetus, because I suspect, as indeed you seem to think yourself,
that you are in labour-great with some conception. Come then to me,
who am a midwife's son and myself a midwife, and do your best to
answer the questions which I will ask you. And if I abstract and
expose your first-born, because I discover upon inspection that the
conception which you have formed is a vain shadow, do not quarrel with
me on that account, as the manner of women is when their first
children are taken from them. For I have actually known some who
were ready to bite me when I deprived them of a darling folly; they
did not perceive that I acted from good will, not knowing that no
god is the enemy of man-that was not within the range of their
ideas; neither am I their enemy in all this, but it would be wrong for
me to admit falsehood, or to stifle the truth. Once more, then,
Theaetetus, I repeat my old question, "What is knowledge?"-and do
not say that you cannot tell; but quit yourself like a man, and by the
help of God you will be able to tell.

  Theaet. At any rate, Socrates, after such an exhortation I should be
ashamed of not trying to do my best. Now he who knows perceives what
he knows, and, as far as I can see at present, knowledge is
perception.

  Soc. Bravely said, boy; that is the way in which you should
express your opinion. And now, let us examine together this conception
of yours, and see whether it is a true birth or a mere,
wind-egg:-You say that knowledge is perception?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Well, you have delivered yourself of a very important
doctrine about knowledge; it is indeed the opinion of Protagoras,
who has another way of expressing it, Man, he says, is the measure
of all things, of the existence of things that are, and of the
non-existence of things that are not:-You have read him?

  Theaet. O yes, again and again.

  Soc. Does he not say that things are to you such as they appear to
you, and to me such as they appear to me, and that you and I are men?

  Theaet. Yes, he says so.

  Soc. A wise man is not likely to talk nonsense. Let us try to
understand him: the same wind is blowing, and yet one of us may be
cold and the other not, or one may be slightly and the other very
cold?

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Soc. Now is the wind, regarded not in relation to us but absolutely,
cold or not; or are we to say, with Protagoras, that the wind is
cold to him who is cold, and not to him who is not?

  Theaet. I suppose the last.

  Soc. Then it must appear so to each of them?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And "appears to him" means the same as "he perceives."

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Then appearing and perceiving coincide in the case of hot and
cold, and in similar instances; for things appear, or may be
supposed to be, to each one such as he perceives them?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Then perception is always of existence, and being the same as
knowledge is unerring?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. In the name of the Graces, what an almighty wise man Protagoras
must have been! He spoke these things in a parable to the common herd,
like you and me, but told the truth, his Truth, in secret to his own
disciples.

  Theaet. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I am about to speak of a high argument, in which all things are
said to be relative; you cannot rightly call anything by any name,
such as great or small, heavy or light, for the great will be small
and the heavy light-there is no single thing or quality, but out of
motion and change and admixture all things are becoming relatively
to one another, which "becoming" is by us incorrectly called being,
but is really becoming, for nothing ever is, but all things are
becoming. Summon all philosophers-Protagoras, Heracleitus, Empedocles,
and the rest of them, one after another, and with the exception of
Parmenides they will agree with you in this. Summon the great
masters of either kind of poetry-Epicharmus, the prince of Comedy, and
Homer of Tragedy; when the latter sings of

     Ocean whence sprang the gods, and mother Tethys,

does he not mean that all things are the offspring, of flux and
motion?

  Theaet. I think so.

  Soc. And who could take up arms against such a great army having
Homer for its general, and not appear ridiculous?

  Theaet. Who indeed, Socrates?

  Soc. Yes, Theaetetus; and there are plenty of other proofs which
will show that motion is the source of what is called being and
becoming, and inactivity of not-being and destruction; for fire and
warmth, which are supposed to be the parent and guardian of all
other things, are born of movement and friction, which is a kind of
motion;-is not this the origin of fire?

  Theaet. It is.

  Soc. And the race of animals is generated in the same way?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And is not the bodily habit spoiled by rest and idleness, but
preserved for a long time by motion and exercise?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And what of the mental habit? Is not the soul informed, and
improved, and preserved by study and attention, which are motions; but
when at rest, which in the soul only means want of attention and
study, is uninformed, and speedily forgets whatever she has learned?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Then motion is a good, and rest an evil, to the soul as well as
to the body?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. I may add, that breathless calm, stillness and the like waste
and impair, while wind and storm preserve; and the palmary argument of
all, which I strongly urge, is the golden chain in Homer, by which
he means the sun, thereby indicating that so long as the sun and the
heavens go round in their orbits, all things human and divine are
and are preserved, but if they were chained up and their motions
ceased, then all things would be destroyed, and, as the saying is,
turned upside down.

  Theaet. I believe, Socrates, that you have truly explained his
meaning.

  Soc. Then now apply his doctrine to perception, my good friend,
and first of all to vision; that which you call white colour is not in
your eyes, and is not a distinct thing which exists out of them. And
you must not assign any place to it: for if it had position it would
be, and be at rest, and there would be no process of becoming.

  Theaet. Then what is colour?

  Soc. Let us carry the principle which has just been affirmed, that
nothing is self-existent, and then we shall see that white, black, and
every other colour, arises out of the eye meeting the appropriate
motion, and that what we call a colour is in each case neither the
active nor the passive element, but something which passes between
them, and is peculiar to each percipient; are you quite certain that
the several colours appear to a dog or to any animal whatever as
they appear to you?

  Theaet. Far from it.

  Soc. Or that anything appears the same to you as to another man? Are
you so profoundly convinced of this? Rather would it not be true
that it never appears exactly the same to you, because you are never
exactly the same?

  Theaet. The latter.

  Soc. And if that with which I compare myself in size, or which I
apprehend by touch, were great or white or hot, it could not become
different by mere contact with another unless it actually changed; nor
again, if the comparing or apprehending subject were great or white or
hot, could this, when unchanged from within become changed by any
approximation or affection of any other thing. The fact is that in our
ordinary way of speaking we allow ourselves to be driven into most
ridiculous and wonderful contradictions, as Protagoras and all who
take his line of argument would remark.

  Theaet. How? and of what sort do you mean?

  Soc. A little instance will sufficiently explain my meaning: Here
are six dice, which are more by a half when compared with four, and
fewer by a half than twelve-they are more and also fewer. How can
you or any one maintain the contrary?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. Well, then, suppose that Protagoras or some one asks whether
anything can become greater or more if not by increasing, how would
you answer him, Theaetetus?

  Theaet. I should say "No," Socrates, if I were to speak my mind in
reference to this last question, and if I were not afraid of
contradicting my former answer.

  Soc. Capital excellent! spoken like an oracle, my boy! And if you
reply "Yes," there will be a case for Euripides; for our tongue will
be unconvinced, but not our mind.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. The thoroughbred Sophists, who know all that can be known about
the mind, and argue only out of the superfluity of their wits, would
have had a regular sparring-match over this, and would -have knocked
their arguments together finely. But you and I, who have no
professional aims, only desire to see what is the mutual relation of
these principles-whether they are consistent with each or not.

  Theaet. Yes, that would be my desire.

  Soc. And mine too. But since this is our feeling, and there is
plenty of time, why should we not calmly and patiently review our
own thoughts, and thoroughly examine and see what these appearances in
us really are? If I am not mistaken, they will be described by us as
follows:-first, that nothing can become greater or less, either in
number or magnitude, while remaining equal to itself-you would agree?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Secondly, that without addition or subtraction there is no
increase or diminution of anything, but only equality.

  Theaet. Quite true.

  Soc. Thirdly, that what was not before cannot be afterwards, without
becoming and having become.

  Theaet. Yes, truly.

  Soc. These three axioms, if I am not mistaken, are fighting with one
another in our minds in the case of the dice, or, again, in such a
case as this-if I were to say that I, who am of a certain height and
taller than you, may within a year, without gaining or losing in
height, be not so tall-not that I should have lost, but that you would
have increased. In such a case, I am afterwards what I once was not,
and yet I have not become; for I could not have become without
becoming, neither could I have become less without losing somewhat
of my height; and I could give you ten thousand examples of similar
contradictions, if we admit them at all. I believe that you follow me,
Theaetetus; for I suspect that you have thought of these questions
before now.

  Theaet. Yes, Socrates, and I am amazed when I think of them; by
the Gods I am! and I want to know what on earth they mean; and there
are times when my head quite swims with the contemplation of them.

  Soc. I see, my dear Theaetetus, that Theodorus had a true insight
into your nature when he said that you were a philosopher, for
wonder is the feeling of a philosopher, and philosophy begins in
wonder. He was not a bad genealogist who said that Iris (the messenger
of heaven) is the child of Thaumas (wonder). But do you begin to see
what is the explanation of this perplexity on the hypothesis which
we attribute to Protagoras?

  Theaet. Not as yet.

  Soc. Then you will be obliged to me if I help you to unearth the
hidden "truth" of a famous man or school.

  Theaet. To be sure, I shall be very much obliged.

  Soc. Take a look round, then, and see that none of the uninitiated
are listening. Now by the uninitiated I mean: the people who believe
in nothing but what they can grasp in their hands, and who will not
allow that action or generation or anything invisible can have real
existence.

  Theaet. Yes, indeed, Socrates, they are very hard and impenetrable
mortals.

  Soc. Yes, my boy, outer barbarians. Far more ingenious are the
brethren whose mysteries I am about to reveal to you. Their first
principle is, that all is motion, and upon this all the affections
of which we were just now speaking, are supposed to depend: there is
nothing but motion, which has two forms, one active and the other
passive, both in endless number; and out of the union and friction
of them there is generated a progeny endless in number, having two
forms, sense and the object of sense, which are ever breaking forth
and coming to the birth at the same moment. The senses are variously
named hearing, seeing, smelling; there is the sense of heat, cold,
pleasure, pain, desire, fear, and many more which have names, as
well as innumerable others which are without them; each has its
kindred object each variety of colour has a corresponding variety of
sight, and so with sound and hearing, and with the rest of the
senses and the objects akin to them. Do you see, Theaetetus, the
bearings of this tale on the preceding argument?

  Theaet. Indeed I do not.

  Soc. Then attend, and I will try to finish the story. The purport is
that all these things are in motion, as I was saying, and that this
motion is of two kinds, a slower and a quicker; and the slower
elements have their motions in the same place and with reference to
things near them, and so they beget; but what is begotten is
swifter, for it is carried to fro, and moves from place to place.
Apply this to sense:-When the eye and the appropriate object meet
together and give birth to whiteness and the sensation connatural with
it, which could not have been given by either of them going elsewhere,
then, while the sight: is flowing from the eye, whiteness proceeds
from the object which combines in producing the colour; and so the eye
is fulfilled with sight, and really sees, and becomes, not sight,
but a seeing eye; and the object which combined to form the colour
is fulfilled with whiteness, and becomes not whiteness but a white
thing, whether wood or stone or whatever the object may be which
happens to be colour,ed white. And this is true of all sensible
objects, hard, warm, and the like, which are similarly to be regarded,
as I was saying before, not as having any absolute existence, but as
being all of them of whatever kind. generated by motion in their
intercourse with one another; for of the agent and patient, as
existing in separation, no trustworthy conception, as they say, can be
formed, for the agent has no existence until united; with the patient,
and the patient has no existence until united with the agent; and that
which by uniting with something becomes an agent, by meeting with some
other thing is converted into a patient. And from all these
considerations, as I said at first, there arises a general reflection,
that there is no one self-existent thing, but everything is becoming
and in relation; and being must be altogether abolished, although from
habit and ignorance we are compelled even in this discussion to retain
the use of the term. But great philosophers tell us that we are not to
allow either the word "something," or "belonging to something," or "to
me," or "this," or "that," or any other detaining name to be used,
in the language of nature all things are being created and
destroyed, coming into being and passing into new forms; nor can any
name fix or detain them; he who attempts to fix them is easily
refuted. And this should be the way of speaking, not only of
particulars but of aggregates such aggregates as are expressed in
the word "man," or "stone," or any name of animal or of a class. O
Theaetetus, are not these speculations sweet as honey? And do you
not like the taste of them in the mouth?

  Theaet. I do not know what to say, Socrates, for, indeed, I cannot
make out whether you are giving your own opinion or only wanting to
draw me out.

  Soc. You forget, my friend, that I neither know, nor profess to
know, anything of! these matters; you are the person who is in labour,
I am the barren midwife; and this is why I soothe you, and offer you
one good thing after another, that you may taste them. And I hope that
I may at last help to bring your own opinion into the light of day:
when this has been accomplished, then we will determine whether what
you have brought forth is only a wind-egg or a real and genuine birth.
Therefore, keep up your spirits, and answer like a man what you think.

  Theaet. Ask me.

  Soc. Then once more: Is it your opinion that nothing is but what
becomes? the good and the noble, as well; as all the other things
which we were just now mentioning?

  Theaet. When I hear you discoursing in this style, I think that
there is a great deal in what you say, and I am very ready to
assent. Soc. Let us not leave the argument unfinished, then; for there
still remains to be considered an objection which may be raised
about dreams and diseases, in particular about madness, and the
various illusions of hearing and sight, or of other senses. For you
know that in all these cases the esse-percipi theory appears to be
unmistakably refuted, since in dreams and illusions we certainly
have false perceptions; and far from saying that everything is which
appears, we should rather say that nothing is which appears.

  Theaet. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. But then, my boy, how can any one contend that knowledge is
perception, or that to every man what appears is?

  Theaet. I am afraid to say, Socrates, that I have nothing to answer,
because you rebuked me just now for making this excuse; but I
certainly cannot undertake to argue that madmen or dreamers think
truly, when they imagine, some of them that they are gods, and
others that they can fly, and are flying in their sleep.

  Soc. Do you see another question which can be raised about these
phenomena, notably about dreaming and waking?

  Theaet. What question?

  Soc. A question which I think that you must often have heard persons
ask:-How can you determine whether at this moment we are sleeping, and
all our thoughts are a dream; or whether we are awake, and talking
to one another in the waking state?

  Theaet. Indeed, Socrates, I do not know how to prove the one any
more than the other, for in both cases the facts precisely
correspond;-and there is no difficulty in supposing that during all
this discussion we have been talking to one another in a dream; and
when in a dream we seem to be narrating dreams, the resemblance of the
two states is quite astonishing.

  Soc. You see, then, that a doubt about the reality of sense is
easily raised, since there may even be a doubt whether we are awake or
in a dream. And as our time is equally divided between sleeping and
waking, in either sphere of existence the soul contends that the
thoughts which are present to our minds at the time are true; and
during one half of our lives we affirm the truth of the one, and,
during the other half, of the other; and are equally confident of
both.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Soc. And may not the same be said of madness and other disorders?
the difference is only that the times are not equal.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And is truth or falsehood to be determined by duration of time?

  Theaet. That would be in many ways ridiculous.

  Soc. But can you certainly determine: by any other means which of
these opinions is true?

  Theaet. I do not think that I can.

  Soc. Listen, then to a statement of the other side of the
argument, which is made by the champions of appearance. They would
say, as I imagine-can that which is wholly other than something,
have the same quality as that from which it differs? and observe,
-Theaetetus, that the word "other" means not "partially," but
"wholly other."

  Theaet. Certainly, putting the question as you do, that which is
wholly other cannot either potentially or in any other way be the
same.

  Soc. And must therefore be admitted to be unlike?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. If, then, anything happens to become like or unlike itself or
another, when it becomes like we call it the same-when unlike, other?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Were we not saying that there. are agents many and infinite,
and patients many and infinite?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And also that different combinations will produce results which
are not the same, but different?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Let us take you and me, or anything as an example:-There is
Socrates in health, and Socrates sick-Are they like or unlike?

  Theaet. You mean to, compare Socrates in health as a whole, and
Socrates in sickness as a whole?

  Soc. Exactly; that is my meaning.

  Theaet. I answer, they are unlike.

  Soc. And if unlike, they are other?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And would you not say the same of Socrates sleeping and waking,
or in any of the states which we were mentioning?

  Theaet. I should.

  Soc. All agents have a different patient in Socrates, accordingly as
he is well or ill.

  Theaet. Of course.

  Soc. And I who am the patient, and that which is the agent, will
produce something different in each of the two cases?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. The wine which I drink when I am in health, appears sweet and
pleasant to me?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. For, as has been already acknowledged, the patient and agent
meet together and produce sweetness and a perception of sweetness,
which are in simultaneous motion, and the perception which comes
from the patient makes the tongue percipient, and the quality of
sweetness which arises out of and is moving about the wine, makes
the wine, both to be and to appear sweet to the healthy tongue.

  Theaet. Certainly; that has been already acknowledged.

  Soc. But when I am sick, the wine really acts upon another and a
different person?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. The combination of the draught of wine, and the Socrates who is
sick, produces quite another result; which is the sensation of
bitterness in the tongue, and the, motion and creation of bitterness
in and about the wine, which becomes not bitterness but something
bitter; as I myself become not but percipient?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. There is no, other object of which I shall ever have the same
perception, for another object would give another perception, and
would make the perception other and different; nor can that object
which affects me, meeting another, subject, produce, the same, or
become similar, for that too would produce another result from another
subject, and become different.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Neither can by myself, have this sensation, nor the object by
itself, this quality.

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. When I perceive I must become percipient of something-there can
be no such thing as perceiving and perceiving nothing; the object,
whether it become sweet, bitter, or of any other quality, must have
relation to a percipient; nothing can become sweet which is sweet to
no one.

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. Then the inference is, that we [the agent and patient] are or
become in relation to one another; there is a law which binds us one
to the other, but not to any other existence, nor each of us to
himself; and therefore we can only be bound to one another; so that
whether a person says that a thing is or becomes, he must say that
it is or becomes to or of or in relation to something else; but he
must not say or allow any one else to say that anything is or
becomes absolutely: -such is our conclusion.

  Theaet. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. Then, if that which acts upon me has relation to me and to no
other, I and no other am the percipient of it?

  Theaet. Of course.

  Soc. Then my perception is true to me, being inseparable from my own
being; and, as Protagoras says, to myself I am judge of what is
and-what is not to me.

  Theaet. I suppose so.

  Soc. How then, if I never err, and if my mind never trips in the
conception of being or becoming, can I fail of knowing that which I
perceive?

  Theaet. You cannot.

  Soc. Then you were quite right in affirming that knowledge is only
perception; and the meaning turns out to be the same, whether with
Homer and Heracleitus, and all that company, you say that all is
motion and flux, or with the great sage Protagoras, that man is the
measure of all things; or with Theaetetus, that, given these premises,
perception is knowledge. Am I not right, Theaetetus, and is not this
your newborn child, of which I have delivered you? What say you?

  Theaet. I cannot but agree, Socrates.

  Soc. Then this is the child, however he may turn out, which you
and I have with difficulty brought into the world. And now that he
is born, we must run round the hearth with him, and see whether he
is worth rearing, or is only a wind-egg and a sham. Is he to be reared
in any case, and not exposed? or will you bear to see him rejected,
and not get into a passion if I take away your first-born?

  Theod. Theaetetus will not be angry, for he is very good-natured.
But tell me, Socrates, in heaven's name, is this, after all, not the
truth?

  Soc. You, Theodorus, are a lover of theories, and now you innocently
fancy that I am a bag full of them, and can easily pull one out
which will overthrow its predecessor. But you do not see that in
reality none of these theories come from me; they all come from him
who talks with me. I only know just enough to extract them from the
wisdom of another, and to receive them in a spirit of fairness. And
now I shall say nothing myself, but shall endeavour to elicit
something from our young friend.

  Theod. Do as you say, Socrates; you are quite right.

  Soc. Shall I tell you, Theodorus, what amazes me in your
acquaintance Protagoras?

  Theod. What is it?

  Soc. I am charmed with his doctrine, that what appears is to each
one, but I wonder that he did not begin his book on Truth with a
declaration that a pig or a dog-faced baboon, or some other yet
stranger monster which has sensation, is the measure of all things;
then he might have shown a magnificent contempt for our opinion of him
by informing us at the outset that while we were reverencing him
like a God for his wisdom he was no better than a tadpole, not to
speak of his fellow-men-would not this have produced an
over-powering effect? For if truth is only sensation, and no man can
discern another's feelings better than he, or has any superior right
to determine whether his opinion is true or false, but each, as we
have several times repeated, is to himself the sole judge, and
everything that he judges is true and right, why, my friend, should
Protagoras be preferred to the place of wisdom and instruction, and
deserve to be well paid, and we poor ignoramuses have to go to him, if
each one is the measure of his own wisdom? Must he not be talking ad
captandum in all this? I say nothing of the ridiculous predicament
in which my own midwifery and the whole art of dialectic is placed;
for the attempt to supervise or refute the notions or opinions of
others would be a tedious and enormous piece of folly, if to each
man his own are right; and this must be the case if Protagoras Truth
is the real truth, and the philosopher is not merely amusing himself
by giving oracles out of the shrine of his book.

  Theod. He was a friend of mine, Socrates, as you were saying, and
therefore I cannot have him refuted by my lips, nor can I oppose you
when I agree with you; please, then, to take Theaetetus again; he
seemed to answer very nicely.

  Soc. If you were to go into a Lacedaemonian palestra, Theodorus,
would you have a right to look on at the naked wrestlers, some of them
making a poor figure, if you did not strip and give them an
opportunity of judging of your own person?

  Theod. Why not, Socrates, if they would allow me, as I think you
will in consideration of my age and stiffness; let some more supple
youth try a fall with you, and do not drag me into the gymnasium.

  Soc. Your will is my will, Theodorus, as the proverbial philosophers
say, and therefore I will return to the sage Theaetetus: Tell me,
Theaetetus, in reference to what I was saying, are you not lost in
wonder, like myself, when you find that all of a sudden you are raised
to the level of the wisest of men, or indeed of the gods?-for you
would assume the measure of Protagoras to apply to the gods as well as
men?

  Theaet. Certainly I should, and I confess to you that I am lost in
wonder. At first hearing, I was quite satisfied with the doctrine,
that whatever appears is to each one, but now the face of things has
changed.

  Soc. Why, my dear boy, you are young, and therefore your ear is
quickly caught and your mind influenced by popular arguments.
Protagoras, or some one speaking on his behalf, will doubtless say
in reply, good people, young and old, you meet and harangue, and bring
in the gods, whose existence of non-existence I banish from writing
and speech, or you talk about the reason of man being degraded to
the level of the brutes, which is a telling argument with the
multitude, but not one word of proof or demonstration do you offer.
All is probability with you, and yet surely you and Theodorus had
better reflect whether you are disposed to admit of probability and
figures of speech in matters of such importance. He or any other
mathematician who argued from probabilities and likelihoods in
geometry, would not be worth an ace.

  Theaet. But neither you nor we, Socrates, would be satisfied with
such arguments.

  Soc. Then you and Theodorus mean to say that we must look at the
matter in some other way?

  Theaet. Yes, in quite another way.

  Soc. And the way will be to ask whether perception is or is not
the same as knowledge; for this was the real point of our argument,
and with a view to this we raised (did we not?) those many strange
questions.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Shall we say that we know every thing which we see and hear?
for example, shall we say that not having learned, we do not hear
the language of foreigners when they speak to us? or shall we say that
we not only hear, but know what they are saying? Or again, if we see
letters which we do not understand, shall we say that we do not see
them? or shall we aver that, seeing them, we must know them?

  Theaet. We shall say, Socrates, that we know what we actually see
and hear of them-that is to say, we see and know the figure and colour
of the letters, and we hear and know the elevation or depression of
the sound of them; but we do not perceive by sight and hearing, or
know, that which grammarians and interpreters teach about them.

  Soc. Capital, Theaetetus; and about this there shall be no
dispute, because I want you to grow; but there is another difficulty
coming, which you will also have to repulse.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Soc. Some one will say, Can a man who has ever known anything, and
still has and preserves a memory of that which he knows, not know that
which he remembers at the time when he remembers? I have, I fear, a
tedious way of putting a simple question, which is only, whether a man
who has learned, and remembers, can fail to know?

  Theaet. Impossible, Socrates; the supposition is monstrous.

  Soc. Am I talking nonsense, then? Think: is not seeing perceiving,
and is not sight perception?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And if our recent definition holds, every man knows that
which he has seen?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And you would admit that there is such a thing as memory?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And is memory of something or of nothing?

  Theaet. Of something, surely.

  Soc. Of things learned and perceived, that is?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Often a man remembers that which he has seen?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And if he closed his eyes, would he forget?

  Theaet. Who, Socrates, would dare to say so?

  Soc. But we must say so, if the previous argument is to be
maintained.

  Theaet. What do you mean? I am not quite sure that I understand you,
though I have a strong suspicion that you are right.

  Soc. As thus: he who sees knows, as we say, that which he sees;
for perception and sight and knowledge are admitted to be the same.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. But he who saw, and has knowledge of that which he saw,
remembers, when he closes his eyes, that which he no longer sees.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And seeing is knowing, and therefore not-seeing is not-knowing?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. Then the inference is, that a man may have attained the
knowledge, of something, which he may remember and yet not know,
because he does not see; and this has been affirmed by us to be a
monstrous supposition.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Soc. Thus, then, the assertion that knowledge and perception are
one, involves a manifest impossibility?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Then they must be distinguished?

  Theaet. I suppose that they must.

  Soc. Once more we shall have to begin, and ask "What is
knowledge?" and yet, Theaetetus, what are we going to do?

  Theaet. About what?

  Soc. Like a good-for-nothing cock, without having won the victory,
we walk away from the argument and crow.

  Theaet. How do you mean?

  Soc. After the manner of disputers, we were satisfied with mere
verbal consistency, and were well pleased if in this way we could gain
an advantage. Although professing not to be mere Eristics, but
philosophers, I suspect that we have unconsciously fallen into the
error of that ingenious class of persons.

  Theaet. I do not as yet understand you.

  Soc. Then I will try to explain myself: just now we asked the
question, whether a man who had learned and remembered could fail to
know, and we showed that a person who had seen might remember when
he had his eyes shut and could not see, and then he would at the
same time remember and not know. But this was an impossibility. And so
the Protagorean fable came to nought, and yours also, who maintained
that knowledge is the same as perception.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And yet, my friend, I rather suspect that the result would have
been different if Protagoras, who was the father of the first of the
two-brats, had been alive; he would have had a great deal to say on
their behalf. But he is dead, and we insult over his orphan child; and
even the guardians whom he left, and of whom our friend Theodorus is
one, are unwilling to give any help, and therefore I suppose that must
take up his cause myself, and see justice done?

  Theod. Not I, Socrates, but rather Callias, the son of Hipponicus,
is guardian of his orphans. I was too soon diverted from the
abstractions of dialectic to geometry. Nevertheless, I shall be
grateful to you if you assist him.

  Soc. Very good, Theodorus; you shall see how I will come to the
rescue. If a person does not attend to the meaning of terms as they
are commonly used in argument, he may be involved even in greater
paradoxes than these. Shall I explain this matter to you or to
Theaetetus?

  Theod. To both of us, and let the younger answer; he will incur less
disgrace if he is discomfited.

  Soc. Then now let me ask the awful question, which is this:-Can a
man know and also not know that which he knows?

  Theod. How shall we answer, Theaetetus?

  Theaet. He cannot, I should say.

  Soc. He can, if you maintain that seeing is knowing. When you are
imprisoned in a well, as the saying is, and the self-assured adversary
closes one of your eyes with his hand, and asks whether you can see
his cloak with the eye which he has closed, how will you answer the
inevitable man?

  Theaet. I should answer, "Not with that eye but with the other."

  Soc. Then you see and do not see the same thing at the same time.

  Theaet. Yes, in a certain sense.

  Soc. None of that, he will reply; I do not ask or bid you answer
in what sense you know, but only whether you know that which you do
not know. You have been proved to see that which you do not see; and
you have already admitted that seeing is knowing, and that
not-seeing is not-knowing: I leave you to draw the inference.

  Theaet. Yes, the inference is the contradictory of my assertion.

  Soc. Yes, my marvel, and there might have been yet worse things in
store for you, if an opponent had gone on to ask whether you can
have a sharp and also a dull knowledge, and whether you can know near,
but not at a distance, or know the same thing with more or less
intensity, and so on without end. Such questions might have been put
to you by a light-armed mercenary, who argued for pay. He would have
lain in wait for you, and when you took up the position, that sense is
knowledge, he would have made an assault upon hearing, smelling, and
the other senses;-he would have shown you no mercy; and while you were
lost in envy and admiration of his wisdom, he would have got you
into his net, out of which you would not have escaped until you had
come to an understanding about the sum to be paid for your release.
Well, you ask, and how will Protagoras reinforce his position? Shall I
answer for him?

  Theaet. By all means.

  Soc. He will repeat all those things which we have been urging on
his behalf, and then he will close with us in disdain, and say:-The
worthy Socrates asked a little boy, whether the same man could
remember and not know the same thing, and the boy said No, because
he was frightened, and could not see what was coming, and then
Socrates made fun of poor me. The truth is, O slatternly Socrates,
that when you ask questions about any assertion of mine, and the
person asked is found tripping, if he has answered as I should have
answered, then I am refuted, but if he answers something else, then he
is refuted and not I. For do you really suppose that any one would
admit the memory which a man has of an impression which has passed
away to be the same with that which he experienced at the time?
Assuredly not. Or would he hesitate to acknowledge that the same man
may know and not know the same thing? Or, if he is afraid of making
this admission, would he ever grant that one who has become unlike
is the same as before he became unlike? Or would he admit that a man
is one at all, and not rather many and infinite as the changes which
take place in him? I speak by the card in order to avoid entanglements
of words. But, O my good sir, he would say, come to the argument in
a more generous spirit; and either show, if you can, that our
sensations are not relative and individual, or, if you admit them to
be so, prove that this does not involve the consequence that the
appearance becomes, or, if you will have the word, is, to the
individual only. As to your talk about pigs and baboons, you are
yourself behaving like a pig, and you teach your hearers to make sport
of my writings in the same ignorant manner; but this is not to your
credit. For I declare that the truth is as I have written, and that
each of us is a measure of existence and of non-existence. Yet one man
may be a thousand times better than another in proportion as different
things are and appear to him.

  And I am far from saying that wisdom and the wise man have no
existence; but I say that the wise man is he who makes the evils which
appear and are to a man, into goods which are and appear to him. And I
would beg you not to my words in the letter, but to take the meaning
of them as I will explain them. Remember what has been already
said,-that to the sick man his food appears to be and is bitter, and
to the man in health the opposite of bitter. Now I cannot conceive
that one of these men can be or ought to be made wiser than the other:
nor can you assert that the sick man because he has one impression
is foolish, and the healthy man because he has another is wise; but
the one state requires to be changed into the other, the worse into
the better. As in education, a change of state has to be effected, and
the sophist accomplishes by words the change which the physician works
by the aid of drugs. Not that any one ever made another think truly,
who previously thought falsely. For no one can think what is not, or
think anything different from that which he feels; and this is
always true. But as the inferior habit of mind has thoughts of kindred
nature, so I conceive that a good mind causes men to have good
thoughts; and these which the inexperienced call true, I maintain to
be only better, and not truer than others. And, O my dear Socrates,
I do not call wise men tadpoles: far from it; I say that they are
the physicians of the human body, and the husbandmen of plants-for the
husbandmen also take away the evil and disordered sensations of
plants, and infuse into them good and healthy sensations-aye and
true ones; and the wise and good rhetoricians make the good instead of
the evil to seem just to states; for whatever appears to a state to be
just and fair, so long as it is regarded as such, is just and fair
to it; but the teacher of wisdom causes the good to take the place
of the evil, both in appearance and in reality. And in like manner the
Sophist who is able to train his pupils in this spirit is a wise
man, and deserves to be well paid by them. And so one man is wiser
than another; and no one thinks falsely, and you, whether you will
or not, must endure to be a measure. On these foundations the argument
stands firm, which you, Socrates, may, if you please, overthrow by
an opposite argument, or if you like you may put questions to me-a
method to which no intelligent person will object, quite the
reverse. But I must beg you to put fair questions: for there is
great inconsistency in saying that you have a zeal for virtue, and
then always behaving unfairly in argument. The unfairness of which I
complain is that you do not distinguish between mere disputation and
dialectic: the disputer may trip up his opponent as often as he likes,
and make fun; but the dialectician will be in earnest, and only
correct his adversary when necessary, telling him the errors into
which he has fallen through his own fault, or that of the company
which he has previously kept. If you do so, your adversary will lay
the blame of his own confusion and perplexity on himself, and not on
you; will follow and love you, and will hate himself, and escape
from himself into philosophy, in order that he may become different
from what he was. But the other mode of arguing, which is practised by
the many, will have just the opposite effect upon him; and as he grows
older, instead of turning philosopher, he will come to hate
philosophy. I would recommend you, therefore, as I said before, not to
encourage yourself in this polemical and controversial temper, but
to find out, in a friendly and congenial spirit, what we really mean
when we say that all things are in motion, and that to every
individual and state what appears, is. In this manner you will
consider whether knowledge and sensation are the same or different,
but you will not argue, as you were just now doing, from the customary
use of names and words, which the vulgar pervert in all sorts of ways,
causing infinite perplexity to one another. Such, Theodorus, is the
very slight help which I am able to offer to your old friend; had he
been living, he would have helped himself in a far more gloriose
style.

  Theod. You are jesting, Socrates; indeed, your defence of him has
been most valorous.

  Soc. Thank you, friend; and I hope that you observed Protagoras
bidding us be serious, as the text, "Man is the measure of all
things," was a solemn one; and he reproached us with making a boy
the medium of discourse, and said that the boy's timidity was made
to tell against his argument; he also declared that we made a joke
of him.

  Theod. How could I fail to observe all that, Socrates?

  Soc. Well, and shall we do as he says?

  Theod. By all means.

  Soc. But if his wishes are to be regarded, you and I must take up
the argument, and in all seriousness, and ask and answer one
another, for you see that the rest of us are nothing but boys. In no
other way can we escape the imputation, that in our fresh analysis
of his thesis we are making fun with boys.

  Theod. Well, but is not Theaetetus better able to follow a
philosophical enquiry than a great many men who have long beards?

  Soc. Yes, Theodorus, but not better than you; and therefore please
not to imagine that I am to defend by every means in my power your
departed friend; and that you are to defend nothing and nobody. At any
rate, my good man, do not sheer off until we know whether you are a
true measure of diagrams, or whether all men are equally measures
and sufficient for themselves in astronomy and geometry, and the other
branches of knowledge in which you are supposed to excel them.

  Theod. He who is sitting by you, Socrates, will not easily avoid
being drawn into an argument; and when I said just now that you
would excuse me, and not, like the Lacedaemonians, compel me to
strip and fight, I was talking nonsense-I should rather compare you to
Scirrhon, who threw travellers from the rocks; for the Lacedaemonian
rule is "strip or depart," but you seem to go about your work more
after the fashion of Antaeus: you will not allow any one who
approaches you to depart until you have stripped him, and he has
been compelled to try a fall with you in argument.

  Soc. There, Theodorus, you have hit off precisely the nature of my
complaint; but I am even more pugnacious than the giants of old, for I
have met with no end of heroes; many a Heracles, many a Theseus,
mighty in words, has broken my head; nevertheless I am always at
this rough exercise, which inspires me like a passion. Please, then,
to try a fall with me, whereby you will do yourself good as well as
me.

  Theod. I consent; lead me whither you will, for I know that you
are like destiny; no man can escape from any argument which you may
weave for him. But I am not disposed to go further than you suggest.

  Soc. Once will be enough; and now take particular care that we do
not again unwittingly expose ourselves to the reproach of talking
childishly.

  Theod. I will do my best to avoid that error.

  Soc. In the first place, let us return to our old objection, and see
whether we were right in blaming and taking offence at Protagoras on
the ground that he assumed all to be equal and sufficient in wisdom;
although he admitted that there was a better and worse, and that in
respect of this, some who as he said were the wise excelled others.

  Theod. Very true.

  Soc. Had Protagoras been living and answered for himself, instead of
our answering for him, there would have been no need of our
reviewing or reinforcing the argument. But as he is not here, and some
one may accuse us of speaking without authority on his behalf, had
we not better come to a clearer agreement about his meaning, for a
great deal may be at stake?

  Theod. True.

  Soc. Then let us obtain, not through any third person, but from
his own statement and in the fewest words possible, the basis of
agreement.

  Theod. In what way?

  Soc. In this way:-His words are, "What seems to a man, is to him."

  Theod. Yes, so he says.

  Soc. And are not we, Protagoras, uttering the opinion of man, or
rather of all mankind, when we say that every one thinks himself wiser
than other men in some things, and their inferior in others? In the
hour of danger, when they are in perils of war, or of the sea, or of
sickness, do they not look up to their commanders as if they were
gods, and expect salvation from them, only because they excel them
in knowledge? Is not the world full of men in their several
employments, who are looking for teachers and rulers of themselves and
of the animals? and there are plenty who think that they are able to
teach and able to rule. Now, in all this is implied that ignorance and
wisdom exist among them, least in their own opinion.

  Theod. Certainly.

  Soc. And wisdom is assumed by them to be true thought, and ignorance
to be false opinion.

  Theod. Exactly.

  Soc. How then, Protagoras, would you have us treat the argument?
Shall we say that the opinions of men are always true, or sometimes
true and sometimes false? In either case, the result is the same,
and their opinions are not always true, but sometimes true and
sometimes false. For tell me, Theodorus, do you suppose that you
yourself, or any other follower of Protagoras, would contend that no
one deems another ignorant or mistaken in his opinion?

  Theod. The thing is incredible, Socrates.

  Soc. And yet that absurdity is necessarily involved in the thesis
which declares man to be the measure of all things.

  Theod. How so?

  Soc. Why, suppose that you determine in your own mind something to
be true, and declare your opinion to me; let us assume, as he
argues, that this is true to you. Now, if so, you must either say that
the rest of us are not the judges of this opinion or judgment of
yours, or that we judge you always to have a true opinion: But are
there not thousands upon thousands who, whenever you form a
judgment, take up arms against you and are of an opposite judgment and
opinion, deeming that you judge falsely?

  Theod. Yes, indeed, Socrates, thousands and tens of thousands, as
Homer says, who give me a world of trouble.

  Soc. Well, but are we to assert that what you think is true to you
and false to the ten thousand others?

  Theod. No other inference seems to be possible.

  Soc. And how about Protagoras himself? If neither he nor the
multitude thought, as indeed they do not think, that man is the
measure of all things, must it not follow that the truth of which
Protagoras wrote would be true to no one? But if you suppose that he
himself thought this, and that the multitude does not agree with
him, you must begin by allowing that in whatever proportion the many
are more than one, in that proportion his truth is more untrue than
true.

  Theod. That would follow if the truth is supposed to vary with
individual opinion.

  Soc. And the best of the joke is, that he acknowledges the truth
of their opinion who believe his own opinion to be false; for he
admits that the opinions of all men are true.

  Theod. Certainly.

  Soc. And does he not allow that his own opinion is false, if he
admits that the opinion of those who think him false is true?

  Theod. Of course.

  Soc. Whereas the other side do not admit that they speak falsely?

  Theod. They do not.

  Soc. And he, as may be inferred from his writings, agrees that
this opinion is also true.

  Theod. Clearly.

  Soc. Then all mankind, beginning with Protagoras, will contend, or
rather, I should say that he will allow, when he concedes that his
adversary has a true opinion-Protagoras, I say, will himself allow
that neither a dog nor any ordinary man is the measure of anything
which he has not learned-am I not right?

  Theod. Yes.

  Soc. And the truth of Protagoras being doubted by all, will be
true neither to himself to any one else?

  Theod. I think, Socrates, that we are running my old friend too
hard.

  Soc. But do not know that we are going beyond the truth.
Doubtless, as he is older, he may be expected to be wiser than we are.
And if he could only just get his head out of the world below, he
would have overthrown both of us again and again, me for talking
nonsense and you for assenting to me, and have been off and
underground in a trice. But as he is not within call, we must make the
best use of our own faculties, such as they are, and speak out what
appears to us to be true. And one thing which no one will deny is,
that there are great differences in the understandings of men.

  Theod. In that opinion I quite agree.

  Soc. And is there not most likely to be firm ground in the
distinction which we were indicating on behalf of Protagoras, viz.,
that most things, and all immediate sensations, such as hot, dry,
sweet, are only such as they appear; if however difference of
opinion is to be allowed at all, surely we must allow it in respect of
health or disease? for every woman, child, or living creature has
not such a knowledge of what conduces to health as to enable them to
cure themselves.

  Theod. I quite agree.

  Soc. Or again, in politics, while affirming that just and unjust,
honourable and disgraceful, holy and unholy, are in reality to each
state such as the state thinks and makes lawful, and that in
determining these matters no individual or state is wiser than
another, still the followers of Protagoras will not deny that in
determining what is or is not expedient for the community one state is
wiser and one counsellor better that another-they will scarcely
venture to maintain, that what a city enacts in the belief that it
is expedient will always be really expedient. But in the other case, I
mean when they speak of justice and injustice, piety and impiety, they
are confident that in nature these have no existence or essence of
their own-the truth is that which is agreed on at the time of the
agreement, and as long as the agreement lasts; and this is the
philosophy of many who do not altogether go along with Protagoras.
Here arises a new question, Theodorus, which threatens to be more
serious than the last.

  Theod. Well, Socrates, we have plenty of leisure.

  Soc. That is true, and your remark recalls to my mind an observation
which I have often made, that those who have passed their days in
the pursuit of philosophy are ridiculously at fault when they have
to appear and speak in court. How natural is this!

  Theod. What do you mean?

  Soc. I mean to say, that those who have been trained in philosophy
and liberal pursuits are as unlike those who from their youth
upwards have been knocking about in the courts and such places, as a
freeman is in breeding unlike a slave.

  Theod. In what is the difference seen?

  Soc. In the leisure spoken of by you, which a freeman can always
command: he has his talk, out in peace, and, like ourselves, he
wanders at will from one subject to another, and from a second to a
third,-if the fancy takes him he begins again, as we are doing now,
caring not whether his words are many or few; his only aim is to
attain the truth. But the lawyer is always in a hurry; there is the
water of the clepsydra driving him on, and not allowing him to
expatiate at will: and there is his adversary standing over him,
enforcing his rights; the indictment, which in their phraseology is
termed the affidavit, is recited at the time: and from this he must
not deviate. He is a servant, and is continually disputing about a
fellow servant before his master, who is seated, and has the cause
in his hands; the trial is never about some indifferent matter, but
always concerns himself; and often the race is for his life. The
consequence has been, that he has become keen and shrewd; he has
learned how to flatter his master in word and indulge him in deed; but
his soul is small and unrighteous. His condition, which has been
that of a slave from his youth upwards, has deprived him of growth and
uprightness and independence; dangers and fears, which were too much
for his truth and honesty, came upon him in early years, when the
tenderness of youth was unequal to them, and he has been driven into
crooked ways; from the first he has practised deception and
retaliation, and has become stunted and warped. And so he has passed
out of youth into manhood, having no soundness in him; and is now,
as he thinks, a master in wisdom. Such is the lawyer, Theodorus.
Will you have the companion picture of the philosopher, who is of
our brotherhood; or shall we return to the argument? Do not let us
abuse the freedom of digression which we claim.

  Theod. Nay, Socrates, not until we have finished what we are
about; for you truly said that we belong to a brotherhood which is
free, and are not the servants of the argument; but the argument is
our servant, and must wait our leisure. Who is our judge? Or where
is the spectator having any right to censure or control us, as he
might the poets?

  Soc. Then, as this is your wish, I will describe the leaders; for
there is no use in talking about the inferior sort. In the first
place, the lords of philosophy have never, from their youth upwards,
known their way to the Agora, or the dicastery, or the council, or any
other political assembly; they neither see nor hear the laws or
decrees, as they are called, of the state written or recited; the
eagerness of political societies in the attainment of office-clubs,
and banquets, and revels, and singing-maidens,-do not enter even
into their dreams. Whether any event has turned out well or ill in the
city, what disgrace may have descended to any one from his
ancestors, male or female, are matters of which the philosopher no
more knows than he can tell, as they say, how many pints are contained
in the ocean. Neither is he conscious of his ignorance. For he does
not hold aloof in order; that he may gain a reputation; but the
truth is, that the outer form of him only is in the city: his mind,
disdaining the littlenesses and nothingnesses of human things, is
"flying all abroad" as Pindar says, measuring earth and heaven and the
things which are under and on the earth and above the heaven,
interrogating the whole nature of each and all in their entirety,
but not condescending to anything which is within reach.

  Theod. What do you mean, Socrates?

  Soc. I will illustrate my meaning, Theodorus, by the jest which
the clever witty Thracian handmaid is said to have made about
Thales, when he fell into a well as he was looking up at the stars.
She said, that he was so eager to know what was going on in heaven,
that he could not see what was before his feet. This is a jest which
is equally applicable to all philosophers. For the philosopher is
wholly unacquainted with his next-door neighbour; he is ignorant,
not only of what he is doing, but he hardly knows whether he is a
man or an animal; he is searching into the essence of man, and busy in
enquiring what belongs to such a nature to do or suffer different from
any other;-I think that you understand me, Theodorus?

  Theod. I do, and what you say is true.

  Soc. And thus, my friend, on every occasion, private as well as
public, as I said at first, when he appears in a law-court, or in
any place in which he has to speak of things which are at his feet and
before his eyes, he is the jest, not only of Thracian handmaids but of
the general herd, tumbling into wells and every sort of disaster
through his inexperience. His awkwardness is fearful, and gives the
impression of imbecility. When he is reviled, he has nothing
personal to say in answer to the civilities of his adversaries, for he
knows no scandals of any one, and they do not interest him; and
therefore he is laughed at for his sheepishness; and when others are
being praised and glorified, in the simplicity of his heart he
cannot help going into fits of laughter, so that he seems to be a
downright idiot. When he hears a tyrant or king eulogized, he
fancies that he is listening to the praises of some keeper of cattle-a
swineherd, or shepherd, or perhaps a cowherd, who is congratulated
on the quantity of milk which he squeezes from them; and he remarks
that the creature whom they tend, and out of whom they squeeze the
wealth, is of a less traitable and more insidious nature. Then, again,
he observes that the great man is of necessity as ill-mannered and
uneducated as any shepherd-for he has no leisure, and he is surrounded
by a wall, which is his mountain-pen. Hearing of enormous landed
proprietors of ten thousand acres and more, our philosopher deems this
to be a trifle, because he has been accustomed to think of the whole
earth; and when they sing the, praises of family, and say that someone
is a gentleman because he can show seven generations of wealthy
ancestors, he thinks that their sentiments only betray a dull and
narrow vision in those who utter them, and who are not educated enough
to look at the whole, nor to consider that every man has had thousands
and ten thousands of progenitors, and among them have been rich and
poor, kings and slaves, Hellenes and barbarians, innumerable. And when
people pride themselves on having a pedigree of twenty-five ancestors,
which goes back to Heracles, the son of Amphitryon, he cannot
understand their poverty of ideas. Why are they unable to calculate
that Amphitryon had a twenty-fifth ancestor, who might have been
anybody, and was such as fortune made him and he had a fiftieth, and
so on? He amuses himself with the notion that they cannot count, and
thinks that a little arithmetic would have got rid of their
senseless vanity. Now, in all these cases our philosopher is derided
by the vulgar, partly because he is thought to despise them, and
also because he is ignorant of what is before him, and always at a
loss.

  Theod. That is very true, Socrates.

  Soc. But, O my friend, when he draws the other into upper air, and
gets him out of his pleas and rejoinders into the contemplation of
justice and injustice in their own nature and in their difference from
one another and from all other things; or from the commonplaces
about the happiness of a king or of a rich man to the consideration of
government, and of human happiness and misery in general-what they
are, and how a man is to attain the one and avoid the other-when
that narrow, keen, little legal mind is called to account about all
this, he gives the philosopher his revenge; for dizzied by the
height at which he is hanging, whence he looks down into space,
which is a strange experience to him, he being dismayed, and lost, and
stammering broken words, is laughed at, not by Thracian handmaidens or
any other uneducated persons, for they have no eye for the
situation, but by every man who has not been brought up a slave.
Such are the two characters, Theodorus: the one of the freeman, who
has becomes trained in liberty and leisure, whom you call the
philosopher-him we cannot blame because he appears simple and of no
account when he has to perform some menial task, such as packing up
bed-clothes, or flavouring a sauce or fawning speech; the other
character is that of the man who is able to do all this kind of
service smartly and neatly, but knows not how to wear his cloak like a
gentleman; still less with the music of discourse can he hymn the true
life aright which is lived by immortals or men blessed of heaven.

  Theod. If you could only persuade everybody, Socrates, as you do me,
of the truth of your words, there would be more peace and fewer
evils among men.

  Soc. Evils, Theodorus, can never pass away; for there must always
remain something which is antagonistic to good. Having no place
among the gods in heaven, of necessity they hover around the mortal
nature, and this earthly sphere. Wherefore we ought to fly away from
earth to heaven as quickly as we can; and to fly away is to become
like God, as far as this is possible; and to become like him, is to
become holy, just, and wise. But, O my friend, you cannot easily
convince mankind that they should pursue virtue or avoid vice, not
merely in order that a man may seem to be good, which is the reason
given by the world, and in my judgment is only a repetition of an
old wives fable. Whereas, the truth is that God is never in any way
unrighteous-he is perfect righteousness; and he of us who is the
most righteous is most like him. Herein is seen the true cleverness of
a man, and also his nothingness and want of manhood. For to know
this is true wisdom and virtue, and ignorance of this is manifest
folly and vice. All other kinds of wisdom or cleverness, which seem
only, such as the wisdom of politicians, or the wisdom of the arts,
are coarse and vulgar. The unrighteous man, or the sayer and doer of
unholy things, had far better not be encouraged in the illusion that
his roguery is clever; for men glory in their shame -they fancy that
they hear others saying of them, "These are not mere good-for
nothing persons, mere burdens of the earth, but such as men should
be who mean to dwell safely in a state." Let us tell them that they
are all the more truly what they do not think they are because they do
not know it; for they do not know the penalty of injustice, which
above all things they ought to know-not stripes and death, as they
suppose, which evil-doers often escape, but a penalty which cannot
be escaped.

  Theod. What is that?

  Soc. There are two patterns eternally set before them; the one
blessed and divine, the other godless and wretched: but they do not
see them, or perceive that in their utter folly and infatuation they
are growing like the one and unlike the other, by reason of their evil
deeds; and the penalty is, that they lead a life answering to the
pattern which they are growing like. And if we tell them, that
unless they depart from their cunning, the place of innocence will not
receive them after death; and that here on earth, they will live
ever in the likeness of their own evil selves, and with evil
friends-when they hear this they in their superior cunning will seem
to be listening to the talk of idiots.

  Theod. Very true, Socrates.

  Soc. Too true, my friend, as I well know; there is, however, one
peculiarity in their case: when they begin to reason in private
about their dislike of philosophy, if they have the courage to hear
the argument out and do not run away, they grow at last strangely
discontented with themselves; their rhetoric fades away, and they
become helpless as children. These however are digressions from
which we must now desist, or they will overflow, and drown the
original argument; to which, if you please, we will now return.

  Theod. For my part, Socrates, I would rather have the digressions,
for at my age I find them easier to follow; but if you wish, let us go
back to the argument.

  Soc. Had we not reached the point at which the partisans of the
perpetual flux, who say that things are as they seem to each one, were
confidently maintaining that the ordinances which the state
commanded 2nd thought just, were just to the state which imposed them,
while they were in force; this was especially asserted of justice; but
as to the good, no one had any longer the hardihood to contend of
any ordinances which the state thought and enacted to be good that
these, while they were in force, were really good;-he who said so
would be playing with the name "good," and would, not touch the real
question-it would be a mockery, would it not?

  Theod. Certainly it would.

  Soc. He ought not to speak of the name, but of the thing which is
contemplated under the name.

  Theod. Right.

  Soc. Whatever be the term used, the good or expedient is the aim
of legislation, and as far as she has an opinion, the state imposes
all laws with a view to the greatest expediency; can legislation
have any other aim?

  Theod. Certainly not.

  Soc. But is the aim attained always? do not mistakes often happen?

  Theod. Yes, I think that there are mistakes.

  Soc. The possibility of error will be more distinctly recognized, if
we put the question in reference to the whole class under which the
good or expedient fall That whole class has to do with the future, and
laws are passed under the idea that they will be useful in after-time;
which, in other words, is the future.

  Theod. Very true.

  Soc. Suppose now, that we ask Protagoras, or one of his disciples, a
question:-O, Protagoras, we will say to him, Man is, as you declare,
the measure of all things-white, heavy, light: of all such things he
is the judge; for he has the criterion of them in himself, and when he
thinks that things are such as he experiences them to be, he thinks
what is and is true to himself. Is it not so?

  Theod. Yes.

  Soc. And do you extend your doctrine, Protagoras (as we shall
further say), to the future as well as to the present; and has he
the criterion not only of what in his opinion is but of what will
be, and do things always happen to him as he expected? For example,
take the case of heat:-When an ordinary man thinks that he is going to
have a fever, and that this kind of heat is coming on, and another
person, who is a physician, thinks the contrary, whose opinion is
likely to prove right? Or are they both right?-he will have a heat and
fever in his own judgment, and not have a fever in the physician's
judgment?

  Theod. How ludicrous!

  Soc. And the vinegrower, if I am not mistaken, is a better judge
of the sweetness or dryness of the vintage which is not yet gathered
than the harp-player?

  Theod. Certainly.

  Soc. And in musical composition-the musician will know better than
the training master what the training master himself will hereafter
think harmonious or the reverse?

  Theod. Of course.

  Soc. And the cook will be a better judge than the guest, who is
not a cook, of the pleasure to be derived from the dinner which is
in preparation; for of present or past pleasure we are not as yet
arguing; but can we say that every one will be to himself the best
judge of the pleasure which will seem to be and will be to him in
the future?-nay, would not you, Protagoras, better guess which
arguments in a court would convince any one of us than the ordinary
man?

  Theod. Certainly, Socrates, he used to profess in the strongest
manner that he was the superior of all men in this respect.

  Soc. To be sure, friend: who would have paid a large sum for the
privilege of talking to him, if he had really persuaded his visitors
that neither a prophet nor any other man was better able to judge what
will be and seem to be in the future than every one could for himself?

  Theod. Who indeed?

  Soc. And legislation and expediency are all concerned with the
future; and every one will admit that states, in passing laws, must
often fail of their highest interests?

  Theod. Quite true.

  Soc. Then we may fairly argue against your master, that he must
admit one man to be wiser than another, and that the wiser is a
measure: but I, who know nothing, am not at all obliged to accept
the honour which the advocate of Protagoras was just now forcing
upon me, whether I would or not, of being a measure of anything.

  Theod. That is the best refutation of him, Socrates; although he
is also caught when he ascribes truth to the opinions of others, who
give the lie direct to his own opinion.

  Soc. There are many ways, Theodorus, in which the doctrine that
every opinion of: every man is true may be refuted; but there is
more difficulty, in proving that states of feeling, which are
present to a man, and out of which arise sensations and opinions in
accordance with them, are also untrue. And very likely I have been
talking nonsense about them; for they may be unassailable, and those
who say that there is clear evidence of them, and that they are
matters of knowledge, may probably be right; in which case our
friend Theaetetus was not so far from the mark when he identified
perception and knowledge. And therefore let us draw nearer, as the
advocate of Protagoras desires; and the truth of the universal flux
a ring: is the theory sound or not? at any rate, no small war is
raging about it, and there are combination not a few.

  Theod. No small, war, indeed, for in most the sect makes rapid
strides, the disciples of Heracleitus are most energetic. upholders of
the doctrine.

  Soc. Then we are the more bound, my dear Theodorus, to examine the
question from the foundation as it is set forth by themselves.

  Theod. Certainly we are. About these speculations of Heracleitus,
which, as you say, are as old as Homer, or even older still, the
Ephesians themselves, who profess to know them, are downright mad, and
you cannot talk with them on the subject. For, in accordance with
their text-books, they are always in motion; but as for dwelling
upon an argument or a question, and quietly asking and answering in
turn, they can no more do so than they can fly; or rather, the
determination of these fellows not to have a particle of rest in
them is more than the utmost powers of negation can express. If you
ask any of them a question, he will produce, as from a quiver, sayings
brief and dark, and shoot them at you; and if you inquire the reason
of what he has said, you will be hit by some other newfangled word,
and will make no way with any of them, nor they with one another;
their great care is, not to allow of any settled principle either in
their arguments or in their minds, conceiving, as I imagine, that
any such principle would be stationary; for they are at war with the
stationary, and do what they can to drive it out everywhere.

  Soc. I suppose, Theodorus, that you have only seen them when they
were fighting, and have never stayed with them in time of peace, for
they are no friends of yours; and their peace doctrines are only
communicated by them at leisure, as I imagine, to those disciples of
theirs whom they want to make like themselves.

  Theod. Disciples! my good sir, they have none; men of their sort are
not one another's disciples, but they grow up at their own sweet will,
and get their inspiration anywhere, each of them saying of his
neighbour that he knows nothing. Fro these men, then, as I was going
to remark, you will never get a reason, whether with their will or
without their will; we must take the question out of their hands,
and make the analysis ourselves, as if we were doing geometrical
problem.

  Soc. Quite right too; but as touching the aforesaid problem, have we
not heard from the ancients, who concealed their wisdom from the
many in poetical figures, that Oceanus and Tethys, the origin of all
things, are streams, and that nothing is at rest? And now the moderns,
in their superior wisdom, have declared the same openly, that the
cobbler too may hear and learn of them, and no longer foolishly
imagine that some things are at rest and others in motion-having
learned that all is motion, he will duly honour his teachers. I had
almost forgotten the opposite doctrine, Theodorus,

   Alone Being remains unmoved, which is the name for the all.

This is the language of Parmenides, Melissus, and their followers, who
stoutly maintain that all being is one and self-contained, and has
no place which to move. What shall we do, friend, with all these
people; for, advancing step by step, we have imperceptibly got between
the combatants, and, unless we can protect our retreat, we shall pay
the penalty of our rashness-like the players in the palaestra who
are caught upon the line, and are dragged different ways by the two
parties. Therefore I think that we had better begin by considering
those whom we first accosted, "the river-gods," and, if we find any
truth in them, we will help them to pull us over, and try to get
away from the others. But if the partisans of "the whole" appear to
speak more truly, we will fly off from the party which would move
the immovable, to them. And if I find that neither of them have
anything reasonable to say, we shall be in a ridiculous position,
having so great a conceit of our own poor opinion and rejecting that
of ancient and famous men. O Theodorus, do you think that there is any
use in proceeding when the danger is so great?

  Theod. Nay, Socrates, not to examine thoroughly what the two parties
have to say would be quite intolerable.

  Soc. Then examine we must, since you, who were so reluctant. to
begin, are so eager to proceed. The nature of motion appears to be the
question with which we begin. What do they mean when they say that all
things are in motion? Is there only one kind of motion, or, as I
rather incline to think, two? should like to have your opinion upon
this point in addition to my own, that I may err, if I must err, in
your company; tell me, then, when a thing changes from one place to
another, or goes round in the same place, is not that what is called
motion?

  Theod. Yes.

  Soc. Here then we have one kind of motion. But when a thing,
remaining on the same spot, grows old, or becomes black from being
white, or hard from being soft, or undergoes any other change, may not
this be properly called motion of another kind?

  Theod. I think so.

  Soc. Say rather that it must be so. Of motion then there are these
two kinds, "change," and "motion in place."

  Theod. You are right.

  Soc. And now, having made this distinction, let us address ourselves
to those who say that all is motion, and ask them whether all things
according to them have the two kinds of motion, and are changed as
well as move in place, or is one thing moved in both ways, and another
in one only?

  Theod. Indeed, I do not know what to answer; but I think they
would say that all things are moved in both ways.

  Soc. Yes, comrade; for, if not, they would have to say that the same
things are in motion and at rest, and there would be no more truth
in saying that all things are in motion, than that all things are at
rest.

  Theod. To be sure.

  Soc. And if they are to be in motion, and nothing is to be devoid of
motion, all things must always have every sort of motion?

  Theod. Most true.

  Soc. Consider a further point: did we not understand them to explain
the generation of heat, whiteness, or anything else, in some such
manner as the following:-were they not saying that each of them is
moving between the agent and the patient, together with a
perception, and that the patient ceases to be a perceiving power and
becomes a percipient, and the agent a quale instead of a quality? I
suspect that quality may appear a strange and uncouth term to you, and
that you do not understand the abstract expression. Then I will take
concrete instances: I mean to say that the producing power or agent
becomes neither heat nor whiteness but hot and white, and the like
of other things. For I must repeat what I said before, that neither
the agent nor patient have any absolute existence, but when they
come together and generate sensations and their objects, the one
becomes a thing a certain quality, and the other a percipient. You
remember?

  Theod. Of course.

  Soc. We may leave the details of their theory unexamined, but we
must not forget to ask them the only question with which we are
concerned: Are all things in motion and flux?

  Theod. Yes, they will reply.

  Soc. And they are moved in both those ways which we distinguished,
that is to Way, they move in place and are also changed?

  Theod. Of course, if the motion is to be perfect.

  Soc. If they only moved in place and were not changed, we should
be able to say what is the nature of the things which are in motion
and flux.

  Theod. Exactly.

  Soc. But now, since not even white continues to flow white, and
whiteness itself is a flux or change which is passing into another
colour, and is never to be caught standing still, can the name of
any colour be rightly used at all?

  Theod. How is that possible, Socrates, either in the case of this or
of any other quality-if while we are using the word the object is
escaping in the flux?

  Soc. And what would you say of perceptions, such as sight and
hearing, or any other kind of perception? Is there any stopping in the
act of seeing and hearing?

  Theod. Certainly not, if all things are in motion.

  Soc. Then we must not speak of seeing any more than of not-seeing,
nor of any other perception more than of any non-perception, if all
things partake of every kind of motion?

  Theod. Certainly not.

  Soc. Yet perception is knowledge: so at least Theaetetus and I
were saying.

  Theod. Very true.

  Soc. Then when we were asked what is knowledge, we no more
answered what is knowledge than what is not knowledge?

  Theod. I suppose not.

  Soc. Here, then, is a fine result: we corrected our first answer
in our eagerness to prove that nothing is at rest. But if nothing is
at rest, every answer upon whatever subject is equally right: you
may say that a thing is or is not thus; or, if you prefer, "becomes"
thus; and if we say "becomes," we shall not then hamper them with
words expressive of rest.

  Theod. Quite true.

  Soc. Yes, Theodorus, except in saying "thus" and "not thus." But you
ought not to use the word "thus," for there is no motion in "thus"
or in "not thus." The maintainers of the doctrine have as yet no words
in which to express themselves, and must get a new language. I know of
no word that will suit them, except perhaps "no how," which is
perfectly indefinite.

  Theod. Yes, that is a manner of speaking in which they will be quite
at home.

  Soc. And so, Theodorus, we have got rid of your friend without
assenting to his doctrine, that every man is the measure of all
things-a wise man only is a measure; neither can we allow that
knowledge is perception, certainly not on the hypothesis of a
perpetual flux, unless perchance our friend Theaetetus is able to
convince us that it is.

  Theod. Very good, Socrates; and now that the argument about the
doctrine of Protagoras has been completed, I am absolved from
answering; for this was the agreement.

  Theaet. Not, Theodorus, until you and Socrates have discussed the
doctrine of those who say that all things are at rest, as you were
proposing.

  Theod. You, Theaetetus, who are a young rogue, must not instigate
your elders to a breach of faith, but should prepare to answer
Socrates in the remainder of the argument.

  Theaet. Yes, if he wishes; but I would rather have heard about the
doctrine of rest.

  Theod. Invite Socrates to an argument-invite horsemen to the open
plain; do but ask him, and he will answer.

  Soc. Nevertheless, Theodorus, I am afraid that I shall not be able
to comply with the request of Theaetetus.

  Theod. Not comply! for what reason?

  Soc. My reason is that I have a kind of reverence; not so much for
Melissus and the others, who say that "All is one and at rest," as for
the great leader himself, Parmenides, venerable and awful, as in
Homeric language he may be called;-him I should be ashamed to approach
in a spirit unworthy of him. I met him when he was an old man, and I
was a mere youth, and he appeared to me to have a glorious depth of
mind. And I am afraid that we may not understand his words, and may be
still further from understanding his meaning; above all I fear that
the nature of knowledge, which is the main subject of our
discussion, may be thrust out of sight by the unbidden guests who will
come pouring in upon our feast of discourse, if we let them
in-besides, the question which is now stirring is of immense extent,
and will be treated unfairly if only considered by the way; or if
treated adequately and at length, will put into the shade the other
question of knowledge. Neither the one nor the other can be allowed;
but I must try by my art of midwifery to deliver Theaetetus of his
conceptions about knowledge.

  Theaet. Very well; do so if you will.

  Soc. Then now, Theaetetus, take another view of the subject: you
answered that knowledge is perception?

  Theaet. I did.

  Soc. And if any one were to ask you: With what does a man see
black and white colours? and with what does he hear high and low
sounds?-you would say, if I am not mistaken, "With the eyes and with
the ears."

  Theaet. I should.

  Soc. The free use of words and phrases, rather than minute
precision, is generally characteristic of a liberal education, and the
opposite is pedantic; but sometimes precision. is necessary, and I
believe that the answer which you have just given is open to the
charge of incorrectness; for which is more correct, to say that we see
or hear with the eyes and with the ears, or through the eyes and
through the ears.

  Theaet. I should say "through," Socrates, rather than "with."

  Soc. Yes, my boy, for no one can suppose that in each of us, as in a
sort of Trojan horse, there are perched a number of unconnected
senses, which do not all meet in some one nature, the mind, or
whatever we please to call it, of which they are the instruments,
and with which through them we perceive objects of sense.

  Theaet. I agree with you in that opinion.

  Soc. The reason why I am thus precise is, because I want to know
whether, when we perceive black and white through the eyes, and again,
other qualities through other organs, we do not perceive them with one
and the same part of ourselves, and, if you were asked, you might
refer all such perceptions to the body. Perhaps, however, I had better
allow you to answer for yourself and not interfere; Tell me, then, are
not the organs through which you perceive warm and hard and light
and sweet, organs of the body?

  Theaet. Of the body, certainly.

  Soc. And you would admit that what you perceive through one
faculty you cannot perceive through another; the objects of hearing,
for example, cannot be perceived through sight, or the objects of
sight through hearing?

  Theaet. Of course not.

  Soc. If you have any thought about both of them, this common
perception cannot come to you, either through the one or the other
organ?

  Theaet. It cannot.

  Soc. How about sounds and colours: in the first place you would
admit that they both exist?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And that either of them is different from the other, and the
same with itself?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And that both are two and each of them one?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. You can further observe whether they are like or unlike one
another?

  Theaet. I dare say.

  Soc. But through what do you perceive all this about them? for
neither through hearing nor yet through seeing can you apprehend
that which they have in common. Let me give you an illustration of the
point at issue:-If there were any meaning in asking whether sounds and
colours are saline or not, you would be able to tell me what faculty
would consider the question. It would not be sight or hearing, but
some other.

  Theaet. Certainly; the faculty of taste.

  Soc. Very good; and now tell me what is the power which discerns,
not only in sensible objects, but in all things, universal notions,
such as those which are called being and not-being, and those others
about which we were just asking-what organs will you assign for the
perception of these notions?

  Theaet. You are thinking of being and not being, likeness and
unlikeness, sameness and difference, and also of unity and other
numbers which are applied to objects of sense; and you mean to ask,
through what bodily organ the soul perceives odd and even numbers
and other arithmetical conceptions.

  Soc. You follow me excellently, Theaetetus; that is precisely what I
am asking.

  Theaet. Indeed, Socrates, I cannot answer; my only notion is, that
these, unlike objects of sense, have no separate organ, but that the
mind, by a power of her own, contemplates the universals in all
things.

  Soc. You are a beauty, Theaetetus, and not ugly, as Theodorus was
saying; for he who utters the beautiful is himself beautiful and good.
And besides being beautiful, you have done me a kindness in
releasing me from a very long discussion, if you are clear that the
soul views some things by herself and others through the bodily
organs. For that was my own opinion, and I wanted you to agree with
me.

  Theaet. I am quite clear.

  Soc. And to which class would you refer being or essence; for
this, of all our notions, is the most universal?

  Theaet. I should say, to that class which the soul aspires to know
of herself.

  Soc. And would you say this also of like and unlike, same and other?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And would you say the same of the noble and base, and of good
and evil?

  Theaet. These I conceive to be notions which are essentially
relative, and which the soul also perceives by comparing in herself
things past and present with the future.

  Soc. And does she not perceive the hardness of that which is hard by
the touch, and the softness of that which is soft equally by the
touch?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. But their essence and what they are, and their opposition to
one another, and the essential nature of this opposition, the soul
herself endeavours to decide for us by the review and comparison of
them?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. The simple sensations which reach the soul through the body are
given at birth to men and animals by nature, but their reflections
on the being and use of them are slowly and hardly gained, if they are
ever gained, by education and long experience.

  Theaet. Assuredly.

  Soc. And can a man attain truth who fails of attaining being?

  Theaet. Impossible.

  Soc. And can he who misses the truth of anything, have a knowledge
of that thing?

  Theaet. He cannot.

  Soc. Then knowledge does not consist in impressions of sense, but in
reasoning about them; in that only, and not in the mere impression,
truth and being can be attained?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. And would you call the two processes by the same name, when
there is so great difference between them?

  Theaet. That would certainly not be right.

  Soc. And what name would you give to seeing, hearing, smelling,
being cold and being hot?

  Theaet. I should call all of them perceiving-what other name could
be given to them?

  Soc. Perception would be the collective name of them?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Which, as we say, has no part in the attainment of truth any
more of being?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. And therefore not in. science or knowledge?

  Theaet. No.

  Soc. Then perception, Theaetetus, can never be the same as knowledge
or science?

  Theaet. Clearly not, Socrates; and knowledge has now been most
distinctly proved to be different from perception.

  Soc. But the original aim of our discussion was to find out rather
what knowledge is than what it is not; at the same time we have made
some progress, for we no longer seek for knowledge, in perception at
all, but in that other process, however called, in which the mind is
alone and engaged with being.

  Theaet. You mean, Socrates, if I am not mistaken, what is called
thinking or opining.

  Soc. You conceive truly. And now, my friend, Please to begin again
at this point; and having wiped out of your memory all that has
preceded, see if you have arrived at any clearer view, and once more
say what is knowledge.

  Theaet. I cannot say, Socrates, that all opinion is knowledge,
because there may be a false opinion; but I will venture to assert,
that knowledge is true opinion: let this then be my reply; and if this
is hereafter disproved, I must try to find another.

  Soc. That is the way in which you ought to answer, Theaetetus, and
not in your former hesitating strain, for if we are bold we shall gain
one of two advantages; either we shall find what we seek, or we
shall be less likely to think that we know what we do not know-in
either case we shall be richly rewarded. And now, what are you
saying?-Are there two sorts of opinion, one true and the other
false; and do you define knowledge to be the true?

  Theaet. Yes, according to my present view.

  Soc. Is it still worth our while to resume the discussion touching
opinion?

  Theaet. To what are you alluding?

  Soc. There is a point which often troubles me, and is a great
perplexity to me, both in regard to myself and others. I cannot make
out the nature or origin of the mental experience to which I refer.

  Theaet. Pray what is it?

  Soc. How there can be-false opinion-that difficulty still troubles
the eye of my mind; and I am uncertain whether I shall leave the
question, or over again in a new way.

  Theaet. Begin again, Socrates,-at least if you think that there is
the slightest necessity for doing so. Were not you and Theodorus
just now remarking very truly, that in discussions of this kind we may
take our own time?

  Soc. You are quite right, and perhaps there will be no harm in
retracing our steps and beginning again. Better a little which is well
done, than a great deal imperfectly.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Well, and what is the difficulty? Do we not speak of false
opinion, and say that one man holds a false and another a true
opinion, as though there were some natural distinction between them?

  Theaet. We certainly say so.

  Soc. All things and everything are either known or not known. I
leave out of view the intermediate conceptions of learning and
forgetting, because they have nothing to do with our present question.

  Theaet. There can be no doubt, Socrates, if you exclude these,
that there is no other alternative but knowing or not knowing a thing.

  Soc. That point being now determined, must we not say that he who
has an opinion, must have an opinion about something which he knows or
does not know?

  Theaet. He must.

  Soc. He who knows, cannot but know; and he who does not know, cannot
know?

  Theaet. Of course.

  Soc. What shall we say then? When a man has a false opinion does
he think that which he knows to be some other thing which he knows,
and knowing both, is he at the same time ignorant of both?

  Theaet. That, Socrates, is impossible.

  Soc. But perhaps he thinks of something which he does not know as
some other thing which he does not know; for example, he knows neither
Theaetetus nor Socrates, and yet he fancies that Theaetetus is
Socrates, or Socrates Theaetetus?

  Theaet. How can he?

  Soc. But surely he cannot suppose what he knows to be what he does
not know, or what he does not know to be what he knows?

  Theaet. That would be monstrous.

  Soc. Where, then, is false opinion? For if all things are either
known or unknown, there can be no opinion which is not comprehended
under this alternative, and so false opinion is excluded.

  Theaes. Most true.

  Soc. Suppose that we remove the question out of the sphere of
knowing or not knowing, into that of being and not-being.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Soc. May we not suspect the simple truth to be that he who thinks
about anything, that which. is not, will necessarily think what is
false, whatever in other respects may be the state of his mind?

  Theaet. That, again, is not unlikely, Socrates.

  Soc. Then suppose some one to say to us, Theaetetus:-Is it
possible for any man to think that which is not, either as a
self-existent substance or as a predicate of something else? And
suppose that we answer, "Yes, he can, when he thinks what is not
true."-That will be our answer?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. But is there any parallel to this?

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Soc. Can a man see something and yet see nothing?

  Theaet. Impossible.

  Soc. But if he sees any one thing, he sees something that exists. Do
you suppose that what is one is ever to be found among nonexisting
things?

  Theaet. I do not.

  Soc. He then who sees some one thing, sees something which is?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. And he who hears anything, hears some one thing, and hears that
which is?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And he who touches anything, touches something which is one and
therefore is?

  Theaet. That again is true.

  Soc. And does not he who thinks, think some one thing?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And does not he who thinks some one thing, think something
which is?

  Theaet. I agree.

  Soc. Then he who thinks of that which is not, thinks of nothing?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. And he who thinks of nothing, does not think at all?

  Theaet. Obviously.

  Soc. Then no one can think that which is not, either as a
self-existent substance or as a predicate of something else?

  Theaet. Clearly not.

  Soc. Then to think falsely is different from thinking that which
is not?

  Theaet. It would seem so.

  Soc. Then false opinion has no existence in us, either in the sphere
of being or of knowledge?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. But may not the following be the description of what we express
by this name?

  Theaet. What?

  Soc. May we not suppose that false opinion or thought is a sort of
heterodoxy; a person may make an exchange in his mind, and say that
one real object is another real object. For thus he always thinks that
which is, but he puts one thing in place of another; and missing the
aim of his thoughts, he may be truly said to have false opinion.

  Theaet. Now you appear to me to have spoken the exact truth: when
a man puts the base in the place of the noble, or the noble in the
place of the base, then he has truly false opinion.

  Soc. I see, Theaetetus, that your fear has disappeared, and that you
are beginning to despise me.

  Theaet. What makes you say so?

  Soc. You think, if I am not mistaken, that your "truly false" is
safe from censure, and that I shall never ask whether there can be a
swift which is slow, or a heavy which is light, or any other
self-contradictory thing, which works, not according to its own
nature, but according to that of its opposite. But I will not insist
upon this, for I do not wish needlessly to discourage you. And so
you are satisfied that false opinion is heterodoxy, or the thought
of something else?

  Theaet. I am.

  Soc. It is possible then upon your view for the mind to conceive
of one thing as another?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. But must not the mind, or thinking power, which misplaces them,
have a conception either of both objects or of one of them?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Either together or in succession?

  Theaet. Very good.

  Soc. And do you mean by conceiving, the same which I mean?

  Theaet. What is that?

  Soc. I mean the conversation which the soul holds with herself in
considering of anything. I speak of what I scarcely understand; but
the soul when thinking appears to me to be just talking-asking
questions of herself and answering them, affirming and denying. And
when she has arrived at a decision, either gradually or by a sudden
impulse, and has at last agreed, and does not doubt, this is called
her opinion. I say, then, that to form an opinion is to speak, and
opinion is a word spoken,-I mean, to oneself and in silence, not aloud
or to another: What think you?

  Theaet. I agree.

  Soc. Then when any one thinks of one thing as another, he is
saying to himself that one thing is another?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. But do you ever remember saying to yourself that the noble is
certainly base, or the unjust just; or, best of all-have you ever
attempted to convince yourself that one thing is another? Nay, not
even in sleep, did you ever venture to say to yourself that odd is
even, or anything of the kind?

  Theaet. Never.

  Soc. And do you suppose that any other man, either in his senses
or out of them, ever seriously tried to persuade himself that an ox is
a horse, or that two are one?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. But if thinking is talking to oneself, no one speaking and
thinking of two objects, and apprehending them both in his soul,
will say and think that the one is the other of them, and I must
add, that even you, lover of dispute as you are, had better let the
word "other" alone [i.e., not insist that "one" and "other" are the
same]. I mean to say, that no one thinks the noble to be base, or
anything of the kind.

  Theaet. I will give up the word "other," Socrates; and I agree to
what you say.

  Soc. If a man has both of them in his thoughts, he cannot think that
the one of them is the other?

  Theat. True.

  Soc. Neither, if he has one of them only in his mind and not the
other, can he think that one is the other?

  Theaet. True; for we should have to suppose that he apprehends
that which is not in his thoughts at all.

  Soc. Then no one who has either both or only one of the two
objects in his mind can think that the one is the other. And
therefore, he who maintains that false opinion is heterodoxy is
talking nonsense; for neither in this, any more than in the previous
way, can false opinion exist in us.

  Theaet. No.

  Soc. But if, Theaetetus, this is not admitted, we shall be driven
into many absurdities.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Soc. I will not tell you until I have endeavoured to consider the
matter from every point of view. For I should be ashamed of us if we
were driven in our perplexity to admit the absurd consequences of
which I speak. But if we find the solution, and get away from them, we
may regard them only as the difficulties of others, and the ridicule
will not attach to us. On the other hand, if we utterly fail, I
suppose that we must be humble, and allow the argument to trample us
under foot, as the sea-sick passenger is trampled upon by the
sailor, and to do anything to us. Listen, then, while I tell you how I
hope to find a way out of our difficulty.

  Theaet. Let me hear.

  Soc. I think that we were wrong in denying that a man could think
what he knew to be what he did not know; and that there is a way in
which such a deception is possible.

  Theaet. You mean to say, as I suspected at the time, that I may know
Socrates, and at a distance see some one who is unknown to me, and
whom I mistake for him-them the deception will occur?

  Soc. But has not that position been relinquished by us, because
involving the absurdity that we should know and not know the things
which we know?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Let us make the assertion in another form, which may or may not
have a favourable issue; but as we are in a great strait, every
argument should be turned over and tested. Tell me, then, whether I am
right in saying that you may learn a thing which at one time you did
not know?

  Theaet. Certainly you may.

  Soc. And another and another?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. I would have you imagine, then, that there exists in the mind
of man a block of wax, which is of different sizes in different men;
harder, moister, and having more or less of purity in one than
another, and in some of an intermediate quality.

  Theaet. I see.

  Soc. Let us say that this tablet is a gift of Memory, the mother
of the Muses; and that when we wish to remember anything which we have
seen, or heard, or thought in our own minds, we hold the wax to the
perceptions and thoughts, and in that material receive the
impression of them as from the seal of a ring; and that we remember
and know what is imprinted as long as the image lasts; but when the
image is effaced, or cannot be taken, then we forget and do not know.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Soc. Now, when a person has this knowledge, and is considering
something which he sees or hears, may not false opinion arise in the
following manner?

  Theaet. In what manner?

  Soc. When he thinks what he knows, sometimes to be what he knows,
and sometimes to be what he does not know. We were wrong before in
denying the possibility of this.

  Theaet. And how would you amend the former statement?

  Soc. I should begin by making a list of the impossible cases which
must be excluded. (1) No one can think one thing to be another when he
does not perceive either of them, but has the memorial or seal of both
of them in his mind; nor can any mistaking of one thing for another
occur, when he only knows one, and does not know, and has no
impression of the other; nor can he think that one thing which he does
not know is another thing which he does not know, or that what he does
not know is what he knows; nor (2) that one thing which he perceives
is another thing which he perceives, or that something which he
perceives is something which he does not perceive; or that something
which he does not perceive is something else which he does not
perceive; or that something which he does not perceive is something
which he perceives; nor again (3) can he think that something which he
knows and perceives, and of which he has the impression coinciding
with sense, is something else which he knows and perceives, and of
which he has the impression coinciding with sense;-this last case,
if possible, is still more inconceivable than the others; nor (4)
can he think that something which he knows and perceives, and of which
he has the memorial coinciding with sense, is something else which
he knows; nor so long as these agree, can he think that a thing
which he knows and perceives is another thing which he perceives; or
that a thing which he does not know and does not perceive, is the same
as another thing which he does not know and does not perceive;-nor
again, can he suppose that a thing which he does not know and does not
perceive is the same as another thing which he does not know; or
that a thing which he does not know and does not perceive is another
thing which he does not perceive:-All these utterly and absolutely
exclude the possibility of false opinion. The only cases, if any,
which remain, are the following.

  Theaet. What are they? If you tell me, I may perhaps understand
you better; but at present I am unable to follow you.

  Soc. A person may think that some things which he knows, or which he
perceives and does not know, are some other things which he knows
and perceives; or that some things which he knows and perceives, are
other things which he knows and perceives.

  Theaet. I understand you less than ever now.

  Soc. Hear me once more, then:-I, knowing Theodorus, and
remembering in my own mind what sort of person he is, and also what
sort of person Theaetetus is, at one time see them, and at another
time do not see them, and sometimes I touch them, and at another
time not, or at one time I may hear them or perceive them in some
other way, and at another time not perceive them, but still I remember
them, and know them in my own mind.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. Then, first of all, I want you to understand that a man may
or may not perceive sensibly that which he knows.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And that which he does not know will sometimes not be perceived
by him and sometimes will be perceived and only perceived?

  Theaet. That is also true.

  Soc. See whether you can follow me better now: Socrates can
recognize Theodorus and Theaetetus, but he sees neither of them, nor
does he perceive them in any other way; he cannot then by any
possibility imagine in his own mind that Theaetetus is Theodorus. Am I
not right?

  Theaet. You are quite right.

  Soc. Then that was the first case of which I spoke.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. The second case was, that I, knowing one of you and not knowing
the other, and perceiving neither, can never think him whom I know
to be him whom I do not know.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. In the third case, not knowing and not perceiving either of
you, I cannot think that one of you whom I do not know is the other
whom I do not know. I need not again go over the catalogue of excluded
cases, in which I cannot form a false opinion about you and Theodorus,
either when I know both or when I am in ignorance of both, or when I
know one and not the other. And the same of perceiving: do you
understand me?

  Theaet. I do.

  Soc. The only possibility of erroneous opinion is, when knowing
you and Theodorus, and having on the waxen block the impression of
both of you given as by a seal, but seeing you imperfectly and at a
distance, I try to assign the right impression of memory to the
right visual impression, and to fit this into its own print: if I
succeed, recognition will take place; but if I fad and transpose them,
putting the foot into the wrong shoe-that is to say, putting the
vision of either of you on to the wrong impression, or if my mind,
like the sight in a mirror, which is transferred from right to left,
err by reason of some similar affection, then "heterodoxy" and false
opinion ensues.

  Theaet. Yes, Socrates, you have described the nature of opinion with
wonderful exactness.

  Soc. Or again, when I know both of you, and perceive as well as know
one of you, but not the other, and my knowledge of him does not accord
with perception-that was the case put by me just now which you did not
understand

  Theaet. No, I did not.

  Soc. I meant to say, that when a person knows and perceives one of
you, his knowledge coincides with his perception, he will never
think him to be some other person, whom he knows and perceives, and
the knowledge of whom coincides with his perception-for that also
was a case supposed.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. But there was an omission of the further case, in which, as
we now say, false opinion may arise, when knowing both, and seeing, or
having some other sensible perception of both, I fail in holding the
seal over against the corresponding sensation; like a bad archer, I
miss and fall wide of the mark-and this is called falsehood.

  Theaet. Yes; it is rightly so called.

  Soc. When, therefore, perception is present to one of the seals or
impressions but not to the other, and the mind fits the seal of the
absent perception on the one which is present, in any case of this
sort the mind is deceived; in a word, if our view is sound, there
can be no error or deception about things which a man does not know
and has never perceived, but only in things which are known and
perceived; in these alone opinion turns and twists about, and
becomes alternately true and false;-true when the seals and
impressions of sense meet straight and opposite-false when they go
awry and crooked.

  Theaet. And is not that, Socrates, nobly said?

  Soc. Nobly! yes; but wait a little and hear the explanation, and
then you will say so with more reason; for to think truly is noble and
to be deceived is base.

  Theaet. Undoubtedly.

  Soc. And the origin of truth and error is as follows:-When the wax
in the soul of any one is deep and abundant, and smooth and
perfectly tempered, then the impressions which pass through the senses
and sink into the heart of the soul, as Homer says in a parable,
meaning to indicate the likeness of the soul to wax (Kerh Kerhos);
these, I say, being pure and clear, and having a sufficient depth of
wax, are also lasting, and minds, such as these, easily learn and
easily retain, and are not liable to confusion, but have true
thoughts, for they have plenty of room, and having clear impressions
of things, as we term them, quickly distribute them into their
proper places on the block. And such men are called wise. Do you
agree?

  Theaet. Entirely.

  Soc. But when the heart of any one is shaggy-a quality which the
all-wise poet commends, or muddy and of impure wax, or very soft, or
very hard, then there is a corresponding defect in the mind -the
soft are good at learning, but apt to forget; and the hard are the
reverse; the shaggy and rugged and gritty, or those who have an
admixture of earth or dung in their composition, have the
impressions indistinct, as also the hard, for there is no depth in
them; and the soft too are indistinct, for their impressions are
easily confused and effaced. Yet greater is the indistinctness when
they are all jostled together in a little soul, which has no room.
These are the natures which have false opinion; for when they see or
hear or think of anything, they are slow in assigning the right
objects to the right impressions-in their stupidity they confuse them,
and are apt to see and hear and think amiss-and such men are said to
be deceived in their knowledge of objects, and ignorant.

  Theaet. No man, Socrates, can say anything truer than that.

  Soc. Then now we may admit the existence of false opinion in us?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And of true opinion also?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. We have at length satisfactorily proven beyond a doubt there
are these two sorts of opinion?

  Theaet. Undoubtedly.

  Soc. Alas, Theaetetus, what a tiresome creature is a man who is fond
of talking!

  Theaet. What makes you say so?

  Soc. Because I am disheartened at my own stupidity and tiresome
garrulity; for what other term will describe the habit of a man who is
always arguing on all sides of a question; whose dulness cannot be
convinced, and who will never leave off?

  Theaet. But what puts you out of heart?

  Soc. I am not only out of heart, but in positive despair; for I do
not know what to answer if any one were to ask me:-O Socrates, have
you indeed discovered that false opinion arises neither in the
comparison of perceptions with one another nor yet in thought, but
in union of thought and perception? Yes, I shall say, with the
complacence of one who thinks that he has made a noble discovery.

  Theaet. I see no reason why we should be ashamed of our
demonstration, Socrates.

  Soc. He will say: You mean to argue that the man whom we only
think of and do not see, cannot be confused with the horse which we do
not see or touch, but only think of and do not perceive? That I
believe to be my meaning, I shall reply.

  Theaet. Quite right.

  Soc. Well, then, he will say, according to that argument, the number
eleven, which is only thought, never be mistaken for twelve, which
is only thought: How would you answer him?

  Theaet. I should say that a mistake may very likely arise between
the eleven or twelve which are seen or handled, but that no similar
mistake can arise between the eleven and twelve which are in the mind.

  Soc. Well, but do you think that no one ever put before his own mind
five and seven, -I do not mean five or seven men or horses, but five
or seven in the abstract, which, as we say, are recorded on the
waxen block, and in which false opinion is held to be impossible;
did no man ever ask himself how many these numbers make when added
together, and answer that they are eleven, while another thinks that
they are twelve, or would all agree in thinking and saying that they
are twelve?

  Theaet. Certainly not; many would think that they are eleven, and in
the higher numbers the chance of error is greater still; for I
assume you to be speaking of numbers in general.

  Soc. Exactly; and I want you to consider whether this does not imply
that the twelve in the waxen block are supposed to be eleven?

  Theaet. Yes, that seems to be the case.

  Soc. Then do we not come back to the old difficulty? For he who
makes such a mistake does think one thing which he knows to be another
thing which he knows; but this, as we said, was impossible, and
afforded an irresistible proof of the non-existence of false
opinion, because otherwise the same person would inevitably know and
not know the same thing at the same time.

  Theaet. Most true.

  Soc. Then false opinion cannot be explained as a confusion of
thought and sense, for in that case we could not have been mistaken
about pure conceptions of thought; and thus we are obliged to say,
either that false opinion does not exist, or that a man may not know
that which he knows;-which alternative do you prefer?

  Theaet. It is hard to determine, Socrates.

  Soc. And yet the argument will scarcely admit of both. But, as we
are at our wits' end, suppose that we do a shameless thing?

  Theaet. What is it?

  Soc. Let us attempt to explain the verb "to know."

  Theaet. And why should that be shameless?

  Soc. You seem not to be aware that the whole of our discussion
from the very beginning has been a search after knowledge, of which we
are assumed not to know the nature.

  Theaet. Nay, but I am well aware.

  Soc. And is it not shameless when we do not know what knowledge
is, to be explaining the verb "to know"? The truth is, Theaetetus,
that we have long been infected with logical impurity. Thousands of
times have we repeated the words "we know," and "do not know," and "we
have or have not science or knowledge," as if we could understand what
we are saying to one another, so long as we remain ignorant about
knowledge; and at this moment we are using the words "we
understand," "we are ignorant," as though we could still employ them
when deprived of knowledge or science.

  Theaet. But if you avoid these expressions, Socrates, how will you
ever argue at all?

  Soc. I could not, being the man I am. The case would be different if
I were a true hero of dialectic: and O that such an one were
present! for he would have told us to avoid the use of these terms; at
the same time he would not have spared in you and me the faults
which I have noted. But, seeing that we are no great wits, shall I
venture to say what knowing is? for I think that the attempt may be
worth making.

  Theaet. Then by all means venture, and no one shall find fault
with you for using the forbidden terms.

  Soc. You have heard the common explanation of the verb "to know"?

  Theaet. I think so, but I do not remember it at the moment.

  Soc. They explain the word "to know" as meaning "to have knowledge."

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. I should like to make a slight change, and say "to possess"
knowledge.

  Theaet. How do the two expressions differ?

  Soc. Perhaps there may be no difference; but still I should like you
to hear my view, that you may help me to test it.

  Theaet. I will, if I can.

  Soc. I should distinguish "having" from "possessing": for example, a
man may buy and keep under his control a garment which he does not
wear; and then we should say, not that he has, but that he possesses
the garment.

  Theaet. It would be the correct expression.

  Soc. Well, may not a man "possess" and yet not "have" knowledge in
the sense of which I am speaking? As you may suppose a man to have
caught wild birds -doves or any other birds-and to be keeping them
in an aviary which he has constructed at home; we might say of him
in one sense, that he always has them because he possesses them, might
we not?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And yet, in another sense, he has none of them; but they are in
his power, and he has got them under his hand in an enclosure of his
own, and can take and have them whenever he likes;-he can catch any
which he likes, and let the bird go again, and he may do so as often
as he pleases.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Once more, then, as in what preceded we made a sort of waxen
figment in the mind, so let us now suppose that in the mind of each
man there is an aviary of all sorts of birds-some flocking together
apart from the rest, others in small groups, others solitary, flying
anywhere and everywhere.

  Theaet. Let us imagine such an aviary-and what is to follow?

  Soc. We may suppose that the birds are kinds of knowledge, and
that when we were children, this receptacle was empty; whenever a
man has gotten and detained in the enclosure a kind of knowledge, he
may be said to have learned or discovered the thing which is the
subject of the knowledge: and this is to know.

  Theaet. Granted.

  Soc. And further, when any one wishes to catch any of these
knowledges or sciences, and having taken, to hold it, and again to let
them go, how will he express himself?-will he describe the
"catching" of them and the original "possession" in the same words?
I will make my meaning clearer by an example:-You admit that there
is an art of arithmetic?

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Soc. Conceive this under the form of a hunt after the science of odd
and even in general.

  Theaet. I follow.

  Soc. Having the use of the art, the arithmetician, if I am not
mistaken, has the conceptions of number under his hand, and can
transmit them to another.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And when transmitting them he may be said to teach them, and
when receiving to learn them, and when receiving to learn them, and
when having them in possession in the aforesaid aviary he may be
said to know them.

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Soc. Attend to what follows: must not the perfect arithmetician know
all numbers, for he has the science of all numbers in his mind?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And he can reckon abstract numbers in his head, or things about
him which are numerable?

  Theaet. Of course he can.

  Soc. And to reckon is simply to consider how much such and such a
number amounts to?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. And so he appears to be searching into something which he
knows, as if he did not know it, for we have already admitted that
he knows all numbers;-you have heard these perplexing questions
raised?

  Theaet. I have.

  Soc. May we not pursue the image of the doves, and say that the
chase after knowledge is of two kinds? one kind is prior to possession
and for the sake of possession, and the other for the sake of taking
and holding in the hands that which is possessed already. And thus,
when a man has learned and known something long ago, he may resume and
get hold of the knowledge which he has long possessed, but has not
at hand in his mind.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. That was my reason for asking how we ought to speak when an
arithmetician sets about numbering, or a grammarian about reading?
Shall we say, that although he knows, he comes back to himself to
learn what he already knows?

  Theaet. It would be too absurd, Socrates.

  Soc. Shall we say then that he is going to read or number what he
does not know, although we have admitted that he knows all letters and
all numbers?

  Theaet. That, again, would be an absurdity.

  Soc. Then shall we say that about names we care nothing?-any one may
twist and turn the words "knowing" and "learning" in any way which
he likes, but since we have determined that the possession of
knowledge is not the having or using it, we do assert that a man
cannot not possess that which he possesses; and, therefore, in no case
can a man not know that which he knows, but he may get a false opinion
about it; for he may have the knowledge, not of this particular thing,
but of some other;-when the various numbers and forms of knowledge are
flying about in the aviary, and wishing to capture a certain sort of
knowledge out of the general store, he takes the wrong one by mistake,
that is to say, when he thought eleven to be twelve, he got hold of
the ringdove which he had in his mind, when he wanted the pigeon.

  Theaet. A very rational explanation.

  Soc. But when he catches the one which he wants, then he is not
deceived, and has an opinion of what is, and thus false and true
opinion may exist, and the difficulties which were previously raised
disappear. I dare say that you agree with me, do you not?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And so we are rid of the difficulty of a man's not knowing what
he knows, for we are not driven to the inference that he does not
possess what he possesses, whether he be or be not deceived. And yet I
fear that a greater difficulty is looking in at the window.

  Theaet. What is it?

  Soc. How can the exchange of one knowledge for another ever become
false opinion?

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Soc. In the first place, how can a man who has the knowledge of
anything be ignorant of that which he knows, not by reason of
ignorance, but by reason of his own knowledge? And, again, is it not
an extreme absurdity that he should suppose another thing to be
this, and this to be another thing;-that, having knowledge present
with him in his mind, he should still know nothing and be ignorant
of all things?-you might as well argue that ignorance may make a man
know, and blindness make him see, as that knowledge can make him
ignorant.

  Theaet. Perhaps, Socrates, we may have been wrong in making only
forms of knowledge our birds: whereas there ought to have been forms
of ignorance as well, flying about together in the mind, and then he
who sought to take one of them might sometimes catch a form of
knowledge, and sometimes a form of ignorance; and thus he would have a
false opinion from ignorance, but a true one from knowledge, about the
same thing.

  Soc. I cannot help praising you, Theaetetus, and yet I must beg
you to reconsider your words. Let us grant what you say-then,
according to you, he who takes ignorance will have a false
opinion-am I right?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. He will certainly not think that he has a false opinion?

  Theaet. Of course not.

  Soc. He will think that his opinion is true, and he will fancy
that he knows the things about which he has been deceived?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Then he will think that he has captured knowledge and not
ignorance?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. And thus, after going a long way round, we are once more face
to face with our original difficulty. The hero of dialectic will
retort upon us:-"O my excellent friends, he will say, laughing, if a
man knows the form of ignorance and the form of knowledge, can he
think that one of them which he knows is the other which he knows? or,
if he knows neither of them, can he think that the one which he
knows not is another which he knows not? or, if he knows one and not
the other, can he think the one which he knows to be the one which
he does not know? or the one which he does not know to be the one
which he knows? or will you tell me that there are other forms of
knowledge which distinguish the right and wrong birds, and which the
owner keeps in some other aviaries or graven on waxen blocks according
to your foolish images, and which he may be said to know while he
possesses them, even though he have them not at hand in his mind?
And thus, in a perpetual circle, you will be compelled to go round and
round, and you will make no progress." What are we to say in reply,
Theaetetus?

  Theaet. Indeed, Socrates, I do not know what we are to say.

  Soc. Are not his reproaches just, and does not the argument truly
show that we are wrong in seeking for false opinion until we know what
knowledge is; that must be first ascertained; then, the nature of
false opinion?

  Theaet. I cannot but agree with you, Socrates, so far as we have yet
gone.

  Soc. Then, once more, what shall we say that knowledge is?-for we
are not going to lose heart as yet.

  Theaet. Certainly, I shall not lose heart, if you do not.

  Soc. What definition will be most consistent with our former views?

  Theaet. I cannot think of any but our old one, Socrates.

  Soc. What was it?

  Theaet. Knowledge was said by us to be true opinion; and true
opinion is surely unerring, and the results which follow from it are
all noble and good.

  Soc. He who led the way into the river, Theaetetus, said "The
experiment will show"; and perhaps if we go forward in the search,
we may stumble upon the thing which we are looking for; but if we stay
where we are, nothing will come to light.

  Theaet. Very true; let us go forward and try.

  Soc. The trail soon comes to an end, for a whole profession is
against us.

  Theaet. How is that, and what profession do you mean?

  Soc. The profession of the great wise ones who are called orators
and lawyers; for these persuade men by their art and make them think
whatever they like, but they do not teach them. Do you imagine that
there are any teachers in the world so clever as to be able to
convince others of the truth about acts of robbery or violence, of
which they were not eyewitnesses, while a little water is flowing in
the clepsydra?

  Theaet. Certainly not, they can only persuade them.

  Soc. And would you not say that persuading them is making them
have an opinion?

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Soc. When, therefore, judges are justly persuaded about matters
which you can know only by seeing them, and not in any other way,
and when thus judging of them from report they attain a true opinion
about them, they judge without knowledge and yet are rightly
persuaded, if they have judged well.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And yet, O my friend, if true opinion in law courts and
knowledge are the same, the perfect judge could not have judged
rightly without knowledge; and therefore I must infer that they are
not the same.

  Theaet. That is a distinction, Socrates, which I have heard made
by some one else, but I had forgotten it. He said that true opinion,
combined with reason, was knowledge, but that the opinion which had no
reason was out of the sphere of knowledge; and that things of which
there is no rational account are not knowable-such was the singular
expression which he used-and that things which have a reason or
explanation are knowable.

  Soc. Excellent; but then, how did he distinguish between things
which are and are not "knowable"? I wish that you would repeat to me
what he said, and then I shall know whether you and I have heard the
same tale.

  Theaet. I do not know whether I can recall it; but if another person
would tell me, I think that I could follow him.

  Soc. Let me give you, then, a dream in return for a dream:-Methought
that I too had a dream, and I heard in my dream that the primeval
letters or elements out of which you and I and all other things are
compounded, have no reason or explanation; you can only name them, but
no predicate can be either affirmed or denied of them, for in the
one case existence, in the other non-existence is already implied,
neither of which must be added, if you mean to speak of this or that
thing by itself alone. It should not be called itself, or that, or
each, or alone, or this, or the like; for these go about everywhere
and are applied to all things, but are distinct from them; whereas, if
the first elements could be described, and had a definition of their
own, they would be spoken of apart from all else. But none of these
primeval elements can be defined; they can only be named, for they
have nothing but a name, and the things which are compounded of
them, as they are complex, are expressed by a combination of names,
for the combination of names is the essence of a definition. Thus,
then, the elements or letters are only objects of perception, and
cannot be defined or known; but the syllables or combinations of
them are known and expressed, and are apprehended by true opinion.
When, therefore, any one forms the true opinion of anything without
rational explanation, you may say that his mind is truly exercised,
but has no knowledge; for he who cannot give and receive a reason
for a thing, has no knowledge of that thing; but when he adds rational
explanation, then, he is perfected in knowledge and may be all that
I have been denying of him. Was that the form in which the dream
appeared to you?

  Theaet. Precisely.

  Soc. And you allow and maintain that true opinion, combined with
definition or rational explanation, is knowledge?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Soc. Then may we assume, Theaetetus, that to-day, and in this casual
manner, we have found a truth which in former times many wise men have
grown old and have not found?

  Theaet. At any rate, Socrates, I am satisfied with the present
statement.

  Soc. Which is probably correct-for how can there be knowledge
apart from definition and true opinion? And yet there is one point
in what has been said which does not quite satisfy me.

  Theaet. What was it?

  Soc. What might seem to be the most ingenious notion of all:-That
the elements or letters are unknown, but the combination or
syllables known.

  Theaet. And was that wrong?

  Soc. We shall soon know; for we have as hostages the instances which
the author of the argument himself used.

  Theaet. What hostages?

  Soc. The letters, which are the clements; and the syllables, which
are the combinations;-he reasoned, did he not, from the letters of the
alphabet?

  Theaet. Yes; he did.

  Soc. Let us take them and put them to the test, or rather, test
ourselves:-What was the way in which we learned letters? and, first of
all, are we right in saying that syllables have a definition, but that
letters have no definition?

  Theaet. I think so.

  Soc. I think so too; for, suppose that some one asks you to spell
the first syllable of my name:-Theaetetus, he says, what is SO?

  Theaet. I should reply S and O.

  Soc. That is the definition which you would give of the syllable?

  Theaet. I should.

  Soc. I wish that you would give me a similar definition of the S.

  Theaet. But how can any one, Socrates, tell the elements of an
element? I can only reply, that S is a consonant, a mere noise, as
of the tongue hissing; B, and most other letters, again, are neither
vowel-sounds nor noises. Thus letters may be most truly said to be
undefined; for even the most distinct of them, which are the seven
vowels, have a sound only, but no definition at all.

  Soc. Then, I suppose, my friend, that we have been so far right in
our idea about knowledge?

  Theaet. Yes; I think that we have.

  Soc. Well, but have we been right in maintaining that the
syllables can be known, but not the letters?

  Theaet. I think so.

  Soc. And do we mean by a syllable two letters, or if there are more,
all of them, or a single idea which arises out of the combination of
them?

  Theaet. I should say that we mean all the letters.

  Soc. Take the case of the two letters S and O, which form the
first syllable of my own name; must not he who knows the syllable,
know both of them?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. He knows, that is, the S and O?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. But can he be ignorant of either singly and yet know both
together?

  Theaet. Such a supposition, Socrates, is monstrous and unmeaning.

  Soc. But if he cannot know both without knowing each, then if he
is ever to know the syllable, he must know the letters first; and thus
the fine theory has again taken wings and departed.

  Theaet. Yes, with wonderful celerity.

  Soc. Yes, we did not keep watch properly. Perhaps we ought to have
maintained that a syllable is not the letters, but rather one single
idea framed out of them, having a separate form distinct from them.

  Theaet. Very true; and a more likely notion than the other.

  Soc. Take care; let us not be cowards and betray a great and
imposing theory.

  Theaet. No, indeed.

  Soc. Let us assume then, as we now say, that the syllable is a
simple form arising out of the several combinations of harmonious
elements-of letters or of any other elements.

  Theaet. Very good.

  Soc. And it must have no parts.

  Theaet. Why?

  Soc. Because that which has parts must be a whole of all the
parts. Or would you say that a whole, although formed out of the
parts, is a single notion different from all the parts?

  Theaet. I should.

  Soc. And would you say that all and the whole are the same, or
different?

  Theaet. I am not certain; but, as you like me to answer at once, I
shall hazard the reply, that they are different.

  Soc. I approve of your readiness, Theaetetus, but I must take time
to think whether I equally approve of your answer.

  Theaet. Yes; the answer is the point.

  Soc. According to this new view, the whole is supposed to differ
from all?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Well, but is there any difference between all [in the plural]
and the all [in the singular]? Take the case of number:-When we say
one, two, three, four, five, six; or when we say twice three, or three
times two, or four and two, or three and two and one, are we
speaking of the same or of different numbers?

  Theaet. Of the same.

  Soc. That is of six?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And in each form of expression we spoke of all the six?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Again, in speaking of all [in the plural] is there not one
thing which we express?

  Theaet. Of course there is.

  Soc. And that is six?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. Then in predicating the word "all" of things measured by
number, we predicate at the same time a singular and a plural?

  Theaet. Clearly we do.

  Soc. Again, the number of the acre and the acre are the same; are
they not?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And the number of the stadium in like manner is the stadium?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And the army is the number of the army; and in all similar
cases, the entire number of anything is the entire thing?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And the number of each is the parts of each?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Soc. Then as many things as have parts are made up of parts?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. But all the parts are admitted to be the all, if the entire
number is the all?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Then the whole is not made up of parts, for it would be the
all, if consisting of all the parts?

  Theaet. That is the inference.

  Soc. But is a part a part of anything but the whole?

  Theaet. Yes, of the all.

  Soc. You make a valiant defence, Theaetetus. And yet is not the
all that of which nothing is wanting?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And is not a whole likewise that from which nothing is
absent? but that from which anything is absent is neither a whole
nor all;-if wanting in anything, both equally lose their entirety of
nature.

  Theaet. I now think that there is no difference between a whole
and all.

  Soc. But were we not saying that when a thing has parts, all the
parts will be a whole and all?

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Then, as I was saying before, must not the alternative be
that either the syllable is not the letters, and then the letters
are not parts of the syllable, or that the syllable will be the same
with the letters, and will therefore be equally known with them?

  Theaet. You are right.

  Soc. And, in order to avoid this, we suppose it to be different from
them?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. But if letters are not parts of syllables, can you tell me of
any other parts of syllables, which are not letters?

  Theaet. No, indeed, Socrates; for if I admit the existence of
parts in a syllable, it would be ridiculous in me to give up letters
and seek for other parts.

  Soc. Quite true, Theaetetus, and therefore, according to our present
view, a syllable must surely be some indivisible form?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. But do you remember, my friend, that only a little while ago we
admitted and approved the statement, that of the first elements out of
which all other things are compounded there could be no definition,
because each of them when taken by itself is uncompounded; nor can one
rightly attribute to them the words "being" or "this," because they
are alien and inappropriate words, and for this reason the letters
or clements were indefinable and unknown?

  Theaet. I remember.

  Soc. And is not this also the reason why they are simple and
indivisible? I can see no other.

  Theaet. No other reason can be given.

  Soc. Then is not the syllable in the same case as the elements or
letters, if it has no parts and is one form?

  Theaet. To be sure.

  Soc. If, then, a syllable is a whole, and has many parts or letters,
the letters as well as the syllable must be intelligible and
expressible, since all the parts are acknowledged to be the same as
the whole?

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. But if it be one and indivisible, then the syllables and the
letters are alike undefined and unknown, and for the same reason?

  Theaet. I cannot deny that.

  Soc. We cannot, therefore, agree in the opinion of him who says that
the syllable can be known and expressed, but not the letters.

  Theaet. Certainly not; if we may trust the argument.

  Soc. Well, but will you not be equally inclined to, disagree with
him, when you remember your own experience in learning to read?

  Theaet. What experience?

  Soc. Why, that in learning you were kept trying to distinguish the
separate letters both by the eye and by the car, in order that, when
you heard them spoken or saw them written, you might not be confused
by their position.

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. And is the education of the harp-player complete unless he
can tell what string answers to a particular note; the notes, as every
one would allow, are the elements or letters of music?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Soc. Then, if we argue from the letters and syllables which we
know to other simples and compounds, we shall say that the letters
or simple clements as a class are much more certainly known than the
syllables, and much more indispensable to a perfect knowledge of any
subject; and if some one says that the syllable is known and the
letter unknown, we shall consider that either intentionally or
unintentionally he is talking nonsense?

  Theaet. Exactly.

  Soc. And there might be given other proofs of this belief, if I am
not mistaken. But do not let us in looking for them lose sight of
the question before us, which is the meaning of the statement, that
right opinion with rational definition or explanation is the most
perfect form of knowledge.

  Theaet. We must not.

  Soc. Well, and what is the meaning of the term "explanation"? I
think that we have a choice of three meanings.

  Theaet. What are they?

  Soc. In the first place, the meaning may be, manifesting one's
thought by the voice with verbs and nouns, imaging an opinion in the
stream which flows from the lips, as in a mirror or water. Does not
explanation appear to be of this nature?

  Theaet. Certainly; he who so manifests his thought, is said to
explain himself.

  Soc. And every one who is not born deaf or dumb is able sooner or
later to manifest what he thinks of anything; and if so, all those who
have a right opinion about anything will also have right
explanation; nor will right opinion be anywhere found to exist apart
from knowledge.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Let us not, therefore, hastily charge him who gave this account
of knowledge with uttering an unmeaning word; for perhaps he only
intended to say, that when a person was asked what was the nature of
anything, he should be able to answer his questioner by giving the
clements of the thing.

  Theaet. As for example, Socrates...?

  Soc. As, for example, when Hesiod says that a waggon is made up of a
hundred planks. Now, neither you nor I could describe all of them
individually; but if any one asked what is a waggon, we should be
content to answer, that a waggon consists of wheels, axle, body, rims,
yoke.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. And our opponent will probably laugh at us, just as he would if
we professed to be grammarians and to give a grammatical account of
the name of Theaetetus, and yet could only tell the syllables and
not the letters of your name-that would be true opinion, and not
knowledge; for knowledge, as has been already remarked, is not
attained until, combined with true opinion, there is an enumeration of
the elements out of which is composed.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. In the same general way, we might also have true opinion
about a waggon; but he who can describe its essence by an
enumeration of the hundred planks, adds rational explanation to true
opinion, and instead of opinion has art and knowledge of the nature of
a waggon, in that he attains to the whole through the elements.

  Theaet. And do. you not agree in that view, Socrates?

  Soc. If you do, my friend; but I want to know first, whether you
admit the resolution of all things into their elements to be a
rational explanation of them, and the consideration of them in
syllables or larger combinations of them to be irrational-is this your
view?

  Theaet. Precisely.

  Soc. Well, and do you conceive that a man has knowledge of any
element who at one time affirms and at another time denies that
clement of something, or thinks that. the same thing is composed of
different elements at different times?

  Theaet. Assuredly not.

  Soc. And do you not remember that in your case and in of others this
often occurred in the process of learning to read?

  Theaet. You mean that I mistook the letters and misspelt the
syllables?

  Soc. Yes.

  Theaet. To be sure; I perfectly remember, and I am very far from
supposing that they who are in this condition, have knowledge.

  Soc. When a person, at the time of learning writes the name of
Theaetetus, and thinks that he ought to write and does write Th and e;
but, again meaning to write the name of Theododorus, thinks that he
ought to write and does write T and e-can we suppose that he knows the
first syllables of your two names?

  Theaet. We have already admitted that such a one has not yet
attained knowledge.

  Soc. And in like manner be may enumerate without knowing them the
second and third and fourth syllables of your name?

  Theaet. He may.

  Soc. And in that case, when he knows the order of the letters and
can write them out correctly, he has right opinion?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. But although we admit that he has right opinion, he will
still be without knowledge?

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. And yet he will have explanations, as well as right opinion,
for he knew the order of the letters when he wrote; and this we
admit be explanation.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Then, my friend, there is such a thing as right opinion
united with definition or explanation, which does not as yet attain to
the exactness of knowledge.

  Theaet. It would seem so.

  Soc. And what we fancied to be a perfect definition of knowledge
is a dream only. But perhaps we had better not say so as yet, for were
there not three explanations of knowledge, one of which must, as we
said, be adopted by him who maintains knowledge to be true opinion
combined with rational explanation? And very likely there may be found
some one who will not prefer this but the third.

  Theaet. You are quite right; there is still one remaining. The first
was the image or expression of the mind in speech; the second, which
has just been mentioned, is a way of reaching the whole by an
enumeration of the elements. But what is; the third definition?

  Soc. There is, further, the popular notion of telling the mark or
sign of difference which distinguishes the thing in question from
all others.

  Theaet. Can you give me any example of such a definition?

  Soc. As, for example, in the case of the sun, I think that you would
be contented with the statement that the sun is, the brightest of
the heavenly bodies which revolve about the earth.

  Theaet. Certainly.

  Soc. Understand why:-the reason is, as I was just now saying, that
if you get at the difference and distinguishing characteristic of each
thing, then, as many persons affirm, you will get at the definition or
explanation of it; but while you lay hold only of the common and not
of the characteristic notion, you will only have the definition of
those things to which this common quality belongs.

  Theaet. I understand you, and your account of definition is in my
judgment correct.

  Soc. But he, who having right opinion about anything, can find out
the difference which distinguishes it from other things will know that
of which before he had only an opinion.

  Theaet. Yes; that is what we are maintaining.

  Soc. Nevertheless, Theaetetus, on a nearer view, I find myself quite
disappointed; the picture, which at a distance was not so bad, has now
become altogether unintelligible.

  Theaet. What do you mean?

  Soc. I will endeavour to explain: I will suppose myself to have true
opinion of you, and if to this I add your definition, then I have
knowledge, but if not, opinion only.

  Theaet. Yes.

  Soc. The definition was assumed to be the interpretation of your
difference.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. But when I had only opinion, I had no conception of your
distinguishing characteristics.

  Theaet. I suppose not.

  Soc. Then I must have conceived of some general or common nature
which no more belonged to you than to another.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. Tell me, now-How in that case could I have formed a judgment of
you any more than of any one else? Suppose that I imagine Theaetetus
to be a man who has nose, eyes, and mouth, and every other member
complete; how would that enable me to distinguish Theaetetus from
Theodorus, or from some outer barbarian?

  Theaet. How could it?

  Soc. Or if I had further conceived of you, not only as having nose
and eyes, but as having a snub nose and prominent eyes, should I
have any more notion of you than of myself and others who resemble me?

  Theaet. Certainly not.

  Soc. Surely I can have no conception of Theaetetus until your
snub-nosedness has left an impression on my mind different from the
snub-nosedness of all others whom I have ever seen, and until your
other peculiarities have a like distinctness; and so when I meet you
tomorrow the right opinion will be re-called?

  Theaet. Most true.

  Soc. Then right opinion implies the perception of differences?

  Theaet. Clearly.

  Soc. What, then, shall we say of adding reason or explanation to
right opinion? If the meaning is, that we should form an opinion of
the way in which something differs from another thing, the proposal is
ridiculous.

  Theaet. How so?

  Soc. We are supposed to acquire a right opinion of the differences
which distinguish one thing from another when we have already a
right opinion of them, and so we go round and round:-the revolution of
the scytal, or pestle, or any other rotatory machine, in the same
circles, is as nothing compared with such a requirement; and we may be
truly described as the blind directing the blind; for to add those
things which we already have, in order that we may learn what we
already think, is like a soul utterly benighted.

  Theaet. Tell me; what were you going to say just now, when you asked
the question?

  Soc. If, my boy, the argument, in speaking of adding the definition,
had used the word to "know," and not merely "have an opinion" of the
difference, this which is the most promising of all the definitions of
knowledge would have come to a pretty end, for to know is surely to
acquire knowledge.

  Theaet. True.

  Soc. And so, when the question is asked, What is knowledge? this
fair argument will answer "Right opinion with knowledge,"-knowledge,
that is, of difference, for this, as the said argument maintains, is
adding the definition.

  Theaet. That seems to be true.

  Soc. But how utterly foolish, when we are asking what is
knowledge, that the reply should only be, right opinion with knowledge
of difference or of anything! And so, Theaetetus, knowledge is neither
sensation nor true opinion, nor yet definition and explanation
accompanying and added to true opinion?

  Theaet. I suppose not.

  Soc. And are you still in labour and travail, my dear friend, or
have you brought all that you have to say about knowledge to the
birth?

  Theaet. I am sure, Socrates, that you have elicited from me a good
deal more than ever was in me.

  Soc. And does not my art show that you have brought forth wind,
and that the offspring of your brain are not worth bringing up?

  Theaet. Very true.

  Soc. But if, Theaetetus, you should ever conceive afresh, you will
be all the better for the present investigation, and if not, you
will be soberer and humbler and gentler to other men, and will be
too modest to fancy that you know what you do not know. These are
the limits of my art; I can no further go, nor do I know aught of
the things which great and famous men know or have known in this or
former ages. The office of a midwife I, like my mother, have
received from God; she delivered women, I deliver men; but they must
be young and noble and fair.

  And now I have to go to the porch of the King Archon, where I am
to meet Meletus and his indictment. To-morrow morning, Theodorus, I
shall hope to see you again at this place.

                             -THE END-
.


  PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: SOCRATES; CRITIAS; TIMAEUS; HERMOCRATES

  Socrates. One, two, three; but where, my dear Timaeus, is the fourth
of those who were yesterday my guests and are to be my entertainers
to-day?

  Timaeus. He has been taken ill, Socrates; for he would not willingly
have been absent from this gathering.

  Soc. Then, if he is not coming, you and the two others must supply
his place.

  Tim. Certainly, and we will do all that we can; having been
handsomely entertained by you yesterday, those of us who remain should
be only too glad to return your hospitality.

  Soc. Do you remember what were the points of which I required you to
speak?

  Tim. We remember some of them, and you will be here to remind us
of anything which we have forgotten: or rather, if we are not
troubling you, will you briefly recapitulate the whole, and then the
particulars will be more firmly fixed in our memories?

  Soc. To be sure I will: the chief theme of my yesterday's
discourse was the State-how constituted and of what citizens
composed it would seem likely to be most perfect.

  Tim. Yes, Socrates; and what you said of it was very much to our
mind.

  Soc. Did we not begin by separating the husbandmen and the
artisans from the class of defenders of the State?

  Tim. Yes.

  Soc. And when we had given to each one that single employment and
particular art which was suited to his nature, we spoke of those who
were intended to be our warriors, and said that they were to be
guardians of the city against attacks from within as well as from
without, and to have no other employment; they were to be merciful
in judging their subjects, of whom they were by nature friends, but
fierce to their enemies, when they came across them in battle.

  Tim. Exactly.

  Soc. We said, if I am not mistaken, that the guardians should be
gifted with a temperament in a high degree both passionate and
philosophical; and that then they would be as they ought to be, gentle
to their friends and fierce with their enemies.

  Tim. Certainly.

  Soc. And what did we say of their education? Were they not to be
trained in gymnastic, and music, and all other sorts of knowledge
which were proper for them?

  Tim. Very true.

  Soc. And being thus trained they were not to consider gold or silver
or anything else to be their own private property; they were to be
like hired troops, receiving pay for keeping guard from those who were
protected by them-the pay was to be no more than would suffice for men
of simple life; and they were to spend in common, and to live together
in the continual practice of virtue, which was to be their sole
pursuit.

  Tim. That was also said.

  Soc. Neither did we forget the women; of whom we declared, that
their natures should be assimilated and brought into harmony with
those of the men, and that common pursuits should be assigned to
them both in time of war and in their ordinary life.

  Tim. That, again, was as you say.

  Soc. And what about the procreation of children? Or rather not the
proposal too singular to be forgotten? for all wives and children were
to be in common, to the intent that no one should ever know his own
child, but they were to imagine that they were all one family; those
who were within a suitable limit of age were to be brothers and
sisters, those who were of an elder generation parents and
grandparents, and those of a younger children and grandchildren.

  Tim. Yes, and the proposal is easy to remember, as you say.

  Soc. And do you also remember how, with a view of securing as far as
we could the best breed, we said that the chief magistrates, male
and female, should contrive secretly, by the use of certain lots, so
to arrange the nuptial meeting, that the bad of either sex and the
good of either sex might pair with their like; and there was to be
no quarrelling on this account, for they would imagine that the
union was a mere accident, and was to be attributed to the lot?

  Tim. I remember.

  Soc. And you remember how we said that the children of the good
parents were to be educated, and the children of the bad secretly
dispersed among the inferior citizens; and while they were all growing
up the rulers were to be on the look-out, and to bring up from below
in their turn those who were worthy, and those among themselves who
were unworthy were to take the places of those who came up?

  Tim. True.

  Soc. Then have I now given you all the heads of our yesterday's
discussion? Or is there anything more, my dear Timaeus, which has been
omitted?

  Tim. Nothing, Socrates; it was just as you have said.

  Soc. I should like, before proceeding further, to tell you how I
feel about the State which we have described. I might compare myself
to a person who, on beholding beautiful animals either created by
the painter's art, or, better still, alive but at rest, is seized with
a desire of seeing them in motion or engaged in some struggle or
conflict to which their forms appear suited; this is my feeling
about the State which we have been describing. There are conflicts
which all cities undergo, and I should like to hear some one tell of
our own city carrying on a struggle against her neighbours, and how
she went out to war in a becoming manner, and when at war showed by
the greatness of her actions and the magnanimity of her words in
dealing with other cities a result worthy of her training and
education. Now I, Critias and Hermocrates, am conscious that I
myself should never be able to celebrate the city and her citizens
in a befitting manner, and I am not surprised at my own incapacity; to
me the wonder is rather that the poets present as well as past are
no better-not that I mean to depreciate them; but every one can see
that they are a tribe of imitators, and will imitate best and most
easily the life in which they have been brought up; while that which
is beyond the range of a man's education he finds hard to carry out in
action, and still harder adequately to represent in language. I am
aware that the Sophists have plenty of brave words and fair
conceits, but I am afraid that being only wanderers from one city to
another, and having never had habitations of their own, they may
fail in their conception of philosophers and statesmen, and may not
know what they do and say in time of war, when they are fighting or
holding parley with their enemies. And thus people of your class are
the only ones remaining who are fitted by nature and education to take
part at once both in politics and philosophy. Here is Timaeus, of
Locris in Italy, a city which has admirable laws, and who is himself
in wealth and rank the equal of any of his fellow-citizens; he has
held the most important and honourable offices in his own state,
and, as I believe, has scaled the heights of all philosophy; and
here is Critias, whom every Athenian knows to be no novice in the
matters of which we are speaking; and as to, Hermocrates, I am assured
by many witnesses that his genius and education qualify him to take
part in any speculation of the kind. And therefore yesterday when I
saw that you wanted me to describe the formation of the State, I
readily assented, being very well aware, that, if you only would, none
were better qualified to carry the discussion further, and that when
you had engaged our city in a suitable war, you of all men living
could best exhibit her playing a fitting part. When I had completed my
task, I in return imposed this other task upon you. You conferred
together and agreed to entertain me to-day, as I had entertained
you, with a feast of discourse. Here am I in festive array, and no man
can be more ready for the promised banquet.

  Her. And we too, Socrates, as Timaeus says, will not be wanting in
enthusiasm; and there is no excuse for not complying with your
request. As soon as we arrived yesterday at the guest-chamber of
Critias, with whom we are staying, or rather on our way thither, we
talked the matter over, and he told us an ancient tradition, which I
wish, Critias, that you would repeat to Socrates, so that he may
help us to judge whether it will satisfy his requirements or not.

  Crit. I will, if Timaeus, who is our other partner, approves.

  Tim. I quite approve.

  Crit. Then listen, Socrates, to a tale which, though strange, is
certainly true, having been attested by Solon, who was the wisest of
the seven sages. He was a relative and a dear friend of my
great-grandfather, Dropides, as he himself says in many passages of
his poems; and he told the story to Critias, my grandfather, who
remembered and repeated it to us. There were of old, he said, great
and marvellous actions of the Athenian city, which have passed into
oblivion through lapse of time and the destruction of mankind, and one
in particular, greater than all the rest. This we will now rehearse.
It will be a fitting monument of our gratitude to you, and a hymn of
praise true and worthy of the goddess, on this her day of festival.

  Soc. Very good. And what is this ancient famous action of the
Athenians, which Critias declared, on the authority of Solon, to be
not a mere legend, but an actual fact?

  Crit. I will tell an old-world story which I heard from an aged man;
for Critias, at the time of telling it, was as he said, nearly
ninety years of age, and I was about ten. Now the day was that day
of the Apaturia which is called the Registration of Youth, at which,
according to custom, our parents gave prizes for recitations, and
the poems of several poets were recited by us boys, and many of us
sang the poems of Solon, which at that time had not gone out of
fashion. One of our tribe, either because he thought so or to please
Critias, said that in his judgment Solon was not only the wisest of
men, but also the noblest of poets. The old man, as I very well
remember, brightened up at hearing this and said, smiling: Yes,
Amynander, if Solon had only, like other poets, made poetry the
business of his life, and had completed the tale which he brought with
him from Egypt, and had not been compelled, by reason of the
factions and troubles which he found stirring in his own country
when he came home, to attend to other matters, in my opinion he
would have been as famous as Homer or Hesiod, or any poet.

  And what was the tale about, Critias? said Amynander.

  About the greatest action which the Athenians ever did, and which
ought to have been the most famous, but, through the lapse of time and
the destruction of the actors, it has not come down to us.

  Tell us, said the other, the whole story, and how and from whom
Solon heard this veritable tradition.

  He replied:-In the Egyptian Delta, at the head of which the river
Nile divides, there is a certain district which is called the district
of Sais, and the great city of the district is also called Sais, and
is the city from which King Amasis came. The citizens have a deity for
their foundress; she is called in the Egyptian tongue Neith, and is
asserted by them to be the same whom the Hellenes call Athene; they
are great lovers of the Athenians, and say that they are in some way
related to them. To this city came Solon, and was received there
with great honour; he asked the priests who were most skilful in
such matters, about antiquity, and made the discovery that neither
he nor any other Hellene knew anything worth mentioning about the
times of old. On one occasion, wishing to draw them on to speak of
antiquity, he began to tell about the most ancient things in our
part of the world-about Phoroneus, who is called "the first man,"
and about Niobe; and after the Deluge, of the survival of Deucalion
and Pyrrha; and he traced the genealogy of their descendants, and
reckoning up the dates, tried to compute how many years ago the events
of which he was speaking happened. Thereupon one of the priests, who
was of a very great age, said: O Solon, Solon, you Hellenes are
never anything but children, and there is not an old man among you.
Solon in return asked him what he meant. I mean to say, he replied,
that in mind you are all young; there is no old opinion handed down
among you by ancient tradition, nor any science which is hoary with
age. And I will tell you why. There have been, and will be again, many
destructions of mankind arising out of many causes; the greatest
have been brought about by the agencies of fire and water, and other
lesser ones by innumerable other causes. There is a story, which
even you have preserved, that once upon a time Paethon, the son of
Helios, having yoked the steeds in his father's chariot, because he
was not able to drive them in the path of his father, burnt up all
that was upon the earth, and was himself destroyed by a thunderbolt.
Now this has the form of a myth, but really signifies a declination of
the bodies moving in the heavens around the earth, and a great
conflagration of things upon the earth, which recurs after long
intervals; at such times those who live upon the mountains and in
dry and lofty places are more liable to destruction than those who
dwell by rivers or on the seashore. And from this calamity the Nile,
who is our never-failing saviour, delivers and preserves us. When,
on the other hand, the gods purge the earth with a deluge of water,
the survivors in your country are herdsmen and shepherds who dwell
on the mountains, but those who, like you, live in cities are
carried by the rivers into the sea. Whereas in this land, neither then
nor at any other time, does the water come down from above on the
fields, having always a tendency to come up from below; for which
reason the traditions preserved here are the most ancient.

  The fact is, that wherever the extremity of winter frost or of
summer does not prevent, mankind exist, sometimes in greater,
sometimes in lesser numbers. And whatever happened either in your
country or in ours, or in any other region of which we are informed-if
there were any actions noble or great or in any other way
remarkable, they have all been written down by us of old, and are
preserved in our temples. Whereas just when you and other nations
are beginning to be provided with letters and the other requisites
of civilized life, after the usual interval, the stream from heaven,
like a pestilence, comes pouring down, and leaves only those of you
who are destitute of letters and education; and so you have to begin
all over again like children, and know nothing of what happened in
ancient times, either among us or among yourselves. As for those
genealogies of yours which you just now recounted to us, Solon, they
are no better than the tales of children. In the first place you
remember a single deluge only, but there were many previous ones; in
the next place, you do not know that there formerly dwelt in your land
the fairest and noblest race of men which ever lived, and that you and
your whole city are descended from a small seed or remnant of them
which survived. And this was unknown to you, because, for many
generations, the survivors of that destruction died, leaving no
written word. For there was a time, Solon, before the great deluge
of all, when the city which now is Athens was first in war and in
every way the best governed of all cities, is said to have performed
the noblest deeds and to have had the fairest constitution of any of
which tradition tells, under the face of heaven.

  Solon marvelled at his words, and earnestly requested the priests to
inform him exactly and in order about these former citizens. You are
welcome to hear about them, Solon, said the priest, both for your
own sake and for that of your city, and above all, for the sake of the
goddess who is the common patron and parent and educator of both our
cities. She founded your city a thousand years before ours,
receiving from the Earth and Hephaestus the seed of your race, and
afterwards she founded ours, of which the constitution is recorded
in our sacred registers to be eight thousand years old. As touching
your citizens of nine thousand years ago, I will briefly inform you of
their laws and of their most famous action; the exact particulars of
the whole we will hereafter go through at our leisure in the sacred
registers themselves. If you compare these very laws with ours you
will find that many of ours are the counterpart of yours as they
were in the olden time. In the first place, there is the caste of
priests, which is separated from all the others; next, there are the
artificers, who ply their several crafts by themselves and do not
intermix; and also there is the class of shepherds and of hunters,
as well as that of husbandmen; and you will observe, too, that the
warriors in Egypt are distinct from all the other classes, and are
commanded by the law to devote themselves solely to military pursuits;
moreover, the weapons which they carry are shields and spears, a style
of equipment which the goddess taught of Asiatics first to us, as in
your part of the world first to you. Then as to wisdom, do you observe
how our law from the very first made a study of the whole order of
things, extending even to prophecy and medicine which gives health,
out of these divine elements deriving what was needful for human life,
and adding every sort of knowledge which was akin to them. All this
order and arrangement the goddess first imparted to you when
establishing your city; and she chose the spot of earth in which you
were born, because she saw that the happy temperament of the seasons
in that land would produce the wisest of men. Wherefore the goddess,
who was a lover both of war and of wisdom, selected and first of all
settled that spot which was the most likely to produce men likest
herself. And there you dwelt, having such laws as these and still
better ones, and excelled all mankind in all virtue, as became the
children and disciples of the gods.

  Many great and wonderful deeds are recorded of your state in our
histories. But one of them exceeds all the rest in greatness and
valour. For these histories tell of a mighty power which unprovoked
made an expedition against the whole of Europe and Asia, and to
which your city put an end. This power came forth out of the
Atlantic Ocean, for in those days the Atlantic was navigable; and
there was an island situated in front of the straits which are by
you called the Pillars of Heracles; the island was larger than Libya
and Asia put together, and was the way to other islands, and from
these you might pass to the whole of the opposite continent which
surrounded the true ocean; for this sea which is within the Straits of
Heracles is only a harbour, having a narrow entrance, but that other
is a real sea, and the surrounding land may be most truly called a
boundless continent. Now in this island of Atlantis there was a
great and wonderful empire which had rule over the whole island and
several others, and over parts of the continent, and, furthermore, the
men of Atlantis had subjected the parts of Libya within the columns of
Heracles as far as Egypt, and of Europe as far as Tyrrhenia. This vast
power, gathered into one, endeavoured to subdue at a blow our
country and yours and the whole of the region within the straits;
and then, Solon, your country shone forth, in the excellence of her
virtue and strength, among all mankind. She was pre-eminent in courage
and military skill, and was the leader of the Hellenes. And when the
rest fell off from her, being compelled to stand alone, after having
undergone the very extremity of danger, she defeated and triumphed
over the invaders, and preserved from slavery those who were not yet
subjugated, and generously liberated all the rest of us who dwell
within the pillars. But afterwards there occurred violent
earthquakes and floods; and in a single day and night of misfortune
all your warlike men in a body sank into the earth, and the island
of Atlantis in like manner disappeared in the depths of the sea. For
which reason the sea in those parts is impassable and impenetrable,
because there is a shoal of mud in the way; and this was caused by the
subsidence of the island.

  I have told you briefly, Socrates, what the aged Critias heard
from Solon and related to us. And when you were speaking yesterday
about your city and citizens, the tale which I have just been
repeating to you came into my mind, and I remarked with astonishment
how, by some mysterious coincidence, you agreed in almost every
particular with the narrative of Solon; but I did not like to speak at
the moment. For a long time had elapsed, and I had forgotten too much;
I thought that I must first of all run over the narrative in my own
mind, and then I would speak. And so I readily assented to your
request yesterday, considering that in all such cases the chief
difficulty is to find a tale suitable to our purpose, and that with
such a tale we should be fairly well provided.

  And therefore, as Hermocrates has told you, on my way home yesterday
I at once communicated the tale to my companions as I remembered it;
and after I left them, during the night by thinking I recovered nearly
the whole it. Truly, as is often said, the lessons of our childhood
make wonderful impression on our memories; for I am not sure that I
could remember all the discourse of yesterday, but I should be much
surprised if I forgot any of these things which I have heard very long
ago. I listened at the time with childlike interest to the old man's
narrative; he was very ready to teach me, and I asked him again and
again to repeat his words, so that like an indelible picture they were
branded into my mind. As soon as the day broke, I rehearsed them as he
spoke them to my companions, that they, as well as myself, might
have something to say. And now, Socrates, to make an end my preface, I
am ready to tell you the whole tale. I will give you not only the
general heads, but the particulars, as they were told to me. The
city and citizens, which you yesterday described to us in fiction,
we will now transfer to the world of reality. It shall be the
ancient city of Athens, and we will suppose that the citizens whom you
imagined, were our veritable ancestors, of whom the priest spoke; they
will perfectly harmonise, and there will be no inconsistency in saying
that the citizens of your republic are these ancient Athenians. Let us
divide the subject among us, and all endeavour according to our
ability gracefully to execute the task which you have imposed upon us.
Consider then, Socrates, if this narrative is suited to the purpose,
or whether we should seek for some other instead.

  Soc. And what other, Critias, can we find that will be better than
this, which is natural and suitable to the festival of the goddess,
and has the very great advantage of being a fact and not a fiction?
How or where shall we find another if we abandon this? We cannot,
and therefore you must tell the tale, and good luck to you; and I in
return for my yesterday's discourse will now rest and be a listener.

  Crit. Let me proceed to explain to you, Socrates, the order in which
we have arranged our entertainment. Our intention is, that Timaeus,
who is the most of an astronomer amongst us, and has made the nature
of the universe his special study, should speak first, beginning
with the generation of the world and going down to the creation of
man; next, I am to receive the men whom he has created of whom some
will have profited by the excellent education which you have given
them; and then, in accordance with the tale of Solon, and equally with
his law, we will bring them into court and make them citizens, as if
they were those very Athenians whom the sacred Egyptian record has
recovered from oblivion, and thenceforward we will speak of them as
Athenians and fellow-citizens.

  Soc. I see that I shall receive in my turn a perfect and splendid
feast of reason. And now, Timaeus, you, I suppose, should speak
next, after duly calling upon the Gods.

  Tim. All men, Socrates, who have any degree of right feeling, at the
beginning of every enterprise, whether small or great, always call
upon God. And we, too, who are going to discourse of the nature of the
universe, how created or how existing without creation, if we be not
altogether out of our wits, must invoke the aid of Gods and
Goddesses and pray that our words may be acceptable to them and
consistent with themselves. Let this, then, be our invocation of the
Gods, to which I add an exhortation of myself to speak in such
manner as will be most intelligible to you, and will most accord
with my own intent.

  First then, in my judgment, we must make a distinction and ask, What
is that which always is and has no becoming; and what is that which is
always becoming and never is? That which is apprehended by
intelligence and reason is always in the same state; but that which is
conceived by opinion with the help of sensation and without reason, is
always in a process of becoming and perishing and never really is. Now
everything that becomes or is created must of necessity be created
by some cause, for without a cause nothing can be created. The work of
the creator, whenever he looks to the unchangeable and fashions the
form and nature of his work after an unchangeable pattern, must
necessarily be made fair and perfect; but when he looks to the created
only, and uses a created pattern, it is not fair or perfect. Was the
heaven then or the world, whether called by this or by any other
more appropriate name-assuming the name, I am asking a question
which has to be asked at the beginning of an enquiry about
anything-was the world, I say, always in existence and without
beginning? or created, and had it a beginning? Created, I reply, being
visible and tangible and having a body, and therefore sensible; and
all sensible things are apprehended by opinion and sense and are in
a process of creation and created. Now that which is created must,
as we affirm, of necessity be created by a cause. But the father and
maker of all this universe is past finding out; and even if we found
him, to tell of him to all men would be impossible. And there is still
a question to be asked about him: Which of the patterns had the
artificer in view when he made the world-the pattern of the
unchangeable, or of that which is created? If the world be indeed fair
and the artificer good, it is manifest that he must have looked to
that which is eternal; but if what cannot be said without blasphemy is
true, then to the created pattern. Every one will see that he must
have looked to, the eternal; for the world is the fairest of creations
and he is the best of causes. And having been created in this way, the
world has been framed in the likeness of that which is apprehended
by reason and mind and is unchangeable, and must therefore of
necessity, if this is admitted, be a copy of something. Now it is
all-important that the beginning of everything should be according
to nature. And in speaking of the copy and the original we may
assume that words are akin to the matter which they describe; when
they relate to the lasting and permanent and intelligible, they
ought to be lasting and unalterable, and, as far as their nature
allows, irrefutable and immovable-nothing less. But when they
express only the copy or likeness and not the eternal things
themselves, they need only be likely and analogous to the real
words. As being is to becoming, so is truth to belief. If then,
Socrates, amid the many opinions about the gods and the generation
of the universe, we are not able to give notions which are
altogether and in every respect exact and consistent with one another,
do not be surprised. Enough, if we adduce probabilities as likely as
any others; for we must remember that I who am the speaker, and you
who are the judges, are only mortal men, and we ought to accept the
tale which is probable and enquire no further.

  Soc. Excellent, Timaeus; and we will do precisely as you bid us. The
prelude is charming, and is already accepted by us-may we beg of you
to proceed to the strain?

  Tim. Let me tell you then why the creator made this world of
generation. He was good, and the good can never have any jealousy of
anything. And being free from jealousy, he desired that all things
should be as like himself as they could be. This is in the truest
sense the origin of creation and of the world, as we shall do well
in believing on the testimony of wise men: God desired that all things
should be good and nothing bad, so far as this was attainable.
Wherefore also finding the whole visible sphere not at rest, but
moving in an irregular and disorderly fashion, out of disorder he
brought order, considering that this was in every way better than
the other. Now the deeds of the best could never be or have been other
than the fairest; and the creator, reflecting on the things which
are by nature visible, found that no unintelligent creature taken as a
whole was fairer than the intelligent taken as a whole; and that
intelligence could not be present in anything which was devoid of
soul. For which reason, when he was framing the universe, he put
intelligence in soul, and soul in body, that he might be the creator
of a work which was by nature fairest and best. Wherefore, using the
language of probability, we may say that the world became a living
creature truly endowed with soul and intelligence by the providence of
God.

  This being supposed, let us proceed to the next stage: In the
likeness of what animal did the Creator make the world? It would be an
unworthy thing to liken it to any nature which exists as a part
only; for nothing can be beautiful which is like any imperfect
thing; but let us suppose the world to be the very image of that whole
of which all other animals both individually and in their tribes are
portions. For the original of the universe contains in itself all
intelligible beings, just as this world comprehends us and all other
visible creatures. For the Deity, intending to make this world like
the fairest and most perfect of intelligible beings, framed one
visible animal comprehending within itself all other animals of a
kindred nature. Are we right in saying that there is one world, or
that they are many and infinite? There must be one only, if the
created copy is to accord with the original. For that which includes
all other intelligible creatures cannot have a second or companion; in
that case there would be need of another living being which would
include both, and of which they would be parts, and the likeness would
be more truly said to resemble not them, but that other which included
them. In order then that the world might be solitary, like the perfect
animal, the creator made not two worlds or an infinite number of them;
but there is and ever will be one only-begotten and created heaven.

  Now that which is created is of necessity corporeal, and also
visible and tangible. And nothing is visible where there is no fire,
or tangible which has no solidity, and nothing is solid without earth.
Wherefore also God in the beginning of creation made the body of the
universe to consist of fire and earth. But two things cannot be
rightly put together without a third; there must be some bond of union
between them. And the fairest bond is that which makes the most
complete fusion of itself and the things which it combines; and
proportion is best adapted to effect such a union. For whenever in any
three numbers, whether cube or square, there is a mean, which is to
the last term what the first term is to it; and again, when the mean
is to the first term as the last term is to the mean-then the mean
becoming first and last, and the first and last both becoming means,
they will all of them of necessity come to be the same, and having
become the same with one another will be all one. If the universal
frame had been created a surface only and having no depth, a single
mean would have sufficed to bind together itself and the other
terms; but now, as the world must be solid, and solid bodies are
always compacted not by one mean but by two, God placed water and
air in the mean between fire and earth, and made them to have the same
proportion so far as was possible (as fire is to air so is air to
water, and as air is to water so is water to earth); and thus he bound
and put together a visible and tangible heaven. And for these reasons,
and out of such elements which are in number four, the body of the
world was created, and it was harmonised by proportion, and
therefore has the spirit of friendship; and having been reconciled
to itself, it was indissoluble by the hand of any other than the
framer.

  Now the creation took up the whole of each of the four elements; for
the Creator compounded the world out of all the fire and all the water
and all the air and all the earth, leaving no part of any of them
nor any power of them outside. His intention was, in the first
place, that the animal should be as far as possible a perfect whole
and of perfect parts: secondly, that it should be one, leaving no
remnants out of which another such world might be created: and also
that it should be free from old age and unaffected by disease.
Considering that if heat and cold and other powerful forces which
unite bodies surround and attack them from without when they are
unprepared, they decompose them, and by bringing diseases and old
age upon them, make them waste away-for this cause and on these
grounds he made the world one whole, having every part entire, and
being therefore perfect and not liable to old age and disease. And
he gave to the world the figure which was suitable and also natural.
Now to the animal which was to comprehend all animals, that figure was
suitable which comprehends within itself all other figures.
Wherefore he made the world in the form of a globe, round as from a
lathe, having its extremes in every direction equidistant from the
centre, the most perfect and the most like itself of all figures;
for he considered that the like is infinitely fairer than the
unlike. This he finished off, making the surface smooth all around for
many reasons; in the first place, because the living being had no need
of eyes when there was nothing remaining outside him to be seen; nor
of ears when there was nothing to be heard; and there was no
surrounding atmosphere to be breathed; nor would there have been any
use of organs by the help of which he might receive his food or get
rid of what he had already digested, since there was nothing which
went from him or came into him: for there was nothing beside him. Of
design he was created thus, his own waste providing his own food,
and all that he did or suffered taking place in and by himself. For
the Creator conceived that a being which was self-sufficient would
be far more excellent than one which lacked anything; and, as he had
no need to take anything or defend himself against any one, the
Creator did not think it necessary to bestow upon him hands: nor had
he any need of feet, nor of the whole apparatus of walking; but the
movement suited to his spherical form was assigned to him, being of
all the seven that which is most appropriate to mind and intelligence;
and he was made to move in the same manner and on the same spot,
within his own limits revolving in a circle. All the other six motions
were taken away from him, and he was made not to partake of their
deviations. And as this circular movement required no feet, the
universe was created without legs and without feet.

  Such was the whole plan of the eternal God about the god that was to
be, to whom for this reason he gave a body, smooth and even, having
a surface in every direction equidistant from the centre, a body
entire and perfect, and formed out of perfect bodies. And in the
centre he put the soul, which he diffused throughout the body,
making it also to be the exterior environment of it; and he made the
universe a circle moving in a circle, one and solitary, yet by
reason of its excellence able to converse with itself, and needing
no other friendship or acquaintance. Having these purposes in view
he created the world a blessed god.

  Now God did not make the soul after the body, although we are
speaking of them in this order; for having brought them together he
would never have allowed that the elder should be ruled by the
younger; but this is a random manner of speaking which we have,
because somehow we ourselves too are very much under the dominion of
chance. Whereas he made the soul in origin and excellence prior to and
older than the body, to be the ruler and mistress, of whom the body
was to be the subject. And he made her out of the following elements
and on this wise: Out of the indivisible and unchangeable, and also
out of that which is divisible and has to do with material bodies,
he compounded a third and intermediate kind of essence, partaking of
the nature of the same and of the other, and this compound he placed
accordingly in a mean between the indivisible, and the divisible and
material. He took the three elements of the same, the other, and the
essence, and mingled them into one form, compressing by force the
reluctant and unsociable nature of the other into the same. When he
had mingled them with the essence and out of three made one, he
again divided this whole into as many portions as was fitting, each
portion being a compound of the same, the other, and the essence.
And he proceeded to divide after this manner:-First of all, he took
away one part of the whole [1], and then he separated a second part
which was double the first [2], and then he took away a third part
which was half as much again as the second and three times as much
as the first [3], and then he took a fourth part which was twice as
much as the second [4], and a fifth part which was three times the
third [9], and a sixth part which was eight times the first [8], and a
seventh part which was twenty-seven times the first [27]. After this
he filled up the double intervals [i.e. between 1, 2, 4, 8] and the
triple [i.e. between 1, 3, 9, 27] cutting off yet other portions
from the mixture and placing them in the intervals, so that in each
interval there were two kinds of means, the one exceeding and exceeded
by equal parts of its extremes [as for example 1, 4/3, 2, in which the
mean 4/3 is one-third of 1 more than 1, and one-third of 2 less than
2], the other being that kind of mean which exceeds and is exceeded by
an equal number. Where there were intervals of 3/2 and of 4/3 and of
9/8, made by the connecting terms in the former intervals, he filled
up all the intervals of 4/3 with the interval of 9/8, leaving a
fraction over; and the interval which this fraction expressed was in
the ratio of 256 to 243. And thus the whole mixture out of which he
cut these portions was all exhausted by him. This entire compound he
divided lengthways into two parts, which he joined to one another at
the centre like the letter X, and bent them into a circular form,
connecting them with themselves and each other at the point opposite
to their original meeting-point; and, comprehending them in a
uniform revolution upon the same axis, he made the one the outer and
the other the inner circle. Now the motion of the outer circle he
called the motion of the same, and the motion of the inner circle
the motion of the other or diverse. The motion of the same he
carried round by the side to the right, and the motion of the
diverse diagonally to the left. And he gave dominion to the motion
of the same and like, for that he left single and undivided; but the
inner motion he divided in six places and made seven unequal circles
having their intervals in ratios of two-and three, three of each,
and bade the orbits proceed in a direction opposite to one another;
and three [Sun, Mercury, Venus] he made to move with equal
swiftness, and the remaining four [Moon, Saturn, Mars, Jupiter] to
move with unequal swiftness to the three and to one another, but in
due proportion.

  Now when the Creator had framed the soul according to his will, he
formed within her the corporeal universe, and brought the two
together, and united them centre to centre. The soul, interfused
everywhere from the centre to the circumference of heaven, of which
also she is the external envelopment, herself turning in herself,
began a divine beginning of never ceasing and rational life enduring
throughout all time. The body of heaven is visible, but the soul is
invisible, and partakes of reason and harmony, and being made by the
best of intellectual and everlasting natures, is the best of things
created. And because she is composed of the same and of the other
and of the essence, these three, and is divided and united in due
proportion, and in her revolutions returns upon herself, the soul,
when touching anything which has essence, whether dispersed in parts
or undivided, is stirred through all her powers, to declare the
sameness or difference of that thing and some other; and to what
individuals are related, and by what affected, and in what way and how
and when, both in the world of generation and in the world of
immutable being. And when reason, which works with equal truth,
whether she be in the circle of the diverse or of the same-in
voiceless silence holding her onward course in the sphere of the
self-moved-when reason, I say, is hovering around the sensible world
and when the circle of the diverse also moving truly imparts the
intimations of sense to the whole soul, then arise opinions and
beliefs sure and certain. But when reason is concerned with the
rational, and the circle of the same moving smoothly declares it, then
intelligence and knowledge are necessarily perfected. And if any one
affirms that in which these two are found to be other than the soul,
he will say the very opposite of the truth.

  When the father creator saw the creature which he had made moving
and living, the created image of the eternal gods, he rejoiced, and in
his joy determined to make the copy still more like the original;
and as this was eternal, he sought to make the universe eternal, so
far as might be. Now the nature of the ideal being was everlasting,
but to bestow this attribute in its fulness upon a creature was
impossible. Wherefore he resolved to have a moving image of
eternity, and when he set in order the heaven, he made this image
eternal but moving according to number, while eternity itself rests in
unity; and this image we call time. For there were no days and
nights and months and years before the heaven was created, but when he
constructed the heaven he created them also. They are all parts of
time, and the past and future are created species of time, which we
unconsciously but wrongly transfer to the eternal essence; for we
say that he "was," he "is," he "will be," but the truth is that "is"
alone is properly attributed to him, and that "was" and "will be" only
to be spoken of becoming in time, for they are motions, but that which
is immovably the same cannot become older or younger by time, nor ever
did or has become, or hereafter will be, older or younger, nor is
subject at all to any of those states which affect moving and sensible
things and of which generation is the cause. These are the forms of
time, which imitates eternity and revolves according to a law of
number. Moreover, when we say that what has become is become and
what becomes is becoming, and that what will become is about to become
and that the non-existent is non-existent-all these are inaccurate
modes of expression. But perhaps this whole subject will be more
suitably discussed on some other occasion.

  Time, then, and the heaven came into being at the same instant in
order that, having been created together, if ever there was to be a
dissolution of them, they might be dissolved together. It was framed
after the pattern of the eternal nature, that it might resemble this
as far as was possible; for the pattern exists from eternity, and
the created heaven has been, and is, and will be, in all time. Such
was the mind and thought of God in the creation of time. The sun and
moon and five other stars, which are called the planets, were
created by him in order to distinguish and preserve the numbers of
time; and when he had made-their several bodies, he placed them in the
orbits in which the circle of the other was revolving-in seven
orbits seven stars. First, there was the moon in the orbit nearest the
earth, and next the sun, in the second orbit above the earth; then
came the morning star and the star sacred to Hermes, moving in
orbits which have an equal swiftness with the sun, but in an
opposite direction; and this is the reason why the sun and Hermes
and Lucifer overtake and are overtaken by each other. To enumerate the
places which he assigned to the other stars, and to give all the
reasons why he assigned them, although a secondary matter, would
give more trouble than the primary. These things at some future
time, when we are at leisure, may have the consideration which they
deserve, but not at present.

  Now, when all the stars which were necessary to the creation of time
had attained a motion suitable to them,-and had become living
creatures having bodies fastened by vital chains, and learnt their
appointed task, moving in the motion of the diverse, which is
diagonal, and passes through and is governed by the motion of the
same, they revolved, some in a larger and some in a lesser orbit-those
which had the lesser orbit revolving faster, and those which had the
larger more slowly. Now by reason of the motion of the same, those
which revolved fastest appeared to be overtaken by those which moved
slower although they really overtook them; for the motion of the
same made them all turn in a spiral, and, because some went one way
and some another, that which receded most slowly from the sphere of
the same, which was the swiftest, appeared to follow it most nearly.
That there might be some visible measure of their relative swiftness
and slowness as they proceeded in their eight courses, God lighted a
fire, which we now call the sun, in the second from the earth of these
orbits, that it might give light to the whole of heaven, and that
the animals, as many as nature intended, might participate in
number, learning arithmetic from the revolution of the same and the
like. Thus then, and for this reason the night and the day were
created, being the period of the one most intelligent revolution.
And the month is accomplished when the moon has completed her orbit
and overtaken the sun, and the year when the sun has completed his own
orbit. Mankind, with hardly an exception, have not remarked the
periods of the other stars, and they have no name for them, and do not
measure them against one another by the help of number, and hence they
can scarcely be said to know that their wanderings, being infinite
in number and admirable for their variety, make up time. And yet there
is no difficulty in seeing that the perfect number of time fulfils the
perfect year when all the eight revolutions, having their relative
degrees of swiftness, are accomplished together and attain their
completion at the same time, measured by the rotation of the same
and equally moving. After this manner, and for these reasons, came
into being such of the stars as in their heavenly progress received
reversals of motion, to the end that the created heaven might
imitate the eternal nature, and be as like as possible to the
perfect and intelligible animal.

  Thus far and until the birth of time the created universe was made
in the likeness of the original, but inasmuch as all animals were
not yet comprehended therein, it was still unlike. What remained,
the creator then proceeded to fashion after the nature of the pattern.
Now as in the ideal animal the mind perceives ideas or species of a
certain nature and number, he thought that this created animal ought
to have species of a like nature and number. There are four such;
one of them is the heavenly race of the gods; another, the race of
birds whose way is in the air; the third, the watery species; and
the fourth, the pedestrian and land creatures. Of the heavenly and
divine, he created the greater part out of fire, that they might be
the brightest of all things and fairest to behold, and he fashioned
them after the likeness of the universe in the figure of a circle, and
made them follow the intelligent motion of the supreme, distributing
them over the whole circumference of heaven, which was to be a true
cosmos or glorious world spangled with them all over. And he gave to
each of them two movements: the first, a movement on the same spot
after the same manner, whereby they ever continue to think
consistently the same thoughts about the same things; the second, a
forward movement, in which they are controlled by the revolution of
the same and the like; but by the other five motions they were
unaffected, in order that each of them might attain the highest
perfection. And for this reason the fixed stars were created, to be
divine and eternal animals, ever-abiding and revolving after the
same manner and on the same spot; and the other stars which reverse
their motion and are subject to deviations of this kind, were
created in the manner already described. The earth, which is our
nurse, clinging around the pole which is extended through the
universe, he framed to be the guardian and artificer of night and day,
first and eldest of gods that are in the interior of heaven. Vain
would be the attempt to tell all the figures of them circling as in
dance, and their juxtapositions, and the return of them in their
revolutions upon themselves, and their approximations, and to say
which of these deities in their conjunctions meet, and which of them
are in opposition, and in what order they get behind and before one
another, and when they are severally eclipsed to our sight and again
reappear, sending terrors and intimations of the future to those who
cannot calculate their movements-to attempt to tell of all this
without a visible representation of the heavenly system would be
labour in vain. Enough on this head; and now let what we have said
about the nature of the created and visible gods have an end.

  To know or tell the origin of the other divinities is beyond us, and
we must accept the traditions of the men of old time who affirm
themselves to be the offspring of the gods-that is what they say-and
they must surely have known their own ancestors. How can we doubt
the word of the children of the gods? Although they give no probable
or certain proofs, still, as they declare that they are speaking of
what took place in their own family, we must conform to custom and
believe them. In this manner, then, according to them, the genealogy
of these gods is to be received and set forth.

  Oceanus and Tethys were the children of Earth and Heaven, and from
these sprang Phorcys and Cronos and Rhea, and all that generation; and
from Cronos and Rhea sprang Zeus and Here, and all those who are
said to be their brethren, and others who were the children of these.

  Now, when all of them, both those who visibly appear in their
revolutions as well as those other gods who are of a more retiring
nature, had come into being, the creator of the universe addressed
them in these words: "Gods, children of gods, who are my works, and of
whom I am the artificer and father, my creations are indissoluble,
if so I will. All that is bound may be undone, but only an evil
being would wish to undo that which is harmonious and happy.
Wherefore, since ye are but creatures, ye are not altogether
immortal and indissoluble, but ye shall certainly not be dissolved,
nor be liable to the fate of death, having in my will a greater and
mightier bond than those with which ye were bound at the time of
your birth. And now listen to my instructions:-Three tribes of
mortal beings remain to be created-without them the universe will be
incomplete, for it will not contain every kind of animal which it
ought to contain, if it is to be perfect. On the other hand, if they
were created by me and received life at my hands, they would be on
an equality with the gods. In order then that they may be mortal,
and that this universe may be truly universal, do ye, according to
your natures, betake yourselves to the formation of animals, imitating
the power which was shown by me in creating you. The part of them
worthy of the name immortal, which is called divine and is the guiding
principle of those who are willing to follow justice and you-of that
divine part I will myself sow the seed, and having made a beginning, I
will hand the work over to you. And do ye then interweave the mortal
with the immortal, and make and beget living creatures, and give
them food, and make them to grow, and receive them again in death."

  Thus he spake, and once more into the cup in which he had previously
mingled the soul of the universe he poured the remains of the
elements, and mingled them in much the same manner; they were not,
however, pure as before, but diluted to the second and third degree.
And having made it he divided the whole mixture into souls equal in
number to the stars, and assigned each soul to a star; and having
there placed them as in a chariot, he showed them the nature of the
universe, and declared to them the laws of destiny, according to which
their first birth would be one and the same for all,-no one should
suffer a disadvantage at his hands; they were to be sown in the
instruments of time severally adapted to them, and to come forth the
most religious of animals; and as human nature was of two kinds, the
superior race would here after be called man. Now, when they should be
implanted in bodies by necessity, and be always gaining or losing some
part of their bodily substance, then in the first place it would be
necessary that they should all have in them one and the same faculty
of sensation, arising out of irresistible impressions; in the second
place, they must have love, in which pleasure and pain mingle; also
fear and anger, and the feelings which are akin or opposite to them;
if they conquered these they would live righteously, and if they
were conquered by them, unrighteously. He who lived well during his
appointed time was to return and dwell in his native star, and there
he would have a blessed and congenial existence. But if he failed in
attaining this, at the second birth he would pass into a woman, and
if, when in that state of being, he did not desist from evil, he would
continually be changed into some brute who resembled him in the evil
nature which he had acquired, and would not cease from his toils and
transformations until he followed the revolution of the same and the
like within him, and overcame by the help of reason the turbulent
and irrational mob of later accretions, made up of fire and air and
water and earth, and returned to the form of his first and better
state. Having given all these laws to his creatures, that he might
be guiltless of future evil in any of them, the creator sowed some
of them in the earth, and some in the moon, and some in the other
instruments of time; and when he had sown them he committed to the
younger gods the fashioning of their mortal bodies, and desired them
to furnish what was still lacking to the human soul, and having made
all the suitable additions, to rule over them, and to pilot the mortal
animal in the best and wisest manner which they could, and avert
from him all but self-inflicted evils.

  When the creator had made all these ordinances he remained in his
own accustomed nature, and his children heard and were obedient to
their father's word, and receiving from him the immortal principle
of a mortal creature, in imitation of their own creator they
borrowed portions of fire, and earth, and water, and air from the
world, which were hereafter to be restored-these they took and
welded them together, not with the indissoluble chains by which they
were themselves bound, but with little pegs too small to be visible,
making up out of all the four elements each separate body, and
fastening the courses of the immortal soul in a body which was in a
state of perpetual influx and efflux. Now these courses, detained as
in a vast river, neither overcame nor were overcome; but were hurrying
and hurried to and fro, so that the whole animal was moved and
progressed, irregularly however and irrationally and anyhow, in all
the six directions of motion, wandering backwards and forwards, and
right and left, and up and down, and in all the six directions. For
great as was the advancing and retiring flood which provided
nourishment, the affections produced by external contact caused
still greater tumult-when the body of any one met and came into
collision with some external fire, or with the solid earth or the
gliding waters, or was caught in the tempest borne on the air, and the
motions produced by any of these impulses were carried through the
body to the soul. All such motions have consequently received the
general name of "sensations," which they still retain. And they did in
fact at that time create a very great and mighty movement; uniting
with the ever flowing stream in stirring up and violently shaking
the courses of the soul, they completely stopped the revolution of the
same by their opposing current, and hindered it from predominating and
advancing; and they so disturbed the nature of the other or diverse,
that the three double intervals [i.e. between 1, 2, 4, 8], and the
three triple intervals [i.e. between 1, 3, 9, 27], together with the
mean terms and connecting links which are expressed by the ratios of 3
: 2, and 4 : 3, and of 9 : 8-these, although they cannot be wholly
undone except by him who united them, were twisted by them in all
sorts of ways, and the circles were broken and disordered in every
possible manner, so that when they moved they were tumbling to pieces,
and moved irrationally, at one time in a reverse direction, and then
again obliquely, and then upside down, as you might imagine a person
who is upside down and has his head leaning upon the ground and his
feet up against something in the air; and when he is in such a
position, both he and the spectator fancy that the right of either
is his left, and left right. If, when powerfully experiencing these
and similar effects, the revolutions of the soul come in contact
with some external thing, either of the class of the same or of the
other, they speak of the same or of the other in a manner the very
opposite of the truth; and they become false and foolish, and there is
no course or revolution in them which has a guiding or directing
power; and if again any sensations enter in violently from without and
drag after them the whole vessel of the soul, then the courses of
the soul, though they seem to conquer, are really conquered.

  And by reason of all these affections, the soul, when encased in a
mortal body, now, as in the beginning, is at first without
intelligence; but when the flood of growth and nutriment abates, and
the courses of the soul, calming down, go their own way and become
steadier as time goes on, then the several circles return to their
natural form, and their revolutions are corrected, and they call the
same and the other by their right names, and make the possessor of
them to become a rational being. And if these combine in him with
any true nurture or education, he attains the fulness and health of
the perfect man, and escapes the worst disease of all; but if he
neglects education he walks lame to the end of his life, and returns
imperfect and good for nothing to the world below. This, however, is a
later stage; at present we must treat more exactly the subject
before us, which involves a preliminary enquiry into the generation of
the body and its members, and as to how the soul was created-for
what reason and by what providence of the gods; and holding fast to
probability, we must pursue our way.

  First, then, the gods, imitating the spherical shape of the
universe, enclosed the two divine courses in a spherical body, that,
namely, which we now term the head, being the most divine part of us
and the lord of all that is in us: to this the gods, when they put
together the body, gave all the other members to be servants,
considering that it partook of every sort of motion. In order then
that it might not tumble about among the high and deep places of the
earth, but might be able to get over the one and out of the other,
they provided the body to be its vehicle and means of locomotion;
which consequently had length and was furnished with four limbs
extended and flexible; these God contrived to be instruments of
locomotion with which it might take hold and find support, and so be
able to pass through all places, carrying on high the dwelling-place
of the most sacred and divine part of us. Such was the origin of
legs and hands, which for this reason were attached to every man;
and the gods, deeming the front part of man to be more honourable
and more fit to command than the hinder part, made us to move mostly
in a forward direction. Wherefore man must needs have his front part
unlike and distinguished from the rest of his body.

  And so in the vessel of the head, they first of all put a face in
which they inserted organs to minister in all things to the providence
of the soul, and they appointed this part, which has authority, to
be by nature the part which is in front. And of the organs they
first contrived the eyes to give light, and the principle according to
which they were inserted was as follows: So much of fire as would
not burn, but gave a gentle light, they formed into a substance akin
to the light of every-day life; and the pure fire which is within us
and related thereto they made to flow through the eyes in a stream
smooth and dense, compressing the whole eye, and especially the centre
part, so that it kept out everything of a coarser nature, and
allowed to pass only this pure element. When the light of day
surrounds the stream of vision, then like falls upon like, and they
coalesce, and one body is formed by natural affinity in the line of
vision, wherever the light that falls from within meets with an
external object. And the whole stream of vision, being similarly
affected in virtue of similarity, diffuses the motions of what it
touches or what touches it over the whole body, until they reach the
soul, causing that perception which we call sight. But when night
comes on and the external and kindred fire departs, then the stream of
vision is cut off; for going forth to an unlike element it is
changed and extinguished, being no longer of one nature with the
surrounding atmosphere which is now deprived of fire: and so the eye
no longer sees, and we feel disposed to sleep. For when the eyelids,
which the gods invented for the preservation of sight, are closed,
they keep in the internal fire; and the power of the fire diffuses and
equalises the inward motions; when they are equalised, there is
rest, and when the rest is profound, sleep comes over us scarce
disturbed by dreams; but where the greater motions still remain, of
whatever nature and in whatever locality, they engender
corresponding visions in dreams, which are remembered by us when we
are awake and in the external world. And now there is no longer any
difficulty in understanding the creation of images in mirrors and
all smooth and bright surfaces. For from the communion of the internal
and external fires, and again from the union of them and their
numerous transformations when they meet in the mirror, all these
appearances of necessity arise, when the fire from the face
coalesces with the fire from the eye on the bright and smooth surface.
And right appears left and left right, because the visual rays come
into contact with the rays emitted by the object in a manner
contrary to the usual mode of meeting; but the right appears right,
and the left left, when the position of one of the two concurring
lights is reversed; and this happens when the mirror is concave and
its smooth surface repels the right stream of vision to the left side,
and the left to the right. Or if the mirror be turned vertically, then
the concavity makes the countenance appear to be all upside down,
and the lower rays are driven upwards and the upper downwards.

  All these are to be reckoned among the second and co-operative
causes which God, carrying into execution the idea of the best as
far as possible, uses as his ministers. They are thought by most men
not to be the second, but the prime causes of all things, because they
freeze and heat, and contract and dilate, and the like. But they are
not so, for they are incapable of reason or intellect; the only
being which can properly have mind is the invisible soul, whereas fire
and water, and earth and air, are all of them visible bodies. The
lover of intellect and knowledge ought to explore causes of
intelligent nature first of all, and, secondly, of those things which,
being moved by others, are compelled to move others. And this is
what we too must do. Both kinds of causes should be acknowledged by
us, but a distinction should be made between those which are endowed
with mind and are the workers of things fair and good, and those which
are deprived of intelligence and always produce chance effects without
order or design. Of the second or co-operative causes of sight,
which help to give to the eyes the power which they now possess,
enough has been said. I will therefore now proceed to speak of the
higher use and purpose for which God has given them to us. The sight
in my opinion is the source of the greatest benefit to us, for had
we never seen the stars, and the sun, and the heaven, none of the
words which we have spoken about the universe would ever have been
uttered. But now the sight of day and night, and the months and the
revolutions of the years, have created number, and have given us a
conception of time, and the power of enquiring about the nature of the
universe; and from this source we have derived philosophy, than
which no greater good ever was or will be given by the gods to
mortal man. This is the greatest boon of sight: and of the lesser
benefits why should I speak? even the ordinary man if he were deprived
of them would bewail his loss, but in vain. Thus much let me say
however: God invented and gave us sight to the end that we might
behold the courses of intelligence in the heaven, and apply them to
the courses of our own intelligence which are akin to them, the
unperturbed to the perturbed; and that we, learning them and partaking
of the natural truth of reason, might imitate the absolutely
unerring courses of God and regulate our own vagaries. The same may be
affirmed of speech and hearing: they have been given by the gods to
the same end and for a like reason. For this is the principal end of
speech, whereto it most contributes. Moreover, so much of music as
is adapted to the sound of the voice and to the sense of hearing is
granted to us for the sake of harmony; and harmony, which has
motions akin to the revolutions of our souls, is not regarded by the
intelligent votary of the Muses as given by them with a view to
irrational pleasure, which is deemed to be the purpose of it in our
day, but as meant to correct any discord which may have arisen in
the courses of the soul, and to be our ally in bringing her into
harmony and agreement with herself; and rhythm too was given by them
for the same reason, on account of the irregular and graceless ways
which prevail among mankind generally, and to help us against them.

  Thus far in what we have been saying, with small exception, the
works of intelligence have been set forth; and now we must place by
the side of them in our discourse the things which come into being
through necessity-for the creation is mixed, being made up of
necessity and mind. Mind, the ruling power, persuaded necessity to
bring the greater part of created things to perfection, and thus and
after this manner in the beginning, when the influence of reason got
the better of necessity, the universe was created. But if a person
will truly tell of the way in which the work was accomplished, he must
include the other influence of the variable cause as well.
Wherefore, we must return again and find another suitable beginning,
as about the former matters, so also about these. To which end we must
consider the nature of fire, and water, and air, and earth, such as
they were prior to the creation of the heaven, and what was
happening to them in this previous state; for no one has as yet
explained the manner of their generation, but we speak of fire and the
rest of them, whatever they mean, as though men knew their natures,
and we maintain them to be the first principles and letters or
elements of the whole, when they cannot reasonably be compared by a
man of any sense even to syllables or first compounds. And let me
say thus much: I will not now speak of the first principle or
principles of all things, or by whatever name they are to be called,
for this reason-because it is difficult to set forth my opinion
according to the method of discussion which we are at present
employing. Do not imagine, any more than I can bring myself to
imagine, that I should be right in undertaking so great and
difficult a task. Remembering what I said at first about
probability, I will do my best to give as probable an explanation as
any other-or rather, more probable; and I will first go back to the
beginning and try to speak of each thing and of all. Once more,
then, at the commencement of my discourse, I call upon God, and beg
him to be our saviour out of a strange and unwonted enquiry, and to
bring us to the haven of probability. So now let us begin again.

  This new beginning of our discussion of the universe requires a
fuller division than the former; for then we made two classes, now a
third must be revealed. The two sufficed for the former discussion:
one, which we assumed, was a pattern intelligible and always the same;
and the second was only the imitation of the pattern, generated and
visible. There is also a third kind which we did not distinguish at
the time, conceiving that the two would be enough. But now the
argument seems to require that we should set forth in words another
kind, which is difficult of explanation and dimly seen. What nature
are we to attribute to this new kind of being? We reply, that it is
the receptacle, and in a manner the nurse, of all generation. I have
spoken the truth; but I must express myself in clearer language, and
this will be an arduous task for many reasons, and in particular
because I must first raise questions concerning fire and the other
elements, and determine what each of them is; for to say, with any
probability or certitude, which of them should be called water
rather than fire, and which should be called any of them rather than
all or some one of them, is a difficult matter. How, then, shall we
settle this point, and what questions about the elements may be fairly
raised?

  In the first place, we see that what we just now called water, by
condensation, I suppose, becomes stone and earth; and this same
element, when melted and dispersed, passes into vapour and air. Air,
again, when inflamed, becomes fire; and again fire, when condensed and
extinguished, passes once more into the form of air; and once more,
air, when collected and condensed, produces cloud and mist; and from
these, when still more compressed, comes flowing water, and from water
comes earth and stones once more; and thus generation appears to be
transmitted from one to the other in a circle. Thus, then, as the
several elements never present themselves in the same form, how can
any one have the assurance to assert positively that any of them,
whatever it may be, is one thing rather than another? No one can.
But much the safest plan is to speak of them as follows:-Anything
which we see to be continually changing, as, for example, fire, we
must not call "this" or "that," but rather say that it is "of such a
nature"; nor let us speak of water as "this"; but always as "such";
nor must we imply that there is any stability in any of those things
which we indicate by the use of the words "this" and "that," supposing
ourselves to signify something thereby; for they are too volatile to
be detained in any such expressions as "this," or "that," or "relative
to this," or any other mode of speaking which represents them as
permanent. We ought not to apply "this" to any of them, but rather the
word "such"; which expresses the similar principle circulating in each
and all of them; for example, that should be called "fire" which is of
such a nature always, and so of everything that has generation. That
in which the elements severally grow up, and appear, and decay, is
alone to be called by the name "this" or "that"; but that which is
of a certain nature, hot or white, or anything which admits of
opposite equalities, and all things that are compounded of them, ought
not to be so denominated. Let me make another attempt to explain my
meaning more clearly. Suppose a person to make all kinds of figures of
gold and to be always transmuting one form into all the
rest-somebody points to one of them and asks what it is. By far the
safest and truest answer is, That is gold; and not to call the
triangle or any other figures which are formed in the gold "these," as
though they had existence, since they are in process of change while
he is making the assertion; but if the questioner be willing to take
the safe and indefinite expression, "such," we should be satisfied.
And the same argument applies to the universal nature which receives
all bodies-that must be always called the same; for, while receiving
all things, she never departs at all from her own nature, and never in
any way, or at any time, assumes a form like that of any of the things
which enter into her; she is the natural recipient of all impressions,
and is stirred and informed by them, and appears different from time
to time by reason of them. But the forms which enter into and go out
of her are the likenesses of real existences modelled after their
patterns in wonderful and inexplicable manner, which we will hereafter
investigate. For the present we have only to conceive of three
natures: first, that which is in process of generation; secondly, that
in which the generation takes place; and thirdly, that of which the
thing generated is a resemblance. And we may liken the receiving
principle to a mother, and the source or spring to a father, and the
intermediate nature to a child; and may remark further, that if the
model is to take every variety of form, then the matter in which the
model is fashioned will not be duly prepared, unless it is formless,
and free from the impress of any of these shapes which it is hereafter
to receive from without. For if the matter were like any of the
supervening forms, then whenever any opposite or entirely different
nature was stamped upon its surface, it would take the impression
badly, because it would intrude its own shape. Wherefore, that which
is to receive all forms should have no form; as in making perfumes
they first contrive that the liquid substance which is to receive
the scent shall be as inodorous as possible; or as those who wish to
impress figures on soft substances do not allow any previous
impression to remain, but begin by making the surface as even and
smooth as possible. In the same way that which is to receive
perpetually and through its whole extent the resemblances of all
eternal beings ought to be devoid of any particular form. Wherefore,
the mother and receptacle of all created and visible and in any way
sensible things, is not to be termed earth, or air, or fire, or water,
or any of their compounds or any of the elements from which these
are derived, but is an invisible and formless being which receives all
things and in some mysterious way partakes of the intelligible, and is
most incomprehensible. In saying this we shall not be far wrong; as
far, however, as we can attain to a knowledge of her from the previous
considerations, we may truly say that fire is that part of her
nature which from time to time is inflamed, and water that which is
moistened, and that the mother substance becomes earth and air, in
so far as she receives the impressions of them.

  Let us consider this question more precisely. Is there any
self-existent fire? and do all those things which we call
self-existent exist? or are only those things which we see, or in some
way perceive through the bodily organs, truly existent, and nothing
whatever besides them? And is all that which, we call an
intelligible essence nothing at all, and only a name? Here is a
question which we must not leave unexamined or undetermined, nor
must we affirm too confidently that there can be no decision;
neither must we interpolate in our present long discourse a digression
equally long, but if it is possible to set forth a great principle
in a few words, that is just what we want.

  Thus I state my view:-If mind and true opinion are two distinct
classes, then I say that there certainly are these self-existent ideas
unperceived by sense, and apprehended only by the mind; if, however,
as some say, true opinion differs in no respect from mind, then
everything that we perceive through the body is to be regarded as most
real and certain. But we must affirm that to be distinct, for they
have a distinct origin and are of a different nature; the one is
implanted in us by instruction, the other by persuasion; the one is
always accompanied by true reason, the other is without reason; the
one cannot be overcome by persuasion, but the other can: and lastly,
every man may be said to share in true opinion, but mind is the
attribute of the gods and of very few men. Wherefore also we must
acknowledge that there is one kind of being which is always the
same, uncreated and indestructible, never receiving anything into
itself from without, nor itself going out to any other, but
invisible and imperceptible by any sense, and of which the
contemplation is granted to intelligence only. And there is another
nature of the same name with it, and like to it, perceived by sense,
created, always in motion, becoming in place and again vanishing out
of place, which is apprehended by opinion and sense. And there is a
third nature, which is space, and is eternal, and admits not of
destruction and provides a home for all created things, and is
apprehended without the help of sense, by a kind of spurious reason,
and is hardly real; which we beholding as in a dream, say of all
existence that it must of necessity be in some place and occupy a
space, but that what is neither in heaven nor in earth has no
existence. Of these and other things of the same kind, relating to the
true and waking reality of nature, we have only this dreamlike
sense, and we are unable to cast off sleep and determine the truth
about them. For an image, since the reality, after which it is
modelled, does not belong to it, and it exists ever as the fleeting
shadow of some other, must be inferred to be in another [i.e. in space
], grasping existence in some way or other, or it could not be at all.
But true and exact reason, vindicating the nature of true being,
maintains that while two things [i.e. the image and space] are
different they cannot exist one of them in the other and so be one and
also two at the same time.

  Thus have I concisely given the result of my thoughts; and my
verdict is that being and space and generation, these three, existed
in their three ways before the heaven; and that the nurse of
generation, moistened by water and inflamed by fire, and receiving the
forms of earth and air, and experiencing all the affections which
accompany these, presented a strange variety of appearances; and being
full of powers which were neither similar nor equally balanced, was
never in any part in a state of equipoise, but swaying unevenly hither
and thither, was shaken by them, and by its motion again shook them;
and the elements when moved were separated and carried continually,
some one way, some another; as, when rain is shaken and winnowed by
fans and other instruments used in the threshing of corn, the close
and heavy particles are borne away and settle in one direction, and
the loose and light particles in another. In this manner, the four
kinds or elements were then shaken by the receiving vessel, which,
moving like a winnowing machine, scattered far away from one another
the elements most unlike, and forced the most similar elements into
dose contact. Wherefore also the various elements had different places
before they were arranged so as to form the universe. At first, they
were all without reason and measure. But when the world began to get
into order, fire and water and earth and air had only certain faint
traces of themselves, and were altogether such as everything might
be expected to be in the absence of God; this, I say, was their nature
at that time, and God fashioned them by form and number. Let it be
consistently maintained by us in all that we say that God made them as
far as possible the fairest and best, out of things which were not
fair and good. And now I will endeavour to show you the disposition
and generation of them by an unaccustomed argument, which am compelled
to use; but I believe that you will be able to follow me, for your
education has made you familiar with the methods of science.

  In the first place, then, as is evident to all, fire and earth and
water and air are bodies. And every sort of body possesses solidity,
and every solid must necessarily be contained in planes; and every
plane rectilinear figure is composed of triangles; and all triangles
are originally of two kinds, both of which are made up of one right
and two acute angles; one of them has at either end of the base the
half of a divided right angle, having equal sides, while in the
other the right angle is divided into unequal parts, having unequal
sides. These, then, proceeding by a combination of probability with
demonstration, we assume to be the original elements of fire and the
other bodies; but the principles which are prior to these God only
knows, and he of men who is the friend God. And next we have to
determine what are the four most beautiful bodies which are unlike one
another, and of which some are capable of resolution into one another;
for having discovered thus much, we shall know the true origin of
earth and fire and of the proportionate and intermediate elements. And
then we shall not be willing to allow that there are any distinct
kinds of visible bodies fairer than these. Wherefore we must endeavour
to construct the four forms of bodies which excel in beauty, and
then we shall be able to say that we have sufficiently apprehended
their nature. Now of the two triangles, the isosceles has one form
only; the scalene or unequal-sided has an infinite number. Of the
infinite forms we must select the most beautiful, if we are to proceed
in due order, and any one who can point out a more beautiful form than
ours for the construction of these bodies, shall carry off the palm,
not as an enemy, but as a friend. Now, the one which we maintain to be
the most beautiful of all the many triangles (and we need not speak of
the others) is that of which the double forms a third triangle which
is equilateral; the reason of this would be long to tell; he who
disproves what we are saying, and shows that we are mistaken, may
claim a friendly victory. Then let us choose two triangles, out of
which fire and the other elements have been constructed, one
isosceles, the other having the square of the longer side equal to
three times the square of the lesser side.

  Now is the time to explain what was before obscurely said: there was
an error in imagining that all the four elements might be generated by
and into one another; this, I say, was an erroneous supposition, for
there are generated from the triangles which we have selected four
kinds-three from the one which has the sides unequal; the fourth alone
is framed out of the isosceles triangle. Hence they cannot all be
resolved into one another, a great number of small bodies being
combined into a few large ones, or the converse. But three of them can
be thus resolved and compounded, for they all spring from one, and
when the greater bodies are broken up, many small bodies will spring
up out of them and take their own proper figures; or, again, when many
small bodies are dissolved into their triangles, if they become one,
they will form one large mass of another kind. So much for their
passage into one another. I have now to speak of their several
kinds, and show out of what combinations of numbers each of them was
formed. The first will be the simplest and smallest construction,
and its element is that triangle which has its hypotenuse twice the
lesser side. When two such triangles are joined at the diagonal, and
this is repeated three times, and the triangles rest their diagonals
and shorter sides on the same point as a centre, a single
equilateral triangle is formed out of six triangles; and four
equilateral triangles, if put together, make out of every three
plane angles one solid angle, being that which is nearest to the
most obtuse of plane angles; and out of the combination of these
four angles arises the first solid form which distributes into equal
and similar parts the whole circle in which it is inscribed. The
second species of solid is formed out of the same triangles, which
unite as eight equilateral triangles and form one solid angle out of
four plane angles, and out of six such angles the second body is
completed. And the third body is made up of 120 triangular elements,
forming twelve solid angles, each of them included in five plane
equilateral triangles, having altogether twenty bases, each of which
is an equilateral triangle. The one element [that is, the triangle
which has its hypotenuse twice the lesser side] having generated these
figures, generated no more; but the isosceles triangle produced the
fourth elementary figure, which is compounded of four such
triangles, joining their right angles in a centre, and forming one
equilateral quadrangle. Six of these united form eight solid angles,
each of which is made by the combination of three plane right
angles; the figure of the body thus composed is a cube, having six
plane quadrangular equilateral bases. There was yet a fifth
combination which God used in the delineation of the universe.

  Now, he who, duly reflecting on all this, enquires whether the
worlds are to be regarded as indefinite or definite in number, will be
of opinion that the notion of their indefiniteness is characteristic
of a sadly indefinite and ignorant mind. He, however, who raises the
question whether they are to be truly regarded as one or five, takes
up a more reasonable position. Arguing from probabilities, I am of
opinion that they are one; another, regarding the question from
another point of view, will be of another mind. But, leaving this
enquiry, let us proceed to distribute the elementary forms, which have
now been created in idea, among the four elements.

  To earth, then, let us assign the cubical form; for earth is the
most immoveable of the four and the most plastic of all bodies, and
that which has the most stable bases must of necessity be of such a
nature. Now, of the triangles which we assumed at first, that which
has two equal sides is by nature more firmly based than that which has
unequal sides; and of the compound figures which are formed out of
either, the plane equilateral quadrangle has necessarily, a more
stable basis than the equilateral triangle, both in the whole and in
the parts. Wherefore, in assigning this figure to earth, we adhere
to probability; and to water we assign that one of the remaining forms
which is the least moveable; and the most moveable of them to fire;
and to air that which is intermediate. Also we assign the smallest
body to fire, and the greatest to water, and the intermediate in
size to air; and, again, the acutest body to fire, and the next in
acuteness to, air, and the third to water. Of all these elements, that
which has the fewest bases must necessarily be the most moveable,
for it must be the acutest and most penetrating in every way, and also
the lightest as being composed of the smallest number of similar
particles: and the second body has similar properties in a second
degree, and the third body in the third degree. Let it be agreed,
then, both according to strict reason and according to probability,
that the pyramid is the solid which is the original element and seed
of fire; and let us assign the element which was next in the order
of generation to air, and the third to water. We must imagine all
these to be so small that no single particle of any of the four
kinds is seen by us on account of their smallness: but when many of
them are collected together their aggregates are seen. And the
ratios of their numbers, motions, and other properties, everywhere
God, as far as necessity allowed or gave consent, has exactly
perfected, and harmonised in due proportion.

  From all that we have just been saying about the elements or
kinds, the most probable conclusion is as follows:-earth, when meeting
with fire and dissolved by its sharpness, whether the dissolution take
place in the fire itself or perhaps in some mass of air or water, is
borne hither and thither, until its parts, meeting together and
mutually harmonising, again become earth; for they can never take
any other form. But water, when divided by fire or by air, on
reforming, may become one part fire and two parts air; and a single
volume of air divided becomes two of fire. Again, when a small body of
fire is contained in a larger body of air or water or earth, and
both are moving, and the fire struggling is overcome and broken up,
then two volumes of fire form one volume of air; and when air is
overcome and cut up into small pieces, two and a half parts of air are
condensed into one part of water. Let us consider the matter in
another way. When one of the other elements is fastened upon by
fire, and is cut by the sharpness of its angles and sides, it
coalesces with the fire, and then ceases to be cut by them any longer.
For no element which is one and the same with itself can be changed by
or change another of the same kind and in the same state. But so
long as in the process of transition the weaker is fighting against
the stronger, the dissolution continues. Again, when a few small
particles, enclosed in many larger ones, are in process of
decomposition and extinction, they only cease from their tendency to
extinction when they consent to pass into the conquering nature, and
fire becomes air and air water. But if bodies of another kind go and
attack them [i.e. the small particles], the latter continue to be
dissolved until, being completely forced back and dispersed, they make
their escape to their own kindred, or else, being overcome and
assimilated to the conquering power, they remain where they are and
dwell with their victors, and from being many become one. And owing to
these affections, all things are changing their place, for by the
motion of the receiving vessel the bulk of each class is distributed
into its proper place; but those things which become unlike themselves
and like other things, are hurried by the shaking into the place of
the things to which they grow like.

  Now all unmixed and primary bodies are produced by such causes as
these. As to the subordinate species which are included in the greater
kinds, they are to be attributed to the varieties in the structure
of the two original triangles. For either structure did not originally
produce the triangle of one size only, but some larger and some
smaller, and there are as many sizes as there are species of the
four elements. Hence when they are mingled with themselves and with
one another there is an endless variety of them, which those who would
arrive at the probable truth of nature ought duly to consider.

  Unless a person comes to an understanding about the nature and
conditions of rest and motion, he will meet with many difficulties
in the discussion which follows. Something has been said of this
matter already, and something more remains to be said, which is,
that motion never exists in what is uniform. For to conceive that
anything can be moved without a mover is hard or indeed impossible,
and equally impossible to conceive that there can be a mover unless
there be something which can be moved-motion cannot exist where either
of these are wanting, and for these to be uniform is impossible;
wherefore we must assign rest to uniformity and motion to the want
of uniformity. Now inequality is the cause of the nature which is
wanting in uniformity; and of this we have already described the
origin. But there still remains the further point-why things when
divided after their kinds do not cease to pass through one another and
to change their place-which we will now proceed to explain. In the
revolution of the universe are comprehended all the four elements, and
this being circular and having a tendency to come together, compresses
everything and will not allow any place to be left void. Wherefore,
also, fire above all things penetrates everywhere, and air next, as
being next in rarity of the elements; and the two other elements in
like manner penetrate according to their degrees of rarity. For
those things which are composed of the largest particles have the
largest void left in their compositions, and those which are
composed of the smallest particles have the least. And the contraction
caused by the compression thrusts the smaller particles into the
interstices of the larger. And thus, when the small parts are placed
side by side with the larger, and the lesser divide the greater and
the greater unite the lesser, all the elements are borne up and down
and hither and thither towards their own places; for the change in the
size of each changes its position in space. And these causes
generate an inequality which is always maintained, and is
continually creating a perpetual motion of the elements in all time.

  In the next place we have to consider that there are divers kinds of
fire. There are, for example, first, flame; and secondly, those
emanations of flame which do not burn but only give light to the eyes;
thirdly, the remains of fire, which are seen in red-hot embers after
the flame has been extinguished. There are similar differences in
the air; of which the brightest part is called the aether, and the
most turbid sort mist and darkness; and there are various other
nameless kinds which arise from the inequality of the triangles.
Water, again, admits in the first place of a division into two
kinds; the one liquid and the other fusile. The liquid kind is
composed of the small and unequal particles of water; and moves itself
and is moved by other bodies owing to the want of uniformity and the
shape of its particles; whereas the fusile kind, being formed of large
and uniform particles, is more stable than the other, and is heavy and
compact by reason of its uniformity. But when fire gets in and
dissolves the particles and destroys the uniformity, it has greater
mobility, and becoming fluid is thrust forth by the neighbouring air
and spreads upon the earth; and this dissolution of the solid masses
is called melting, and their spreading out upon the earth flowing.
Again, when the fire goes out of the fusile substance, it does not
pass into vacuum, but into the neighbouring air; and the air which
is displaced forces together the liquid and still moveable mass into
the place which was occupied by the fire, and unites it with itself.
Thus compressed the mass resumes its equability, and is again at unity
with itself, because the fire which was the author of the inequality
has retreated; and this departure of the fire is called cooling, and
the coming together which follows upon it is termed congealment. Of
all the kinds termed fusile, that which is the densest and is formed
out of the finest and most uniform parts is that most precious
possession called gold, which is hardened by filtration through
rock; this is unique in kind, and has both a glittering and a yellow
colour. A shoot of gold, which is so dense as to be very hard, and
takes a black colour, is termed adamant. There is also another kind
which has parts nearly like gold, and of which there are several
species; it is denser than gold, and it contains a small and fine
portion of earth, and is therefore harder, yet also lighter because of
the great interstices which it has within itself; and this
substance, which is one of the bright and denser kinds of water,
when solidified is called copper. There is an alloy of earth mingled
with it, which, when the two parts grow old and are disunited, shows
itself separately and is called rust. The remaining phenomena of the
same kind there will be no difficulty in reasoning out by the method
of probabilities. A man may sometimes set aside meditations about
eternal things, and for recreation turn to consider the truths of
generation which are probable only; he will thus gain a pleasure not
to be repented of, and secure for himself while he lives a wise and
moderate pastime. Let us grant ourselves this indulgence, and go
through the probabilities relating to the same subjects which follow
next in order.

  Water which is mingled with fire, so much as is fine and liquid
(being so called by reason of its motion and the way in which it rolls
along the ground), and soft, because its bases give way are less
stable than those of earth, when separated from fire and air and
isolated, becomes more uniform, and by their retirement is
compressed into itself; and if the condensation be very great, the
water above the earth becomes hail, but on the earth, ice; and that
which is congealed in a less degree and is only half solid, when above
the earth is called snow, and when upon the earth, and condensed
from dew, hoarfrost. Then, again, there are the numerous kinds of
water which have been mingled with one another, and are distilled
through plants which grow in the earth; and this whole class is called
by the name of juices or saps. The unequal admixture of these fluids
creates a variety of species; most of them are nameless, but four
which are of a fiery nature are clearly distinguished and have
names. First there is wine, which warms the soul as well as the
body: secondly, there is the oily nature, which is smooth and
divides the visual ray, and for this reason is bright and shining
and of a glistening appearance, including pitch, the juice of the
castor berry, oil itself, and other things of a like kind: thirdly,
there is the class of substances which expand the contracted parts
of the mouth, until they return to their natural state, and by
reason of this property create sweetness;-these are included under the
general name of honey: and, lastly, there is a frothy nature, which
differs from all juices, having a burning quality which dissolves
the flesh; it is called opos (a vegetable acid).

  As to the kinds of earth, that which is filtered through water
passes into stone in the following manner:-The water which mixes
with the earth and is broken up in the process changes into air, and
taking this form mounts into its own place. But as there is no
surrounding vacuum it thrusts away the neighbouring air, and this
being rendered heavy, and, when it is displaced, having been poured
around the mass of earth, forcibly compresses it and drives it into
the vacant space whence the new air had come up; and the earth when
compressed by the air into an indissoluble union with water becomes
rock. The fairer sort is that which is made up of equal and similar
parts and is transparent; that which has the opposite qualities is
inferior. But when all the watery part is suddenly drawn out by
fire, a more brittle substance is formed, to which we give the name of
pottery. Sometimes also moisture may remain, and the earth which has
been fused by fire becomes, when cool, a certain stone of a black
colour. A like separation of the water which had been copiously
mingled with them may occur in two substances composed of finer
particles of earth and of a briny nature; out of either of them a half
solid body is then formed, soluble in water-the one, soda, which is
used for purging away oil and earth, and other, salt, which harmonizes
so well in combinations pleasing to the palate, and is, as the law
testifies, a substance dear to the gods. The compounds of earth and
water are not soluble by water, but by fire only, and for this
reason:-Neither fire nor air melt masses of earth; for their
particles, being smaller than the interstices in its structure, have
plenty of room to move without forcing their way, and so they leave
the earth unmelted and undissolved; but particles of water, which
are larger, force a passage, and dissolve and melt the earth.
Wherefore earth when not consolidated by force is dissolved by water
only; when consolidated, by nothing but fire; for this is the only
body which can find an entrance. The cohesion of water again, when
very strong, is dissolved by fire only-when weaker, then either by air
or fire-the former entering the interstices, and the latter
penetrating even the triangles. But nothing can dissolve air, when
strongly condensed, which does not reach the elements or triangles; or
if not strongly condensed, then only fire can dissolve it. As to
bodies composed of earth and water, while the water occupies the
vacant interstices of the earth in them which are compressed by force,
the particles of water which approach them from without, finding no
entrance, flow around the entire mass and leave it undissolved; but
the particles of fire, entering into the interstices of the water,
do to the water what water does to earth and fire to air, and are
the sole causes of the compound body of earth and water liquefying and
becoming fluid. Now these bodies are of two kinds; some of them,
such as glass and the fusible sort of stones, have less water than
they have earth; on the other hand, substances of the nature of wax
and incense have more of water entering into their composition.

  I have thus shown the various classes of bodies as they are
diversified by their forms and combinations and changes into one
another, and now I must endeavour to set forth their affections and
the causes of them. In the first place, the bodies which I have been
describing are necessarily objects of sense. But we have not yet
considered the origin of flesh, or what belongs to flesh, or of that
part of the soul which is mortal. And these things cannot be
adequately explained without also explaining the affections which
are concerned with sensation, nor the latter without the former: and
yet to explain them together is hardly possible; for which reason we
must assume first one or the other and afterwards examine the nature
of our hypothesis. In order, then, that the affections may follow
regularly after the elements, let us presuppose the existence of
body and soul.

  First, let us enquire what we mean by saying that fire is hot; and
about this we may reason from the dividing or cutting power which it
exercises on our bodies. We all of us feel that fire is sharp; and
we may further consider the fineness of the sides, and the sharpness
of the angles, and the smallness of the particles, and the swiftness
of the motion-all this makes the action of fire violent and sharp,
so that it cuts whatever it meets. And we must not forget that the
original figure of fire [i.e. the pyramid], more than any other
form, has a dividing power which cuts our bodies into small pieces
(Kepmatizei), and thus naturally produces that affection which we call
heat; and hence the origin of the name (thepmos, Kepma). Now, the
opposite of this is sufficiently manifest; nevertheless we will not
fail to describe it. For the larger particles of moisture which
surround the body, entering in and driving out the lesser, but not
being able to take their places, compress the moist principle in us;
and this from being unequal and disturbed, is forced by them into a
state of rest, which is due to equability and compression. But
things which are contracted contrary to nature are by nature at war,
and force themselves apart; and to this war and convulsion the name of
shivering and trembling is given; and the whole affection and the
cause of the affection are both termed cold. That is called hard to
which our flesh yields, and soft which yields to our flesh; and things
are also termed hard and soft relatively to one another. That which
yields has a small base; but that which rests on quadrangular bases is
firmly posed and belongs to the class which offers the greatest
resistance; so too does that which is the most compact and therefore
most repellent. The nature of the light and the heavy will be best
understood when examined in connexion with our notions of above and
below; for it is quite a mistake to suppose that the universe is
parted into two regions, separate from and opposite to each other, the
one a lower to which all things tend which have any bulk, and an upper
to which things only ascend against their will. For as the universe is
in the form of a sphere, all the extremities, being equidistant from
the centre, are equally extremities, and the centre, which is
equidistant from them, is equally to be regarded as the opposite of
them all. Such being the nature of the world, when a person says
that any of these points is above or below, may he not be justly
charged with using an improper expression? For the centre of the world
cannot be rightly called either above or below, but is the centre
and nothing else; and the circumference is not the centre, and has
in no one part of itself a different relation to the centre from
what it has in any of the opposite parts. Indeed, when it is in
every direction similar, how can one rightly give to it names which
imply opposition? For if there were any solid body in equipoise at the
centre of the universe, there would be nothing to draw it to this
extreme rather than to that, for they are all perfectly similar; and
if a person were to go round the world in a circle, he would often,
when standing at the antipodes of his former position, speak of the
same point as above and below; for, as I was saying just now, to speak
of the whole which is in the form of a globe as having one part
above and another below is not like a sensible man.

  The reason why these names are used, and the circumstances under
which they are ordinarily applied by us to the division of the
heavens, may be elucidated by the following supposition:-if a person
were to stand in that part of the universe which is the appointed
place of fire, and where there is the great mass of fire to which
fiery bodies gather-if, I say, he were to ascend thither, and,
having the power to do this, were to abstract particles of fire and
put them in scales and weigh them, and then, raising the balance, were
to draw the fire by force towards the uncongenial element of the
air, it would be very evident that he could compel the smaller mass
more readily than the larger; for when two things are simultaneously
raised by one and the same power, the smaller body must necessarily
yield to the superior power with less reluctance than the larger;
and the larger body is called heavy and said to tend downwards, and
the smaller body is called light and said to tend upwards. And we
may detect ourselves who are upon the earth doing precisely the same
thing. For we of separate earthy natures, and sometimes earth
itself, and draw them into the uncongenial element of air by force and
contrary to nature, both clinging to their kindred elements. But
that which is smaller yields to the impulse given by us towards the
dissimilar element more easily than the larger; and so we call the
former light, and the place towards which it is impelled we call
above, and the contrary state and place we call heavy and below
respectively. Now the relations of these must necessarily vary,
because the principal masses of the different elements hold opposite
positions; for that which is light, heavy, below or above in one place
will be found to be and become contrary and transverse and every way
diverse in relation to that which is light, heavy, below or above in
an opposite place. And about all of them this has to be
considered:-that the tendency of each towards its kindred element
makes the body which is moved heavy, and the place towards which the
motion tends below, but things which have an opposite tendency we call
by an opposite name. Such are the causes which we assign to these
phenomena. As to the smooth and the rough, any one who sees them can
explain the reason of them to another. For roughness is hardness
mingled with irregularity, and smoothness is produced by the joint
effect of uniformity and density.

  The most important of the affections which concern the whole body
remains to be considered-that is, the cause of pleasure and pain in
the perceptions of which I have been speaking, and in all other things
which are perceived by sense through the parts of the body, and have
both pains and pleasures attendant on them. Let us imagine the
causes of every affection, whether of sense or not, to be of the
following nature, remembering that we have already distinguished
between the nature which is easy and which is hard to move; for this
is the direction in which we must hunt the prey which we mean to take.
A body which is of a nature to be easily moved, on receiving an
impression however slight, spreads abroad the motion in a circle,
the parts communicating with each other, until at last, reaching the
principle of mind, they announce the quality of the agent. But a
body of the opposite kind, being immobile, and not extending to the
surrounding region, merely receives the impression, and does not
stir any of the neighbouring parts; and since the parts do not
distribute the original impression to other parts, it has no effect of
motion on the whole animal, and therefore produces no effect on the
patient. This is true of the bones and hair and other more earthy
parts of the human body; whereas what was said above relates mainly to
sight and hearing, because they have in them the greatest amount of
fire and air. Now we must conceive of pleasure and pain in this way.
An impression produced in us contrary to nature and violent, if
sudden, is painful; and, again, the sudden return to nature is
pleasant; but a gentle and gradual return is imperceptible and vice
versa. On the other hand the impression of sense which is most
easily produced is most readily felt, but is not accompanied by
Pleasure or pain; such, for example, are the affections of the
sight, which, as we said above, is a body naturally uniting with our
body in the day-time; for cuttings and burnings and other
affections which happen to the sight do not give pain, nor is there
pleasure when the sight returns to its natural state; but the
sensations are dearest and strongest according to the manner in
which the eye is affected by the object, and itself strikes and
touches it; there is no violence either in the contraction or dilation
of the eye. But bodies formed of larger particles yield to the agent
only with a struggle; and then they impart their motions to the
whole and cause pleasure and pain-pain when alienated from their
natural conditions, and pleasure when restored to them. Things which
experience gradual withdrawings and emptyings of their nature, and
great and sudden replenishments, fail to perceive the emptying, but
are sensible of the replenishment; and so they occasion no pain, but
the greatest pleasure, to the mortal part of the soul, as is
manifest in the case of perfumes. But things which are changed all of
a sudden, and only gradually and with difficulty return to their own
nature, have effects in every way opposite to the former, as is
evident in the case of burnings and cuttings of the body.

  Thus have we discussed the general affections of the whole body, and
the names of the agents which produce them. And now I will endeavour
to speak of the affections of particular parts, and the causes and
agents of them, as far as I am able. In the first place let us set
forth what was omitted when we were speaking of juices, concerning the
affections peculiar to the tongue. These too, like most of the other
affections, appear to be caused by certain contractions and dilations,
but they have besides more of roughness and smoothness than is found
in other affections; for whenever earthy particles enter into the
small veins which are the testing of the tongue, reaching to the
heart, and fall upon the moist, delicate portions of flesh-when, as
they are dissolved, they contract and dry up the little veins, they
are astringent if they are rougher, but if not so rough, then only
harsh. Those of them which are of an abstergent nature, and purge
the whole surface of the tongue, if they do it in excess, and so
encroach as to consume some part of the flesh itself, like potash
and soda, are all termed bitter. But the particles which are deficient
in the alkaline quality, and which cleanse only moderately, are called
salt, and having no bitterness or roughness, are regarded as rather
agreeable than otherwise. Bodies which share in and are made smooth by
the heat of the mouth, and which are inflamed, and again in turn
inflame that which heats them, and which are so light that they are
carried upwards to the sensations of the head, and cut all that
comes in their way, by reason of these qualities in them, are all
termed pungent. But when these same particles, refined by
putrefaction, enter into the narrow veins, and are duly proportioned
to the particles of earth and air which are there, they set them
whirling about one another, and while they are in a whirl cause them
to dash against and enter into one another, and so form hollows
surrounding the particles that enter-which watery vessels of air
(for a film of moisture, sometimes earthy, sometimes pure, is spread
around the air) are hollow spheres of water; and those of them which
are pure, are transparent, and are called bubbles, while those
composed of the earthy liquid, which is in a state of general
agitation and effervescence, are said to boil or ferment-of all
these affections the cause is termed acid. And there is the opposite
affection arising from an opposite cause, when the mass of entering
particles, immersed in the moisture of the mouth, is congenial to
the tongue, and smooths and oils over the roughness, and relaxes the
parts which are unnaturally contracted, and contracts the parts
which are relaxed, and disposes them all according to their
nature-that sort of remedy of violent affections is pleasant and
agreeable to every man, and has the name sweet. But enough of this.

  The faculty of smell does not admit of differences of kind; for
all smells are of a half formed nature, and no element is so
proportioned as to have any smell. The veins about the nose are too
narrow to admit earth and water, and too wide to detain fire and
air; and for this reason no one ever perceives the smell of any of
them; but smells always proceed from bodies that are damp, or
putrefying, or liquefying, or evaporating, and are perceptible only in
the intermediate state, when water is changing into air and air into
water; and all of them are either vapor or mist. That which is passing
out of air into water is mist, and that which is passing from water
into air is vapour; and hence all smells are thinner than water and
thicker than air. The proof of this is, that when there is any
obstruction to the respiration, and a man draws in his breath by
force, then no smell filters through, but the air without the smell
alone penetrates. Wherefore the varieties of smell have no name, and
they have not many, or definite and simple kinds; but they are
distinguished only painful and pleasant, the one sort irritating and
disturbing the whole cavity which is situated between the head and the
navel, the other having a soothing influence, and restoring this
same region to an agreeable and natural condition.

  In considering the third kind of sense, hearing, we must speak of
the causes in which it originates. We may in general assume sound to
be a blow which passes through the ears, and is transmitted by means
of the air, the brain, and the blood, to the soul, and that hearing is
the vibration of this blow, which begins in the head and ends in the
region of the liver. The sound which moves swiftly is acute, and the
sound which moves slowly is grave, and that which is regular is
equable and smooth, and the reverse is harsh. A great body of sound is
loud, and a small body of sound the reverse. Respecting the
harmonies of sound I must hereafter speak.

  There is a fourth class of sensible things, having many intricate
varieties, which must now be distinguished. They are called by the
general name of colours, and are a flame which emanates from every
sort of body, and has particles corresponding to the sense of sight. I
have spoken already, in what has preceded, of the causes which
generate sight, and in this place it will be natural and suitable to
give a rational theory of colours.

  Of the particles coming from other bodies which fall upon the sight,
some are smaller and some are larger, and some are equal to the
parts of the sight itself. Those which are equal are imperceptible,
and we call them transparent. The larger produce contraction, the
smaller dilation, in the sight, exercising a power akin to that of hot
and cold bodies on the flesh, or of astringent bodies on the tongue,
or of those heating bodies which we termed pungent. White and black
are similar effects of contraction and dilation in another sphere, and
for this reason have a different appearance. Wherefore, we ought to
term white that which dilates the visual ray, and the opposite of this
is black. There is also a swifter motion of a different sort of fire
which strikes and dilates the ray of sight until it reaches the
eyes, forcing a way through their passages and melting them, and
eliciting from them a union of fire and water which we call tears,
being itself an opposite fire which comes to them from an opposite
direction-the inner fire flashes forth like lightning, and the outer
finds a way in and is extinguished in the moisture, and all sorts of
colours are generated by the mixture. This affection is termed
dazzling, and the object which produces it is called bright and
flashing. There is another sort of fire which is intermediate, and
which reaches and mingles with the moisture of the eye without
flashing; and in this, the fire mingling with the ray of the moisture,
produces a colour like blood, to which we give the name of red. A
bright hue mingled with red and white gives the colour called
auburn. The law of proportion, however, according to which the several
colours are formed, even if a man knew he would be foolish in telling,
for he could not give any necessary reason, nor indeed any tolerable
or probable explanation of them. Again, red, when mingled with black
and white, becomes purple, but it becomes umber when the colours are
burnt as well as mingled and the black is more thoroughly mixed with
them. Flame colour is produced by a union of auburn and dun, and dun
by an admixture of black and white; pale yellow, by an admixture of
white and auburn. White and bright meeting, and falling upon a full
black, become dark blue, and when dark blue mingles with white, a
light blue colour is formed, as flame-colour with black makes leek
green. There will be no difficulty in seeing how and by what
mixtures the colours derived from these are made according to the
rules of probability. He, however, who should attempt to verify all
this by experiment, would forget the difference of the human and
divine nature. For God only has the knowledge and also the power which
are able to combine many things into one and again resolve the one
into many. But no man either is or ever will be able to accomplish
either the one or the other operation.

  These are the elements, thus of necessity then subsisting, which the
creator of the fairest and best of created things associated with
himself, when he made the self-sufficing and most perfect God, using
the necessary causes as his ministers in the accomplishment of his
work, but himself contriving the good in all his creations.
Wherefore we may distinguish two sorts of causes, the one divine and
the other necessary, and may seek for the divine in all things, as far
as our nature admits, with a view to the blessed life; but the
necessary kind only for the sake of the divine, considering that
without them and when isolated from them, these higher things for
which we look cannot be apprehended or received or in any way shared
by us.

  Seeing, then, that we have now prepared for our use the various
classes of causes which are the material out of which the remainder of
our discourse must be woven, just as wood is the material of the
carpenter, let us revert in a few words to the point at which we
began, and then endeavour to add on a suitable ending to the beginning
of our tale.

  As I said at first, when all things were in disorder God created
in each thing in relation to itself, and in all things in relation
to each other, all the measures and harmonies which they could
possibly receive. For in those days nothing had any proportion
except by accident; nor did any of the things which now have names
deserve to be named at all-as, for example, fire, water, and the
rest of the elements. All these the creator first set in order, and
out of them he constructed the universe, which was a single animal
comprehending in itself all other animals, mortal and immortal. Now of
the divine, he himself was the creator, but the creation of the mortal
he committed to his offspring. And they, imitating him, received
from him the immortal principle of the soul; and around this they
proceeded to fashion a mortal body, and. made it to be the vehicle
of the so and constructed within the body a soul of another nature
which was mortal, subject to terrible and irresistible
affections-first of all, pleasure, the greatest incitement to evil;
then, pain, which deters from good; also rashness and fear, two
foolish counsellors, anger hard to be appeased, and hope easily led
astray-these they mingled with irrational sense and with all-daring
love according to necessary laws, and so framed man. Wherefore,
fearing to pollute the divine any more than was absolutely
unavoidable, they gave to the mortal nature a separate habitation in
another part of the body, placing the neck between them to be the
isthmus and boundary, which they constructed between the head and
breast, to keep them apart. And in the breast, and in what is termed
the thorax, they encased the mortal soul; and as the one part of
this was superior and the other inferior they divided the cavity of
the thorax into two parts, as the women's and men's apartments are
divided in houses, and placed the midriff to be a wall of partition
between them. That part of the inferior soul which is endowed with
courage and passion and loves contention they settled nearer the head,
midway between the midriff and the neck, in order that it might be
under the rule of reason and might join with it in controlling and
restraining the desires when they are no longer willing of their own
accord to obey the word of command issuing from the citadel.

  The heart, the knot of the veins and the fountain of the blood which
races through all the limbs was set in the place of guard, that when
the might of passion was roused by reason making proclamation of any
wrong assailing them from without or being perpetrated by the
desires within, quickly the whole power of feeling in the body,
perceiving these commands and threats, might obey and follow through
every turn and alley, and thus allow the principle of the best to have
the command in all of them. But the gods, foreknowing that the
palpitation of the heart in the expectation of danger and the swelling
and excitement of passion was caused by fire, formed and implanted
as a supporter to the heart the lung, which was, in the first place,
soft and bloodless, and also had within hollows like the pores of a
sponge, in order that by receiving the breath and the drink, it
might give coolness and the power of respiration and alleviate the
heat. Wherefore they cut the air-channels leading to the lung, and
placed the lung about the heart as a soft spring, that, when passion
was rife within, the heart, beating against a yielding body, might
be cooled and suffer less, and might thus become more ready to join
with passion in the service of reason.

  The part of the soul which desires meats and drinks and the other
things of which it has need by reason of the bodily nature, they
placed between the midriff and the boundary of the navel, contriving
in all this region a sort of manger for the food of the body; and
there they bound it down like a wild animal which was chained up
with man, and must be nourished if man was to exist. They appointed
this lower creation his place here in order that he might be always
feeding at the manger, and have his dwelling as far as might be from
the council-chamber, making as little noise and disturbance as
possible, and permitting the best part to advise quietly for the
good of the whole. And knowing that this lower principle in man
would not comprehend reason, and even if attaining to some degree of
perception would never naturally care for rational notions, but that
it would be led away by phantoms and visions night and day-to be a
remedy for this, God combined with it the liver, and placed it in
the house of the lower nature, contriving that it should be solid
and smooth, and bright and sweet, and should also have a bitter
quality, in order that the power of thought, which proceeds from the
mind, might be reflected as in a mirror which receives likenesses of
objects and gives back images of them to the sight; and so might
strike terror into the desires, when, making use of the bitter part of
the liver, to which it is akin, it comes threatening and invading, and
diffusing this bitter element swiftly through the whole liver produces
colours like bile, and contracting every part makes it wrinkled and
rough; and twisting out of its right place and contorting the lobe and
closing and shutting up the vessels and gates, causes pain and
loathing. And the converse happens when some gentle inspiration of the
understanding pictures images of an opposite character, and allays the
bile and bitterness by refusing to stir or touch the nature opposed to
itself, but by making use of the natural sweetness of the liver,
corrects all things and makes them to be right and smooth and free,
and renders the portion of the soul which resides about the liver
happy and joyful, enabling it to pass the night in peace, and to
practise divination in sleep, inasmuch as it has no share in mind
and reason. For the authors of our being, remembering the command of
their father when he bade them create the human race as good as they
could, that they might correct our inferior parts and make them to
attain a measure of truth, placed in the liver the seat of divination.
And herein is a proof that God has given the art of divination not
to the wisdom, but to the foolishness of man. No man, when in his
wits, attains prophetic truth and inspiration; but when he receives
the inspired word, either his intelligence is enthralled in sleep,
or he is demented by some distemper or possession. And he who would
understand what he remembers to have been said, whether in a dream
or when he was awake, by the prophetic and inspired nature, or would
determine by reason the meaning of the apparitions which he has
seen, and what indications they afford to this man or that, of past,
present or future good and evil, must first recover his wits. But,
while he continues demented, he cannot judge of the visions which he
sees or the words which he utters; the ancient saying is very true,
that "only a man who has his wits can act or judge about himself and
his own affairs." And for this reason it is customary to appoint
interpreters to be judges of the true inspiration. Some persons call
them prophets; they are quite unaware that they are only the
expositors of dark sayings and visions, and are not to be called
prophets at all, but only interpreters of prophecy.

  Such is the nature of the liver, which is placed as we have
described in order that it may give prophetic intimations. During
the life of each individual these intimations are plainer, but after
his death the liver becomes blind, and delivers oracles too obscure to
be intelligible. The neighbouring organ [the spleen] is situated on
the left-hand side, and is constructed with a view of keeping the
liver bright and pure-like a napkin, always ready prepared and at hand
to clean the mirror. And hence, when any impurities arise in the
region of the liver by reason of disorders of the body, the loose
nature of the spleen, which is composed of a hollow and bloodless
tissue, receives them all and dears them away, and when filled with
the unclean matter, swells and festers, but, again, when the body is
purged, settles down into the same place as before, and is humbled.

  Concerning the soul, as to which part is mortal and which divine,
and how and why they are separated, and where located, if God
acknowledges that we have spoken the truth, then, and then only, can
we be confident; still, we may venture to assert that what has been
said by us is probable, and will be rendered more probable by
investigation. Let us assume thus much.

  The creation of the rest of follows next in order, and this we may
investigate in a similar manner. And it appears to be very meet that
the body should be framed on the following principles:-

  The authors of our race were aware that we should be intemperate
in eating and drinking, and take a good deal more than was necessary
or proper, by reason of gluttony. In order then that disease might not
quickly destroy us, and lest our mortal race should perish without
fulfilling its end-intending to provide against this, the gods made
what is called the lower belly, to be a receptacle for the superfluous
meat and drink, and formed the convolution of the bowels, so that
the food might be prevented from passing quickly through and
compelling the body to require more food, thus producing insatiable
gluttony, and making the whole race an enemy to philosophy and
music, and rebellious against the divinest element within us.

  The bones and flesh, and other similar parts of us, were made as
follows. The first principle of all of them was the generation of
the marrow. For the bonds of life which unite the soul with the body
are made fast there, and they are the root and foundation of the human
race. The marrow itself is created out of other materials: God took
such of the primary triangles as were straight and smooth, and were
adapted by their perfection to produce fire and water, and air and
earth-these, I say, he separated from their kinds, and mingling them
in due proportions with one another, made the marrow out of them to be
a universal seed of the whole race of mankind; and in this seed he
then planted and enclosed the souls, and in the original
distribution gave to the marrow as many and various forms as the
different kinds of souls were hereafter to receive. That which, like a
field, was to receive the divine seed, he made round every way, and
called that portion of the marrow, brain, intending that, when an
animal was perfected, the vessel containing this substance should be
the head; but that which was intended to contain the remaining and
mortal part of the soul he distributed into figures at once around and
elongated, and he called them all by the name "marrow"; and to
these, as to anchors, fastening the bonds of the whole soul, he
proceeded to fashion around them the entire framework of our body,
constructing for the marrow, first of all a complete covering of bone.

  Bone was composed by him in the following manner. Having sifted pure
and smooth earth he kneaded it and wetted it with marrow, and after
that he put it into fire and then into water, and once more into
fire and again into water-in this way by frequent transfers from one
to the other he made it insoluble by either. Out of this he fashioned,
as in a lathe, a globe made of bone, which he placed around the brain,
and in this he left a narrow opening; and around the marrow of the
neck and back he formed vertebrae which he placed under one another
like pivots, beginning at the head and extending through the whole
of the trunk. Thus wishing to preserve the entire seed, he enclosed it
in a stone-like casing, inserting joints, and using in the formation
of them the power of the other or diverse as an intermediate nature,
that they might have motion and flexure. Then again, considering
that the bone would be too brittle and inflexible, and when heated and
again cooled would soon mortify and destroy the seed within-having
this in view, he contrived the sinews and the flesh, that so binding
all the members together by the sinews, which admitted of being
stretched and relaxed about the vertebrae, he might thus make the body
capable of flexion and extension, while the flesh would serve as a
protection against the summer heat and against the winter cold, and
also against falls, softly and easily yielding to external bodies,
like articles made of felt; and containing in itself a warm moisture
which in summer exudes and makes the surface damp, would impart a
nature coolness to the whole body; and again in winter by the help
of this internal warmth would form a very tolerable defence against
the frost which surrounds it and attacks it from without. He who
modelled us, considering these things, mixed earth with fire and water
and blended them; and making a ferment of acid and salt, he mingled it
with them and formed soft and succulent flesh. As for the sinews, he
made them of a mixture of bone and unfermented flesh, attempered so as
to be in a mean, and gave them a yellow colour; wherefore the sinews
have a firmer and more glutinous nature than flesh, but a softer and
moister nature than the bones. With these God covered the bones and
marrow, binding them together by sinews, and then enshrouded them
all in an upper covering of flesh. The more living and sensitive of
the bones he enclosed in the thinnest film of flesh, and those which
had the least life within them in the thickest and most solid flesh.
So again on the joints of the bones, where reason indicated that no
more was required, he placed only a thin covering of flesh, that it
might not interfere with the flexion of our bodies and make them
unwieldy because difficult to move; and also that it might not, by
being crowded and pressed and matted together, destroy sensation by
reason of its hardness, and impair the memory and dull the edge of
intelligence. Wherefore also the thighs and the shanks and the hips,
and the bones of the arms and the forearms, and other parts which have
no joints, and the inner bones, which on account of the rarity of
the soul in the marrow are destitute of reason-all these are
abundantly provided with flesh; but such as have mind in them are in
general less fleshy, except where the creator has made some part
solely of flesh in order to give sensation-as, for example, the
tongue. But commonly this is not the case. For the nature which
comes into being and grows up in us by a law of necessity, does not
admit of the combination of solid bone and much flesh with acute
perceptions. More than any other part the framework of the head
would have had them, if they could have co-existed, and the human
race, having a strong and fleshy and sinewy head, would have had a
life twice or many times as long as it now has, and also more
healthy and free from pain.

  But our creators, considering whether they should make a
longer-lived race which was worse, or a shorter-lived race which was
better, came to the conclusion that every one ought to prefer a
shorter span of life, which was better, to a longer one, which was
worse; and therefore they covered the head with thin bone, but not
with flesh and sinews, since it had no joints; and thus the head was
added, having more wisdom and sensation than the rest of the body, but
also being in every man far weaker. For these reasons and after this
manner God placed the sinews at the extremity of the head, in a circle
round the neck, and glued them together by the principle of likeness
and fastened the extremities of the jawbones to them below the face,
and the other sinews he dispersed throughout the body, fastening
limb to limb. The framers of us framed the mouth, as now arranged,
having teeth and tongue and lips, with a view to the necessary and the
good, contriving the way in for necessary purposes, the way out for
the best purposes; for that is necessary which enters in and gives
food to the body; but the river of speech, which flows out of a man
and ministers to the intelligence, is the fairest and noblest of all
streams. Still the head could neither be left a bare frame of bones,
on account of the extremes of heat and cold in the different
seasons, nor yet be allowed to be wholly covered, and so become dull
and senseless by reason of an overgrowth of flesh. The fleshy nature
was not therefore wholly dried up, but a large sort of peel was parted
off and remained over, which is now called the skin. This met and grew
by the help of the cerebral moisture, and became the circular
envelopment of the head. And the moisture, rising up under the
sutures, watered and closed in the skin upon the crown, forming a sort
of knot. The diversity of the sutures was caused by the power of the
courses of the soul and of the food, and the more these struggled
against one another the more numerous they became, and fewer if the
struggle were less violent. This skin the divine power pierced all
round with fire, and out of the punctures which were thus made the
moisture issued forth, and the liquid and heat which was pure came
away, and a mixed part which was composed of the same material as
the skin, and had a fineness equal to the punctures, was borne up by
its own impulse and extended far outside the head, but being too
slow to escape, was thrust back by the external air, and rolled up
underneath the skin, where it took root. Thus the hair sprang up in
the skin, being akin to it because it is like threads of leather,
but rendered harder and closer through the pressure of the cold, by
which each hair, while in process of separation from the skin, is
compressed and cooled. Wherefore the creator formed the head hairy,
making use of the causes which I have mentioned, and reflecting also
that instead of flesh the brain needed the hair to be a light covering
or guard, which would give shade in summer and shelter in winter,
and at the same time would not impede our quickness of perception.
From the combination of sinew, skin, and bone, in the structure of the
finger, there arises a triple compound, which, when dried up, takes
the form of one hard skin partaking of all three natures, and was
fabricated by these second causes, but designed by mind which is the
principal cause with an eye to the future. For our creators well
knew that women and other animals would some day be framed out of men,
and they further knew that many animals would require the use of nails
for many purposes; wherefore they fashioned in men at their first
creation the rudiments of nails. For this purpose and for these
reasons they caused skin, hair, and nails to grow at the extremities
of the limbs. And now that all the parts and members of the mortal
animal had come together, since its life of necessity consisted of
fire and breath, and it therefore wasted away by dissolution and
depletion, the gods contrived the following remedy: They mingled a
nature akin to that of man with other forms and perceptions, and
thus created another kind of animal. These are the trees and plants
and seeds which have been improved by cultivation and are now
domesticated among us; anciently there were only the will kinds, which
are older than the cultivated. For everything that partakes of life
may be truly called a living being, and the animal of which we are now
speaking partakes of the third kind of soul, which is said to be
seated between the midriff and the navel, having no part in opinion or
reason or mind, but only in feelings of pleasure and pain and the
desires which accompany them. For this nature is always in a passive
state, revolving in and about itself, repelling the motion from
without and using its own, and accordingly is not endowed by nature
with the power of observing or reflecting on its own concerns.
Wherefore it lives and does not differ from a living being, but is
fixed and rooted in the same spot, having no power of self-motion.

  Now after the superior powers had created all these natures to be
food for us who are of the inferior nature, they cut various
channels through the body as through a garden, that it might be
watered as from a running stream. In the first place, they cut two
hidden channels or veins down the back where the skin and the flesh
join, which answered severally to the right and left side of the body.
These they let down along the backbone, so as to have the marrow of
generation between them, where it was most likely to flourish, and
in order that the stream coming down from above might flow freely to
the other parts, and equalise the irrigation. In the next place,
they divided the veins about the head, and interlacing them, they sent
them in opposite directions; those coming from the right side they
sent to the left of the body, and those from the left they diverted
towards the right, so that they and the skin might together form a
bond which should fasten the head to the body, since the crown of
the head was not encircled by sinews; and also in order that the
sensations from both sides might be distributed over the whole body.
And next, they ordered the water-courses of the body in a manner which
I will describe, and which will be more easily understood if we
begin by admitting that all things which have lesser parts retain
the greater, but the greater cannot retain the lesser. Now of all
natures fire has the smallest parts, and therefore penetrates
through earth and water and air and their compounds, nor can
anything hold it. And a similar principle applies to the human
belly; for when meats and drinks enter it, it holds them, but it
cannot hold air and fire, because the particles of which they
consist are smaller than its own structure.

  These elements, therefore, God employed for the sake of distributing
moisture from the belly into the veins, weaving together network of
fire and air like a weel, having at the entrance two lesser weels;
further he constructed one of these with two openings, and from the
lesser weels he extended cords reaching all round to the extremities
of the network. All the interior of the net he made of fire, but the
lesser weels and their cavity, of air. The network he took and
spread over the newly-formed animal in the following manner:-He let
the lesser weels pass into the mouth; there were two of them, and
one he let down by the air-pipes into the lungs, the other by the side
of the air-pipes into the belly. The former he divided into two
branches, both of which he made to meet at the channels of the nose,
so that when the way through the mouth did not act, the streams of the
mouth as well were replenished through the nose. With the other cavity
(i.e. of the greater weel) he enveloped the hollow parts of the
body, and at one time he made all this to flow into the lesser
weels, quite gently, for they are composed of air, and at another time
he caused the lesser weels to flow back again; and the net he made
to find a way in and out through the pores of the body, and the rays
of fire which are bound fast within followed the passage of the air
either way, never at any time ceasing so long as the mortal being
holds together. This process, as we affirm, the name-giver named
inspiration and expiration. And all this movement, active as well as
passive, takes place in order that the body, being watered and cooled,
may receive nourishment and life; for when the respiration is going in
and out, and the fire, which is fast bound within, follows it, and
ever and anon moving to and fro, enters through the belly and
reaches the meat and drink, it dissolves them, and dividing them
into small portions and guiding them through the passages where it
goes, pumps them as from a fountain into the channels of the veins,
and makes the stream of the veins flow through the body as through a
conduit.

  Let us once more consider the phenomena of respiration, and
enquire into the causes which have made it what it is. They are as
follows:-Seeing that there is no such thing as a vacuum into which any
of those things which are moved can enter, and the breath is carried
from us into the external air, the next point is, as will be dear to
every one, that it does not go into a vacant space, but pushes its
neighbour out of its place, and that which is thrust out in turn
drives out its neighbour; and in this everything of necessity at
last comes round to that place from whence the breath came forth,
and enters in there, and following the breath, fills up the vacant
space; and this goes on like the rotation of a wheel, because there
can be no such thing as a vacuum. Wherefore also the breast and the
lungs, when they emit the breath, are replenished by the air which
surrounds the body and which enters in through the pores of the
flesh and is driven round in a circle; and again, the air which is
sent away and passes out through the body forces the breath inwards
through the passage of the mouth and the nostrils. Now the origin of
this movement may be supposed to be as follows. In the interior of
every animal the hottest part is that which is around the blood and
veins; it is in a manner on internal fountain of fire, which we
compare to the network of a creel, being woven all of fire and
extended through the centre of the body, while the-outer parts are
composed of air. Now we must admit that heat naturally proceeds
outward to its own place and to its kindred element; and as there
are two exits for the heat, the out through the body, and the other
through the mouth and nostrils, when it moves towards the one, it
drives round the air at the other, and that which is driven round
falls into the fire and becomes warm, and that which goes forth is
cooled. But when the heat changes its place, and the particles at
the other exit grow warmer, the hotter air inclining in that direction
and carried towards its native element, fire, pushes round the air
at the other; and this being affected in the same way and
communicating the same impulse, a circular motion swaying to and
from is produced by the double process, which we call inspiration
and expiration.

  The phenomena of medical cupping-glasses and of the swallowing of
drink and of the projection of bodies, whether discharged in the air
or bowled along the ground, are to be investigated on a similar
principle; and swift and slow sounds, which appear to be high and low,
and are sometimes discordant on account of their inequality, and
then again harmonical on account of the equality of the motion which
they excite in us. For when the motions of the antecedent swifter
sounds begin to pause and the two are equalised, the slower sounds
overtake the swifter and then propel them. When they overtake them
they do not intrude a new and discordant motion, but introduce the
beginnings of a slower, which answers to the swifter as it dies
away, thus producing a single mixed expression out of high and low,
whence arises a pleasure which even the unwise feel, and which to
the wise becomes a higher sort of delight, being an imitation of
divine harmony in mortal motions. Moreover, as to the flowing of
water, the fall of the thunderbolt, and the marvels that are
observed about the attraction of amber and the Heraclean stones,-in
none of these cases is there any attraction; but he who investigates
rightly, will find that such wonderful phenomena are attributable to
the combination of certain conditions-the non-existence of a vacuum,
the fact that objects push one another round, and that they change
places, passing severally into their proper positions as they are
divided or combined

  Such as we have seen, is the nature and such are the causes of
respiration-the subject in which this discussion originated. For the
fire cuts the food and following the breath surges up within, fire and
breath rising together and filling the veins by drawing up out of
the belly and pouring into them the cut portions of the food; and so
the streams of food are kept flowing through the whole body in all
animals. And fresh cuttings from kindred substances, whether the
fruits of the earth or herb of the field, which God planted to be
our daily food, acquire all sorts of colours by their inter-mixture;
but red is the most pervading of them, being created by the cutting
action of fire and by the impression which it makes on a moist
substance; and hence the liquid which circulates in the body has a
colour such as we have described. The liquid itself we call blood,
which nourishes the flesh and the whole body, whence all parts are
watered and empty places filled.

  Now the process of repletion and evacuation is effected after the
manner of the universal motion by which all kindred substances are
drawn towards one another. For the external elements which surround us
are always causing us to consume away, and distributing and sending
off like to like; the particles of blood, too, which are divided and
contained within the frame of the animal as in a sort of heaven, are
compelled to imitate the motion of the universe. Each, therefore, of
the divided parts within us, being carried to its kindred nature,
replenishes the void. When more is taken away than flows in, then we
decay, and when less, we grow and increase.

  The frame of the entire creature when young has the triangles of
each kind new, and may be compared to the keel of a vessel which is
just off the stocks; they are locked firmly together and yet the whole
mass is soft and delicate, being freshly formed of marrow and nurtured
on milk. Now when the triangles out of which meats and drinks are
composed come in from without, and are comprehended in the body, being
older and weaker than the triangles already there, the frame of the
body gets the better of them and its newer triangles cut them up,
and so the animal grows great, being nourished by a multitude of
similar particles. But when the roots of the triangles are loosened by
having undergone many conflicts with many things in the course of
time, they are no longer able to cut or assimilate the food which
enters, but are themselves easily divided by the bodies which come
in from without. In this way every animal is overcome and decays,
and this affection is called old age. And at last, when the bonds by
which the triangles of the marrow are united no longer hold, and are
parted by the strain of existence, they in turn loosen the bonds of
the soul, and she, obtaining a natural release, flies away with joy.
For that which takes place according to nature is pleasant, but that
which is contrary to nature is painful. And thus death, if caused by
disease or produced by wounds, is painful and violent; but that sort
of death which comes with old age and fulfils the debt of nature is
the easiest of deaths, and is accompanied with pleasure rather than
with pain.

  Now every one can see whence diseases arise. There are four
natures out of which the body is compacted, earth and fire and water
and air, and the unnatural excess or defect of these, or the change of
any of them from its own natural place into another, or-since there
are more kinds than one of fire and of the other elements-the
assumption by any of these of a wrong kind, or any similar
irregularity, produces disorders and diseases; for when any of them is
produced or changed in a manner contrary to nature, the parts which
were previously cool grow warm, and those which were dry become moist,
and the light become heavy, and the heavy light; all sorts of
changes occur. For, as we affirm, a thing can only remain the same
with itself, whole and sound, when the same is added to it, or
subtracted from it, in the same respect and in the same manner and
in due proportion; and whatever comes or goes away in violation of
these laws causes all manner of changes and infinite diseases and
corruptions. Now there is a second class of structures which are
also natural, and this affords a second opportunity of observing
diseases to him who would understand them. For whereas marrow and bone
and flesh and sinews are composed of the four elements, and the blood,
though after another manner, is likewise formed out of them, most
diseases originate in the way which I have described; but the worst of
all owe their severity to the fact that the generation of these
substances stances in a wrong order; they are then destroyed. For
the natural order is that the flesh and sinews should be made of
blood, the sinews out of the fibres to which they are akin, and the
flesh out of the dots which are formed when the fibres are
separated. And the glutinous and rich matter which comes away from the
sinews and the flesh, not only glues the flesh to the bones, but
nourishes and imparts growth to the bone which surrounds the marrow;
and by reason of the solidity of the bones, that which filters through
consists of the purest and smoothest and oiliest sort of triangles,
dropping like dew from the bones and watering the marrow.

  Now when each process takes place in this order, health commonly
results; when in the opposite order, disease. For when the flesh
becomes decomposed and sends back the wasting substance into the
veins, then an over-supply of blood of diverse kinds, mingling with
air in the veins, having variegated colours and bitter properties,
as well as acid and saline qualities, contains all sorts of bile and
serum and phlegm. For all things go the wrong way, and having become
corrupted, first they taint the blood itself, and then ceasing to give
nourishment the body they are carried along the veins in all
directions, no longer preserving the order of their natural courses,
but at war with themselves, because they receive no good from one
another, and are hostile to the abiding constitution of the body,
which they corrupt and dissolve. The oldest part of the flesh which is
corrupted, being hard to decompose, from long burning grows black, and
from being everywhere corroded becomes bitter, and is injurious to
every part of the body which is still uncorrupted. Sometimes, when the
bitter element is refined away, the black part assumes an acidity
which takes the place of the bitterness; at other times the bitterness
being tinged with blood has a redder colour; and this, when mixed with
black, takes the hue of grass; and again, an auburn colour mingles
with the bitter matter when new flesh is decomposed by the fire
which surrounds the internal flame-to all which symptoms some
physician perhaps, or rather some philosopher, who had the power of
seeing in many dissimilar things one nature deserving of a name, has
assigned the common name of bile. But the other kinds of bile are
variously distinguished by their colours. As for serum, that sort
which is the watery part of blood is innocent, but that which is a
secretion of black and acid bile is malignant when mingled by the
power of heat with any salt substance, and is then called acid phlegm.

 Again, the substance which is formed by the liquefaction of new and
tender flesh when air is present, if inflated and encased in liquid so
as to form bubbles, which separately are invisible owing to their
small size, but when collected are of a bulk which is visible, and
have a white colour arising out of the generation of foam-all this
decomposition of tender flesh when inter-mingled with air is termed by
us white phlegm. And the whey or sediment of newly-formed phlegm is
sweat and tears, and includes the various daily discharges by which
the body is purified. Now all these become causes of disease when
the blood is not replenished in a natural manner by food and drink but
gains bulk from opposite sources in violation of the laws of nature.
When the several parts of the flesh are separated by disease, if the
foundation remains, the power of the disorder is only half as great,
and there is still a prospect of an easy recovery; but when that which
binds the flesh to the bones is diseased, and no longer being
separated from the muscles and sinews, ceases to give nourishment to
the bone and to unite flesh and bone, and from being oily and smooth
and glutinous becomes rough and salt and dry, owing to bad regimen,
then all the substance thus corrupted crumbles away under the flesh
and the sinews, and separates from the bone, and the fleshy parts fall
away from their foundation and leave the sinews bare and full of
brine, and the flesh again gets into the circulation of the blood
and makes the previously-mentioned disorders still greater. And if
these bodily affections be severe, still worse are the prior
disorders; as when the bone itself, by reason of the density of the
flesh, does not obtain sufficient air, but becomes mouldy and hot
and gangrened and receives no nutriment, and the natural process is
inverted, and the bone crumbling passes into the food, and the food
into the flesh, and the flesh again falling into the blood makes all
maladies that may occur more virulent than those already mentioned.
But the worst case of all is when the marrow is diseased, either
from excess or defect; and this is the cause of the very greatest
and most fatal disorders, in which the whole course of the body is
reversed.

  There is a third class of diseases which may be conceived of as
arising in three ways; for they are produced sometimes by wind, and
sometimes by phlegm, and sometimes by bile. When the lung, which is
the dispenser of the air to the body, is obstructed by rheums and
its passages are not free, some of them not acting, while through
others too much air enters, then the parts which are unrefreshed by
air corrode, while in other parts the excess of air forcing its way
through the veins distorts them and decomposing the body is enclosed
in the midst of it and occupies the midriff thus numberless painful
diseases are produced, accompanied by copious sweats. And oftentimes
when the flesh is dissolved in the body, wind, generated within and
unable to escape, is the source of quite as much pain as the air
coming in from without; but the greatest pain is felt when the wind
gets about the sinews and the veins of the shoulders, and swells
them up, so twists back the great tendons and the sinews which are
connected with them. These disorders are called tetanus and
opisthotonus, by reason of the tension which accompanies them. The
cure of them is difficult; relief is in most cases given by fever
supervening. The white phlegm, though dangerous when detained within
by reason of the air-bubbles, yet if it can communicate with the
outside air, is less severe, and only discolours the body,
generating leprous eruptions and similar diseases. When it is
mingled with black bile and dispersed about the courses of the head,
which are the divinest part of us, the attack if coming on in sleep,
is not so severe; but when assailing those who are awake it is hard to
be got rid of, and being an affection of a sacred part, is most justly
called sacred. An acid and salt phlegm, again, is the source of all
those diseases which take the form of catarrh, but they have many
names because the places into which they flow are manifold.

  Inflammations of the body come from burnings and inflamings, and all
of them originate in bile. When bile finds a means of discharge, it
boils up and sends forth all sorts of tumours; but when imprisoned
within, it generates many inflammatory diseases, above all when
mingled with pure blood; since it then displaces the fibres which
are scattered about in the blood and are designed to maintain the
balance of rare and dense, in order that the blood may not be so
liquefied by heat as to exude from the pores of the body, nor again
become too dense and thus find a difficulty in circulating through the
veins. The fibres are so constituted as to maintain this balance;
and if any one brings them all together when the blood is dead and
in process of cooling, then the blood which remains becomes fluid, but
if they are left alone, they soon congeal by reason of the surrounding
cold. The fibres having this power over the blood, bile, which is only
stale blood, and which from being flesh is dissolved again into blood,
at the first influx coming in little by little, hot and liquid, is
congealed by the power of the fibres; and so congealing and made to
cool, it produces internal cold and shuddering. When it enters with
more of a flood and overcomes the fibres by its heat, and boiling up
throws them into disorder, if it have power enough to maintain its
supremacy, it penetrates the marrow and burns up what may be termed
the cables of the soul, and sets her free; but when there is not so
much of it, and the body though wasted still holds out, the bile is
itself mastered, and is either utterly banished, or is thrust
through the veins into the lower or upper-belly, and is driven out
of the body like an exile from a state in which there has been civil
war; whence arise diarrhoeas and dysenteries, and all such
disorders. When the constitution is disordered by excess of fire,
continuous heat and fever are the result; when excess of air is the
cause, then the fever is quotidian; when of water, which is a more
sluggish element than either fire or air, then the fever is a tertian;
when of earth, which is the most sluggish of the four, and is only
purged away in a four-fold period, the result is a quartan fever,
which can with difficulty be shaken off.

  Such is the manner in which diseases of the body arise; the
disorders of the soul, which depend upon the body, originate as
follows. We must acknowledge disease of the mind to be a want of
intelligence; and of this there are two kinds; to wit, madness and
ignorance. In whatever state a man experiences either of them, that
state may be called disease; and excessive pains and pleasures are
justly to be regarded as the greatest diseases to which the soul is
liable. For a man who is in great joy or in great pain, in his
unseasonable eagerness to attain the one and to avoid the other, is
not able to see or to hear anything rightly; but he is mad, and is
at the time utterly incapable of any participation in reason. He who
has the seed about the spinal marrow too plentiful and overflowing,
like a tree overladen with fruit, has many throes, and also obtains
many pleasures in his desires and their offspring, and is for the most
part of his life deranged, because his pleasures and pains are so very
great; his soul is rendered foolish and disordered by his body; yet he
is regarded not as one diseased, but as one who is voluntarily bad,
which is a mistake. The truth is that the intemperance of love is a
disease of the soul due chiefly to the moisture and fluidity which
is produced in one of the elements by the loose consistency of the
bones. And in general, all that which is termed the incontinence of
pleasure and is deemed a reproach under the idea that the wicked
voluntarily do wrong is not justly a matter for reproach. For no man
is voluntarily bad; but the bad become bad by reason of an ill
disposition of the body and bad education, things which are hateful to
every man and happen to him against his will. And in the case of
pain too in like manner the soul suffers much evil from the body.
For where the acid and briny phlegm and other bitter and bilious
humours wander about in the body, and find no exit or escape, but
are pent up within and mingle their own vapours with the motions of
the soul, and are blended, with them, they produce all sorts of
diseases, more or fewer, and in every degree of intensity; and being
carried to the three places of the soul, whichever they may
severally assail, they create infinite varieties of ill-temper and
melancholy, of rashness and cowardice, and also of forgetfulness and
stupidity. Further, when to this evil constitution of body evil
forms of government are added and evil discourses are uttered in
private as well as in public, and no sort of instruction is given in
youth to cure these evils, then all of us who are bad become bad
from two causes which are entirely beyond our control. In such cases
the planters are to blame rather than the plants, the educators rather
than the educated. But however that may be, we should endeavour as far
as we can by education, and studies, and learning, to avoid vice and
attain virtue; this, however, is part of another subject.

  There is a corresponding enquiry concerning the mode of treatment by
which the mind and the body are to be preserved, about which it is
meet and right that I should say a word in turn; for it is more our
duty to speak of the good than of the evil. Everything that is good is
fair, and the animal fair is not without proportion, and the animal
which is to be fair must have due proportion. Now we perceive lesser
symmetries or proportions and reason about them, but of the highest
and greatest we take no heed; for there is no proportion or
disproportion more productive of health and disease, and virtue and
vice, than that between soul and body. This however we do not
perceive, nor do we reflect that when a weak or small frame is the
vehicle of a great and mighty soul, or conversely, when a little
soul is encased in a large body, then the whole animal is not fair,
for it lacks the most important of all symmetries; but the due
proportion of mind and body is the fairest and loveliest of all sights
to him who has the seeing eye. Just as a body which has a leg too
long, or which is unsymmetrical in some other respect, is an
unpleasant sight, and also, when doing its share of work, is much
distressed and makes convulsive efforts, and often stumbles through
awkwardness, and is the cause of infinite evil to its own self-in like
manner we should conceive of the double nature which we call the
living being; and when in this compound there is an impassioned soul
more powerful than the body, that soul, I say, convulses and fills
with disorders the whole inner nature of man; and when eager in the
pursuit of some sort of learning or study, causes wasting; or again,
when teaching or disputing in private or in public, and strifes and
controversies arise, inflames and dissolves the composite frame of man
and introduces rheums; and the nature of this phenomenon is not
understood by most professors of medicine, who ascribe it to the
opposite of the real cause. And once more, when body large and too
strong for the soul is united to a small and weak intelligence, then
inasmuch as there are two desires natural to man,-one of food for
the sake of the body, and one of wisdom for the sake of the diviner
part of us-then, I say, the motions of the stronger, getting the
better and increasing their own power, but making the soul dull, and
stupid, and forgetful, engender ignorance, which is the greatest of
diseases. There is one protection against both kinds of
disproportion:-that we should not move the body without the soul or
the soul without the body, and thus they will be on their guard
against each other, and be healthy and well balanced. And therefore
the mathematician or any one else whose thoughts are much absorbed
in some intellectual pursuit, must allow his body also to have due
exercise, and practise gymnastic; and he who is careful to fashion the
body, should in turn impart to the soul its proper motions, and should
cultivate music and all philosophy, if he would deserve to be called
truly fair and truly good. And the separate parts should be treated in
the same manner, in imitation of the pattern of the universe; for as
the body is heated and also cooled within by the elements which
enter into it, and is again dried up and moistened by external things,
and experiences these and the like affections from both kinds of
motions, the result is that the body if given up to motion when in a
state of quiescence is overmastered and perishes; but if any one, in
imitation of that which we call the foster-mother and nurse of the
universe, will not allow the body ever to be inactive, but is always
producing motions and agitations through its whole extent, which
form the natural defence against other motions both internal and
external, and by moderate exercise reduces to order according to their
affinities the particles and affections which are wandering about
the body, as we have already said when speaking of the universe, he
will not allow enemy placed by the side of enemy to stir up wars and
disorders in the body, but he will place friend by the side of friend,
so as to create health.

  Now of all motions that is the best which is produced in a thing
by itself, for it is most akin to the motion of thought and of the
universe; but that motion which is caused by others is not so good,
and worst of all is that which moves the body, when at rest, in
parts only and by some external agency. Wherefore of all modes of
purifying and reuniting the body the best is gymnastic; the next
best is a surging motion, as in sailing or any other mode of
conveyance which is not fatiguing; the third sort of motion may be
of use in a case of extreme necessity, but in any other will be
adopted by no man of sense: I mean the purgative treatment of
physicians; for diseases unless they are very dangerous should not
be irritated by medicines, since every form of disease is in a
manner akin to the living being, whose complex frame has an
appointed term of life. For not the whole race only, but each
individual-barring inevitable accidents-comes into the world having
a fixed span, and the triangles in us are originally framed with power
to last for a certain time, beyond which no man prolong his life.
And this holds also of the constitution of diseases; if any one
regardless of the appointed time tries to subdue them by medicine,
he only aggravates and multiplies them. Wherefore we ought always to
manage them by regimen, as far as a man can spare the time, and not
provoke a disagreeable enemy by medicines.

  Enough of the composite animal, and of the body which is a part of
him, and of the manner in which a man may train and be trained by
himself so as to live most according to reason: and we must above
and before all provide that the element which is to train him shall be
the fairest and best adapted to that purpose. A minute discussion of
this subject would be a serious task; but if, as before, I am to
give only an outline, the subject may not unfitly be summed up as
follows.

  I have often remarked that there are three kinds of soul located
within us, having each of them motions, and I must now repeat in the
fewest words possible, that one part, if remaining inactive and
ceasing from its natural motion, must necessarily become very weak,
but that which is trained and exercised, very strong. Wherefore we
should take care that the movements of the different parts of the soul
should be in due proportion.

  And we should consider that God gave the sovereign part of the human
soul to be the divinity of each one, being that part which, as we say,
dwells at the top of the body, inasmuch as we are a plant not of an
earthly but of a heavenly growth, raises us from earth to our
kindred who are in heaven. And in this we say truly; for the divine
power suspended the head and root of us from that place where the
generation of the soul first began, and thus made the whole body
upright. When a man is always occupied with the cravings of desire and
ambition, and is eagerly striving to satisfy them, all his thoughts
must be mortal, and, as far as it is possible altogether to become
such, he must be mortal every whit, because he has cherished his
mortal part. But he who has been earnest in the love of knowledge
and of true wisdom, and has exercised his intellect more than any
other part of him, must have thoughts immortal and divine, if he
attain truth, and in so far as human nature is capable of sharing in
immortality, he must altogether be immortal; and since he is ever
cherishing the divine power, and has the divinity within him in
perfect order, he will be perfectly happy. Now there is only one way
of taking care of things, and this is to give to each the food and
motion which are natural to it. And the motions which are naturally
akin to the divine principle within us are the thoughts and
revolutions of the universe. These each man should follow, and correct
the courses of the head which were corrupted at our birth, and by
learning the harmonies and revolutions of the universe, should
assimilate the thinking being to the thought, renewing his original
nature, and having assimilated them should attain to that perfect life
which the gods have set before mankind, both for the present and the
future.

  Thus our original design of discoursing about the universe down to
the creation of man is nearly completed. A brief mention may be made
of the generation of other animals, so far as the subject admits of
brevity; in this manner our argument will best attain a due
proportion. On the subject of animals, then, the following remarks may
be offered. Of the men who came into the world, those who were cowards
or led unrighteous lives may with reason be supposed to have changed
into the nature of women in the second generation. And this was the
reason why at that time the gods created in us the desire of sexual
intercourse, contriving in man one animated substance, and in woman
another, which they formed respectively in the following manner. The
outlet for drink by which liquids pass through the lung under the
kidneys and into the bladder, which receives then by the pressure of
the air emits them, was so fashioned by them as to penetrate also into
the body of the marrow, which passes from the head along the neck
and through the back, and which in the preceding discourse we have
named the seed. And the seed having life, and becoming endowed with
respiration, produces in that part in which it respires a lively
desire of emission, and thus creates in us the love of procreation.
Wherefore also in men the organ of generation becoming rebellious
and masterful, like an animal disobedient to reason, and maddened with
the sting of lust, seeks to gain absolute sway; and the same is the
case with the so-called womb or matrix of women; the animal within
them is desirous of procreating children, and when remaining
unfruitful long beyond its proper time, gets discontented and angry,
and wandering in every direction through the body, closes up the
passages of the breath, and, by obstructing respiration, drives them
to extremity, causing all varieties of disease, until at length the
desire and love of the man and the woman, bringing them together and
as it were plucking the fruit from the tree, sow in the womb, as in
a field, animals unseen by reason of their smallness and without form;
these again are separated and matured within; they are then finally
brought out into the light, and thus the generation of animals is
completed.

  Thus were created women and the female sex in general. But the
race of birds was created out of innocent light-minded men, who,
although their minds were directed toward heaven, imagined, in their
simplicity, that the clearest demonstration of the things above was to
be obtained by sight; these were remodelled and transformed into
birds, and they grew feathers instead of hair. The race of wild
pedestrian animals, again, came from those who had no philosophy in
any of their thoughts, and never considered at all about the nature of
the heavens, because they had ceased to use the courses of the head,
but followed the guidance of those parts of the soul which are in
the breast. In consequence of these habits of theirs they had their
front-legs and their heads resting upon the earth to which they were
drawn by natural affinity; and the crowns of their heads were
elongated and of all sorts of shapes, into which the courses of the
soul were crushed by reason of disuse. And this was the reason why
they were created quadrupeds and polypods: God gave the more senseless
of them the more support that they might be more attracted to the
earth. And the most foolish of them, who trail their bodies entirely
upon the ground and have no longer any need of feet, he made without
feet to crawl upon the earth. The fourth class were the inhabitants of
the water: these were made out of the most entirely senseless and
ignorant of all, whom the transformers did not think any longer worthy
of pure respiration, because they possessed a soul which was made
impure by all sorts of transgression; and instead of the subtle and
pure medium of air, they gave them the deep and muddy sea to be
their element of respiration; and hence arose the race of fishes and
oysters, and other aquatic animals, which have received the most
remote habitations as a punishment of their outlandish ignorance.
These are the laws by which animals pass into one another, now, as
ever, changing as they lose or gain wisdom and folly.

  We may now say that our discourse about the nature of the universe
has an end. The world has received animals, mortal and immortal, and
is fulfilled with them, and has become a visible animal containing the
visible-the sensible God who is the image of the intellectual, the
greatest, best, fairest, most perfect-the one only begotten heaven.

                              -THE END-
